`Sunnyside Cottage,
July
8, 1841.
`
My Dear Sir:
`
I have
not sooner replied to your letter of the eighteenth of June,
communicating
the intelligence of the untimely death of your brother, because in
fact I was at a loss how to reply. It is one of those cases in which all ordinary
attempts at consolation are apt to appear trite and cold, and can never reach
the deep-seated affliction. In such cases, it always appears to me better
to leave the heart to struggle with its own sorrows, and medicine its own ills;
and indeed, in healthful minds, as in healthful bodies, Providence has
beneficently
implanted self-healing qualities, that in time close up and almost
obliterate
the deepest wounds.
`I do not recollect to have met your brother more than once,
*
*
They
met in an official capacity, I believe, at the nuptials of an old and valued
friend of my brother's,
David Graham,
Esq., of New York. The interview is
pleasantly alluded to in one of the `Ollapodiana' chapters which
ensue.
but our
interview left a most favorable impression, which was confirmed and
strengthened
by all I afterward knew of him. His career, though brief, has been
useful, honorable, popular, and I trust generally happy; and he has left
behind
him writing which will make men love his memory and lament his loss.
Under such circumstances, a man has not lived in vain; and though his
death be premature, there is consolation to his survivors springing from
his very grave.
`Believe me, my dear sir,
`Yours very truly,
`Washington Irving
.
`L. Gaylord Clark,
Esq.'`
Of
the several excellent writers whose names we have placed upon our
catalogue as worthy of the honor we intend to do them (a series of portraits
of popular Philadelphia authors, accompanied by suitable notices of their
lives and works,) the first we select is that of
Willis Gaylord Clark,
whose
rare abilities as a poet, and whose qualities as a man, justify this distinction.
The life of a student is usually, almost necessarily, indeed, uneventful.
Disinclined
by habit and association, and generally unfitted by temperament, to
mingle in the ruder scenes, the shocks and conflicts that mark the periods
of sterner existence, his biography furnishes but few salient points upon
which an inquirer can take hold. In the little circle which his affections
have gathered around him, he finds abundant sources of enjoyment and
interest
;
and though the world without may ring with his name, he pursues his
quiet and peaceful way, undisturbed by, if not insensible to, its praises. Such
has been eminently the case with the subject of this notice. With feelings
peculiarly fitted for social and domestic intercourse, and a heart overflowing
with the warmest and most generous impulses; and a shrinking sensitiveness
to obtrusive public regard, Mr.
Clark
has always sought those scenes in
which, while his talents found free scope, his native modesty was unwounded,
and he could exercise without restraint the Joftier charities of his nature.
`Mr.
Clark
was born in Otisco, a rich agricultural town in the county of
Onondaga, in the State of New York. His father was a soldier in the days of
the revolution, whose valor and services won for him tributes of
acknowledgment
from the delegates of a grateful nation. He was, moreover, a man of
reading and talent, fond of collecting and studying useful books, and much
given to philosophical pursuits and inquiries. In his son
Willis
he found
an apt and anxious pupil; and the judicious teachings of the father, aided by
the classic inculcations of the Rev.
George Colton,
a maternal relative, laid
a broad and solid foundation for those acquirements which have since added
grace and vigor to the outpourings of genius. At a very early age, Mr.
Clark
manifested poetic inclinations. Amid the glorious scenery that was outspread
on every side of him, he soon began to feel the yearnings of his Divine nature.
The spirit that was within him, stimulated by the magnificence of these
external
objects, could not be repressed; and he painted the beauties of plain
and mountain; of the flower-clad valley and the forest-crowned hill; of the
gorgeous going down of the sun amid a profusion of dazzling tints and hues
such as nowhere else accompanied his setting; of the rich and vari-colored
autumnal foliage that shone in melancholy brightness; of the clear lake,
whose unruffled bosom was placid as the soul of peace; in terms so
glowing
,
and with a distinctness and force, that showed an eye so quick to
perceive
,
and a mind so capable to appreciate, the loveliness of creation, that
it at once secured to him praise and admiration. As he grew older, there was
mingled with this exquisite power of description a tone of gentle solemnity,
a delicate sadness of thought; a strain of seriousness such as showed a
paramount
desire to gather from the scenes and images reflected through his
poetical
faculties, useful lessons of morality. We remember very well when
our attention was first drawn to his productions, and he was then but a boy,
that we were impressed with the fact just mentioned; and we admired that
one so young, should thus address himself directly to the hearts of his
readers
,
and stir up within them founts of tenderness and piety.
`After completing his scholastic course, Mr.
Clark
repaired to
Philadelphia
,
whither his reputation as a poet of much skill and a high degree of
promise, had already preceded him. Soon after his arrival, under the
auspices
of the Rev. Dr.
Ely,
his patron and friend, he started a literary
journal
,
similar in its design and character to the `Mirror' of New York. Young,
inexperienced, and therefore incapable of managing the business details of
this undertaking with the necessary regard to its economy, he found that the
profits were disproportioned to the labor, and was soon induced to abandon
it. He conducted it, however, long enough to show that his powers of
writing
were not confined to poetry alone, but that in various departments of prose
literature, previously unattempted by him, he possessed great aptitude; and
his criticisms on books and the arts indicated a vigorous and well-disciplined
taste, considerable power of analysis, just discrimination, and above all, a
generous forbearance toward all who were the subjects of his commentaries.
About the time this project failed, the Rev. Dr.
Brantley,
a Baptist
clergyman
of great eminence, then in the pastoral charge of a church in this
city, and now President of the College of South Carolina
*
*
This
institution subsequently bestowed upon Mr.
Clark
the honorary degree of
Bachelor of Arts.
assumed the care
of the `Columbian Star,' a religious and literary periodical, and associated
Mr.
Clark
with him in its conduct. From this connection Mr.
Clark
derived
many advantages. To an intellect of the very highest order; a copious
supply of various and rare learning; an eloquence which illuminated
whatever
it was applied to; a remarkable purity and clearness of style, and the
most vigorous habits of thought, Dr.
Brantley
united a spirit touched with
the finest impulses of humanity, and an affability of demeanor, which, while
it imparted grace to his manner, made him in all circumstances, easy and
accessible. Upon his young friend and associate, these qualities acting with
a sympathetic influence, produced a lasting and most salutary impression.
The counsels of the divine pointed him to the path in which he ought to
tread; the example of the scholar inspired him with a generous emulation
and the mild benevolence of the Christian gentleman taught him the
importance
of cultivating benignity of temper, and of subduing all untoward
passions. While he was connected with the `Columbian Star,' Mr.
Clark
published numerous fugitive pieces of a high grade of merit. Most of these
he suffered to remain uncollected, though many of them were stamped with
all the marks of genius. A few were afterward published in a duodecimo
volume, along with a poem of considerable length, called the `Spirit of Life,'
originally prepared as an exercise for a collegiate exhibition.
`Mr.
Clark,
after an agreeable and instructive association with the
reverend
editor of the `Columbian Star,' was solicited to take charge of the
`Philadelphia Gazette,' the oldest and one of the most respectable daily
journals
published in this city. With this solicitation he saw proper to comply,
and from the grateful cultivation of polite literature, he turned to the dry
and fatiguing duty of superintending the multifarious concerns of a political,
commercial, and advertising newspaper. In his new vocation, he acquitted
himself with credit and honor, and ultimately became the proprietor of the
establishment, which he continued to manage and direct until within a few
days of his death. Though avowedly partisan in his predilections, and doing
battle in good earnest for the cause which he espoused, Mr.
Clark
never
sacrificed his own opinions to any question or suggestion of expediency.
Never slavish, never even submissive to the dictates of self-assumed
authority
,
he upon all occasions preserved a fair, free, and upright policy, which
deservedly
placed him high in the estimation of all honest and independent men.
`In 1836, Mr.
Clark
was married to
Anne Poyntell Caldcleugh,
the
daughter of one of our most wealthy and respectable citizens. In this lady
great personal beauty and varied accomplishments were joined to a most
tender and affectionate disposition, a meekness and serenity of mind, that
nothing could disturb. With such qualities in his bride, qualities that found
an answering echo in his own bosom, the married career of Mr.
Clark
was
for a time one of unclouded sunshine. Unhappily, his wife, whose
constitution
was naturally delicate, was seized with that most terrible disease of
our climate, consumption, and after a long period of protracted suffering,
which she bore with a meekness and gentleness that endeared her
infinitely
to her friends, she was taken away in the very prime of her youth
and happiness. A blow like this fell with a crushing weight upon the hopes
and enjoyments of her surviving partner; and in various tributes to her
memory, he evinced the deep grief of his afflicted spirit.
`Of Mr.
Clark's
general merits as a poet but one opinion can be
entertained
.
In the sweetness of his numbers, the elegance of his diction, the
propriety of his sentiments, and the chasteness of his imagery, he is scarcely
surpassed by any living writer. His earlier productions, as we have already
said, are all tinged by a hue of sadness, but it is a sadness without gloom;
and while they vividly portray the chances and changes of life, and the
shifting
aspects of nature, they inculcate the important truth that there is a higher
and a better world, for which our affections are chastened, and our
desires
made perfect by suffering. In an extended notice of Mr.
Clark's
writings, published in the `American Quarterly Review,' we find a concise
and forcible delineation of his peculiarities and style. After some general
remarks, the reviewer says:
`
With
the exception of a small volume published some years since, we believe that
Mr.
Clark's
effusions have not been collected. They have appeared at irregular and
often remote intervals; and though their beauty and pathos have won the applause of
the first writers of this country and England, they have not made that impression
which if united they could not fail to produce. Mr.
Clark's
distinguishing traits are
tenderness, pathos, and melody. In style and sentiment he is wholly original, but if
he resemble any writer, it is Mr.
Bryant
. The same lofty tone of sentiment, the
same touches of melting pathos, the same refined sympathies with the beauties and
harmonies of nature, and the same melody of style, characterise, in an almost equal
degree, these delightful poets. The ordinary tone of Mr.
Clark's
poetry is gentle,
solemn, and tender. Ilis effusions flow in melody from a heart full of the sweetest
affections
,
and upon their surface is mirrored all that is gentle and beautiful in nature,
rendered more beautiful by the light of a lofty and religious imagination. He is one
of the few writers who have succeeded in making the
poetry of religion
attractive.
Young is sad, and austere, Cowper is at times constrained, and Wordsworth is much
too dreamy for the mass; but with
Clark
religion is unaffectedly blended with the
simplest and sweetest affections of the heart. His poetry glitters with the dew, not
of Castaly, but of heaven. No man, however cold, can resist the winning and natural
sweetness and melody of the tone of piety that pervades his poems. All the voices
of nature speak to him of religion; he
`Finds tongues in trees, books in the running brooks,
Sermons in stones, and good in everything.'
There is not an effusion, and scarce a line in his poetical writings that is not replete
with this spirit. The entire absence of affectation or artifice in Mr.
Clark's
poetry
also deserves the highest commendation. Though always poetical he is always
natural
;
he sacrifices nothing for effect, and does not seek his subjects or his figures from
the startling or the extravagant. There is an uniform and uninterrupted propriety in
his writings. His taste is not merely cultivated and refined, but sensitively fastidious,
and shrinks, with instinctive delicacy, from anything that could distort the tranquil
and tender beauty of his lines. His diction is neither quaint nor common-place,
bloated
nor tame, but is natural, classic, and expressive. In the art of versification, he
appears
to be nearly perfect; we know no poet in the language who is more regular,
animated
,
and euphonious.
`The Spirit of Life' is one of the most labored, though certainly not the most
successful
of Mr.
Clark's
poems. It occupies the larger portion of the only volume
which he has given to the public. The dedication, though we confess it is not
precisely
to our taste, is euthusiastic and fervid. It is excused, however, by the general
admiration at that time manifested for the author of Pelham, and was perhaps due as
a grateful tribute to a distinguished author, who had previously spoken of his poems
in high terms, and of himself as a gentlemen, `who has an enviable genius, to be
excited
in a new and unexhausted country, and a glorious career before him, where, in
manners, scenery, and morals, hitherto undescribed and unexhausted, he can find
wells where he himself may be the first to drink.'
`As a prose writer, Mr.
Clark
possesses a rare combination of dissimilar qualities.
At times eloquent, vehement, and impussioned, pouring out his thoughts in a fervent
tide of strong and stirring language, he sweeps the feelings of his readers along with
him, and at others playful, jocular, and buoyant, he dallies with his subject, and
mingles
mirth and argument, drollery and gravity, so oddly, yet so aptly, that the effect
is irresistible. Few men have a more acute perception of the ludicrous; few
understand
better how to move the strings of laughter, and when he chooses to indulge in
strains of humor, his good-natured jests, and `quips and cranks and wanton wiles,' show
the fullness of his powers, and the benevolent strain of his feelings. In kindness and
pathos, when such is the bent of his inclination, his prose essays are not inferior to
his poetical compositions.'
`Mr.
Clark
was for many years a liberal contributor to the periodical and
annual
literature of this country. He was also a frequent correspondent of
the leading English magazines. `The tales and essays,' says the author of
`The Poets and Poetry of America,' `which he found leisure to write for
the New York
Knickerbocker
Magazine, and especially a series of
amusing
papers under the quaint title of `
Ollapodiana,
' will long be
remembered
for their heart-moving and mirth-provoking qualities.'`
With
the exception of a small volume published some years since, we believe that
Mr.
Clark's
effusions have not been collected. They have appeared at irregular and
often remote intervals; and though their beauty and pathos have won the applause of
the first writers of this country and England, they have not made that impression
which if united they could not fail to produce. Mr.
Clark's
distinguishing traits are
tenderness, pathos, and melody. In style and sentiment he is wholly original, but if
he resemble any writer, it is Mr.
Bryant
. The same lofty tone of sentiment, the
same touches of melting pathos, the same refined sympathies with the beauties and
harmonies of nature, and the same melody of style, characterise, in an almost equal
degree, these delightful poets. The ordinary tone of Mr.
Clark's
poetry is gentle,
solemn, and tender. Ilis effusions flow in melody from a heart full of the sweetest
affections
,
and upon their surface is mirrored all that is gentle and beautiful in nature,
rendered more beautiful by the light of a lofty and religious imagination. He is one
of the few writers who have succeeded in making the
poetry of religion
attractive.
Young is sad, and austere, Cowper is at times constrained, and Wordsworth is much
too dreamy for the mass; but with
Clark
religion is unaffectedly blended with the
simplest and sweetest affections of the heart. His poetry glitters with the dew, not
of Castaly, but of heaven. No man, however cold, can resist the winning and natural
sweetness and melody of the tone of piety that pervades his poems. All the voices
of nature speak to him of religion; he
`Finds tongues in trees, books in the running brooks,
Sermons in stones, and good in everything.'
There is not an effusion, and scarce a line in his poetical writings that is not replete
with this spirit. The entire absence of affectation or artifice in Mr.
Clark's
poetry
also deserves the highest commendation. Though always poetical he is always
natural
;
he sacrifices nothing for effect, and does not seek his subjects or his figures from
the startling or the extravagant. There is an uniform and uninterrupted propriety in
his writings. His taste is not merely cultivated and refined, but sensitively fastidious,
and shrinks, with instinctive delicacy, from anything that could distort the tranquil
and tender beauty of his lines. His diction is neither quaint nor common-place,
bloated
nor tame, but is natural, classic, and expressive. In the art of versification, he
appears
to be nearly perfect; we know no poet in the language who is more regular,
animated
,
and euphonious.
`The Spirit of Life' is one of the most labored, though certainly not the most
successful
of Mr.
Clark's
poems. It occupies the larger portion of the only volume
which he has given to the public. The dedication, though we confess it is not
precisely
to our taste, is euthusiastic and fervid. It is excused, however, by the general
admiration at that time manifested for the author of Pelham, and was perhaps due as
a grateful tribute to a distinguished author, who had previously spoken of his poems
in high terms, and of himself as a gentlemen, `who has an enviable genius, to be
excited
in a new and unexhausted country, and a glorious career before him, where, in
manners, scenery, and morals, hitherto undescribed and unexhausted, he can find
wells where he himself may be the first to drink.'
`As a prose writer, Mr.
Clark
possesses a rare combination of dissimilar qualities.
At times eloquent, vehement, and impussioned, pouring out his thoughts in a fervent
tide of strong and stirring language, he sweeps the feelings of his readers along with
him, and at others playful, jocular, and buoyant, he dallies with his subject, and
mingles
mirth and argument, drollery and gravity, so oddly, yet so aptly, that the effect
is irresistible. Few men have a more acute perception of the ludicrous; few
understand
better how to move the strings of laughter, and when he chooses to indulge in
strains of humor, his good-natured jests, and `quips and cranks and wanton wiles,' show
the fullness of his powers, and the benevolent strain of his feelings. In kindness and
pathos, when such is the bent of his inclination, his prose essays are not inferior to
his poetical compositions.'`
Our
brother is no more!'
Death,
the pale messenger, has beckoned
him silently away; and the spirit which kindled with so many elevated
thoughts; which explored the chambers of human affection, and awakened
so many warm sympathies; which rejoiced with the glad, and grieved with
the sorrowing, has ascended to mansions of eternal repose. And there is
one,
reader, who above all others feels how much gentleness of soul, how
much fraternal affection and sincere friendship; how much joyous bilarity,
goodness, poetry, have gone out of the world; and he will be pardoned for
dwelling in these pages, so often enriched by the genius of the Departed,
upon the closing scenes of his earthly career. Since nearly a twelve-month
the deceased has `died daily' in the eyes of the writer of this feeble tribute.
He saw that Disease sat at his heart, and was gnawing at its cruel leisure;
that in the maturity of every power, in the earthly perfection of every
faculty
;
`when experience had given facility to action and success to endeavor,'
he was fast going down to darkness and the worm. Thenceforth were
treasured
up every soul-fraught epistle and the recollection of each recurring
interview, growing more and more frequent, until at length Life like a spent
steed `panted to its goal,' and Death sealed up the glazing eye and stilled
the faltering tongue. Leaving these, however, with many other treasured
remains and biographical facts for future reference and preservation in this
Magazine, we pass to the following passages of a letter recently received
from a late but true friend of the lamented deceased, Rev. Dr.
Ducachet,
Rector of St. Stephen's Church, Philadelphia; premising merely, that the
reverend gentleman had previously called upon him at his special instance,
in the last note he ever penned; that `his religious faith was manifested in
a manner so solemn, so frank, and so cordial,' as to convince the affectionate
pastor that the failing invalid, aware that he must die of the illness under
which he was suffering, had long been seeking divine assistance to prepare
him for the issue so near at hand:
`At four o'clock on Friday
p. m.
the day before his death, I saw him
again, he himself having selected the time, thinking that he was strongest
in the afternoon. But there was an evident change for the worse; and he
was laboring under fever. His religious feelings were however even more
satisfactory, and his views more clear, than the day before. He assured me
that he enjoyed a sweet peace in his mind, and that he had no
apprehension
about death. He was `ready to depart' at any moment. I was
unwilling
to disturb him by much talking, or a very long visit, and made several
attempts to leave him; but in the most affectionate and pressing manner,
not to be resisted, he urged me to remain. His heart seemed full of joy and
peace; overflowing with gratitude to
God
for his goodness, and with
kindness
to me. Leaving him, after an hour's interview, I promised to return
on Saturday
a.m.,
at ten o'clock, and to administer baptism to him then. This
was done accordingly, in the presence of his father-in-law, and three or four
other friends and connexions, whom he had summoned to his bed, as he
told me, for the express purpose of letting them see his determination to
profess the faith of the gospel which in life he had so long neglected. It
was a solemn, moving sight; one of the most interesting and affecting I ever
saw. More devotion, humility, and placid confidence in
God,
I never saw
in any sick man. I mentioned to him that as his strength was evidently
declining
,
it would be well for him to say every thing he desired to say to me
then, as his voice and his faculties might fail. He then affectionately placed
his arms around my neck; gently drew my ear near to his lips, that I might
hear his whispers; and after thanking me over and over again for my small
attentions to him, which his gratitude magnified into very high services, he
proceeded to tell me what he wished done with his `poor body.' He
expressed
very great anxiety to see
you,
and he very much feared that he should
die before your expected arrival at midnight. But he said he left that
matter
and every other to
God
's disposal. As I was leaving him, he said, `Call
again to-day,' which I promised to do in the evening. He told me he felt a
happy persuasion that when he passed from this miserable world and that
enfeebled body, he should enter upon `the inheritance incorruptible,
undefiled
,
and that fadeth not away.' He asked: `Do you observe how these
words labor to convey the idea of Heaven's blessedness to our feeble minds?
`The inheritance
incorruptible!
' Beautiful thought! `
Undefiled
'more
beautiful still! `
That fadeth not away
'most beautiful of all! I think I
understand something of the peace and glory these redoubled words were
designed to express.' And then, raising his wasted hand, with great
emphasis
he said, `I shall soon know all about it, I trust!'
`In the evening, about seven o'clock, I received a message from him to
come immediately to him. I was there by eight. I was surprised to find
that he had rallied so much. There was a strength I had not seen before;
and his fine open features were lighted up with unusual brilliancy. In every
way he seemed better; and I flattered myself that he would live to see you,
and even hold out for a day or two more. I had much charming
conversation
with him about his state of feeling, his views of himself as a sinner,
and of
God,
and of
Jesus Christ
as a precious Saviour, and of heaven, etc.
He then handed me a prayer-book, adding, `That was my
Anne
's,'
meaning
his wife's. `Now read me the office for the sick in this book. I want
the whole of it. I have read it myself over and over, since you pointed it
out to me, and it is delightful.' He then repeated the sentence, `I know
that my Redeemer liveth, and that he shall stand in the latter day upon the
earth,' and asked if that was not a part of it. I told him that that belonged
to the
burial service
. `Then,' said he, `it is quite suitable for me, for it will
soon be read by you over my grave.' I sat by his bed, and found the place.
Waiting in silence to receive his signal to begin, I thought he was engaged
in secret prayer, and was unwilling to interrupt him. But he remained
silent
so long, seeming to take no notice of me, that I spoke to him. I found
that his mind was wandering, and that speech had failed. He muttered
indistinctly
only. From that moment, he sank gradually away. His
emaciated
limbs were retracted and cold; his pulse failed; the shadow of death
gathered fast and dark upon his countenance; his respiration became feebler
and feebler; and at last, at precisely five minutes past ten, he died. So
imperceptibly
and gently did his happy spirit flee away, that it was some time
before we could ascertain that he had gone. I never saw a gentler death.
There was no pain, no distress, no shuddering, no violent disruption of the
ties of life. Both as to the mind's peace and the body's composure, it was
a beautiful instance of
. The change which indicated the approach
of his last moment, took place about half an hour only before he died.
Such, my dear Sir, are all the chief particulars I can remember, and which
I have thought you would desire to know.'`
He
was, so far as his character revealed itself to me, a man of a most
noble, frank, and generous nature. He was as humble as a little child. He
exhibited throughout most remarkable patience. He never complained.
But once, while I was on bended knees, praying with him for patience to be
given him, and acknowledging that all he had suffered was for the best, he
clasped his hands together, and exclaimed, `Yes! right, rightall right!'
... He was one of the most affectionate-hearted men I ever saw. Every
moment I spent with him, he was doing or saying something to express to me
his attachment. He would take my hand, or put his arm around my neck,
or say something tender, to tell me that he loved me. He showed the same
kind feeling to his attendants, his faithful nurse,
Rebecca,
and to the
humblest
of the servants.... He was of course, with such a heart, grateful
for the smallest attentions. He received the most trifling office with thanks.
I observed this most remarkably on the evening of his death. I had taken
my son with me, that he might sit up with him on Saturday night, if
occasion
should require. When I mentioned that the youth was in the room, he
called for him; welcomed him most kindly, thanked him over and over for
his friendly intentions; and in fact, broke out into the warmest expressions of
gratitude for what his sensitive and generous heart took to be a high act of
favor. All this was within an hour and a half of his death.... Finally,
I believe he was a truly religious man. I have no doubt that he was fully
prepared for his end; and that through the sacrifice of the cross, and the
Saviour who died there for sinners, he was pardoned and accepted. He has
gone, I feel persuaded, to the abodes of peace, where the souls of those who
sleep in the
Lord Jesus
enjoy perpetual felicity and rest.'THE
LITERARY REMAINS,
ETC., ETC.
OLLAPODIANA.
NUMBER ONE.
March,
1835.
Good Reader,
let us have a talk together. Sit you down
with benevolent optics, and a kindly heart, and I doubt not that
we shall pass an hour right pleasantly, one with another.
Pleasantly
,
in part, but in part it may be, sadly; for you know it is
with conversation, as with life; it taketh various colors, and is
changing evermore. So we will expect these changes, and meet
them as they come. Sometimes we shall be in the cheerful vein,
and at others, in that
subjunctive
mood which conquers the jest on
the lip, and holds Humor in bonds. But for `gude or ill,' I
shall desire you to sit with me. In the voices of Mirth, there
may be excitement, but in the tones of Mourning there is
consolation
.
So I think, dear reader, as I write this last sentence, and tell
you melancholy tidings.
Charles Lamb
is dead! Yes, the
mild, the gentle
Lamb,
is gathered at last, pure as the innocent,
simple object that syllables his name, into the fold of God!
*
*
Charles Lamb,
the author of `
Elia,
' and one of the sweetest and most
graphic writers of the present era, died in London in
December.
Perfect Creator of rich conceitscharming Architect of Periods,
whose delicate aroma, like balm from Gilead, yet loiters around
me!`how shall I mourn thee?' Reader, I hope you knew
him, in that fond acquaintance which Authorship establishes
between
a writer and his admirers. What an Essayist was he!
How shrewd in observationhow discriminative of the burlesque
how quaint, yet melodious in dictionin expression, how
varied!
Who
ever rose from his pages, without brighter thoughts
and softer feelings? If any one, let him distrust his heart, and
acquire new perceptions; for in my sense, 't is better he should
have no perceptions, than be in the possession of qualities that
can not enable him to discern the merits of Lamb; the
contemplative
graduate of `Christ's,' at Oxford, who could fling the
lustre
of his serene and goodly mind over every object; who trailed
the flowery vines of Poetry along the formal walks of Prose,
until the scene brightened like a garden to the vision, and the
air was redolent of celestial odors!
When
will his place be filled
again? What hand may renew the leaves of `Elia,' fresher and
greener than those of Spring? What dainty finger will trace
that fair charactery of life, on foolscap or vellum more? Alas,
dear reader, I fear me, none. How fine a scholar, too, was he!
None of your plodding quoters of Greek and Latin, with
sentences
longer than the longest Alexandrine, and a style rougher than
the wave by Charybdis; but clear as the sky of May, and smooth
as the susurrations of a stream in Eden. O gentle Lamb! My
heart could well indite, were my harp strung deftly for so sad a
theme, a flood of mournful eulogy at thy departure. What could
reconcile me to the truth that thou art indeed to more, but the
sublime and most comfortable assurance, that what is loss to
those who love thy memory, is but immortal gain to thee!
Lamb excelled as a writer, (though it was not his profession,)
better than nine in ten, because he made the best sources of the
language his study and his enjoyment. He walked with the
god-like
spirits of old English literature, like a compeer among his
fellows; he sat him down beneath the royal and purple shadows
of their mighty mantles, and ate of the manna which descended
around. How numerous and how worthy were his intellectual
companions! Shakspeare was his bosom friend; and with
Chaucer
,
Sidney, Warwick, Spenser, Overbury, Brown, and Walton,
he `strayed among the fields, hearing as it were the voice of
God
.'
Yet Lamb had his carping critics, and mayhap his delicious
sentences were often caviare to the million. But they will live
and be cherished, when we are no more. Every age to come
will possess a fitting audience, but
not
a few, that shall wear him
pre-eminent in their approval, and venerate his name.
I will not consent to speak of the degenerated taste of modern
times, until the comments on Shakspeare, the passages of Elia,
or the pure nature of Elizabeth Woodville shall be forgotten;
and then, I will lament more in sorrow than in anger. I shall
begin then to think, that the well of English undefiled has become
polluted into a polyglott cistern; that its freshness has departed;
and that, for the spirits who love it, it will well no more, except
from those rare and secluded fountains, the Elder Libraries,
tasted but seldom, and heard of by few.
Charles Lamb had no common mind. It was exquisitely
gentle, but its simple delineations were ever true to life, and
therefore strong. His pen was imbued with the humor of a
Cruikshank, yet he was no caricaturist, and never distorted.
Even amidst the cold and calculating details of the India House,
his fancy was ever exuberant: yet he never outraged probability
in the pursuit of his bent; he travelled not out of his path for
humor: it dropped like running water from his pen. In happy
words, and forms of speech, he was lord of the ascendant. I do
confess myself his warm admirer; and I deplore his exit, not as
one who grieves without hope: for though he is lost to lands
below
the sun, he has proceeded to set up his everlasting rest in a
better country, where the day does not darken, and Death hangs
no cloud. In all things a lover of purity, he has gone at last,
full of years and ripe in wisdom, where all is pureamong the
troops of shining ones, in the heavenly Jerusalem.
Talking
of Jerusalem, reminds meodd coincidence!
of Rapelje's Narrative. That handsome volume, from the pen
of a fellow townsman, contains many an instructive and pleasant
page. But it is the misfortune of the traveller, I think, that he
has been too negligent in his records. When he sojourns in
France or Italy, we are sure that what he says is the truth, even
to the purchase of a night-cap; but when he quotes the language,
we perceive at once, that he gathers his orthography from his
ear. He speaks for example, of the
Save
(Sevres) China
Manufactory
near Paris. Now, `
Save
China,' is very well, as an
admonitory
phrase of household conomy; but in any other sense,
especially when used as a proper name, it is at least radically
wrong, in everything but sound. In Rome, our author lodged
in
Strada-street
. He
may
have done so: but I guess he
mistook
the name. Strada is street in Italian, they tell me, as also
is via; and I was forcibly reminded by this presumptive error,
of the remark made by an American sailor, in a letter addressed
to a friend, from Paris, during the famous
trois jours,
wherein he
describes a man whom he `
seen,
with skase the valey of a rag on
his back, running down
Rue-street,
and yelling `
Vivy la Shirt!
' '
*
*
Vive la charte.
The sound of a word, more especially in a foreign lingo, is a
most delusive criterion of its orthographical construction. The
unfortunate woman in Humphrey Clinker, made a sad verbal
faux pas in her own tongue, in the description of a night passed
in vexing and grieving, when she wrote that she had been `a
vixen
and
griffin
all along the corse of the night.'
To return. It is in the East that our ancient townsman sees
with a clearer eye, and writes with simplicity and taste. His
sketch of Jerusalem is distinct and vivid. Strange, mysterious
city! What a hold it hath upon every imagination! How
linked in, is it, with recollections of the times of youth; with
lessons from the Scriptures, delivered by the priest of our earliest
days, from the sweet Olive mount of childhood! Straightway
as we read of that Metropolis of Faith, we go back on the
posting
wings of Reminiscence, to the green fields and fresh waters
of serener years. We hear the chimes of Sabbath bells, the
voices of the choir, and the pealing of that delicious organ, whose
diapason was rapture, whose triumphant harmony kindled the
soul. Associations of Bethlehem and merry Christmas mingle
together; and the babe in the manger is contrasted with the
green-wreathed churches and blessings of Home. A hallowed
word, indeed, is Jerusalem. The great temple of Solomon, the
gate that looked toward Damascus, the
Via Dolorosa,
along
which our Saviour walked, to suffer a guiltless deaththese,
with a thousand other scenes of interest, arise to the mind at the
mere mention of that devoted city, from whose mountain-girt
circumference
were once rejected the brooding wings of the
Almighty
.
How many pilgrims have gone there; how many have
died there, in the `entering in of the ways;' in the billows of
Jordan! How many crusaders, battling for the cross of their
order; franklins, deserting the oaken halls of their far eastern
castles; fair penitents, distrusting themselves and relying on God;
palmers, with `sandal-shoon and scallop-shell!'
Good reader, in your black letter researches, if haply you
have made them, did you ever meet with that right venerable
tome, `The Informacion for Pylgrymes unto ye holy land, that
is to wyte, to Rome, and to Jherusaleme?' A pleasing `4to.'
it is; and was `emprynted at Londone, in the Flete-strete, at the
signe of ye sonne, by Wynkyne de Worde, in the yere of God,
m cccc and xxiiij.' In those days, Europe used to pour her
yearly thousands into the lap of Palestine. How differently
people
travelled then, from the modern tourist, in the era of Rapelje!
The author of the `Informacion' went from Venice. With
seemly modesty, his departure is thus set down: `In the seven
and twenty day of the moneth June, there passed fro Venyse,
under sayle out of the haven of Venyse, at the sonne goinge
down, certayne pilgrymes toward Jherusaleme, in a shyppe of a
merchant of Venyse, y'called Iohn Moreson. The patrone of
the same shyppe was y'called Luke mantell. To the nombre of
lx. and syxe pylgrimes: every man payinge, some more some
lesse, as they might accorde with the patrone.' There were no
packet-cabins then, with fine wines and fixed prices! Every
tourist was obliged to provision himself. The `informacion' on
this point, and the advice, must have been very serviceable to
those who follow the author. He says: `Hyre you a cage for
halfe a dozene hennes or chekyns to have with you in the shyppe
or galey. For ye shal have neede of hem, manie times. And
buy you halfe a bushell of mele sede at Venyse for them. Also
take a barrel with you for a sege for your chambre in the shyppe;
it is ful necessary if ye were seke, that you come not into the
ayre. Also whan you comen to haven townes, yf she shall tarry
there three days, go by times to lande; for then ye may have
lodginge before another: it wyl be take up anone. And when
you come to dyuers havens, beware of fruytes that ye ete none
for nothynge; for they be not accordinge to our complexion, and
they gendre a bloudie fluxe. And yf any englishmanne catch
that there sekenesse, it is a greate mervayle but and he dye
thereof.'
`The mountains stand yet round about Jerusalem;' and amid
the ravages of years and the visits of pilgrims, from Sir John
Maunderville to Chateaubriand and Rapelje, the city has kept
her Great Wonders still. For ages, her objects of holy curiosity
have not essentially changed. `These,' says our author, `ben
the pylgrimages within the cytee of Iherusaleme. The fyrst is
before the temple of ye sepulchre dore. There is a four-square
stone, whyte, whereupon Chryste rested hym with his crosse
whan hee went toward the mount of Calvarie, where is
indulgence
vii yeeres and vii lentes. Also the howse of the ryche
man which denyed Lazare ye crommes of breed.' How little
mutation has been made by time, in these grand characteristics
of Jerusalem! Yet since this pilgrimage was written, what
changes have occurred among the nations of the earth! The
cities of America have arisen, like exhalations, from the
wilderness
:
revolution has followed revolution: rivers of blood, and
`hecatombs of men,' have testified the march of Death; yet lonely,
simple Jerusalem, afar in the East, surrounded by desperate
hordes and gloomy plains, with none but
moral
attractions, yet
lingers in her desolation. There the Roman, the Armenian, and
the Greek Catholics, fight bloody battles on the sacred mount of
Calvary, over the multiplied holes of the cross,
*
*
The
holes of the three crosses on which our
Saviour
and the two thieves were
crucified, have increased to between one and two dozen. Each of the divided
threes are shown as the true ones. During some of the holy festivals, as we
learn from modern travellers, the contests of the different parties claiming the
true holes of those trees of death, are sanguinary and ferocious in the extreme.
Several combatants have died in these bitter broils on the very spot where a
God
expired, to give peace to men.
and lift up the
voice of riot and slaughter, even in the sepulchre of Christ.
There was a kind-heartedness among those ancient pylgrimes,
which is not to be found in our selfish days. If they
encountered
any unpleasant adventures, and they were avoidable, they
would instruct others how to shun them. In the matter of diet,
they used to be particularly minute; and I am strongly inclined
to think, that those old cosmopolites used to be right good livers.
They seemed to have an innate hankering after `creature
comforts
;'
and whatever they found, at any haven, that was good,
they speedily mentioned the same in their books, for the especial
benefit of those who should come after, as a kind of advertisement.
By
the way, while discoursing of advertisements, I think I may
say that they form one of the strong characteristics of our
enterprising
people. Look into the newspapers; how they teem with
these tidings of life! I love to look them over. What a vast
amount of interests they representhow many hopes and fears!
From `Tin plates and spelter,' to `A Wife Wanted,' they are
pleasing to read: and I am glad, when I see an
avis
that I have
watched for some time daily, at last disappear. It is a sign that
the author has had his wish accomplished; has sold his
commodities
,
or found what he sought.
There is just about the same difference between the
orthography
and grace of city and country advertisements, that there is
between the manners of town and country people. Many of the
rural merchants expose their wares in poetry; they sell muslins
or groceries, by long metre, and chant the praises of wooden
bowls and codfish, on the murmuring lyre. Methinks it should
go hard with customers, if such harmonious notifications do not
usually take good effect for their authors. Legal advertisements,
by humble functionaries, have not this privilege. They must be
confined to the prosethough not to the
letter
of law; for
imagination
sometimes gambols through them, in a most wanton
quest of new combinations of letters. In the course of my
researches
,
I have possessed myself of sundry notices in the
advertising
and business line, two or three of which I subjoin. That
which immediately followeth, was not long since promulgated in
a sister State. It is an
`ADWERTISEMENT.
`To be sold by public vandue, upon Saderdey the 23th day of November
next, at the house of Eva Tn, wedo deseesct in Newmanstown, all
sutch personabel property of the said wedo in above menchent to witone
good milcks cow and hey by the hundred 2 ten pleet stoves with pips one
weel barow one close covert and kitchien tresser tebells and 3
cheers,
tups
and barrils one larg cauper kittil and iron potts 3 beds and bedstets 3 cheests
and a large quantate of flax and linnen stuff and all kinds of other hous and
kitchein furniturs to tichues to menchen the vandue to begin at 10 of the
clock of the forenon. Resonabel greted will be give and the conddition
maid noen on the day of sail by
S. B., Administrator.'
There is no question at all, that the officer who penned the
foregoing instrument felt the full force of his station when he
committed
it to paper. He luxuriated in the mighty authority
reposed
in him by the law; and looked forward, no doubt, with
sublime anticipations to the time when he should expose to the
highest bidder `the parsonabel property of the wedo deseesct,'
and receive his perquisites therefor. He had no notion, I will be
sworn, that he was writing himself down an Ass, as well as an
Administrator. The effusions of such a linguist are exceedingly
edifying to read. They remind me of a noted personage in one
of our large cities, who has amassed a splendid fortune, by the
manufacture of certain medicines of doubtful utility. Having
neglected his education, and being often thrown into society above
his sphere, he is as often the butt of many polished persons, who
love to bore him with spurious learning, and who frequently
resort
to the magnificent mansion where he dwells in dismal and
uncongenial gentility. `Sir,' said one of these wags to him not
long ago, `your medicinal discoveries are invaluableimmortal:
they stamp you as the benefactor of your race; and it will yet be
said of you, as
Homer
said of
Oliver Cromwell:
`Frigidi zoni,
hoc belloni, lapsus lingu!'
'
`No doubt of it!' said the flattered individual; `and I thank
you for the compliment. Yet still for all, notwithstanding what
you say, my honors is very small, and my enemies is very
numerous
:
numerouser, a great sight, than they was when I wa'nt
so well for to do. It was only the other day, that I got a letter,
threatening egregiously for to burn down my consarn by means
of a conflagration, if I didn't persist from uttering them
medicines
.'
`Was the letter anonymous?'
`Not it; and there, you see, I had the author on the hip. He
dassent prescribe a syonymous communication to me, and so
with unparalleled insurance he subscribed to his epistle the
signature
of `A. B. C.' It is well known, them letters is, to most
people; and I shall bring the author into a court, before the
month is out, on a plea of
sash'-a-rarrow!'
Business,
like Misfortune, makes one acquainted with strange
matters. Here, for instance, is a bill, written by a very choice
Italian, in language which he fain supposed to have been the
quintessence of good English. It was tendered to an esteemed
citizen, well known for his taste. Such a document is worth
four dollars, without any additional value received. I offer the
original, and a translation, which the author little thought it
needed:
Mr. Huon Sqwar,
To Julian Gr,
Dr.
Busto Vaccenton,
$2 00
Busto Guispier,
2 00
I think it would puzzle any one to ascertain the `intent of this
bill,' without much pondering and reflection. It would be laid
on the table, in despair, by nine persons in ten. But when
touched by the key of cogitation, its latent meanings flash forth
to day. Here is the literal rendering:
Mr. Hone, Esq.
To Julian Gr,
Dr.
Bust of Washington,
$2 00
Bust of Shakspeare,
2 00
After such a document, I might best close. But I have one
other notice from the interior, (the autographs of all are extant,)
which I admire no less for its orthography, than for its grammar
and punctuation:
`NOTICE
`
Of
the supscriber hoses wos misen august the 15 1834 Lost of a span
of hoses straid or stole out of the comons at liverpool a small black mayor
switch tale nine yeres old a small bay maire
too
white feet behine and a short
taile and a bout eight teen yeres old five dolars reward on them the oner of
them hoses lives in townd of clay.
D. Rd.
'
Farther than these, nothing need be said. They are
exhibitions
of business talent, much to be applauded, but which, at the
same time, might be materially enhanced by the benefits of
education
.
Howbeit, the schoolmaster is abroad: and the rising
generation will embrace few who cannot understand the falsity of
the dolt's premises in Shakspeare, who contends that `reading
and writing come by nature.'
NUMBER TWO.
May,
1835.
Well,
Spring is coming at last, with smiles such as she used
to wear in my childhood, when she stepped over the glowing
mountains, wlth light and song in her train. The feelings of
better years are kindling within me, as I look from my window
over the blossoming gardens of the city, regale my nostrils with
the inhalation of the air from fresh waters, and taste the fragrance
which sweeps over the town from the flowering trees in yonder
`fashionable square.' If there is any positive enjoyment on
earth, one gets an inkling of it, on a spring day, when his heart
is not worn, and `his bosom is young.' It is a blessed time;
and he who feels it has a right to say so, even at the expense of
being called a proser. I love to sit, as I do now, by my
casement
,
with the gale melting all over my forehead, (like an
invisible
touch of benediction from some spirit-hand,) and mark the
rosy clouds move along the west, as the hum of the city dies upon
the ear, and the arial currents of evening are taking their course
over the vast inland from the sea. I feel, at such moments, that
I have an indestructible soul; that the
God
whose fingers lifted
the mountains to their places, and set the sun in heaven, likewise
lights the human spirit from the exhaustless fountain of
His
power
.
I muse upon the littleness of man, and the greatness of his
Creator,
until the thought exalts my contemplations aloft, and I
am lost in wonder.
There is nothing so graceful as a cloud. It is the richest thing
in nature, except a wave in its dissolution. How beautifully its
painted sides flaunt along the west! If you would see clouds,
you must see them
in
the West. I have watched those that were
engendered by the sprays of Niagara, and the winds of Ontario,
floating eastwardly from the occident, until every fold was
baptized
in molten ruby, amber, and vermillion; and as the vast
curtain
rolled upward above the mountains, leaving only a few thin
bars of crimson across a sky of the tenderest violet, I have
repeated
those beautiful lines of Glck:
Methinks it were no pain to die,
On such an eve, when such a sky
O'ercanopies the West;
To gaze my fill on you calm deep,
And like an infant, sink to sleep
On earth, my mother's breast.
There's peace and welcome in yon sen
Of endless blue tranquility
Those clouds are living things;
I trace their veins of liquid gold,
I see them solemnly unfold
Their soft and fleecy wings.
Clouds are like flowers, in their fading and passing away.
We lose them with regret. Thoughts of our last hour come
upon us, as we watch them die, and we almost wish to die with
them: to say
Come now, oh, Death! thy freezing kiss
Emancipates; the rest is bliss
I would I were away!
I am led, in looking at clouds, to think of the past, and the
mysterious awe with which they were regarded in the olden time.
In the days of Tacitus, when the Roman armies approached a
town to besiege it, and the shadows of clouds lay upon it, they
would postpone their warfare until the sun-light was there. I
think of those old ballads, where desolate ladies are represented
in their castles, watching the clouds as they sailed up the sky
from France into England, envying their elevation and scope of
view, and building a thousand dreams, as fantastic as they.
Mentioning
the past, causes me to revert to Charles Lamb.
In a former number I spoke warmly in his praise, but I gave no
taste of his quality. From the past, he cannot be dissociated.
It was a realm in which he lived. There grew the vines and fig
trees under which he sate him down, not in `sullenness and
gloom,' but with the light of an exuberant fancy ever kindling at
his heart. Believing that he was
the
writer on whom the mantle
of Shakspeare did the most manifestly descend, I am bound to
`give a reason for the faith that is in me.' This I shall do, by
quoting a few passages from his works.
John Woodvil,
a
tragedy
from his pen, affords a copious supply of Shaksperian thought,
and fully justifies the remark of Hunt, that `Lamb, and he alone,
was worthy to have heard, by the lips of the Bard of Avon, the
recital of a scene in any one of his immortal plays, hot from the
brain.' I must of course be brief in my quotations; but a few
will suffice. John Woodvil is beloved by Margaret Woodvil,
an orphan ward of his father, Sir Walter. He becomes cold
and distant to her, and she deserts Woodvil Hall, after
addressing
him a kind,
womanly
letter. The following are his
reflections
on its perusal:
Gone! gone, my girl? So hasty, Margaret,
And never a kiss at parting? Shallow loves,
And likings of a ten-day's growth, use courtesies,
And show red eyes at parting. Who bids `farewell'
In the same tone he cries `
God
speed you, sir?'
Or tells of joyful victories at sea,
Where he hath ventures, does not rather muffle
His organs to emit a leaden sound,
To suit the melancholy dull `farewell'
Which they in Heaven not use?
So peevish, Margaret!
But 'tis the common error of your sex,
When our idolatry slackens or grows less,
(As who of woman born, can keep his faculty
Forever strained to the pitch? or can at pleasure,
Make it renewable, as some appetites are,
As namely, hunger, thirst?) this being the case,
They tax us with neglect, and love grown cold,
Coin plainings of the perfidy of men,
Which into maxims pass, and apophthegms,
To be retailed in ballads.
By the way, the word apophthegm reminds me of the
numerous
sayings current in this country, that are utterly unsusceptible
of meaning or explanation. Thus, when a person is eccentric,
he is pronounced `as odd as Dick's hat band.' The origin of
this native apophthegm is buried in obscurity. In vain does
curiosity inquire
who
was the mysterious Richard, with taste
unique,
and hat-band odd? Was it Richard the III.? or Cur
de Lion? Probably not the former. The only queer things
about that monarch, were his misshapen back, and his knee-band;
an article which his proud representatives of the stage wear only
on one leg, a custom certainly odd, because, according to the
antique rule, `One is odd, and two are even.' Most men have
but one hat-band. It is considered sufficientand no man has
two: if he had, it would be odd indeed. A mass of reasoning
on this subject presses itself at present upon my mind; but I pass
to other sayings. When one is good humored, it is apt to be
remarked that `He is as smiling as a basket of chips.' Now
reader,
is
there anything so very humorous in a basket of chips?
Does it wear a smile? I never could perceive that it did. A
basket of this sort is as much devoid of expression, as the whites
of Job's eggs were of taste. I have gathered many a basket full
of chips in the country, for the gay mid-winter's fire; but really
they never smiled. There is no lineament of pleasure in a basket
thus replenished. The contents lend a glow to the farmer's
parlor
,
and that is their only smile; a compulsory brightness, which
consumes them in its light, like `a cheerful look from a breaking
heart.' I take this to be sound logic, but have not, as yet, availed
myself of any archological commentaries on the subject.
When an individual, also, is in a state of extreme inebriety, it is
observed of him, that `He is as blue as a razor.' Now under
favor and correction, I would express my belief that a razor hath
not that cerulean hue spoken of `i' the adage.' It is of a bright
and silvery aspect, and the sheen thereof is entirely unlike the
sky, or any other azure element or tint whatever. How the
saying
became extant, is beyond the lore of the antiquary. I have
consulted several grave old gentlemen on the subject, and they
all tell me that the saying is only valuable from its exceeding
longevity. They have heard it, they say, from the lips of their
great grandfathers, but comprehend not its fitness or sense. Age
is its protection, and it continues to be received as a good phrase,
merely because the memory of man runneth not to the contrary
of its acceptance.
But to return to Lamb. In a dialogue in Sherwood Forest,
between Margaret Woodvil, and Simon the brother of John, the
following beautiful passage occurs:
Margaret
.
What sports do you use i' the forest?
Simon
.
Not many; some few; as thus:
To see the sun to bed, and to arise,
Like some hot amourist, with glowing eyes,
Bursting the lazy bonds of sleep that bound him,
With all his fires and travelling glories round him.
Sometimes, the moon on soft night clouds to rest,
Like Beauty, nestling in a young man's breast,
And all the winking stars, her handmaids, keep
Admiring silence while those lovers sleep;
Sometimes, outstretcht in very idleness,
Naught doing, saying little, thinking less,
To view the leaves, their dancers upon air,
Go eddying round: and small birds, how they fare,
When mother Autumn fills their beaks with corn,
Filcht from the careless Almathea's horn.
How completely is the subjoined colloquy
drenched
with the
spirit of Shakspeare:
Lovel
.
I marvel that the poets, who of all men, methinks, should possess
the hottest livers, and most empyreal fancies, should affect to see such
virtues in cold water.
John Woodvil
.
Because your poet hath an internal wine richer than
lippara
or canaries, yet uncrushed from any grapes of earth, unpressed in
mortal wine-presses.
Lovel
.
What may be the name of this wine?
John
.
It hath as many names as qualities. It is denominated
indifferently
,
wit, conceit, invention, inspiration; but its most royal and comprehensive
name is
fancy
.
Lovel
.
And where keeps he this sovereign liquor?
John
.
Its cellars are in the brain, whence your true poet deriveth
intoxication
at will; while his animal spirits, catching a pride from the quality
and neighborhood of their noble relative, the brain, refuse to be sustained
by wines and fermentations of earth.
Equally Shaksperian is the following
fancy
portrait of an honest,
confidential friend:
This Lovel here's of a tough honesty,
Would put the rack to the proof. He is not of that sort
Which haunt my house, snorting the liquors,
And when their wisdoms are afloat with wine,
Spend vows as fast as vapors, which go off,
Even with the fumes, their fathers. He is one,
Whose sober morning actions
Shame not his o'er night's promises;
Why this is he, whom the dark-wisdomed Fate
Might trust her counsels of predestination with,
And the world be no loser.
No
one, it seems to me, of all the race of modern writers, has
been so completely successful as Lamb, in the power of imbuing
a composition with the true style and spirit of ancient English.
Upon
his
ear alone, would seem to have melted the sweet and
majestic harmonies of the olden time; and, from a skill acquired
by familiarity with that golden age of his native tongue, he touched
his pen, to awaken in every reader a glow of enthusiasm.
Talking
of enthusiasm, leads me to say, that of all places
wherein one can catch a glow of
sacred
transport, commend me
to a Methodist meeting-house. I am no bigoted religionist. I
have a feeling of deference and respect for every sect that
worships
God
; and about none particularly, have I either prejudice
or predilection. But I must allow that in no convocations, save
those of that church, did I ever hear so much to move my
sensibility
;
to quicken, as by a sudden shock, the pulses of the heart,
and to rouse the affections by a rapid and irresistible pathos.
Often, from pure volition, do I wander away from the more
flashing
streets of the metropolis, into some of those quiet haunts
whose retirement seems to denote the absence of society and the
world. I enter the humble porch, and with a feeling of
reverential
simplicity, I sit me down. The pulpit is occupied by two
or three speakers. One is engaged in exhortation. With
justifiable
tact, he has been selected as the first, in order to give him
`fair play,' as he is evidently the weakest of the clerical trio. I
perceive in him nothing extraordinary. He doles forth a sermon,
full of common-places, and
`in that nasal twang
Heard in conventicles:'
but his brevity is studied, and the clerical
foil
takes his seat,
while the brighter gem, whose eloquence he has set off in
anticipation
,
arises. He is young, and handsome. The disposition
of his dress and contour betokens the presence of one who is
desirous, primarily, of impressing his hearers `by that first appeal
which is to the eye;' and secondly, to inspire them with the
eloquent
fires that are slumbering in his brain and bosom. At first,
his voice is low and indistinct; anon, it aspires into a melliffluous
cadence, until every heart is moved, and every lip tremulous
with a sigh. Such an one I heard, not many months ago. He
commenced with the text, `I have been young, and now I am
old; yet have I never seen the righteous forsaken, nor his seed
begging bread.' In his pictures of youth and age, and of the
sole consolation, `the one thing needful,' which should sustain
both, he broke forth into the following sublime emblem:
`My friends, as I look down from this advantageous eminence,
upon the different mortal ages that appear before me; upon
cheeks painted with the rosy bloom of childhood, and lips
redolent
with the fragrance of spring; when I contrast them with the
corrugated lineaments and snow-sprinkled temples of age, my
mind labors with a fearful comparison. I contrast the full veins
and fair moulded features of childhood with the thin and
shrivelled
aspects of declining years; and I liken them all to the scenes
which we meet with on the broad ocean of existence. In our
better days, we leave the pleasant land of youth in a fairy barque;
the sunshine laughs upon the pennon, and trembles on the sail;
the sweet winds refresh our nostrils from the flowery shore, the
blue vistas delight our eyes, the waves dance in brightness beneath
our keel; the sky smiles above us, the sea around us, and the
land behind us, as it recedes; and before, a track of golden
brightness seems to herald our way. Time wears onand the
shore fades to the view. The barque and its inmates are alone
on the ocean. The sky becomes clouded; the invisible winds
sweep with a hollow murmur along the deep; the sun sinks like
a mass of blood over the waters, which rise and tumble in mad
confusion through a wide radius of storm; the clouds, like
gloomy curtains, are lifting from afar. The sails are rent; the
tackle disparts; broken cordage streams and whistles to the
tempest
;
the waves burst like molten mountains upon the half
submerged
and shuddering deck; masts are rent in splinters; the
seaman is washed from the wheel. Cries of terror and anguish
mingle with the remorseless dash of billows, and the howling of
thunder and storm. The foundered boat sinks as she launches;
the deck is breaking. God of mercy!
Who
shall appear for the
rescue?
Where
fold the arms that are mighty to save? Men
and brethrenaid is near at hand. Through the rifts of the
tempest
,
3
beaming over the tumultuous waters, moves a pavilion of
golden light. The midnight is waning; gushes of radiance
sprinkle the foam; a towering form smiles on the eyes of the
despairing voyagers, encircled with a halo of glory. It is the
Saviour
of Manit is the Ark of the Covenant! It moves
onward
;
the waves rush back on either hand; and over a track
of calm expanse, the Ark is borne. Who steps from its side,
and walks over the deep, as if upon the land? It is the great
Captain of our Salvationthe Mighty to Save? He rescues the
drowning from death, the hopeless from gloom. He stills the
fury of the tempest; and for the spirit of mourning, he gives the
song of rejoicing and the garments of praise. Ark of the
Covenant
!
roll this way! We are sinking in the deep waters; and
there is none to deliver! Let the prayer be offered, and it will
save us all!
Such is a faint sketch of the exhortation I have mentioned.
In illustrating this point, the preacher said: `Let not this sketch
be deemed the dream of a fanciful mind. We are the voyagers,
ours is the danger, and
God
is the Power who guides the Ark of
Deliverance. These things are not visible to the naked, mortal
eye, but their truth is the same. The things which are seen are
temporal; from them depend those momentous things which are
unseen and eternal. How shall I illustrate the boundless
difference
between the glories of the spiritual and temporal world?
Some years ago, I remember, I was in a town in a neighboring
State when there chanced an eclipse of the sun. I had
forgotten
the anticipated event, and was reading in my room,
unmindful
of the pale and sickly twilight that had gradually stolen
over my page. A friend came in, and said, `Brother, are you
aware that the eclipse is now taking place?' I answered no; and
joining him, I walked down into the long broad street. It was
full of people; and the houses of the town, on all sides, were
covered with the population. I took a small fragment of smoked
glass, and surveyed the sun. It was nearly obscured by the
other sphere, and by the clouds which, clad in gloomy light,
were sailing fitfully by. After a little while I retired to my
apartment
,
but for nearly an hour was totally blind. Now, my
beloved
friends, that mighty orb, even when, as at this present, it
sails in unclouded majesty above us, throwing its floods of light
upon the far-off mountain, the arid desert, the fertile valley, or
the heaving main, that glorious orb is but a faint spark at the foot
of the Omnipotenta dimly-lighted lamp, feebly glimmering on
the outer verge of that transcendent world, whose glories are
unseen
and eternal.'
To appreciate bursts of pulpit eloquence like these, you must
hear
them. You must have partaken of the excitement which
warms the speaker, and spreads like a sweet contagion, if I may
so speak, among his auditory. You must see the faces of young
and old lighted up with a solemn interest; and when he goes on
to depict the goodness of the
Saviour,
you should mark the
tearful
features beaming in loveliness from the galleries; hear the sobs
of irrepressible rapture which attest the animation of the
believing
;
and anon your own heart is so melted with enthusiasm, that
when the rich, trembling tones of the congregation are blended in
the hymn, you seem carried aloft on wings of extacy, by the
infectious
transport of the scene. I have listened to the
ad
captandum
eloquence of many a `popular' divine, without emotion,
and heard, indifferently, the incontrovertible propositions of many
a `stately son of demonstration;' but when I desire to be
subdued
and melted in simple feeling, I go to a Methodist meeting.
Something humble and holy is there; the distinctions of this life
are lost in the contemplation of that which is to come; the music
rings in tender supplication at the door of my heart; and I come
away, feeling for days like a purer and a better man. There be
many who visit such places for amusement; to mimic the prayer
of the righteous, and sneer at the stay of the comfortless and the
aged; but he who would thus insult his
God,
is worse than a
reptile
.
I have
heard many definitions of
Puns
. It has been
generally
conceded that the
worst
are the
best
. The most far-fetched
are certainly the most unexpected, and consequently the most
humorous. What can be better in this way than Hood's
description
of Ben. Battle, in the conflict?
`A cannon ball took off his
legs
And he laid down his
arms:
Or that doleful announcement, after his death, when
`They went and
told
the Sexton,
And the Sexton
toll'd
the bell!'
Things like these make one laugh every time they are thought
of. They are irresistible to the most ordinary apprehension.
Looking over my dear familiar Lamb's works the other day, I
encountered some comments on a pun, which, with the example
offered, are so admirable, that I transcribe them entire.
A pun is not bound by the laws which limit nicer wit. It is a
pistol let off at the ear; not a feather to tickle the intellect. It is
an antic which does not stand upon manners, but comes bounding
into the presence, and does not show the less comic for being
dragged in sometimes by the head and shoulders. What though
it limp a little, or prove defective in one leg? All the better.
A pun may easily be too curious and artificial. Who has not at
one time or other been at a party of professors, (himself perhaps,
an old offender in that line,) where, after ringing a round of the
most ingenious conceits, every man contributing his shot, and
some there the most expert shooters of the day; after making a
poor
word
run the gauntlet till it is ready to drop; after hunting
and winding through all the possible ambages of similar sounds;
after squeezing, and hauling, and tugging at it, till the very milk
of it will not yield a drop further, suddenly some obscure,
unthought-of
fellow in a corner, who was never 'prentice to the
trade, whom the company for very pity passed over, as we do by
a known poor man when a money-subscription is going round,
no one calling upon him for his quota; has all at once come out
with something so whimsical yet so pertinent; so brazen in its
pretensions, yet so impossible to be denied; so exquisitely good,
and so deplorably bad, at the same time, that it has proved a
Robin Hood's shot; anything ulterior to that is despaired of, and
the party breaks up, unanimously voting it to be the very worst
(that is, best) pun of the evening. This species of wit is the
better
for not being perfect in all its parts. What it gains in
completeness
,
it loses in naturalness. The more exactly it satisfies
the critical, the less hold it has upon some other faculties. The
puns which are most entertaining are those which will least bear
an analysis. Of this kind is the following, recorded, with a sort
of stigma, in one of Swift's Miscellanies:
`An Oxford scholar, meeting a porter who was carrying a hare
through the streets, accosts him with this extraordinary question:
`Prithee, friend, is that your
own hare,
or a
wig?
'
`There is no excusing this, and no resisting it. A man might
blur ten sides of paper in attempting a defence of it against a
critic who should be laughter-proof. The quibble in itself is not
considerable. It is only a new turn given by a little false
pronunciation
,
to a very common, though not very courteous inquiry.
Put by one gentleman to another at a dinner-party, it would have
been vapid; to the mistress of the house, it would have shown
much less wit than rudeness. We must take in the totality of
time, place, and person; the pert look of the inquiring scholar,
the desponding looks of the puzzled porter; the one stopping at
leisure, the other hurrying on with his burden; the innocent
though rather abrupt tendency of the first member of the question,
with the utter and inextricable irrelevancy of the second; the
placea public street, not favorable to frivolous investigations;
the affrontive quality of the primitive inquiry (the common
question
)
invidiously transferred to the derivative (the new turn given
to it) in the implied satire; namely, that few of that tribe are
expected
to eat of the good things which they carry, they being in
most countries considered rather as the temporary trustees than
owners of such dainties, which the fellow was beginning to
understand
;
but then the
wig
again comes in, and he can make nothing
of it; all put together constitute a picture. Hogarth could have
made it intelligible on canvass.'
There are some men who speak in puns. Philadelphians,
since the time of
Knickerbocker,
have had the merit of being the
most atrocious punsters in the union. But with the exception of
a happy journalist or two, and a few jurists, they have the name
only; which, however, has attained such an altitude, that they
sleep on their laurels. Perhaps it is well; yet of all
miscarriages
,
an abortive pun is the worst. How many witlings have I
seen bring forth one of those pseudo
bon-mots,
and baptize it
with a grin, when it was the very quintessence of inanity! Truly,
they have their reward; for they are often asked by their
acquaintances
,
when they have finished, whether the time has come
to laugh!
I like a play upon words in other ways. Ben. Jonson made
a right good hit, when he wagered that he could incorporate the
choral words
di, do, dum,
into a melancholy couplet. Being
challenged to do so, he adventured as thus:
When Dido found that neas would not come,
She wept in silence, and was
Dido dumb
.'
Chesterfield made it a rule, that in social chat, the visiter's
good sayings should be reserved for the last, and that when he
had uttered them, he should instantly take himself away.
Believing
that I can not add a better thing than this versicle of
Ben's, (built, no doubt, at some happy moment when `his learned
sock was on',) I follow the counsel.
NUMBER THREE.
June,
1835.
Another
month has gone by, and bless us, reader, here am
I again, at the same casement of which I whilome made mention,
brewing you another chapter of various topics, `writen as they
shoulde comen into my mynde.' `The moneth June!' A right
pleasant month it isleafy, sunny, and sweet. The view from
my window has vastly improved since my last. The `
fashionable
square' is almost hidden by a cloud of splendid verdure;
and as I look upon the undulating and breeze-tossed mass, I
think there are few things so fine as a huge wall of `innumerous
boughs,' clothed in the garniture of summer, and quivering in
the beauty of mornso sparkling, fresh, and rich to see!
The air that sweeps from squares and groves, is worth a
fortune
.
Let me breathe it in health, and I am happy. All truly
excellent things are those which
all
can enjoy: the blessed sun,
the air, the sight of sky and cloud, of hills and waters, these are
for
all
. Munificent
Creator!
What do not thy creatures owe
thee! I respire now in an atmosphere that would befit
Hesperia
.
The breeze is balm:
`It hath come over gardens, and the flowers
That kissed it are betrayed.'
So long as I can relish these blessings, with such exhilarating
enjoyment
,
I would love to live, and live to love; I could
cheerfully
pass the octogenarian in my decline.
The midsummer weighs me down. It takes away my nerves,
and resolves me into a woman. I grow weak and sentimental,
and a kind of rascally melancholy comes upon my spirit. Such,
at least,
has been
the case; but I think I am yearly changing in
that regard. When June comes, also, I am not so buoyant as
aforetime. I can not tell the reason, unless it be that Hope loses
lustre from her wings in every solstice; while Reality points with
his iron finger at the index of time, and tells me I am becoming
unmindful of beauty and untinctured with song. Now and then
I think this is true, especially of the brighter seasons:
`Alas, my heart's darkness! I own it is summer,
Yet, 'tis not the summer I once used to see;
Then I had welcomes for every new comer
Now strangely the summer seems altered to me.'
So of other matters. I used to rejoice in watching the splendid
coaches which flashed by my window, with their luxurious
springs, and servants in livery, swinging with golden bands from
their stands behind; and I took much delight in surveying the
fair freight within; now they roll by unnoticed. I am in a spirit
land, mainly; a land of dreams and reveriesthe realm and
dominion
of `Drowsy head.'
Talking
of drowsiness, makes me think of a feeling which
comes over the mind of a man, after reading a published article
from his pen, full of errors. He sees fine periods and pet
sentences
inhumanly butchered; he turns with discontent from the
journal to which they were sent; `look on't again he dares not;'
he perspires with rage; and, fretting himself drowsy, feels ready
to say with Otway, `Oh for a long, long sleep, and so forget it!'
Genius of Faust! what abominations are committed in thy name!
Hereby hangs a tale.
The other day, a little man called to see me, as the author of
`Ollapodiana.' He was of lowly stature, bent in the back,
knockkneed
,
and had hair on his head of a most grievous sorrel hue.
His ungainly too-long coat was of blackish fustian, his jerkin of
snuffy buff, and his pantaloons of blue cotton, `i' the autumn of
their life.' He had found me out, he said, by my style, and had
brought a sketch which he desired I would smuggle into the
Knickerbocker,
as he feared its acceptance otherwise. So I
stand godfather for his bantling. It has, I should think, been
hastily created, and its insertion here will crowd out several
members and subsections of my own, but I fancy it will do. I
can sympathize with Smith; yet he is used to reverses, being one
of the identical persons who failed in receiving the prize offered
by the `Olympiad and Sunburst,' as mentioned recently in this
Magazine. One thing plagued me. He was determined to read
the whole thing aloud, so that I could ascertain
exactly
every
word, and thus prevent mistakes when I surveyed the
proof-sheets
.
I sat like a martyr, while he rose, and with a
preliminary
flourish,
`Drew from the deep Charybdis of his coat
What
seemed
a handkerchief, and forthwith blew
His vocal nose.'
and then began:
`THE VICTIM OF A PROOF-READER.'
Foul murder hath been donelo! here's the
proof!'
Old Play
.'
`
Oh!
for the good old times of Typography, when operatives
in the art could render the ancients; when Caxton translated `Ye
Seyge of Troye' from the language of Greece! Would that,
in this latter age, when Champollion has deciphered the
hieroglyphics
of Egypt; when the spirit of inquiry is every where
abroad; some one might be found, who could continue to
shelter
from typical aggression a writer for the press!
`I am the victim of a proof-reader. The blunders of others,
and not my own, have placed me in a state of feeling akin to
purgatory. Ever since I began to shave for a beard, I have been
more or less afflicted with the
cacothes scribendi,
and I flatter
myself that I have not always been unsuccessful in my
writings
.
But my
printed
efforts have neither been honorable to my genius,
nor grateful to my vanity; `on the contrary they have been quite
the reverse.' I have had the sweetest poems turned into
thrice-sodden
stupidity; sentences in prose, on which I doated in
manuscript, have been perused in a deep perspiration, and with
positive loathing, in print. All this has arisen from a conspiracy
which seems to have been formed against me, by all the
typographical
gentlemen of the country. It is true, I write what
Mrs. Malaprop might call an `ineligible hand;' for to the pitiful
minuti of crossing
t's,
and dotting
i's,
I never could descend.
I have often given directions to publishers, that if a word was
otherwise `past finding out,' they should count the marks; but
the plan failed, as have indeed all my plans for
correct habits
of
thought before the public. If this narrative shall prove to be
correctly printed, it will be the first article from my pen that has
ever met with such an honor, and I shall be proportionably
pleased.
`Like all other mortals, I am penetrable to the arrows of
Cupid
.
My heart is not encased with the epidermis of a rhinoceros,
nor the bull hide of Ajax; consequently I am what they call in
romances a susceptible person. When I was nineteen I fell in
love, and as I found prose too tame a medium, too staid a
drapery for my thoughts, what could I do, but express to my
fair one my passion in song? She was a beautiful creature, `a
delicious arrangement of flesh and blood;' a country parson's
daughter, with excellent tastes and accomplishments. She was
fond of poetry, and so was I. This circumstance sent my fancy
a wool-gathering, for tropes, figures, and emblems. Young
ladies have a passionate admiration for genius, and I determined
to show that I was not deficient in that particular; that I belonged
of right to those who merited the saying, `
Poeta nascitur non fit
.'
During the spring of 18 I was attacked with a perfect
incontinence
of rhyme. My ladye-love was always my theme. But
of all my compositions, none satisfied me save the following,
which I produced with great
lim labor,
and studious care. I
think poorly enough of it now:
TO EMILY B.
`
Dear Girl!
an angel sure thou art
The muse of every spell
Which brings one transport to my heart,
And bids my bosom swell.
`And oh! carnation on thy cheek
Its richest lustre lends;
And thy blue eyes forever speak
A welcome to thy friends.
Alas! if fate should bid us part,
Life would be naught with me;
A load would rest upon my heart,
Without a smile from thee.
Where shall I meet a leaf so fair
In Nature's open page?
With thee the beauteous flower compare,
And e'en my grief assuage?
`Forgive, my love, this hasty lay,
And let its numbers be
Sweet monitors that day by day,
Shall bid thee think of me!'
`This production I sent to the village newspaper. I waited
a
long
week, to see it appear. Finally, the important
Wednesday
arrived. I hastened to the office, but the affair was not
published
.
I glanced with a hurried eye over the damp sheet, and
found a notice at last, commencing with three
stars
turned up
and down. It read thus:
* * *
The
tribute to Emily, by `J. S.' is unavoidably postponed until our
next, by a press of advertisements, for which we are thankfulsince we do
that kind of business, as likewise all sorts of job-work, on the most
reasonable
termsblanks, cards, hand-bills, and other legal documents, being
executed
by us at the shortest notice. Not to digress, however, we would say
to `J. S.' let him cultivate his talent; he has tremendous powers, but he
writes a bad hand. He should make his penmanship like his poetry
perfect
.'
`I had the curiosity to look into the advertising columns to
see what envious things of traffic had displaced my lines.
There were but three advertisements, a sheriff's sale, a stray
cow, and a wife eloped from bed and board. I read the sheriff's
notice with that deep interest which these documents usually
excite
.
It discoursed of lands, messuages, and tenements,
designated
`by a line, beginning at the north west corner of Mr.
Jenkins'
cow-house, running thence north seventy-five chains,
fourteen
links, thence east twenty-nine chains eleven links, to a stake
and stones'and so on to the end of the chapter.
`Yet the notice filled me with exceeding great delight. I sent
it to Emily: I told her that `J. S.' was myself, but begged her
not to mention it to a third person. She kept her secret as
women usually do. In three days it was all over town, that I
had a piece, `that I had made out of my head,' coming forth in
the next week's newspaper, addressed to Emily Brinkerhoff.
`Never did seven days roll more slowly round than the week's
interval which followed the foregoing notice, in the publication
of the `Elucidator of Freedom, and Tocsin of the People.'
When it
did
finally come out, I sent Emily an affectionate note,
with a copy of the paper, assuring her that the poem contained
my real sentiments. I determined not to read it myself until I
visited her in the evening. By great self-denial I kept my
resolve
,
and when the young moon arose, bent my steps toward
the mansion of my mistress.
`She received me coldly. I was surprised and abashed.
`What is the matter, Em.,' I tenderly inquired: `did you get
my billet-doux and the verses to-day?'
Yesthey came safe.'
Well, how did you like them?'
The note was kind and good, but the verses were foolish,
ridiculous nonsense.'
`I was thunderstruck. I asked to see the paper. Emily arose
and handed it to me; and sitting down by the vine-clad window,
she patted her little foot angrily on the floor.
`I opened the Elucidator and Tocsin, and read my poem.
Solomon of Jerusalem! what inhuman butcherywhat idiotcy!
But I will give the effusion as it was printed, `and shame the
devil:
'
`TO EMILY B.
`
Dear Girl!
an angel sour thou art
The mule of every spell;
That brays o'er trumpets to my heart,
And bids my bosom swell.
`And oh! darnation o'er thy cheek
Its rudest blister bends;
And thy blear eyes forever speak
A welcome to thy friends.
`Alas! if fate should bind us fast,
Life would be rough with me;
A toad would rush upon my heart,
Without a smile from thee.
`Where could I meet a lamp so fair
In Nature's open passage?
With thee the barbarous flower compare,
And own my grief a saussage?
`Forgive, my bore, this nasty lay,
And let its numbers be
Sweet monitors, that drily dry,
Shall bid thee think of me!'
J. S.
`When I had read this diabolical mass of stuff over, I flew
into an uncontrollable rage. In the blindness of my chagrin, I
depreciated the judgment of Miss Emily; I thought everybody
could see the errors, and detect them as readily as I did; and I
said to my young friend that she must have been very stupid or
inattentive, not to see how the poem
ought
to read. This roused
in her bosom, `all the blood of all the Brinkerhoffs.' She handed
me my hat, and pointed significantly to the door. I went out at
the aperture thus indicated, and have never darkened it since.
Emily is now the wife of a Connecticut school-master, who
blows the pitch-pipe and leads the choir on Sunday, in her
father's
church.
`This was my first passion, and my last, except that into
which I have been roused every time I have sent a piece to be
published. Yet I still love to console my dreary bachelorship
by writing, and seeing my thoughts in print; but I despair of
ever seeing them rightly uttered. Fate, in that regard, is against
me, and probably always will be.
`
John Smith
.'
After
a tragedy, the curtain falls to slow and mournful music.
Should the leader of an orchestra on such an occasion strike up
Yandee Doodle or Paddy Carey, the contrast would be absurd.
I feel in something such a predicament now. I have introduced
a tragical or at least a melodramatical narration, and I should be
unfeeling indeed to follow it up with other matters, which
probably
would be of a cheerful nature. I leave the story of my
visiter's
sorrow and reverses, as a provocative to solemn reflection in
the reader, upon the abuses of printing, and the mutability of
types.
NUMBER FOUR.
August,
1835.
From
one who loves to babble of green fields, and brooks of
running crystal, it is natural to expect a rhapsody about the
country. Listen then, reader, to me.
I affect the country, with a most engrossing and strong
attachment
.
It awakens my tenderest feelings and my sweetest
associations
.
Delicious reveries descend upon my spirit, as I walk
through the meadows and clover fields, when the earth is white
with Summer, and glowing with beauty. To see the wide
landscape
undulating around you; to hear the cling-clang of the
mower's whet-stone, as he sharpen's his scythe, while the heavy
swaths are lying around; to see the loaded wain rolling onward
to the garner, with fragrant hay, or nodding wheat-sheaves,
embodiments
of Plentythese sights are pleasant, reader: and you
who reside in cities, where unwritten odors of a most
questionable
salubrity assail your indignant nostril; who breathe
chimney-smoke
and dust, and suffer the secret backbitings of
numerous
bugs, mostly of metropolitan originyou, I say, can have
no imagination of the delights of a country existence. Your
hapless
ears are bored at morn with the supernatural shriek of the
milk-man, or the amphibious voice of the unmusical clam-dealer,
oyster-man, or sweep; and you lie upon your bed, tossing in
restless disquiet; you snore maledictions, and think daggers,
though you use none.
But
out of town
oh, it is perfect! Your milk is fresh, your
strawberries fresh, rich, and succulent. The first commodity has
not been watered at the public pump, nor are the latter luxuries
bruised and unclean. I must drop this topic, for my mouth
beginneth
to water; a complaint, no remedy being nigh, that is
unpleasant
to the last degree.
I affect the country, because my first impressions of this
breathing world were formed amid its hallowed scenery. I was
cradled among the hills; blue mountains melted in the distance
from my bed-room window; broad fields, and woods, and rivers,
shone between; the huge rains made melody on the roof of
Home for my unsophisticated ear, and I became steeped in the
passionate love of nature. It has never left me. I rejoice as I
call back those pleasant times, when in the casement of our
seminary
,
I rested my telescope on my shut-up Virgil, and looked
off among the far-off hills in the lap of which the edifice was
navelled, and saw the pretty girls of the farm-houses, whitening
their long pieces of brown tow-cloth, fresh from the loom;
picking
raspberries in the green hedges; drawing cool water, in the
swinging oaken-bucket, to make switchel withal, for the swains,
as they came home for their forenoon lunch, or milking their
balm-breathing cows, `in the golden evening-tide!' Those were
happy days! and if I learned my Latin badly, and made
blunders
in recitation, I got many a leaf from the book of nature
most deeply
by heart
.
There is something exceedingly grateful in the country, when
you can, as far as literature is concerned, enjoy the delectable
urbs in rure;
when you can get books, and specially newspapers:
for whatsoever may be said by man or woman, as touching
Editors
,
they are famous ministers to our pleasure. We love to
peruse their sheets; and even in times of political excitement,
when a stranger to the country might be induced to believe that
the greatest rascals in the republic were rival candidates for its
highest honors; when, among journalists, each one seems
rempli
de colre,
and ready to pull every opponent by the individual
nose; even then, we love to read their writings. We like to see
the cut, the keen retort, the hot rejoinder, and the sequent quip.
There is excitement in them.
Commend me to a newspaper. Cowper had never seen one
of our big sheets, when he called such four-paged folios `
maps
of busy life.' They are morethey are life itself. Its
ever-sounding
and resistless
vox populi
thunders through their columns,
to cheer or to subdue, to elevate or to destroy. Let a scoundrel
do a dirty action, and get his name and deed into the papers, and
and
then
go into the streetBroadway, for exampleand you
shall see his reception. Why does each passer-by curl his lip,
and regard him with scorn? Why is he shunned, as if a noisome
pestilence breathed around him? What makes every man
observe
him with a contemptuous leer? Because,
they have seen
the newspaper,
and they know him. So, in a contrary degree, is
it with honorable and gifted men. The news-prints keep their
works and worth before the public eye; and when themselves
appear, they are the observed of all observers. Hats are lifted
as they approach, and strangers to whom they are pointed out,
gaze after them with reverence. Success to newspapers! They
are liable, it is true, to abuseas what blessing is not?but
they are noble benefits, nevertheless. What an endless variety
of subjects, too, do they contain! Now we are entertained with
original dissertations on numerous important subjects; then, to
use the quaint old catalogue of Burton, `come tydings of
weddings
,
maskings, mummeries, entertainments, jubilees, wars, fires,
inundations, thefts, murders, massacres, meteors, comets,
spectrums
,
prodigies, shippe-wracks, piracies, sea-fights, lawsuits,
pleas, laws, proclamations, embassys, trophies, triumphs, revels,
sportes, playes; then again, as in a new-shifted scene, treasons,
cheating tricks, robberies, enormous villanies in all kindes, funerals,
burials, new discoveries, expositions; now comicall, then
tragical
matters. To-day we hear of new offices created, to-morrow
of great men deposed, and then again of fresh honors conferred;
one is let loose, another prisoned; one purchaseth, another
breaketh; he thrives, his neighbor turneth bankrupt; now plenty,
then again dearth and famine; one runs, another rides, wrangles,
laughs, weepes, and so forth. Thus we do daily hear such like,
both public and private news.'
I have an attachment to newspapers, because I deem them a
kind of moral
batteaux de plaisance,
or rail-cars, mayhap, wherein
you can embark before breakfast, or after dinner, and survey the
world, and the kingdoms thereof. It is a cheap and right
wholesome
way of journeying; and indeed, with the exception of a few
national jaunts, is about the only mode I have ever employed: for `I
travelle not save in mappe and carde, in which my unconfined
thoughts have freely expatiated, as having ever been especially
delighted with the study of cosmogony.' My bias for newspapers
is at least an honest one; and I have been driven into it more
perhaps from the worthlessness of the mass of re-published
books, than from the intrinsic merit of my daily and and
hebdominal
visiters; for the name of these aforesaid books is legion;
and most of them, if in sheets, would be fit only `to put under
pies, to lap spice in, and keep roast meat from burning.'
Rural life seldom fails to accomplish one object;
it softens the
heart
. It awakens the affections and leads to contemplation.
`
God
made the country, and Man made the town.' In the
former
,
there are no artificial wants, prejudices, or fashionsall is
cordiality, comfort, and peace. We look abroad upon the solemn
hills, the shining streams, and waving woodlands, and we feel
that
God is there!
His hand placed the rock-ribbed mountain
on its throne, and rolled around it its crown of misty glory.
His
breath fills the blue vault that swells above, until immensity, as
it were, is visible; and
His
smile is
shadowed
only in the
sunbeams
which traverse those abysses of mystery. How majestic
is the coming of a summer storm! We sit at the window of
some rural mansion, to which we have fled from the thick air and
heat of the metropolis; we see the far-off clouds arise like giant
forms against the horizon, with spears of fire, and robes of
purple
and gold; then, as by some sudden alchemy, they melt into
a mass of solid gloom, from whose bosom the lightning darts its
vivid chain, while its source
`Hangs o'er the solemn landscape, silent, dark,
Frowning and terrible.'
I have said that the country melts and subdues the heart. It
is true. I have seen a Being, in the flush and glow of girlhood,
who seemed to live and move in an atmosphere of lofty and
passionate
excitement
. I have seen thousands hang upon her
accents
,
as she moved before them, like the Tragic muse, her eye
dilated and her features radiant with the light of genius. I have
seen the bosoms of the young and beautiful swelling at her glance,
and the tears of hundreds flowing at her bidding. Was there
enjoyment
then, in the mind of her who thus moved the hearts of
others by the momentary tempest that awoke in her own, and
tossed them on the `lava waves and gusts of her own soul?
Alas, no! It was the mingling of labor and art; the fitful fever
of the brain. But I have seen that One presiding at the board
of
Home,
with the serenity of unutterable affection on her brow,
and the radiance of happy thoughts in her eyes. The peace of
the country had breathed upon her heart; and the impulses that
its scenes engender, had tranquilized her being. Could this be
the same? Secluded, yet most content, she had forgotten the
hollow pageantries through which she had passed; the noisy
crowd; the unbroken applause; and then, the prejudices of
altered or dishonest critics, and the gossip of the multitude. She
had other objects to `utterly fulfil' her spirit. A cherub, on
whose baby brow and soft Siddonian lip, she could rain the warm
baptism of maternal kisses; the companionship of loving friends
and elevated thoughts; communion with Naturethese were
her treasures and her guerdon. Past pre-judgments, misguided
frankness, and the weakness of a clouded
amor patri,
seemed
alike forgotten.
Tell me not that the country is lonesome. It is rich with
voices of comfort, and tones of delight. It is a vast and solemn
cathedral, with walls and roof of azure and gold, unpillared and
illimitable; its floors are tesselated with rainbow-colored flowers,
and silver streams, and living verdure. It is a haunt wherein to
muse, and dream, and lift the soul, until the heart overflows in
the religion of its worship.
Talking
of worship, makes me say, that nothing can inspire
in me a deeper feeling of devotion than sacred music. To hear
the plaintive overture of the choir, and the organthe stream of
melody which seems to roll from the galleries, and to dissolve
as it flows, into a kind of atmosphere above the aislesis
soothing
and subduing. It banishes every low-thoughted care, and
gives us `such glimpses of Heaven as saints have in dreams.'
One fancies that he hears the murmur of spirit-hymns, or else
the rustling of celestial wings, and says within himself:
`Let but a little part,
A wandering breath of that high melody
Descend into my heart,
And change it, till it be
Transformed, and swallowed up, oh love! in thee!'
But while I profess my affection for sacred melodies, I can
truly say that the secular and sentimental music of the day is
`my very great detestation,' as Laureate Southey said of albums.
The words are generally
namby-pamby,
to the last extent; and
are sung with such demi-grunts, and shrugs, and affected cadences,
that I had as lief hear the town-crier, or that other stentorian
personage who vociferates
O yez! O yez!
at a city court. Then,
what contortions of phiz do singers undergo! and how do they
torture the lungs of those they teach, as well as the ears of those
who listen! `Sir,' said an intelligent French Count once to me,
as we were listening to a pupil of an Italian songster, `This mode
would destroy the best
chanteuse
in the world; it would break
the ribs of a diligence horsebah!' I thought so too.
Vocalists
,
now-a-days, are obliged to stretch their jaws almost to
dislocation, and they roar you like lions. You would think, to
see
them sing, that they were of that class mentioned in sacred
writ, who `open their mouths wide for the latter rain.' They
seem to delight in gutturals and grimace, flourishes and falsettos.
One of these men, whose vocal orifice extended horizontally
almost across his face, applied not long ago to a waggish
physician
in Philadelphia, to ask his advice as touching the probable
success of an operation to which he desired to submit himself.
`I have sung for several years in public,' said the minstrel, `and
I find that the changes of fashion require louder tones than I am
able to utter, while my mouth retains its present dimensions. I
am obliged to whiffle out many of my long and large notes, as a
grimalkin cries in a quinsy, cracked and broken. I want
volume,
and I have called to know whether you can aid me in effecting
an alteration which will give my lips a fuller and freer play, and
my voice more freedom.'
`Perhaps so,' responded the physician; `but what do you
require
?
What do you propose?'
`I wish, I say,' returned the singer, (who, let it be
remembered
,
had an enormous
bouche
of his own,) `that my mouth
should be
enlarged
. It is too limited for my purpose.'
`Oho!' said the doctor, `I understand you. We'll see what
can
be done.'
He arose, and placing his hand on the head of the patient,
turned it to and fro, like a barber's
garcon,
while an expression
of solemn drollery struggled in his features.
`I can do so, Sir,' he continued, after a short pause, `and
easily; but there is a preliminary operation, which may distress
and perhaps disfigure you. It is a
long
job, and you may not
consent to it.'
`To any thing, my dear doctor, that will effect my object.
Pray tell me what is requisite to be done?'
`Why, my friend, you wish your mouth widened: it is now
uncommonly expansive; and in order to extend its limits any
farther, it will first be necessary
to remove your ears,
they being
obstacles at each corner!'
It may be conjectured that the operation was declined, and
that the vocalist quitted his adviser in the sulks. Such was
the fact.
By the way, the physician of whom I have thus spoken, is a
kind of modern Abernethy: full of benevolence, skill, and
merrimake. He knows how to distinguish to a nicety between
positive illness and imaginary ailments, those children of
hypochondria
and spleen. He was once, and that not `sixty years
since,' visited by a bloated and ricketty
bon vivant,
who had
epicurized
himself almost to Death's door, where, like the
Irishman's
horse in the play, he seemed ready to go in without
knocking. His proboscis was a model of convivial rubicundity;
but the corners of his mouth were drawn downward with a look of
settled misanthropy. In short, he had eaten too much, for too
long a time; the genial juices of his system had become tart
and acid; while his mind, never the most cordial or elevated,
had become cloudy, sluggish, and indiscriminative of good.
The epicure approached the Esculapian disciple, with a visage
as sour as if he had just effected the deglutition of all the
ipecacuanha
in Christendom. He slid with his gouty limbs into a
chair, and vociferated:
`Well, doctor, here I am, and I am just going to die. Not
that I feel so very bad in my system, but just look at my nose!
What mean those devilish carbuncles, those branching red veins!
It can't be eatingit can't be drinking. I have given up all but
one slice of beef, one of mutton, and one of pork, at dinner; I
eat fewer potatoes at a sitting than I used to do; and where I was
wont to take three glasses of brandy, or wine, whether it be
Madeira
,
Port, Sherry, or Heidsiek, I now take but two. I eat
fewer suppers, or at least not
quite
so many late ones, and those
not so heartily as I once did; yet I sleep badly; have strange
dreams, and wear this salamander-looking nose. What the deuce
am I to do? It makes me very unhappy. It torments me
continually
,
by the itching which it produces. I want your candid
opinion on this matter, doctorand I want it soonor I shall be
a dead man.'
`Well, my friend,' replied the Healer: `I have but one thing
to recommend, and if you refuse it, all is lost. I have often told
you that you would kill yourself with gormandizing: you have
visited me time and again with your ailings, and all my advice,
which would have tended to remove them, have been studiously
rejected. I can do no more, except to mention the remedy with
respect to your distressed member, which I am now about to
offer
.
You say it annoys you: and with that knowledge, as well
as a sight of its redness in my eye, I repeat, there is but one
course for you to pursue, which can yield you relief. If after
hearing the plan, you shall decline it, let the peril be your own.
I wash my hands of the whole business.'
`Pray tell me, doctor; I will follow your counsel implicitly.
I vow, I fear if I do not, that these incipient eruptions will
combine
in a cancer. Do ease me at once, and tell me what I shall
do, if my nose continues thus to itch me.'
`Listen, then, for your comfort depends on what I say. If it
does
itch, as you declare, and as I doubt notif it plagues you
thus, you can onlyI say it solemnly, as I said beforeyou
can only throw yourself upon one methodone dernier resort,
which is,
to scratch it!
Do this, and relief will follow;
and remember with gratitude that it was I advised you! Good
morning.'
This was as good an answer, under the circumstances, as
could have been made. How many nervous ladies and
hypped
gentlemen, are the bane of the physicianwearying his soul out
with their fancied ills! It were well if we had more Abernethys
in our catalogue of doctors. How this excellent and
praise-worthy
fraternity contrive to enjoy life so well, and to look so
round and happy as the most of them do, is to me a puzzle.
Speaking
of puzzles, reminds me, Reader, of one now lying
perdue in my breeches pocket, which I am about to transcribe
for your edification. Rack your brain over it, for it is a
veritable
enigma, and susceptible of solution. Ten to one, you don't
guess it! A wide round has that enigma gone, among the
Philadelphia
lawyersthat proverbially puzzle-solving tribeyet it
remains unravelled. As the newspapers say, when a sheep has
been stolen, and the thief escaped, `The whole matter is veiled
in impenetrable mystery.' It was engendered by a
savant
who
wore a red wig, and took a great deal of snuff. What is it?
There's the question?
A NEW PUZZLE.
It
is as high as all the stars,
No well was ever sunk so low;
It is in age, five thousand years,
But was not born an hour ago.
It is as wet as water is,
No red-hot iron e'er was drier;
As dark as night, as cold as ice,
Shines like the sun, and burns like fire,
No soul, nor body to consume
No fox more cunning, dunce more dull;
'Tis not on earth, 'tis in this room,
Hard as a stone and soft as wool.
'Tis of no color, but of snow,
Outside and inside black as ink;
All red, all yellow, green and blue
This moment you upon it think.
In every noise, this strikes your ear,
'Twill soon expire, 'twill ne'er decay;
Does always in the light appear,
And yet was never seen by day.
Than the whole earth it larger is,
Than a small pin's point 't is less;
I'll tell you ten times what it is,
Yet after all, you shall not guess!
'Tis in your mouth, 't was never nigh
Where'er you look, you see it still;
'Twill make you laugh, 'twill make you cry;
You feel it plain, touch what you will.
I have no great respect for charades, rebuses, and riddles, but
the foregoing puzzle is so `very mysterious,' as Paul Pry would
say, that it will well repay an hour's study. Who gives it up?
I consider it worth finding out. It will be found different from
one half those forlorn enigmas which pay so poorly for a
discovery
.
Such things remind me of the missionary who was
ascending
the Mississippi with some religious tracts, and stepped on
shore from a flat-boat, to accost an old lady who was knitting
before
a low shanty, under a tree near the river. It was in the
Asiatic cholera time, and the epidemic was then in New Orleans.
`My good woman,' said the evangelist, as he offered her a
tract, `have you got the
gospel
here?'
`No, Sir, we han't,' replied the old crone, `but they've got it
awfully down to New O'leens!'
The question was a puzzle.
It is better, I take it, to laugh than to cry; and, Reader, I
hope thou relishest a joke. If thou dost not, I am sorry for
thee. If thy ears are deaf to
jeux d'esprit,
and thine eye
looketh
around upon the world with a dullness which humor cannot
brighten, then I say, Go to, thou art not of my kidney. `As a
Dutch host, if you come to an inn in Germanie, and dislike your
fare, diet, lodging, etc., replies, in a surly tone, `If you like not
this, get you to another inn,' so I resolve, if you like not my
writing, go read something else. I do not much esteem thy
censure
;
take thy course; 't is not as thou wilt, nor as I will;
for every man's witty labor takes not, except the matter, subject,
occasion, and some commending favorite, happen to it.'
Apropos
of crying: I know a clever and venerable
septuagenarian
,
who, when he should laugh, always weeps. Tell him a
good story, or a bit of pleasant news, and he will sob as if his
heart would break. I met him not long since in the country, in
a mixed company; the brilliant fragments of a marriage party.
The bridegroom was of his household; and when the good old
gentleman
found that his young relative had committed matrimony
with a lovely specimen of girlhood, and under the most favorable
auspices, he burst forth into an irrepressible flood of sorrow and
joy together. His chair shook under him with the intensity of
his emotions, as if it partook of them; while his aged optics
`purging thick amber and plum-tree gum'exhibited his
amiable
weakness in a fruitful river of brine. It was a hearty
spectacle
,
to see such sympathy and genial feeling in the bosom of
Age. I love to see these ancient reservoirs of sentiment
occasionally
stirred up with the pole of passing events.
`Did you have a pleasant party, on the evening of the bridal?'
quoth the old gentleman to one of the nuptial train.
`O, delightful!' was the answer`perfectly delightful!'
`Good gracious!'responded the querist`you don't say
so!' And then he collapsed again into a paroxysm of doleful
enjoyment, that was most edifying to observe.
Well, I love to see these things; I love to see the fountains
of affection welling up from the slow-throbbing heart of Eld.
When I become old; when the vital current plays tardily and
sadly through the shrunken conduits of my frame; when at
times, I `'gin to be a-weary of the sun;' when the sober
autumnal
shadows are stealing along my pathway, and voices from
the Past tell me how many are lost that I have lovedthen let
me cherish those that remain; let me be interested in their
enjoyments
,
and let the light which beams from their open brows
and loving eyes, sink warmly on my heart!
By the way, I like those representations of age, which we see
sometimes in the Scottish pictures of Wilkie, and in paintings of
the Flemish schoolwhere the elderly gentleman, as in John
Anderson my Jo, is represented as the very personification of
good feeling. I love to see your `old 'un' enjoy his joke.
How well do I remember observing my father sit down and shake
his capacious sides over
Knickerbocker's
History! Yet he
was a sage, grave man; had shouldered his musket, and carried
his knapsack through many a long campaign, in the Revolution,
and commanded his troops in the last war with honor. His heart
was not saddened, however, by the remembrance of the trials that
he had endured for his country; and well was he able, in the
evening
of his decline, `to show how fields were won'for he had
won them.
Military
matters have materially altered of late years.
There is a vast deal of superfluous courage extant. In a time
of profound peace, the good citizens of many of our states are
bored with fines and mulets, that ought to be discarded
altogether
.
Then, what a sight do some of our militia companies
present? They remind me of the story of the French Prince,
who visited England, and on his arrival at Cambridge, was
greeted by a volunteer company of neighboring clowns,
commanded
by a supreme hind, who exceeded all his train-band for
clumsiness and bad culture. After undergoing a sort of review
before the noble stranger, the captain approached him, and
begged
to know the opinion he entertained of the company that
fronted him.
`Sare,' said the Prince, `I'ave seen great many companie;
great many battallion; I'ave seen de grand corps de Napoleon;
de guard National; I'ave seen de allied armee; I'ave seen de
Swiss and de Jarman, de Russ and de Pruss, but ma foi,
captain
,
I'ave
nevare
seen such an extraordinare companie as yours;
nevarenevare!
'
The compliment was considered equivocal.
Country trainings are nearly on a par with country serenades.
If their dispraise can be expressed in a more appropriate simile,
I should be glad to find it out. A friend of mine, in one of the
interior towns of the Key-stone State, recently undertook to
serenade a young lady toward whom he had a kind of
sentimental
propensity. I dare say he
promised
good music, being far
more notorious for promises than
performance;
but when the
evening came, the expectant damsel was greeted with such a
concord of sounds, as had not been heard since the days of
Babel
.
Tin horns, fiddles, made of cornstalks, cow-bells, triangles,
a fife, a bass drum
base
it was!and that guttural instrument,
the bassoon; these, played upon by a band of boorish
tatterdemallians
,
made up the music and the band. The wakeful Venus
endured it as long as her weak nerves would allow; when she
arose, `in bed gown clad,' and popping her night-cap'd head from
the window, poured forth such a polyglott remonstrancein
Dutch, English, and
patois
that the serenaders were obliged
to decamp with a most precipitate scattering. Would that our
ungainly and useless militia might obey the public
remonstrance
follow
the example, and do likewise!
NUMBER FIVE.
September,
1835.
My
good friend of a Reader, let us have another chat
together
.
I must spin my yarn now and then, or I should grow
melancholy, and you would burst in ignorance. I love this
haphazard
way of writing; I can be as discursive as a disporting
colt, when high-strung health incites him to dancing pleasaunce,
and his frame is replete with pasture. My charter is as large as
the wind; and I allow myself to `flare up' on almost any topic.
It is the best way. I have no ambitious veins of thought under
my skull; I expect not preferment; I am a lover of quiet, and
despise notoriety. I leave that boon to be clutched at by a
thousand
little celebrities of the day. I wish to be familiar, but not
too bold; and easy, but not too tame, neither. Of renown, I
experienced enough last week to satisfy me for a decade. My
strongest aspirations were gratified by the appearance of my
name in the Post-office list of lettersa marked distinction,
which
seems
like fameand for which two extra cents were paid
without a murmur. Now that my name is up in this way, I can
afford to seize my quill, and let it play, in holyday spirit, among
Scenes and Sentences. Like good old Democritus, junior, I
can say to him who reads me, that `'Tis not my study or intent
to compose neatly, which an orator requires, but to express
myself
readily and plainly, as it happens; so that, as a river runs,
sometimes precipitate and swift, then dull and slow; now direct,
then
per ambages;
now deep, then shallow; now broad, then
narrow, doth my style flow; now serious, then light; now
comickal, then satyrickal; now more elaborate, then remiss, as
the subject requires, or I stand affected. And if thou vouchsafe
to read this treatise, it shall seem no otherwise to thee than the
way to an ordinary travelersometimes foul, sometimes fair;
here champion, there enclosed; barren in one place, better soil
in another; by woods, groves, hills, dales, plains, and so forth,
will I lead thee through variety of objects,
some
of which thou
shalt surely like.' This, I take it, is the way to be agreeable.
Your fellow who sits down to his page with a brimstone spirit, or
with turgid thoughts, generally plays the part, either of a
misanthrope
or a jackass; two characters that, next to a bum-bailiff
after a militia fine, I hold in the supremest contempt. One of the
first-mentioned genus I know, who is eternally complaining of the
world. With the soul of indomitable discontent ever rankling
within him, he looks on every scene with an eye which pleasure
can not brighten; he takes every child of Adam for a rascal, and
for all he meets has a black look and a cross word. Yet no one,
probably, has had more cause of gratitude, than himself, for
favors and benefactions received at the hands of his fellows. Yet
he goes on, Ishmael-like, injuring and injured; having the
foolishness
to think that he can
derive
pleasure without
giving
it, and
repay good with evil:
`He is a sackcloth bard,
God
help his grief!
He blames the bowers with night-shade overrun;
He weeps his eyes red o'er a faded leaf,
And wastes his pathos on the dying sun.'
He supposes that men are monsters, and women as treacherous
as mermaids. Thus believing and acting, he is ever in hot
water
.
To hear him talk, or to read his writings, you would fancy
that the man had just escaped from Bedlam. Litigation is his
element; and the suffering lawyers whom he retains, are puzzled
to decide which is the most doubtful, the character of their
client, or their prospect of pay. You would laugh, reader, to
hear this fellow talk about the wasting calamities of life.
Robust
,
whiskered, and sturdy in his lookwith the exception of
his saffron-colored visage, that index of bilehe represents
himself as the elect of the grave; on the extremest verge of
which he would be thought to have been standing any time these
ten years. He once called, at a University, upon a friend of
mine, who was busy in his professorship. `Ah, Mr. L,'
said he, in a solemn, sepulchral tone, `this is a dark day for me.
Misery is my lot; despair dogs my footsteps; friends cut me;
the fates hunt me like blood-hounds; and a cloud of obloquy
hangs about my name. I feel that my country is unworthy of
such a nurseling of the Nine as I. I think of going to
Greece
.'
`To
Greece!
' exclaimed the professor; `you had better
go to
grass!
'
I believe he took the learned gentleman's advice; for he seems
to have been ever since on the journey.
Now this is a specimen of a class of men, that I sincerely
pity, and can not abide. They are canine occupants of the great
manger of life; they eat not themselves, in peace, neither will
they let others. I aroynt them, one and all. I love your good,
hearty person, who does not despise his fellow men, nor deem
them all caitiffs; who has a smile, a joke, and
human sympathies
.
There is nothing like these, unless it be susceptibility to beauty.
This is a source of superior pleasure.
Who
does not love to
look at a pretty woman?
`
Who
can curiously behold
The smoothness and the sheen of Beauty's cheek,
Nor feel the heart can never all grow old?'
I regard ladies in public masses, as I do a splendid gallery of
pictures. I say, readerjust in your individual eardid you
never particularly relish a jaunt on board a steam-boat, when you
found beautiful women there? Tell me honestly, did they not,
though strangers, materially enhance the delightsomeness of your
journey? Have you not singled out some fairest One of them
all, and directed a volley of desperately-agreeable looks to
herward
;
greatly delectated, peradventure, when they met return?
You sit and feel the bland air playing over your temples; the
broad river expands before you; beautiful scenes flit by on either
side; and then you drink in a delicious intoxication with your
eyes, which delights the more, because you know it is
ephemeral
.
It is one of those pleasures that nobody writes about, and
every body feels. And do you not entertain a deep regret, when
the city, with its pompous spires and bay, appears in view; when
you near the crowded wharf, and amid bustling trunk-hunters and
band-box exporters, you perceive your eye-acquaintance glide
away? Somebody stands near the wharf; it is her cousin
George, or Henry, and her sister. Don't you envy the young
thing who inserts her sweet face and pouting lips under that veil,
and receives that ringing kiss? To be sure you doand that
is just all the good it does you. The fair
Inconnue
is rolled off
in a coach, and the next day you have forgotten her altogether.
This is one of those cheap and unmentioned felicities, of which
we have so many to sweeten existence; that are as pleasant as
they are pure and fleeting to the participant, and which are
mortal flat to a spectator!
It is with the troubles of life, as with its pleasures; there are
a great many that you can not allude to. Somebody may annoy
you in an unredressable way; places that you wish to visit may be
`improved' by others; a man may change hats with you, seduce
your umbrella, or tread on your toe. But I can always endure
these things at an opera, or a play, when well attended. Beauty
hallows and sanctifies a thousand inconveniences. I have stood
in a kind of rapture, looking at feminine loveliness, when I was
hedged around in a back box by a clan of unctuous and
perspiring
varlets; but when I could discern Beauty, I cared not. I
could mark the Phidian lip, the Grecian nose, the uplifted, open
brow, the tasteful
coiffure,
and see the negligent eye-lashes rise
and fall, over orbs of surpassing lustre. What cared I, that
their light, as if `shot from the deadly level of a gun,' came to
me past the old hats and oily coats of expectorating vagabonds?
I do not know how it is, but such things do greatly augment
one's better sympathies. And it is often done by ocular
deception
.
I have a friend who always construes a look from a lady,
at an opera or play, as a direct tribute to himself; yet he is
shortsighted
,
and can not tell, in nine cases out of ten, whether he is
the observed or not. His
amour propre,
however, always takes
the brightest side. I know several blades who, from this cause,
are patronising tailors to an extravagant degree; depredating upon
every one of those artisans who `exults to trust, and blushes to
be paid.' One youth of this kind I knowa dolt of the very
first waterwho said to an acquaintance, recently, in my
presence
:
`Do you know the Miss's of Noo-Yawk? What
devilish susceptible crechures they ar', to be su-ah! I called on
them a few months ago, and sang to them `Zurich's Waters,'
and `Me Sister De-ah,' and don't you think, they both fell in
love with me? Egad, they did
so;
but I couldn't relieve, and
so I cut them. I vow I won't be cruel to any body if I can
help it; I won't, positively; would you?'
This was at an Ordinary. `I say, straanger,' said a
rough-looking
book-pedlar from Illinois, who sat near this scented
braggart
,
`you are not a
man,
are you?a full-bound man? You
don't sartingly answer to a masculine title, do you? I should
take you for a pocket edition of a sheep. Them's my sentiments,
and you have 'em gratis. You havn't brains enough to fascinate
a kitten; yet you do
raally
fancy you are something oncommon!
You are
too
flat to keep your eyes open, fully; and I'll bet a
wolf-trap, that the sight of a full-blown poppy would set you to
sleep, any time. Oh, pshaw! Landlord, give this thing a weak
lemonade, scented with rose water, and tote me a pint of brandy;
hot, with a red pepper in it, and a common segar. I'll go
bail for the bill.'
The irresistible young man walked off, with a mingled look of
inanity and anger.
It
is astonishing how many stupid people you meet in society;
fellows with brains in their purses, who will talk you an infinite
deal of nothing, and thus beget a reputation of being remarkably
fluent and agreeable persons. A sample of this genus I lately
encountered in a fashionable drawing-room. I inquired after the
health of an acquaintance of mine, and friend of his, whom he
had met in Washington, during the winter, adding that I esteemed
him a fine fellow.
`Fine fellow,' said Mr. Voluble Pipkins, `fine fellow, d'ye
say? By Jove, he's not only a fine fellow, Sir, but d'ye
observe
,
he's a good fellowa glorious fellowa noble man, Sir;
an immense, a stupendous man. Egad, Sir, I consider him equal
toMoore's Melodies!'
I tried to review this laudatory emission of
vox et preterea nihil,
and to ascertain what Moore's Melodies had to do in comparison
with a clever fellow, but a new outpouring of verbiage left me no
time for the effort.
Pipkins now began to describe his travels in the South, in the
course of which he gave a fact an inference that I thought rather
unique
.
`How do you like the Southrons?' I inquired.
`Oh, bless you, ver' well; ver' well; the moral excellence
of the people is proverbial; but the mutton is scarce and poor.
However, I don't like mutton, myself!'
A GREAT
many young men imagine that any thing can be said
to a woman in the way of nonsense, and relished to boot. I
remember
a country party, a few miles from the metropolis, where
a few young middies and dragoons were invited. The
rosy-cheeked
girls were playing blind man's buff, when we arrived.
A few maids, beyond a certain age, were planted round the sides
of the apartment. Toward one of these, a mischievous young
dragoon bent his way. He was, let me premise, in the incipiency
of jollification.
`Tranquil lady!' said he, with a grave look, `you seem to
contemplate this scene of enjoyment with an indifferent eye. To
me it is a picture of delight. It warms my bosom extensively.
It gives to my mental optics those scenes in the West, where the
settlers used to recruit our corpuses with creatur' comforts.
It reminds me of the pleasant days of my youth, when I lay upon
the damp cold earth, and listened to the cannon's roaring
symphonies
.'
`I don't understand that 'are,' said the ancient damsel, in a
husky tone, and with a look uncommonly `furtive.'
Reader, did you ever eat a supper at a country party? It is
quite
l'autre chose
from one in the city. Your ice-cream, salads,
and champaigne, are not there; but in their stead are
substantialities
of the heaviest kind. It is a sort of late dinner, and
you have course after course in eternal abundance. In the
present
case,
`'Tis fit that I should tell you what
Those gentles had to eat;
How ale went round, and how,
God
wot,
The tables groaned with meat.
Suffice to say, that trim sirloin
Of bullock, proud in death to join
With radish-of-the-horse;
Flanked by a soup's embossed tureen,
And eke by cauliflower, of mein
Winsome and white as ere was seen,
Adorned the firstling course.'
This was followed by a various profusion of good things, the
number of which it would have puzzled Zerah Colburn to
compute
.
I never saw so complete a specimen of a legitimate rural
repast. It was broad morning before we came home; none of
us at a loss to know
why
such a difference exists between the
delicate belles of cities, and their buxom rivals of the country.
Speaking
of country girlsyou will see them at
camp-meetings
,
plenty as blackberries. Did you ever visit one of these
convocations? There is a sublimity about them, notwithstanding
several ludicrous features, which must be felt to be appreciated.
I once attended one, in the interior of New York. It was
Autumn
,
and our partly left home on a tour of ten miles, just as the
evening sun was sending his slant radiance over the many-colored
glories of an October landscape. River, lake, and gorgeous
woodland, shone in the declining day-beams; the tall poplar
gave to the gale its yellow leaf, and melancholy whisper; the
moping owl, as the twilight deepened, complained to the moon.
I was quite young, and full to overflowing with animal spirits.
But when we reached the camp-ground, in the forest, I was
hushed into awe. It was enclosed by a hedge of green boughs,
nearly a mile in circumference; tents encircled the area, against
the hedge, and the light of torches placed in sticks high among
the trees, beamed fitfully in the evening gusts, upon the
variegated
and swaying boughs of the wilderness. Unperceived, I
clomb a sapling by the side of our tent, and surveyed the scene.
From a rude pulpit in the midst of the vast assemblage, a
sonorous preacher was delivering his message. He spoke with
much eloquence, and ended with prayer, and the naming of a
hymn. The multitude beneath him tossed tumultuously around,
a living ocean of humanity. Shrieks, groans, supplications, and
cries of `glory!' rent the air. Sundry brethren were moving
briskly about, comforting mourners, and singing snatches of
sacred song. Never shall I forget one sweet voice, seemingly
endowed with supernatural melody, breathing out:
`
Jesus,
lover of my soul,
Let me to thy bosom fly,
While the billows o'er me roll,
While the tempest still is high.
Hide me, oh! my
Saviour,
hide,
Till the storms of life be past;
Safely to the haven guide,
Oh receive my soul at last!'
Beyond the enclosure, I could perceive groups of ragamuffins,
with torches stuck in the ground, under the boughs of a dark
and gloomy pine, swearing, drinking, and playing cards with a
straggling party of friendly Indians. It was an
Ollapodiana
kind
of a scene.
When the hymn was finished, one of those dull souls arose,
of whom not a few may be found in all persuasions, who seem
ordained of heaven to make their audiences literal specimens of
self-denial, by listening to their ministrations. He drawled out
his vapid sentences in the worst and weakest taste. His text
was from the parable of the Rich Man and Lazarus. In
describing
the beggar at the gate of Dives, (so beautifully depicted
by David Teniers, in his
Mauvais Riche,
) he said it was not
wonderful that the mendicant should have chosen such a
position
:
`for,' said he, logically, `provisions in them days was
sumptuous and plenty. Even the beggars got a good living, and
Lazarus, no doubt of it, liked his place. Individiwals of his
calling didn't then get from rich men's tables, as they do now,
little bits of bread, and 'tature, and pork, and pickle; no, my
hearers, they got
great plates of pie,
and sich things. Hence
we view, that Lazarus was in dan-ger, when surrounded with
dogs, that might have stolen half his victuals!'
It came to pass, some months after this, that a friend of mine
heard this same divine preach a sermon at the funeral of a middle
aged lady, who was greatly beloved in the community where she
died. Her family was large, and highly respectable; but having
moved a long time previous from a neighboring State, little was
known of their origin. The obsequies were attended by a large
and sympathising community. The preacher opened his
discourse
,
by speaking of the good character of the deceased, and
the sad occasion which called the company together. `But, my
friends,' said he, `unknown to you, I have greater cause for
seriousness at this solemn time, than any one before me. Even
these surviving relations, who are most interested in what I am
going to communicate, have forgotten the time when, long ago,
and afar off, they once heard my voice. It is now about twenty
years since the father of the deceased, and of her brothers and
sisters now seated with other relatives present, suddenly expired
before my eyes. Yes, I had the melancholy satisfaction, among
thousands of others, of
seeing him hung
. I read the hymn
which was sung ere he swung; and I hopethough he seemed
not to relish my informing him that he would soon go from `works
to rewards,' nor to appreciate my kind advice generallythat,
as most persons who die from the scaffold generally do, he went
to glory, right off.'
With this pleasing and complimentary reminiscence, the
speaker
took his text from that chapter in the book of Esther, wherein
is recorded the execution of Haman. From this he drew, neck
and heels, the far-fetched inference, that all earthly things were
uncertain, and that it was equally hard to tell
how,
as
when,
we
should die. After a prolix `improvement,' he concludedto
the great edification, doubtless, of the audience in general, and
the mourners in particular.
To return to our camp-meeting. We left the ground as the
day was breaking. The noisy congregation; the declining
watch-fires
by the tents; the solemn drapery of the tall cedars, just
catching the first smile of Light; all formed a scene to be
remembered
.
I think, now, how appropriately could have been
applied to it, as we stepped slowly from the ground, the lines of
Mrs. Hemans:
`Yes, lightly, softly move!
There is a Power, a Presence in the woods;
A viewless Being, that with life and love
Informs the reverential solitudes;
The rich air knows it, and the mossy sod
Thou, Thou art here, my
God
!
`And if with awe we tread
The minster floor, beneath the storied pane,
And 'midst the mouldering banners of the dead,
Will the green, voiceful wild seem less Thy fane?
This
fane, which Thou hast built?where arch and roof
Are of Thy living woof?'
Let
me say one word, Reader, of her from whom I have
just quoted. She was my friend, and we have often exchanged
thoughts and words with each other. Not soon shall we look
upon her like again. She was a pure spirit, essentially
disembodied
,
before she left the world. Made `perfect through
suffering
,'
she seemed permitted by Heaven to linger beyond her time
on earth, a glorious example of feminine loveliness beautified by
Pain. A volume only would do justice to her worth; and for
her gifts, her works remain their eulogy. In all things, I revered
her; and while musing to her memory, may I usurp a signature,
and trust myself in song?
MRS. HEMANS.
We
weep not, when the yellow leaves are gathered,
While Autumn's peace and plenteousness abound;
When from the tinted boughs, like rainbows withered,
The golden fruit drops richly to the ground;
When solemn Nature round her sadness throws
A mellow glory and a warm repose.
We weep not then, amid the fruitage falling,
Whose affluent incense rises to the sky;
Though then we hear soft spirit-voices calling,
That tell how loved and cherished things must die;
For to the fairest blooms a change must come,
That the ripe treasures may be garnered home.
'Twas thus with thee, Beloved! their holy mission
Thy heart and soaring lays at last fulfilled;
Then rolled the cloud beyond the spirit's vision,
Till all the music of thy lyre was stilled;
And like a melting wave, or waning sun,
Passed from this vale of ill the Gifted One!
'Tis well, divinest Soul, with thee! for Heaven
Had filled thine inmost thoughts with sacred dreams;
And to thy reverie and song was given
A world of radiant and immortal gleams;
Yea, gorgeous pictures of a better land
Did ever to thy view their scene expand,
Now, all their fadeless pomp and glow perceiving,
Thou breathest freely, in celestial air;
Thy tender heart hath ceased its weary grieving,
And the pure mind is bathed in rapture there;
While, mid fair ways no earthly foot hath trod,
In white thou walkest, present with thy
God
!
Thou hearest melody, whose flowing numbers
Once came but faintly to thy mortal ear,
When ills of time were lost in evening slumbers,
And magic Fancy brought her Eden near;
Thou hast thy yearning hopes' fruition now
The wreath of Paradise surrounds thy brow!
Thou hearest harps delicious, sweetly ringing,
And sister Spirits fan thee with their wings;
With them thou minglest, and with them art singing,
Where, named of Life, the crystal river springs;
Where, like some changing prism, expand the skies,
And purple hills from vernal vales arise.
Thou art in glory, oh rejoicing Spirit!
Thou look'st on flowers that no pale frost may stain;
And from a changeless Friend thou dost inherit
A lyre triumphant, breathing not of pain;
Thou hast thy
Home
at last, from sorrow free,
And all is blessedness and peace with thee!
Philadelphia
.
W. G. C.
I have just seen an engraved bust of Mrs. Hemans, which I
can not doubt is a perfect resemblance of her features, with the
exception of the eyes. It was taken, as I suppose, in her early
and happy days. The soft wavy locks are parted sweetly on her
high forehead, and fall in beautiful tresses by either cheek; the
expression of the face is cheerfulbeautiful; and every
lineament
betokens the presence of intellect. The temples are lofty
and full; and the department of the brain strongly developed.
I perceive
that I am beginning to speak like a phrenologist,
for which I beg my reader's pardon. I have small sympathy
and respect for those learned professors of craniology. I do not
believe that the human skull ever was intended as a sort of
topographical
chart of the soul and its affections. The general
principles
of the science are plausibleperhaps
true;
but when you
come to subdivide a man's sconce into innumerable sections of
thought and feeling; when you give to every impulse its place of
origin; it is, as my friend Grant Thorburn said in Boston,
`coming to rather close quarters.' The truth is, such a science,
pursued to its
ultimatum,
is the height of folly. I have no
reverence
for
names,
thank heaven! unless they are hallowed by
reason
.
I acknowledge that the brain is placed in a certain part of
the human head; that if that part be small, or diminished, the
quantity of gumption, in the individual who owns the sconce,
will be `nothing to speak of;' and this is the extent of my
phrenology
.
Half the modern professors of this science are as
arrant
quacks as ever vended nostrum. They tell a story of an
acquaintance of minea wag, who, by the way, has never denied
itto this effect. He was determined to
quiz a phrenologist
.
Accordingly, he repaired to his shoe-maker, and caused him to
place upon his head an enormous organ of
wax
. The disciple
of Crispin performed his task well; placed the organ rightly
according
to the fithographed plate, and stuck upon it a goodly
covering of human hair. Thus accoutered, our hero visited the
phrenological professor. He submitted his head to the decisive
palms of his Bump-ship, and received his opinion. `God bless
me, Sir!' said the learned judge, `you have an admirable head,
in many respects; but you possess one organ which speaks
volumes for your character.'
`What is that, pray?'
`This is it, Sirallow me to direct your hand to it, Sir
this is it. Do you feel it? That, Sir, is the organ of
adhesiveness
and
never before, I think, did I see it so strongly
developed
.
Believe me, Sir, you are a wonderful exemplification
of our theory; so much so, indeed, that I should almost be
tempted to pronounce you a
lusus natur
of science.'
`No you don't!' said the patient, removing the waxen
protuberance
;
`
you
are the
curiosity;
you can't tell gum from
gumption!'
I must
close. I fear I am getting prosywhich I dislike,
of all things. It is pleasant to talk for a while, when our spirits
are animated, and we feel colloquial; but it is folly to push
conversation
,
when the soul which creates it begins to flag. It is
like the attempt at festivity among the last lingerers at a ball, in
the `small hours' of the morninga deplorable scene!
`All, all is gloom! and dandies in the dumps,
Dance in responsive dullness to their pumps,
Like some town hack, that, spavined, old, and blind,
Trots to the wheezing of his broken wind.'
Ere long, reader, we will discourse together again; in October,
probablyin November, certainly. `There will be divine
sarvice
in this meeting-house,' said a colored man of
God,
at a
church of his order, `in a fortnight,
God
willing
in tree week,
wheder or no!
' I reject such predictions; but I hope we shall
meet again, my `reading public''till when,
Dieu! Voila le
commencement du fin!
'
NUMBER SIX.
October,
1835.
Magnificent
and pompous Autumn! It cometh before me
with `dyed garments' of glory; with trailing clouds of
innumerous
tints, with leaves that fill the air with solemn whispers, and
paint the viewless gusts in hues of beauty. Splendid Autumn!
Thy every feature is lovely to my soul. There is not a spray
which yields its tribute to the wind, that hath not a lesson in its
shiver, and a moral in its sound. When the `sweet South' seeks
in vain for the summer flowers, over which it ranged like a
chartered
libertine, rifling their cups, and betraying their soft odors;
when the clouds lie in long red bars across the West, and the
deep tones of woods and waters ring through the clear and
searchable atmosphere
then
is the Spirit of Autumn my monitor
and my companion. I walk over the sere meadow; I see the
many-colored fruits piled up in rich profusion under the generous
orchard trees; I hear the pensive and farewell chanting of the
birds, as they poise their pinions for milder climes, and I deem
their melody a summons of gratitudea call for thanksgiving.
Then Memory is busy; a sweet repose falls like golden light on
every vision of the past, and all its regrets are lost in that
enchanting
radiance. This is Autumn, to me. I think of the pure
skies, the broad lakes, and the swelling mountains, on which the
eyes of my childhood feasted, until I become again a resident
among them, scaling verdant peaks, and looking abroad on seas
of rainbow-foliage tossing to the breeze; or mayhap,
delectating
my palate with gathered chesnuts, and my ear with their
harmony, as they pattered on the leaves from the lofty burs:
touching perchance, in their fall, the whirring wing of the
partridge
,
as it wheeled through the woods. There is not a thought
of Autumn that is sad to me. I love it for itself alone: `scene
of ripe fruits and mellow fruitfulness;' of calmness, beauty, and
abundance; it has voices, and sights, and influences, that I
5
would not exchange for a dukedom. I am always obliged to
shake from my pen a few drops of superfluous enthusiasm, in
the Autumn time.
I was
sitting yesterday, looking over my newspaper, and
thinking of other timesto which direction this season always
bids me turnwhen I fell into a profound meditation on the
great progress and power of those pregnant folios. I remember
the time that when the weekly newsprint, brought to `our village'
by the post-rider, came to hand, I would pore over its blue and
reeking columns with a degree of interest that nothing else could
match. Every word of its contents, advertisements and all,
would be devoured at a sitting. The dailies of New-York were
smaller than the country weeklies now, and issued, perhaps, in
smaller numbers. No crowds of boys beset the wharves, and all
public places, of the metropolis, as now, with such vociferations
as these: `
Here's
the Courier and Enquirer!
Here's
the Sun,
Jeff'sonian, Tra-a-nscript!
Here's
the Journal of Commerce!
Yere's
the American
and
the Post!
Yere's the
Star
with
the
foreign news!
Yere's
the `Old Sarpent,'
and
the
Spirits-o'-Seventy-six
,
and
the Advertiser!
Yere's
the Spirits-Times,
and
the Morning Herald!' No trifling penny won a little world
of knowledge, then. How changed is
now
the scene! He who
cannot read as he runs, at this era, must indeed be a way faring
fool. I rejoice to see this glorious influence of the press
pervading
our country. While it continues, we can never be
otherwise
than free. Guided, as it mainly is, by strength and vigor
of intellectinspired as it is, with the fervor of free bosoms
its course is onward, and its power irresistible. An unfettered
press is the glory of a nation. Here, it should be
peculiarly
free; else it cannot echo the voice of the people. What this
people yet will be, in morals, in political importance, and in
national power, depends greatly on the press. Its weight, in the
broad scale of good and evil, is beyond the patriot's fear, or the
enthusiast's dream.
Respecting
dreams, I would say a word. Surrounded as
we are with mysterywith our yesterdays in the grave, and our
to-morrows in Eternitywhat is a greater mystery than a dream?
It comes to us when we are, as it were, in death; when whole
cities are still; when the rich and poor, the rough and gentle,
the care-worn and the careless, lie down in the blessed equality
of slumber, and wrap around them the mantle of repose. How
sweet must dreams be to the captive! Dreams of the blue sky,
the shining stars, the open fields; the moon, like a golden lamp,
rolling through the dark blue depths of heaven! I have certainly
had visions in the night-watches which have delighted me for
months; flinging about my daily paths a glow and beauty which
tongue cannot utter, nor pen portray; until I have been ready to
say on waking, with one of old,
`Redde mihi campos meos floridos,
columnam auream, assistentes angelos:'
Give me my fields again,
my most delicious fields, my pillar of a glorious light, and my
assistant angels!
Reader, did you never have queer dreams? Had you ever a
vision of being at a fashionable party, and all at once discover
that you had no coat on? That one of your feet was a broom,
wherewith, in obedience to some superior mandate, you were
engaged in both dancing and sweeping? I wot of one, who has.
It is hard work to
run
in a dream. I have been chased by
Indians thus, and could never get on. Some horrid weight
hangs to one's feet; he feels the breath of his enemy on his
shoulders and neckbut it seems an age ere he is overtaken.
It is folly to say that it is not unpleasant to be killed in a dream.
I have laid down my life in this way, an hundred times.
One curious vision I remember, in my boyish days.
Methought
I was crossing an immense abyss, on a single grape-vine,
with Apollyon for a pilot. I forget his appearance exactly, but
it was hideous in the extreme. He led me over the dark and
dismal void, until I had reached the midway part of the vine,
when he attempted the gymnastic feat of throwing me off. I
caught him by the hair, which me-seemed was composed of red
hot wires, very fine, and with a giant's strength hurled him below.
I hear yet sometimes the booming thunder of his `sail
broadvans
,'
as he fell. Then, methought I experienced a pair of
beautiful wings, and sailed away upon them to a paradise of rest.
I have done many valiant things in dreams, and made many
valued acquaintances. In them I have held large discourse with
Shakspeare, Milton, Sir Philip Sidney, Walter Scott, and I
know not how many other worthies. Then my travels! I know
not where I have
not
been in my visions. My last tour of this
sort was to Jerusalem. There I met many patriarchs and
prophets, and delivered a bitter oration to Judas, on his
treachery
.
On these occasions, I have always said to myself, `Well,
thank Heaven! this is
no dream
. I have dreamed about such
things heretofore, but this is
real
.' In this style I have visited
Paris and London; have wept with Josephine at Malmaison;
and, as
aid de camp
to Napoleon, assisted in reviewing his troops
in the
Champ de Mars
. Heaven only knows how many times I
have dined with kings and princes, from Solomon down to
William
the Fourth.
There is nothing so glorious as water in a dream! With a
strange green light, the waves arise and roll. Speaking in a
visionary
sense, I can say with St. Paul. `A night and a day
have I been in the deep.' I have been drowned several times;
and on one occasion, went across the Atlantic in a chariot, with
Pharaoh in livery for a driver. Fantastical thoughts, like those
of which Irving and Hood complain, often rise in thick-coming
throngs to my mind; sometimes laden with dolour, and at others,
full of amusement and edification.
I have wept in dreams, and bitterly, too. Once I had a
vision, that two dear friends had gone to India, as missionaries.
I followed them, through dreadful tempests, across the ocean.
We approached Calcutta; a beautiful vision of palaces and piles,
surrounded with hills of wonderful palm-trees, whose green leaves
displayed around their borders a circle of glorious and
prismatic
light. I touched the shore: the great car of Juggernaut
seemed approaching, and foremost in the ranks of the
idolaters,
were the friends I sought. They had been converted to
heathenism
.
Before I could reach them, they plunged themselves
beneath
the car. I saw them crushed by the sanguinary wheels;
their blood streamed around me! It was a horrid dream; and
when I awoke, how supremely happy did I arise, to thank
God
it was `but a dream!'
I have
a friendhe belongs to the confraternity of ancient
and honorable bachelorswho is wont to describe a most
painful
dream which he encountered in his thirtieth year. Before I
give his vision, however, I will describe the Visionary. He is
now about two, or, 'by'r Lady, inclining to three score;' is very
censorious, and declares that the ladies now-a-days are nothing,
compared with those who flourished when `we young fellows'
delighted society, in our powdered hair and graceful queues.'
He says that people have much degenerated; and still avers with
pertinacious impudence, that he was once, and that not long ago,
considered the Adonis of the town. Sad alteration! I scarcely
know what emblem would now represent his features. His face
is like a faded apple, and his eyes twinkle from under his shaggy
brows, like a mastiff's. He says a flat thing, laughs at it for
some ten minutes, and then swears at the by-stander who does
not `comprehend the joke.' To what shall I liken this remnant
of the pastthis Ancient of Days? To a withered shrub?
a sapless, hollow bough? No; emblems fail. If he resembles
anything, he is
Most like to carcass perched on gallow-tree.'
Well, to his dream. He thought he was young again, and in
the midst of olden societythe gay Lothario of his time. He
danced, and `shook a graceful foot,' with many a damsel, at an
evening ball. Encountering one who filled him with admiration,
he proposed himself to her at once. He was accepted. A
priest was present, and the dance was exchanged
la mode de
songe-creux
into a bridal party. The Bachelor was married:
he pressed an angel to his bosom.
Months rolled byas they go in dreamsvery swiftly, and
the honey-moon was over. My friend's angel proved a tartar.
They had wordsand from words (so the vision ran) they came
to blows. These squabbles were renewed daily. At last, one
day at breakfast, the unhappy Benedick determined to end his
troubles. He poisoned his coffee, and drank it down. A
dreadful
fever seized him; he groaned, he thirsted, he burned with
heat; and with a hideous yell, he awoke!so delighted at his
celibacy, that he jumped out of bed, and in the darkness of his
apartment, watched only by the waning moon and stars, danced
an energetic rigadoon.
Now this was a dream that could only have entered the head
of some rusty old single gentleman. I eschew his scoundrel
opinions of matrimony, altogether. It has been called a lottery;
but it is only such in one sense; for all who embark in it, have
a full and fair opportunity to judge their prizes; a probationary
season, which affords all needful scrutiny of disposition and
character
.
I am of Milton his mind, with respect of marriage; it is
a pleasing and consummate ordinance, and when thoughtfully
entered
upon, right pleasant to the participants therein. A kind of
marriage mania has broken out among all my friends; they are
dropping away one by one; and all of them, happy fellows!
seem to say by their looks and actions, that they would not thank
a king for his crown. You can't get them to take a glance at a
picture in the shop-windows now, as you are going to dinner:
they must hurry home`there all their treastres be.' A sense
of loneliness sometimes arrests my spirit as I survey these
glorious
companions in their domestic retreats. I have seen the time,
when
`I would not my unhousel'd, free condition
Put into circumscription and confine,
For the sea's worth:'
but that time is not remembered with pleasure, nor is its
continuance
desirable. Truly saith my kind, my beloved old Jeremy
Taylor: `There is nothing can please a man without love:
nothing
but that can sweeten felicity itself. When a man dwclls in
love, then the breasts of his wife are as the droppings upon the
hill of
Hermon,
her eyes are fair as the light of heaven, she is a
fountain sealed, and he can quench his thirst and ease his cares,
and lay his sorrows down upon her lap, and can retire home as
to his sanctuary and refectory, and his gardens of sweetness and
chaste refreshments. No man can tell but he that loves his
children
,
how many delicious accents make a man's heart dance in
the conversation of those dear pledges; their childishness, their
stammering, their little angers, their innocence, their
imperfections
,
their necessities, are so many little emanations of joy and
comfort to him that delights in their persons and society.
She
that is loved is safe, and he that loves is joyful
.' Such pictures as
these, are delightful to see. A parental sort of feeling crawls
over the heart of the bachelor as he reads, and he is ready to
gird himself for adventure, and to say with the lord of Beatrice,
`The world must be peopled!'
I read this passage the other day to a casual acquaintance, and
he said, profanely, it was `dd nonsense!' But then he is
proverbial for the extreme smallness of his soul. He is one of
those kind of varlets, who are in a measure `upon the town;'
who will indulge their bibulous propensities at the expense of
any and everybody; akin no doubt to the celebrated Simpkins,
the eleemosynary wine-bibber, upon whose tomb-stone the
following
epitaph was recorded, as if from the hand of a
suffering
friend:
`What! Simpkins dead! It cannot be.
Simpkins, will you
take wine
with me?
No answernone? What! nothing said?
Won't he take wine?
he must be dead!
'
The testimony or the anathemas of such a fellow can be
neither
hurtful nor valuable. He hates children, too: says he had
as lief see the devil. Out upon the wretch! If ever there was
a positive manifestation of the divine spirit of
God,
it is the clear
eyes and brows of children.
Their souls are new,
and their
affections
as fresh and ductile as a vine in spring. And how they
bound and glow, with the spirit of existence! I could hang the
manstickler as I am for freedom of opinionwho thinks
otherwise. If there be anything calculated to make us satisfied
with our earthly pilgrimage, it is the love of the young, and the
scenes of animation which they display. I have never had my
head examined by a phrenologist; but it is my belief that the
organ of
Interestinthejoysandsorrowsofchildrenativeness
will be
found there, strongly developed. So much have I thought on
the subject, that I have a rough draft of metre, alluding
thereunto
,
which `it is hoped may please.' I have adopted for it a
plaintive air, now much in vogue in London, among the
coster-mongers
and sweeps, and in which, as in many of the choruses
extant, there is a large amount of meaning. What a world of
thought is hidden, for example, in those magic words, `
ai, ai,
euai, ai, eu!
' in Zurich's Waters! I have seen ladies nod
their heads over pianos, and look as knowingly when they
repeated
these cabalistic monosyllables, as if they contained
explanations
of certain symbols in the Apocalypse. But to the metre.
Stand a little back, Readerhere it comes:
THE LIFE OF YOUTH.
AIR: `ALL ROUND MY HAT.'
There
is a time when light, and air, and flowers,
Are shining brightly whereso'er we tread;
When, from the passing of the swift-wing'd hours,
An atmosphere of love and peace is shed;
When hope flits near us, on her angel wings,
And sweetly to the heart her anthem sings.
Then pleasant transports overcome the bosom,
And days in pictured guise go beaming by;
A softer breath exhaleth from the blossom
A purer radiance gilds the open sky:
The hues of heaven are poured on every scene
On the glad waters, and the fields of green.
All then is beauty; from the gay clouds, waving
Whene'er the breeze their golden skirts may stir,
To the blue streams their bloomy borders laving
The budding orchard, or the vernal fir:
A look of gladness beams where'er we move,
And fills the dancing heart with holy love.
With love for Nature, and for
Him
whose power
Glows in the noontide, or the blush of morn;
Whose smile the waves receivethe tree, the flower
The vine's rich tendrils, and the ripening corn;
It wakes a Sabbath feeling in the breast
A tranquil sense of harmony and rest.
This is
the Life of Youth!
and oh, how fleeting
The glorious splendors of its morning be!
With changeful hues the wildered fancy cheating,
As moonlight smiles imprint the evening sea;
While the fair sails sweep onward in their pride,
O'er treacherous waves that to dim whirlpools glide.
This is the Life of Youth! Oh, could it linger
About us ever, as de Leon sought;
Nor care, nor sorrow with effacing finger,
Destroy the magic web by fancy wrought,
This earth I could not then call stale and flat,
Nor the dark cypress wreathe `
all round my hat!
'
Reader,
I am cut short. I have received intimations (
accompanied
with expressions of complimentary and profound regret)
that the space which I expected to replenish in the present
number
,
has been unexpectedly circumscribed by the
voluminousness
(unlooked-for) of other matter. Wherefore, until next we
meet, I say to you, as Wordsworth said to the companion of one
whom I greatly esteem as an American and a friend
Vive valete!
NUMBER SEVEN.
November,
1835.
One
thing is certain. There is an influence in Autumn which
induces a most oblivious negligence of the time being, which
transfers us from this `ignorant present' into the very bowels of
fairy land. I can scantly take heart-a-grace enough to deglute
my daily provisions, make a morning call, or do any other thing
most easy to be done. I could just sit down, and dream of the
past from morn till dewy eve. Fancies, thicker than the
multitudinous
leaves of Vallombrosa, beleague my soul, and I am led
captive at their will. It is a seasonAutumn iswherein to
play the Looker On.
Pursuant
to this predisposition, I was recently enacting
Spectator
at a City Election. It is a glorious sight to see the People
come up in their majesty and exercise their suffrages. How
animated
are the streets at night, on such occasions! Hundreds
of paper lanthorns gleaming around the polls; transparencies
shining from the head-quarters of wards and parties, and glorious
banners waving their stars and stripes in the gusty sky, over the
humming multitude. I always feel proud of my country at such
times. Surely there never was a better system of government
adopted by man, than ours. Liable to misuse perhaps, but show
me a nation on earth so essentially free as the American. In
truth, we are become `rather too free;' we make bold to infract
the laws somewhat too often. But where is the people that do
not do it more?
It must be confessed, though, that elections in the country are
often burlesque and bombastic to the last degree. Undue
importance
is attached to small matters, little characters are
stupendously
magnified, and little events elevated into marvels. I have
before me, for example, a late number of the Logtown Universal
Advertiser and Entire-Swine Despatch. It presents the details
of an unimportant inspectors' election, something as follows:
`VICTORY!VICTORY!GLORIOUS VICTORY!
`
We
hasten to lay before our numerous readers, and the country at large,
the thrilling events by which yesterday was signalized in the annals of
Logtown
.
The day opened big with the fate of principles
and
men. As the
morn advanced, the throngs of golden clouds which shone in the East
seemed
to cast a smile of welcome, gorgeous and indescribable, o'er a long line
of pedestrian voters, some in one-horse wagons, and all of them residing
near our village, wending to the contest. Heaven looked on with interest
and expectancy. Proud was the issue, and the result also, as the sequel
will show. At last, the auspicious time arrived. The contest was begun
the onslaught was made. The conclusion was, that the immense eagle of
victory sits on our banners, a-flopping her wide spread opinions, to the
confusion
and dismay of the vile horde of foul and corrupt miscreants, traitors
to their country, and
God
-forsaken wretches, who attempted to stop the
flight of the ahead-going bird. Their hopes are prostrated! There is
every certainty that our townsman,
John Jones Smith, Jr., Esq.,
will go to
the Legislature; and we can, with swelling bosoms, fearlessly assure the
nation at large, and the friends of liberty everywhere, that Logtown is
regenerated
,
and disenthralled
erect, and sound to the core!
Henceforth let
her be set down as one of the most Spartan communities on the face of the
earth. `
Liberty or death!
' was her war-cry: it prevailed, and she has
conquered
!
`Of course, where such immense interests of a faction were at stake, bad
passions will have play. We regret to say that several fights occurred,
while the two parties were counting off. One loathsome ragamuffin, with a
face black with anger and dirt, attempted but too successfully to pull the
nose of our worthy magistrate and fellow-townsman, Plutarch Shaw, while
in the agreeable and inoffensive act of taking a pint of beer`thinking no
danger, for he had no guilt.' Blood flowed in torrents, but the estimable
Shaw disdained to retaliate upon his opponent, who repaid his forbearance
with a remark unparalleled for its ingratitude: namely, that `Shaw was too
drunk to lift his fist!' We forbear comment on such atrocious conduct.
It is sufficient to record the factthereby holding up the offender to the
scorn of the world. Contempt, indeed, is a powerful weapon. We had
occasion, ourself, to use it yesterday. A miscreant, totally unbeknown to
us, stopped us by the door of a tavern, where we had made ourself the
recipient
of a few oysters, and with his arms akimbo, inquired: `Are you the
man as edits the Advertiser and Entire-Swine Despatch?' We answered
in the negative, `yes, that we were.' `Well,' said the villain, with a look
of unutterable impudence, `I am glad I have got a sight of you. I have
been a-wanting sometime to see the man as I considers the greatest rascal
and the barefacetest liar in the district!'
`Our reply was calm and dignified. We answered, by way of response,
that we were glad he was gratified; and expressed a hope that, having seen
what he wished, he would pass on. Our reply created much pleasant
laughter
at the time; though a few heated partisans of the opposite party
attempted
to hoot and hiss us. Their malignant souls could not brook our
magnanimity, and consequent safety of person. Poor, vile, contemptible
assassinsfrom the bottom of our heart,
how
we
do
despise them!
`P.S. Since writing the above, we have found reason to believe that the
wretch who was led to address us by the tavern, was urged on by the
upstart
editor of the Logtown General Observer and Deluge of Reform. We
do not doubt it. He is a paltry, low, we had almost said nasty, individual,
and would feel honored by our scorn. Nothing but an insuperable objection
to low epithets, could prevent us from speaking of this felon and caitiff as
he deserves. But we forbear.
Argument,
not
personality,
is our battle-axe.
We leave the conductor of the Deluge to wallow in the rottenness of that
moral leprosy which has covered him all over as with a garment. He is an
utmost wretcha multitudinous puppyperfectly ostensible in character,
and venial in deportment, lacking not urbanity merely, but politeness
likewise
.
With these sentiments we leave him to the vulture-fangs of his own
filthy conscience. We have treated him tenderly in this instancebut let
him beware! One more provocation, and we will gibbet him before a
disgusted
world, in terms which shall be remembered.
Verbal Sap,
as
Homer
says`a word is a sufficiency'and have done.'
It
was glorious sport for me, in the `post prandial hours' of
my school days, when election time came. The student loves
the season, for the
feels
the very spirit of liberty which the
elections
perpetuate and display. It is pleasant to see partisans,
after
election is over, mingling again together in unity and
friendship
.
Half the speeches in political meetings are spoken for
effect, and words are used to express ten times more than they
mean. `Now, here is a point,' said a young friend of mine, as
he showed me some loose notes of a ward-meeting address,
`here's a place where I mean to get up a small lot of
indignation
;
here I will make a touching appeal to patriotism, our
forefather's
rights in jeopardy, and so forth. There are several fine
fellows on the opposition ticket; I have to dine with a couple of
them to-morrow; but I shall call them to-night,
politically,
all
the varlets, traitors, and rascals, that I can lay my tongue to:
and so will they me. But we all know what it amounts tojust
nothing, as far as our social positions are concerned. Do what
we will, in our self-government, we must be a happy people:
but I like the excitement.'
How much by the way, there is in that one word, excitement!
Of how many mad pranks and boyish adventures it is the source
and soul! I once belonged to a fraternity of students y'clept
`
The Snap-Dragon Club
.' I was founded by one Harry
Wilford
,
a harum-scarum youth as ever thumbed Horace, or
meditated
deviltries over the eloquent page of Cicero. Beshrew him
for a mad wag! The list of the S. D. Society included all the
clever fellows in the Seminary where it was formed; and the
constitution
required that every member should consent to obey the
commands of the President (in common with the whole corps),
whatever they might be!
Wilford was President: and truly he
was a hard one. Sometimes he would issue orders by his
Secretary
to the Club, to resort to some rendezvous several miles
from town, at three o'clock in the morning. No one disobeyed.
How many times has he selected some cloudy, stormy autumn
night, and issued his mandate for a convention of the Club,
without umbrellas,
in some open field, a league off, to hear one
of the members, chosen by himself, sing a song! It was a
curious
,
eccentric band as ever leagued together; and I cannot
remember
one instance of infracted orders. We were situated
somewhere near the centre of Western New York, distant about
eight miles from the celebrated Cayuga Lake and Bridge; and
not one romantic dell, or ridge, or stream, for ten miles round,
remained unvisited by the Club. The President generally
permitted
us to rest in the winter season; for in that quarter the
breath of old Hyem is like a blast from the glaciers. What was
our astonishment, then, on a cold morning in February, 18,
on reading the following Dog-Latin notice in the village
newspaper
:
`SYMPOSIUM RUMPO-DRACONIS:
Congregere in Pons Cayuguum, Februarius Sexdecim, nox media, pro
jocus et exercitatio, et animi relaxatio.
Object
.
Elevation of the Ancient Henry
.
Hy. Wilford,
Prases
.
feb
. 15 1
t
.
N. B. Preliminary Rendezvous. H. No. 3. R. No. 4.'
This noticewell understood by the initiatedcreated great
sensation in the club. We huddled together, after evening
prayers in the chapel, at Wilford's room in the third Hall,
Number
Four.
`Gentlemen,' said Harry, `you are required to-night to do a
signal and singular duty. The Club must be at Cayuga bridge
at twelve, precisely. Every member is required to transport
thither, in his hat, six crackers and one dried herring. The
pocket of every brother must contain the pecuniary sum of one
dollar. The design of the convocation is expressed in the
notice.'
`But, Mr. President,' said a young member, `We don't know
what it means. What does it say we must do? What are we
to
elevate?
'
`Sit down, Sir!' said Wilford, imperatively! `your education,
as a brother of the Snap-Dragons, has been neglected. The
sentence to which you refer, is symbolically, or rather
synonymically
,
expressed and put. It means that the object of our
meeting
is
to raise the old Harry!
We are going to have a scrape.'
The explanation was voted satisfactory, and at the hour of
nine we sat off, nineteen students, all in a body. Oh, what a
bitter cold night it was! Not one of the party reached the
appointed
place without frozen ears and toes. But there was no
flinching; every man stood his ground: and at the witching hour
of midnight, fortified with punch, crackers, and the individual
herring, we all stood on the middle of the bridge. Boreas!
how the air swept down the lake, over the thick-ribbed ice!
Here Wilford addressed us, in beautiful language, of which he
was a perfect master; thanked us for our crucifixion of
selfishness
for the ends of the Club; expatiated upon the benefits of
resolution and perseverance; and after a quotation of Ossian's
Address to the Moon, ended with the following:
`Freeze, freeze, thou bitter sky!
Thou canst not bite so nigh,
As benefits forgot;
Although thy breath be rude
Although the skies thou warp,
Thou art not half so sharp,
As man's ingratitude!'
This quotation was the
finale
. We reached home somewhere
in the vicinity of day-break, a weary set of wretches, and crawled
to our beds, to enjoy the rich luxury of sleep, until the
tintinnabulary
announcement of
nine,
from the chapel bell.
Oh golden days of keen, but objectless adventure!when we
attached importance to every little achievement; when the snowy
expanse of landscape shot past us like a dream, from the loaded
sleigh, or the springing
pung;
when there was beauty every
where, and in every thing; brown woods, and frozen streams,
or the big lakes, where we wheeled on glistering heel! Days
of excitement, of pride, of tumultuous thoughts, of deep
affections
,
of burning ambitionwhither have ye flown! Psha!
I am becoming sentimental.
Well
Harry Wilford after this gave the Club a respite,
until the next Spring, when a camp-meeting occurred at a place
about sixteen miles distant from our Seminary. All was bustle
and confusion in the village; every body was going, and Harry's
head conceived a luminous idea. He issued a notice that the
Club should convene on the camp ground at nine P.M. on
Sunday
evening. The notice, which was distributed thoroughly
among the members, concluded with the following ominous line:
`From the President, who will precede the Club,
preaching,
from the pulpit, may be expected.'
Every one was astonished; expectation was on tiptoe; but
mum
was the word. Measures were adopted for the procurement
of a conveyance, but not one was to be had in the town. At
last an old fellow, who brought turnips and cabbages to market,
and lived a mile or two from the village, was prevailed upon to
oblige us for a liberal compensation, with his cart, two venerable
mares, and a couple of unbroken colts. These were brought
together in double tandem, the maternal cattle acting as leaders.
We started at the sunset of a beautiful day; but Phbus and
Phaeton! what a figure we cut! The old turnip-cart creaked
like a gibbet; and though the colts were well enough, yet their
parental precedents might have reminded one of the animals
mentioned by the quaint old Peter Heylin, in his `Compleate
Uoyauge thorough France:' `As lean were they as Envie is in
the Poet
macies in corpora tota
being most true of them.
Neither were they not only lean enough to have their ribbes
numbred
,
but the very spurs had made such casements thorough their
skinnes, that it had been no great dificultie for to have surveyed
their entrails. A straunge kynde of catel in mine opinion, and
such as had neither flesh on their bones, nor skinne on their flesh,
nor hair on their skinne. All the neighing we cold heare from
the proudest of them was onely an old dry cougph, which I'le
assure you did much comfort me; for by that noise I first learned
there was life in them.'
We reached the camp-ground in due time, fagged and jaded.
But the excitement of the scene put all our weariness to flight.
When we entered the hedged area in the wilderness, and saw
the assembled thousands in a waving mass beneath the
torch-disclosed
foliage of innumerous boughs, we could scarcely
contain
ourselves for admiration. As we were entering, we caught
a glimpse of Harry Wilford. He was presenting a letter to a
clergyman in a corner of the camp-ground. We were
marvelling
what that could mean, when singing commenced. How
sweetly it fell on my ear! Every leaf that trembled to the
breeze, seemed instinct with holy melody. There is nothing so
heavenly and subduing, as the full-volumed gush of harmony
which rises like incense from the lips of a primitive, sensitive
congregation, chanting `with spirit and understanding,' in
God's
first temple, the solemn forest. I felt overpowered.
After singing, there was a prayer; and then a solemn-visaged
man of
God
arose to announce that a young brother, in full
standing in a distant Conference, had been warmly introduced to
him by letter, and would deliver his message. `Brother
Wilkins
,'
he said, `I leave this flock in the wilderness to receive the
manna of your ministrations.'
The young brother arose. It was
Harry Wilford!
His
mouth was pursed up with an aspect like the aperture of a
lady's reticule; his profusion of glowing brown locks had been
tallowed
down over his handsome forehead, with a most demure
expression, and those mischievous eyes of his were chastened to
a glance of peculiar sobriety. A benignant smile played about
his finely-chiselled mouth, so faint, indeed, that it scarcely seemed
a smile; and he had begirt himself in a coat `of formal cut,' with
a `stand-up' collar, which, as I discovered at a glance, belonged
to a lank, ungainly fellow who swept the halls of our little
college
,
and rejoiced in the
soubriquet,
`Professor of Dust and Ashes.'
I caught Wilford's eye twice, before he began his
exhortation
;
and there was a lurking deviltry in the expression, as if it
said: `Keep your gaze on me, boys; I'm doing well; don't
disconcert me.'
He selected his text from Acts xxvi. 29: `And Paul said, I
would to
God,
that not only thou, but also all that hear me this
day, were both almost and altogether such as I am, except these
bonds;' and never did I hear a more eloquent sermon. He ran
rapidly through the history of Paul; he touched with
impassioned
fervor upon the lofty spirit with which he went bound in
the spirit unto Jerusalem, and gave with pathetic enthusiasm, the
outline picture of his arraignment before Festus. `Mark, my
beloved brethren and sisters,' said he, `the powerful contrast
between
the pride of sin, and the unadorned glory of the
Christian
!
Behold the meek Apostle, standing before the imperial
Festus and Agrippa, who with Bernice his wife had come with
great pomp, accompanied by the chief captains and principal men
of the citybrought forth by commandmenthindered with
bonds, before princes and potentates, in gold and purple! He
lifts up his voice; the trembling spirit-tones ring through the vast
apartment where he stands; they thunder at the door of every
heart; they bring the deluge of sensibility to many a cheek.
The warm lip of woman quivers; her bright orbs grow dim with
emotion; the silvered head sinks thoughtfully upon the breast of
age; a Sabbath holiness lingers around; and as the travel-worn
apostle speaketh on, the bosoms that surround him, thrill to the
movement of his tongue. As he proceeds, he kindles; he seems
to rise above the wall of dust that circumscribes his spirit; his
corruption seems to put on incorruption; his mortal form seems
to expand into the bright dimensions of immortality. The voice
of inspiration trembles around; the words of grace fall like good
seed, broad-cast among the multitude; and as the prisoner in his
bonds pleads the cause of love, and truth, and
God,
the agitated
Festus, shrinking from the tremendous energy of his eloquence,
exclaims, `
Thou art beside thyself!
' But with what firm
benevolence
and kindly meekness is his insult answered! How calmly
is it denied! And with what yearning tenderness does the
Pilgrim
and Soldier of the Cross invoke for his judge all the
blessings
that filled his own soul`except his bonds!' Wondrous
benignityfond outpouring of a spirit rapt and overflowing with
the fulness of
God
! Who would not rather journey with the
saint in his pilgrim-sandals from prison to prison, from peril to
peril, from stripes to shipwreck, than to dwell in the tents of
sinful
magnificence, or abide in the ephemeral tabernacles of
luxury
to
wield the sceptre of kings, or hold the reins of empires!'
Here Wilford's cheek flushed, and his eye sparkled with
enthusiasm
.
He saw by the uplifted hands, he heard by the groans
and shouts around him, that his discourse was taking effect, and
like an actor, excited with applause, he swept onward in his
speech: `Oh,
my
friends! let not his great example be lost upon
you. Follow in his footsteps; walk even as he walked;
denying
ungodliness, and crucifying the flesh, with its affections and
lusts; so that at the last, ye may shine in ga-loh-rah! Mark
what I tell ye!
I
may be unworthy; your preacher may be
sinful
,
ignorant, and imperfect; but
ye
must be watchful, prayerful,
and steadfast: then shall ye shine at the last as the stars in the
firmament, for ever and ever. Then, when the sun himself shall
grow dim with years; when his yellow hair shall no longer float
on the Eastern mountains, or his golden banners tremble at the
gates of the West; when the ocean shrinks to its final ebb, and
the mountains themselves decay with age, then shall ye stray
amid the blissful fields of Paradise, enjoying pinultimatelymind
I say
pi
-nultimatelythose raptures of which, in this dull vale
of misery, we have nor sign nor symbol.'
Here Wilford lowered his voice, and ended his discourse with
a beautiful allusion to the scene around him. He was skilled in
camp-meeting psalmody, and with his sweet voice `raised' a
tune, and led the singers in a hymn whose simple melody yet
haunts my ear.
When the hymn was finished, it was followed by an `
exhortation'
from some Western Brother, who had strayed into the
Conference on a mission for supplies. His address was the
strangest compound of pathos and bathos that I have ever heard.
Wilford, while he spoke, sat on the seat behind him, and I
observed
that it was with the utmost difficulty he could keep his
countenance. The Preacher discussed the text of the good
Samaritan, illustrating therefrom the great benefits of kindness
and charity. But his discourse had no more connection with the
text, than it had with the science of algebra. He talked of
every thing
and oh, Santa Maria! what grammar he
did
use,
to be sure! `Them kind of characters,' said hespeaking of
the selfish and avaricious`is not fit for to live, nor for to die.
They hasn't no bowels, no more than a statute. Poor deluded
souls! they go through the world, without doing no good to
nobody
;
and when they die, they go to their own place.
Hence
we view,
that when the final judgment comes, they will meet with
dreadful punishments. How awful will be that there scene!
Then, all at onst, they will obsarve the heavens a-darkening, the
seas a-roaring, the tombs a-bustin', the mountains a-melting, and
the cattle and sheep straddling about to keep their places!'
He went on in this strain, until his voice became thick and
husky, and he complained that `his lungs was a-givin' in.' Here
his tones sunk to a low and plaintive pitch; and he closed with
sentences that fell like music upon my ear, and brought a flood
of tears to my eyes. He spoke of the dangers that had beset
him in the far West; and of the benignity of that Power which
had sustained him through every trial. `Often,' he said, `
how
often, have I swum my horse across midnight rivers, carrying
the glad tidings of salvation to settlements in the wilderness, when
the fearful cry of wolves rung in my ear, and the watch-fires of
the hostile Indians blazed beneath the giant pines! How often
have I wandered through the tall grass of the Prairies, day after
day, with my over-coat for my evening pillow, and the
star-gemmed
vault of heaven for the curtains of my rest! I was sad,
but I was comforted; I was thirsty, but my spirit had
refreshment
;
I was weary, but the arm of Omnipotence sustained my
fainting footsteps, and I laid my head upon the bosom of peace.
I was far from manin silencealone; yet
not
alone, for my
God
was with me!'
Words could not describe the thrilling effect of this simple yet
sublime conclusion. It banished completely from my mind the
preceding absurdities of imagery in which the preacher had
indulged
,
and left me filled with emotion. I did not mean to be
impious, as I made the observation, but I did not reflect that it
might apply to both ends of his sermon, when I said, as I
departed
with my fellow Snap-Dragons, `Never man spake like
this
man.'
About an hour after the conclusion of his maiden sermon,
Wilford met the club, entire, as agreed upon, `at the
first
tavern
from the ground.' He had on an enormous pair of false
whiskers
;
his hair was brushed up in his usual free, airy style; his
coat had been changed, and his hat placed jauntily on one side.
I never saw a fellow so full of spirit. We had a fine supper,
and Harry staid longer than all. When I left, he was saying to
the landlord: `Come, show your charge for the company;
what's to pay? Bring in your bill, as the honey-suckle said to
the humming-bird.'
Poor Harry! His mad-cap career,
as
a mad-cap, was short.
He is now a devoted missionary of the church, at a far western
station
;
and I recently heard an old lady who knows him there, say
that `A piouser creeter, nor a devouter, never was seen, nowhere!'
Talking
of old women, makes me think of young ones. I
see by an article in one of the late English magazines, that the
palm of superior beauty is frankly awarded to the ladies of the
United States. This is just. Who can walk through the streets
of any of our principal citiesNew-York or Philadelphia for
instancenever forgetting Baltimorewithout being struck and
smitten
with the rare loveliness of the damsels therein? It is
like walking through a splendid gallery of animated pictures.
How many fairy forms, and `wreathed smiles,' and dove-like
eyes! I care not if the observer of these be an elder brother of
Methusalemhe must be movedhe must admire: for
`Who can curiously behold
The smoothness and the sheen of Beauty's cheek,
Nor feel the heart can never all grow old?'
But there is a pestilent pack of fellows in New-York, who are
potent wine-bibbers and fortune-hunters, that spend their days
and nights in
scoundrelizing,
to use a term of their own. A
member of this clan will pay his devoirs to a lady, giving her
every reason to believe that he is serious in his intentions, and
overflowing with affection, when he is only worming from her a
few secrets respecting her goods and chattels, present and
prospective
.
These varlets have a cabalistic language of their own,
of which I will endeavor to give the reader an idea. I overheard
a pair of them conversing not long ago in Broadway, and having
previously acquired the key to their dialect, I understood it
perfectly.
`Well, Bob,' said one, `were you at Miss's
soire
last
night? It was expected to be superb.'
6
`Yes, I was, Tom; but my good fellow, it was scarce an
object
.
It was hardly worth the perfume that I unctuated my
whiskers withal. There were several sweet, virtuous young
ladies there; modest, exemplary, lovely. But they were some
engaged, and the rest were `minus the
brads'
paupers, all.'
`But Miss Van Blank was there, wasn't she? If so, I say
there was Heaven. Which way she turns is paradise, and her
smile would improve the sunshine in Eden. There is retiring,
bashful, rose-like loveliness for you.'
`Granted, Tomshe
was
thereand all you say is true:
but my dear boy, she has no
moral character
. Her reputation
is bad. Now who do you think was the very nucleus of the
company? Why, that rich and ugly Miss. They say she
is
improving,
every year, and egad, I think so. She has
persons
enough in her employ, amending her face and frame, to
beautify the Witch of Endor. Look at her hand; why it is as
large as the hand of Providence. She has got a better smile
than she was wont to have
and I know who sold it to her!
I
saw that same smile last year, in a glass case, at the exhibition of
the American Institute. It cost her moneyand really it has
done execution. That great walking porker, Frank Rumminson,
has asked her hand, and won it, and nobody knows it. The
money-hunters
flock around her, as the fish do round a fly. Frank will
have a great
prize
with her; but the worst of it is, she is immortal.
I believe she must have descended from the Wandering Jew; and
I'll wager a dozen of champaigne that she will live till
doomsday
,
and be the first to hear the angel Gabriel give his
solo
obligato
on the trumpet.'
`Hush, Bobyou are getting blasphemous. This won't do.
Who else was there?'
`Why Miss, the younger. You know she was thought
quite rich, and the fellows scoundrelized about her very
extensively
,
until they found their error, when they retired in shoals.
I asked one of them last night what had become of her property.
`Ah!' said he, `my fine boy, we were misinformed. She has
no property to become
of
.'
Thus they went on; but I must explain their lingo. When
these varlets wish to inquire among themselves respecting a lady's
fortune, they interrogate under the synonym of an inquiry as to
her
moral character
. If affluent, it is `excellent;' if middling,
she `has a fair reputation;' if without any funds they call her
`perfectly abandoned, with no character at all.' So they go;
playing evermore the same mercenary and scoundrel game. Out
upon them! They ought to be hanged, and then be pulled by the
nose. The damsel of whom the young
partyzan
spoke, with all
her plainness, is deluged with compliments and love-letters. As
Frank Rumminson is the elect, she burns most of these scrawls
without reading.
By
the by, how much tact and genius it requires to write a
good love-letter. Most persons are ill at these amorous
scriptures
.
I encountered one the other day, in an ancient tome,
(the Extravagaunt Shepherd), that pleased me mightily. Here it
runs:
`
My Dearest Deer:
`
Sithence
that love, which is the lightest bird in the world, hath
nestled in my bosom, it hath proved so full of egg, that I have been forced
to suffer him to lay there. But sithence he hath laid it, he hath sate upon
it a long tyme, and at length hath hatched this little pullet which I now
send you. The breeding of it will cost you little; all the food it will
require
will be caresses and kisses. And withal, it is so well taught that it
speaks better than a paraqueto, and so will tell you my sufferings for you.
It hath in charge to inquire of you whether or no you are yet displeased
with me, and to let me know your mind, not by a pullet so big as this, but
by the least chicken you please, if I may have your favor; with this promise,
that if you have laid aside your rigor, I shall send you no more pullets, but
present you with full-grown birds, full of valor and affection.
Lysis
.
`Flowers,' saith Shakspeare, `are love's charactery;' and I
dare be sworn he never thought that passion, or the record which
confessed it, could be symbolized by so familiar a fowl as a pullet.
However, Miss Landon declares that `Love is full of
phantasies
,'
and the
billet doux
of the Extravagant Shepherd prove it.
If the nestling fowl was kind, it is probable that Lysis very soon
engendered barn-door birds enough to stock an aviary.
Doubtless
the pastoral youth could have said, with Godfrey of
Bulloigne
:
`Ah, cruel Love, that slayeth us equally,
Where worm-wood thou or honey do dispence;
And equal deadly at all seasons be
Mischieves and medicines that proceed of thee.'
I have
been looking for several evenings with great earnestness
at
the comet
. Whether I have seen farther into it than my
contemporaries
,
I can not tell. I have observed enough, however,
to convince me that this Stranger in our sky is a very `eccentric
character. It wanders about
ad libitum
shedding the light of
its countenance wherever it listethfree and independentthe
Democrat of the air. `Success to its wand'rings, where'er it
may go!'
Many sensible things have been said of comets. Old
Died
rich Knickerbocker
heaven rest his soul!expressed his
fears, on the
ipse dixit
of certain philosophersand his modest
pen blushed while he did sothat the comet would one day
`turn tail upon the earth, and deluge it with water.' But that
was founded on a false hypothesis. It is cheering to believe that
a better destiny awaits it.
Levity aside; is it not a grand and vast conception, that this
wan and misty orb has been travelling swifter than the swiftest
cannon-ball, through the dim realms of space, since our
Saviour
slept in the manger at Bethlehem, and the Star in the East lit its
fires for the Wise Men's eyes? Is it not like Divinity, that
power of Astronomic prophecy, which pierced the curtains of
the future, and foretold the advent of this blazing world? Looks
it not like sharing attributes with Omnipotence, and `
circumventing
God
?' And when this generation shall be slumbering in the
dust, that predicted orb will again stream its `horrid hair' across
our sky. When the lover who has now looked at it with his
mistress shall become a patriarch among his children; when the
child now lisping its early inquiries of the wandering star, shall
tell the tale in after years, to some grand-babe throned on her
kneethen the comets will come again! What changes, what
revolutions, what convulsions of states and empires, will chance
ere then! My soul expands into a sense of sublimity, as I
reflect
on the vast world of events between. How many ties will
be severedhow many hearts be brokenhow many tears be
shed! Yet while on earth these vicissitudes will advene and
vanish, in that far element above and around us this luminous
globe shall wander with its train, flashing and glowing through the
fields of immensity. Thought itselfImagination in her boldest
flightsinks with wearied wing, unable to grasp the stupendous,
boundless theme! Truly said the ancient minstrel; `When I
survey the heavens, the work of thy fingers, the moon and the
stars which thou hast ordained, then I say, what is man that thou
art mindful of him, or the son of man that thou visitest him?'
What a pity it is, that we have no great telescopes in our
country, to survey the skies withal. There was, during the last
winter and spring, a locomotive astronomerdoubtless of
Yankee
extractionwho paraded of evenings about the streets of
Philadelphia, with a large glass stationed on a frame. He sold
small parcels of astronomy, at sixpence a-piece. I bought three
shillings worth of him in the course of the season. He was
doorkeeper
to the heavenly bodies; and had all the realm of sky
Airshire
as his own. I got the worth of my outlay every time.
I saw Jupiter, Saturn, the Rings, and the revolving satellites, all
for a
fi'pennybit
. I shall never cease to thank this surveyor of
celestial lots for the glimpes of heaven that he gave me. I
formed
,
while looking through his immense
lenses,
some idea of the
swiftness, the tremendous energy, with which this earth revolves
on her axis. The old
alma mater
has in truth a restless time of
it. Notwithstanding the immense distance of the stars observed,
the glass, resting on the solid earth, would glide by them in a
moment. The eternal dance of planets went on, each sphere
rolling in its own atmosphere, with worlds on countless worlds
beyond; surrounded with infinity, and making melody to
God!
I care not how I come by such thoughts as these, but it is
very queer to see a person peddling sublimity by the glimpse,
and snacks of astronomy at so much the squint, or, as it were, by
the quintal. Nobody but a member of the Universal Yankee
Nation would have conceived this stellar enterprise.
`Dinumeras
stellas, si potes,'
was said of old: and I will wager my opera-glass,
that some ingenious American will take, ere long, an ethereal
census. Mr. Clayton, with his thirty-passenger balloon, is
destined
to put out the first celestial
feeler
in the business. By St.
Paul! we can do
anything
in this country. I believe, with a
lamented friend, if Mount tna were sold to an American Stock
Company, that money could be evoked from the transaction:
`Enceladus would be made to roar by contract, and the natural
fire-works be exhibited for a consideration!'
How pleasant is a lovely thing, a
little
out of season! Just
now a humming-bird came fluttering about a few dahlias that are
blushing in my window, through the yellow sunshine of this
warm October day. He lingered for a moment, `like atom of
the rainbow, glittering round,' and then balanced his beautiful
pinions for flight. His tiny form is just fading, in the direction
where the many-colored foliage of Washington Square is
twinkling
to the breeze:
Thou
fairy bird, whose golden wing
Mounts on the west wind's stealing sigh:
For thee the flowers profusely fling
Their last aroma through the sky
Go on rejoicing; but take heed that thy flight be not in the
winter
.
Ours is a changeful climate, Master Cobweb.
This incident has revived in my mind three perfect stanzas,
from a pen once wielded by a hand now mouldering in the grave.
Nothing can be sweeter or purer. They breathe the very
philosophy
of Faith, and soul of Song. The strain was suggested
to the author on seeing a butterfly resting on a skull.
Creature
of air and light!
Emblem of that which may not fade or die;
Wilt thou not speed thy flight,
To chase the south wind through the glowing sky?
What lures thee thus to stay
With silence and decay,
Fix'd on the wreck of cold mortality?
The thoughts once chambered there,
Have gathered up their treasures, and are gone;
Will the dust tell us where
They that have burst their prison-house have flown?
Rise, nursling of the day,
If thou wouldst trace their way
Earth hath no voice to make the secret known.
Who seeks the vanished bird,
By the forsaken nest and broken shell?
Far hence he sings unheard,
Yet free and joyous, mid the woods to dwell!
Thou of the sunshine born,
Take the bright wings of morn!
Thy hopes call heavenward from you gloomy cell.
`No more at present,' dear Reader, from your faithful
Ollapod
.
NUMBER EIGHT.
December,
1835.
That
was a good inscription which Byron desired should be
recorded on his monument
`Implora pace!'
Delicious peace!
I love thee as I do sleep. Thou insensible Dove, that waftest
upon thy soft and fragrant pinion the odors from the gardens of
the Hesperides, and Islands of the Blest! I love thee for the rich
reveries in which my soul is steeped when thou art nigh; whether
thou comest in gusty Autumn, in the solemn stillness of a starry
winter's night, in the glow of Summer, or the balm-breathing
loveliness of Spring. It is only the idea of its peace, which
reconciles us to the
grave
. When the hurly-burly of life is over,
it is sweet to believe that there is rest in the tomb. The heart
shrinks indeed from its breathless, pulseless, and `cold
obstruction
;'
but there is comfort to the care-worn bosom in the thought
of its repose. When the `fitful fever' of earth has frenzied heart
and brain; when the sad breast is surcharged with groans and
sighs; it is not melancholy to believe in the rest of the grave.
When bitter images take possession of the mind; when friends
are faithless, and love inconstantthen the wearied one sighs for
tranquility, and saith with Otway:
`Oh, for a long, long sleep, and so forget it!'
Thus Socrates reasoned, it may be, when he raised to his lips the
chalice of oblivion, and quaffed his deadly hemlock.
I have
thought on this wise, from reading the numerous
instances
of suicide that have occurred in our country within the
year. But alas! the majority of the cases were perpetrated by
those to whom even death itself could afford neither refuge nor
remedy; to whom eternity could have seemed in prospect but a
perpetuity of horror; and with whom the thought of futurity was
but the prolonging of guilty principles and ever-during remorse,
those dark and gloomy curtains that invest forever the chambers
of the soul.
It is worth observing, that the majority of suicides occur
among men. Indeed, when I inspect the annals of crime, I have
no great partiality for my own sex. Who fill our prisons? Men.
Who throng our criminal courts, to receive the public smitings
that fall from the arm of Justice? Principally men. Who is it
that may be said to grow sick the oftenest of life, and so rush
into the world of spirits? Mostly men. Who are
uncompunctious
in pulling the fatal trigger, or assaulting the jugular with
shining steel? Menmen! Can any one deny this? I trow
not. There is a reason for it, too. Woman, in her worst estate,
is purer than man in
his
worst. Sensibilities, which are worn
away among men, in their intercourse with the world, linger and
play about her heart, even when the fountain of virtue in her
bosom has been turned to bitter and polluted waters. The
lingering
principle of human affection sometimes warms her cheek
and bedews her eye, even when the holiness of rectitude has
become
a forgotten quality, and a hateful thing. The divinity
withinthe earliest gift of Heavencontinues to reflect itself
upon the face from the soul, until at last the faint image of
goodness
becomes imperceptible; and the brazen front of shameless
vice has lost the beauty of its morning, and the image of its
God
.
The crimes of women, when they do commit crime, arise
from some tender source at first, which gradually hardens into
desperate wickedness. It is long before she surrenders herself
to the suggestions of vice:
`But when she falls, she falls like Lucifer,
Never to rise again.'
The true being and end of womankind is
love;
and from this,
if I may so speak, all their sorrows, if they pervert that holy and
heavenly passion, directly proceed. I reverence the principle of
love in woman. It seems, indeed, the atmosphere in which she
lives, and moves, and has her being. The arms and wings of
her spirit seem ever reaching and panting to clasp to her bosom,
and brood over, some object of human affection. In the smile of
her lip, in the glance of her eye, in the soft and bewildering
melody of her voice, we find but the semblances and echoes of
the Spirit of Love. She delights to minister to our comfort; to
invest our pathway with the roses of delicate enjoyment; to lend
sunshine to the hearth, and repose to the evening hour. I have
never thought upon the gentle and unobtrusive influence of
woman
,
without feelings of the deepest admiration.
She seldom
hates
. When she is wronged, she is forgiving; when destroyed,
she still turns with an eye of earnest regret to that paradise of
innocence from which her passions have driven her; and in
solitude
,
by day or at evening, `she waters her cheek in tears
without
measure.'
In woman, all that is sacred and lovely seems to meet, as in
its natural centre. Do we look for self-denial? See the devoted
wife. For resolute affection, struggling through countless trials?
Behold the lover. For that overflowing fulness of fond idolatry
which gives to things of earth a devotion like that which should
ascend to
God?
Behold the mother, at the cradle of her infant,
or pillowing its drowsy eyelid on her bosom; supremely blest to
see its fair cheek rise and fall upon the white and heaving orb,
where it finds nourishment and rest!
This
is woman; always
loving; always beloved. Well may the poet strike his lyre in
her praise; well may the warrior rush to the battle-field for her
smile; well may the student trim his lamp to kindle her
passionate
heart, or warm her dainty imagination: she deserves them
all. Last at the cross and earliest at the grave of the
Saviour,
she teaches to those who have lived since
His
sufferings, the
inestimable virtue of constant affection. I love to see her by the
couch of sickness; sustaining the fainting head; offering to the
parched lip its cordial, to the craving palate its simple
nourishment
;
treading with noiseless assiduity around the solemn
curtains, and complying with the wish of the invalid when he
says:
`
Let
me not have this gloomy view
About my room, about my bed;
But blooming roses, wet with dew,
To cool my burning brow instead:'
disposing the sunlight upon the pale forehead, bathing the hair
with ointments, and letting in upon it from the summer casement
the sweet breath of Heaven! How lovely are such exhibitions
of ever-during constancy and faith!how they appeal to the
soul!like the lover in the Canticles, whose fingers, when she
rose to open the door to her beloved, dropped `with sweet
smelling
myrrh upon the handles of the lock!' No man of
sensibility
,
I take it, after battling with the perplexities of the out-door
world, but retires with a feeling of refreshment to his happy
fireside
:
he hears with joy the lisp of the cherub urchin that climbs
upon his knee, to tell him some wonderful tale about nothing, or
feels with delight the soft breath of some young daughter, whose
downy, peach-like cheek is glowing close to his own. I am
neither a husband nor a father; but I can easily fancy the
feeling
of supreme pleasure which either must experience. Let us
survey the world of business: what go we `out for to see?'
The reed of ambition, shaken by the breath of the multitude;
cold-hearted traders and brokers, traffickers and overreachers,
anxious each to circumvent his fellow, and turn to his own purse
the golden tide in which all would dabble. Look at the
homes
of most of these. There the wife waits for her husband; and
while she feels that anxiety for his presence which may be called
the hunger of the heart, she feeds her spirit with the memory
of his smile; or perhaps looks with fondness upon the pledges
of his affection, as they stand like olive-branches round about
his table.
Reader, on my honor I do not wish to be prosy; and as I
have no one to advertise me on that point, I must trust my own
judgment. Ollapod sometimes elongates a subsection; but he
shortens others. So I must e'en discourse more upon this theme
of woman; for I have some events which I wish to interweave
herein; events that cast no particular credit upon the scurvy
gender to which I belong.
I say all this in behalf of woman, however, with a mental
reservation, which I will promulge anon. At present, I leave
essay for narrative.
A few
days ago, as I was taking my accustomed morning's
walk, in a mild October morning, in the suburbs of the city
whereof I am a denizen, I found myself, on a sudden, in the
open country. The melancholy landscapes of Autumn stretched
around; and the bright hues which had characterized the season
were beginning to disappear. Nothing disturbed my meditations,
except the passage of some early market man or woman, hieing
with their little world of cares and hens to the mart of the town.
I wandered unconsciously onward, until I discovered that I was,
as it were, in the midst of a crowd, fronting a low, time-worn
tenement. A few vehicles were drawn up around it, and seeing
a medical friend whom I knew, I inquired the cause of the
assembly. He informed me that a young girl had committed
suicide, and was then lying dead in an upper apartment. Moved
with sorrowful curiosity, I complied with his request to enter. In
one apartment were several females, in tears and distress; in
another, the witnesses, and members of the coroner's jury.
Ascending
a staircase, I found myself in the presence of the Dead;
of One, who, before the first dark day of nothingness had swept
the lines of beauty from her features, was lying on a pallet of
straw, pale in dissolution. The sight was mournful and solemn.
Her face had lingering about it all the features of beauty: its
ensign was still floating above the voiceless lip, and the
deep-sealed
eye. Heavy masses of rich auburn hair lay in waves on
each side of her snowy temples; a faint hue lingered about the
cheeks; but the foamy and purple lips indicated how violent
was the death she had died. By the bed-side lay a half-eaten
apple, and a large rhomboid of corrosive sublimate. Particles
of this deadly poison were still upon the fruit. Thus the
life-weary
taker had ended her days. I looked out upon the gloomy
waste of country over which she had gazed her last, at twilight,
the evening before, and tried to realize what must have been the
depth of agony which possessed her spirit then. How must her
bruised heart have throbbed with misery!how dark must have
been her soul!like that of the Medea of Euripides, when she
prepared the deadly garments for her rival, and dedicated to
death the children of her womb. Thoughts of the cause now
agitated my mind. She had confided, and been betrayed.
Cruelty
and abuse had been her lot; but amidst all she had been
constant and devoted. Her hands were clasped as if in prayer;
and the potent poison had overcome her system ere she could
disunite them.
There are moments when the mysteries of eternity throng so
rapidly upon our imagination, that we live years of
contemplation
in their little round. This was the case with me. There
lay the prostrate form of one whose only crime had been, that
she had loved, not wisely, but too well; one who, stung to the
heart by the destroyer of her peace, had determined to lay down
her aching head and sorrowful bosom in the rest of the grave.
As I stood gazing at the lifeless object before meinterrupted
only by the pitying ejaculations of the few that were present, or
the sobs of those who were belowI was requested by the
surgeon
in attendance, as a personal favor, to go in his private
carriage
to the house of the father of the deceased, and apprize him
of the fatal occurrence, of which he was still ignorant.
Receiving
my directions, I went. I drove up to a handsome dwelling
in a distant street, and was ushered by a servant into a beautiful
drawing-room, where a glowing fire was burning in the grate.
Every thing around betokened ease and plenty, if not opulence.
The folding-doors of the parlor soon opened, and the warm air
from an adjoining elegant apartment came in from another fire.
The father stood before me. He was a respectable looking
person, but bore about him the marks of violent passions, and an
indomitable will.
It was by slow and painful degrees that I communicated to him
the horrid death of his child. When I had unburthened my mind
and heart, he seemed to stand like a statue of marble for a
moment
;
then, sinking upon an ottoman, he gave way to the agony
of his soul. His chest heaved with his deep-drawn sighs, his lip
faltered, and tears, stern tears, `like the first drops of a
thunder-shower
,'
came to his eye.
I saw him stand, a few moments after, by the corpse of his
daughter. Words cannot describe the scene.
The
history of her sorrows and fate may be briefly told. Her
father had emigrated, with a lovely and engaging wife, from a
foreign country. She was their first-born; belovedidolized.
When brothers and sisters were growing up with and around her,
she was the favored of them all.
At last, her mother died. She was just budding into
womanhood
,
when this sad event took place. After the funeral rites,
she found that she was destined to fill her mother's place, so far
as the guardianship and care of her young brothers and sisters
were concerned. She knew the stern disposition and headstrong
passions of her parent, and she strove to the utmost to meet his
wishes and oblige his will. Soon, however, his demeanor began
to change. He insisted that she was unable to perform the
duties
required, and a house-keeper was procuredone, it seems,
not dissimilar to the celebrated Original mentioned by Byron.
She was overbearing and vulgar. By degrees, the daughter
perceived too surely, that her mother's place was filled to the
utmost
,
in all its relations, by a dishonest and unholy woman.
She suffered in silence; she blushed at her own degradation,
through the recklessness of her parent, but she breathed not a
word. At last her silence was imputed to insubordinate anger;
she was pronounced incorrigible, and driven from her father's
house
an outcast
.
Hitherto she had been worthy and innocent. But evil
examples
,
and a just filial anger, fired her soul. She sought the house
of a friend, a close intimate of her mother's, where she lived as
an assistant in the lighter and more elegant duties of a
household
.
By degrees, her beauty attracted the attention of a youth,
the son of her protectress. She loved; she was beset with
solemn vows, and an unbroken train of temptations; until, finally,
she was betrayed; and unable to battle against her own remorse,
and the thousand shames that rained on her defenceless head,
she sought the drug and the grave!
Now that for which I do somewhat abate my admiration of
women, is this. They condemn all derelictions from duty,
without
discrimination. In a case like the present, they make no
distinction; they see the bruised heart sink into the dust, with
scarce an expression of regret, and hear the report that a sister
spirit has rushed, unanointed and unannealed, into the presence
of its
God,
without one throb of pity. Why this inexorable
judgment? Why this absence of extenuating reasons? Why
is it, with them, that
`Every wo a tear can claim,
Except an erring sister's shame?'
I pretend not to tell; but if their opinions are severe,
what
shall be said of those fiends in human form, who poison the
fountains
of virtue in the innocent bosom; whose lips breathe the
black lie, and the broken vow? Is there a punishment too great
to be inflicted upon the villain who approaches the fair fabric of
virtue only to leave it in ruin and desolation? Is
hell
too much?
No! To repay the love which one has himself awakened with
disgrace and scorn; to drive the spirit one has polluted, into the
presence of that
Creator
from whom it came bright and
unsullied
;
what guilt can be greater, in all the annals of crime?
My heart burns with indignation, as I dwell on the theme.
How many a very wretch, among the youth of our cities, is
dashing
in the
beau monde,
whose true place is the penitentiary;
whose only relief from its walls, is the prodigal
love
of some
violated
virgin, who has suffered long and is kind! These are
solemn, but almost interdicted truths. There are some whom
I
know,
of this detestable class; men who will bow, and
sentimentalize
,
and flourish at
soirees
and assemblies, at operas and
theatres
,
who have valiantly spent years of their worthless and
spendthrift
lives, in daily and nightly endeavors to compass the
dishonor
of some lowly and lovely One, whom `nature made weak,
trusting her defence to man's generosity;' whose happiness was
the end and aim of loving parents, and whose brow her dishonor
has laid in the tomb!
Let me not be understood as the apologist of guilt. I
reverence
the sweetness and majesty of virtue, but I love the sway of
justice. I would warn the tender sex against the easy prejudice
which leads them to visit the sins of the voluptuous offender of
the moral law upon the victim whom only years of systematic
villany could bring within his toils; who makes the holiest
passion
subservient to the establishment of the unholiest; until at
the last, honor, conscience, hope, all that was worth possessing,
is banished from that breast which he found pure, and left
corrupted
and in shame.
Talking
of shame: I wonder if a young woman ever made
a better defence of her lover than did Juliet for Romeo, before
that garrulous old nurse of hers:
Nurse
Shame come to Romeo!
Juliet
.
Blistered be thy tongue
For uttering that word! Upon his brow
Shame is ashamed to sit.
It is a throne where Honor should be crowned
Sole monarch of the universal earth.
I admire that glorious play of Shakspeare's. It abounds with
such gushes of heavenly tendernesssuch delicate expressions,
such delicious passages, that I revel in its perusal. It is a
thing to read at Summer twilight, or at the close of a soft, mild
day in Autumn. True, I would not much affect the hearing of
it from the lips of your rouged and periwig'd players; but it is
sweet to read. I doubt whether there is more excellent music in
any composition, more melliffluous and touching, than the
following
lines. Just note, dear reader, how the rich
liquids
melt
and mingle with each other; especially in the lines I have
italicised
:
Juliet
.
Wilt thou begone? It is not yet near day:
It was
the nightingale, and not the lark,
That pierced the
fearful hollow of thine ear:
Nightly she sings on yon pomegranate tree:
Believe me, love,
it was the nightingale.
Romeo
.
It was
the lark, the herald of the morn,
No nightingale: look, love, what envious streaks
Do lace the severing clouds,
in yonder East:
Night's candles are burnt out, and jocund day
Stands tiptoe on the misty mountain-tops:
I must be gone and liveor stay, and die.'
I know nothing in the range of English composition, except
two or three verses in Gray's Elegy, superior in harmony to
these. America, however, puts in her claim. It has been
reserved
for a bard of this republicsome inglorious Milton of
the Westto approach the divine original. Reader, elevate
thine ear and listen. The verse now to be quoted, is from a
love-letter
,
indited by a youth who was recently
indicted
for a breach
of the marriage promise, and mulcted in many shekels. Thus
he vents his plaint, and
spell
of wo:
`
Don't
you hear yanders tirkle dove
A-morning upon yanders tree?
It is a-morning for its true love,
So do I morn to be with thee!'
There is said to be `a coincidence in great minds;' and really
these last quoted verses would seem to prove it. Juliet and her
Romeo speak of the lark and nightingale;
our
bard changes
those sweet fowls to the `
tirkle
-dove,' and causes it to roar you
gently, as if it were yet unweaned. But we will let him go.
It
is strange what a wonderful power we have in
every one
of
our senses to awaken associations! The taste of some
well-flavored
apple, such as I used to eat in other days, will open
upon me a whole volume of boyhood. Sometimes, too, there
are tones in a flute, deftly discoursed upon, that arouse within
my spirit a thousand recollections. They convoy me back to
better times, and I find myself hiding with my young playmates
among the ripe strawberries of the meadow, listening the while
to the `sweet divisions' of the bob-o'lincoln, as it sang in the air!
Little paroxysms of puerility such moments are; but I would
not exchange them for the plaudits of the multitude, or the voice
of revelry. Something I had then about my heartsome light
arial influencewhich has since been lost among the hollow
pageantries of the world. I admire that song of Hood's, in
which, while recapitulating the memories of his boyhood, he
says:
`
I remember,
I remember
The pine trees, dark and high;
I used to think their slender tops
Were
close against the sky;
It was a childish ignorance
But now 'tis little joy
To know I'm
farther off from Heaven
Than when I was a boy!
'
In truth, if one wishes to preserve the true wisdom of nature,
he must keep about him the childhood of his soul. That was a
pleasant feature in the character of Chief Justice Marshall. I
have seen it related of him, that, not many years before his death,
he used to be found in the neighborhood of Richmond, Virginia,
with his coat off, playing at quoits with the youth of that region.
He lacked no wisdom; but he knew what was good for the spirit,
and had a relish for fun.
Apropos
of fun: there are many who wish to be grave and
dignified without the `power of face!' I knew a little
bandy-legged
comedian once, who, finding his profession insufficient for
his wants turned
undertaker
. Here was a change! He carried
into his new business his old merry smirk, and the roguish
twinkle of his eye; insomuch that when patrons called to get his
hearse, or a coffin, he seemed evermore laughing at their sorrows.
He finally gave up his fresh calling in despair. He said his
cursed facetious mug would be the ruin of him, in any serious
vocation. He has now betaken himself to the art and mystery
of tailoring, in which he hopes to thrive. Perhaps he may; but
he has taken a wrong course for it; because
His speculative skill
Is hasty credit and a distant bill;
two most dubious specimens of enterprise.
By-the-by
how ambitious students do make this class of
artisans suffer! I remember a fellow, Bob Edwards by name,
whom all the scholars loved, and all the landlords hated, who
used to patronize these thread-and-needle citizens, until he nearly
ruined several of them. He was an adroit rascal, yet one of the
funniest, gleesome dogs alive. He once founded in the
institution
a train of
soires,
called `Baked-Potato-Parties,' and right
pleasant ones they were; for all the appurtenances of wine,
butter
,
bread, and everything good, were smuggled by `Dust and
Ashes' to grace the feast. These revels occurred every other
night, among the students of the different halls. One afternoon,
when it came Edwards' turn to play the host, it chanced to be a
dismal day; there was a fine, drizzling rain coming down upon
the damp and heavy snow. He determined, to cheer his spirits,
after recitations, to anticipate the evening's glee, with one or two
boon companions. Accordingly he despatched to my apartment
the following:
`VERO ILLUSTRISSIMO JOHANNO OLLAPODIO:
`SALUTEM!
`
Vene
meo cubiculo hoc post meridiem quartem horam vel dimidium
hor post. Hoc est damnatus dies pluvialis, et habeo ceruleos diabolos,
similis Tartaro.
`Forsitan possumus habere conversationem plenam jocunditatis, et
superfusam optimorum jocorumsi inclinationem habis ire indivisum
Porculum
,
vel elevare Antiquum Henriqum, in hanc viam, Sperabo videre
meum excellentissimum amicum Ollapodianum, horam ante scriptam.
Pax Vobiscum
.
`
Die Januarii, vigessimo secundo, anno Christi,
millessimo, octingessimo, vigesimo secundo
.'
`
Robertus
.'
In compliance with this mysterious and classical summons, I
repaired speedily to Edwards' apartment. He had made ample
preparations for his `party;' but he was desirous to exceed the
usual hilarity of the occasion. I found him surrounded with
good things. A basket of grape champaigne in one corner; in
another, a bushel of potatoes, poured out upon the floor; a
bake-pan in the midst, and a glorious flame in his fire-place. In
our anticipatory proceedings, we became exceedingly jolly; so
much so, indeed, that I forgot entirely how the time passed when
I
should
have been at my ordinary supper with the fellows of my
mess,
at our boarding-house. By-and-by, the members of the
party began to arrive; and the apartment was soon crowded
almost
to suffocation. But the wassail had scarcely begun. The
`boys' continued to crowd in; until at last there was a perfect
jam
. A pretty girl from our quarters had been engaged to act
as general attendant, and she was never treated with more
respectful
deference than on that memorable evening.
At last, the time came to `serve up.' The baked potatoes
with all their luxurious condiments, were
dished;
and when our
repast was finished,
we
were dished. Few, indeed, of our large
symposium could tell his elbow from his chin, or any other
portion
of his anatomical system. We became obstreperous. As
Charles Lamb says, `There was
too much
fun.' By degrees,
however, we came partially to ourselves, and I happened to
remember
that there was a ball in the neighborhood, to which
nearly all of us had been invited. An old sleigh was procured;
we ferreted out four horses, and a negro named Apollo, to drive
them; and off we started in high glee, on our saltatory enterprise.
I hastened to my room, when our plan was decided, and
hurriedly
completed my wardrobe. We embarked
en masse
in the
sleighand
how
we went! In a shorter time than I can
describe
,
we were at the festive resort. We heard, as we were
rigging
,
the music from the hall.
We
enteredJove knows how. I remember being struck
with the gay appearance of the ball-room, and the large
assemblage
of pretty girls. I stepped up to onethe daughter of a
Judge, and a member of Congress. She was one of your
plump, rosy-faced creatures, buxom and pleasing. `She was a
being of loveliness; nature had compressed and concentrated in
her dumpy form, the attractions of a dozen. Her face was
bright and expressiveher figure, of course, was perfectO,
quite so!'
To this damsel I addressed myself, and solicited her hand in
the dance. She assented; and with my brain reeling with
fancies
of wine and women, I really thought, for the moment, that
she `did me proud.' I flourished my 'kerchief, restored it to my
pocket, and proceeded to encase my digits in gloves.
The
dance was beginning, I took my place, and drew my
silk
gants
hastily over my hands. The black fiddler had stamped
we were near the headand there was no time to be lost. I
`
seized
my partner,' as commanded by the sable Apollo, and
went ahead. When we reached the bottom of the rowfor it
was a country danceI was all in a glow; and drawing my
mouchoir
from my pocket, essayed to mop my perspiring temples.
As I did so, I was partially 'ware of a general
snicker
through
the room. What could it be for? I looked around; every one
looked at
me
. I looked downthen at my hands. The sight
was quite enough. For a handkerchief, I had flourished a
common
dickey,
the strings whereof fell to my feetlong as the
moral law. For gloves, I had selected from my trunk a pair of
short silk pump-hose, `well saved' by numerous emendations that
had been required by sundry previous scrapes; all these I had
displayed
on
and
in
my hands, before the multitude!
Words are but poor types of my chagrin. One haw-buck
dancera fellow whom I caught in several vulgar attempts to
achieve a `pigeon-wing'came up to me with an impudent air,
and thus right eloquent, said:
`Mister, I think them gloves o' your'n must be so'th'in rather
new. Dare say the're fresh from 'York. They are
darned good,
any how; any body can see that.'
`I say,' yelled another biped of the same genius, `is that the
last go for han'ker'chers? They can't steal them, can they, with
strings to 'em. That's a right smart contrivance.'
There
are
some
matters of the Past, upon which I do not
look back with any special complacencyand this is one.
But `the longest night,' as well as the longest day, `maun ha'
an end.' I was too jovial to comprehend exactly the
ridiculousness
of my whereabout in the ball-room; but its memory
accompanied
my head-ache the next morning most vividly.
7
The worst of the affair, howeversetting aside all the
dsagrmens
of creeping through our cold halls to bed somewhere
about three in the morninghad not yet come. Edwards'
beautiful Latin letter to me had been dropped in the great hall,
and some officious puppy, who disliked either him or me, had
conveyed it to the president. No man ever showered a more
humiliating lecture upon another, than did that worthy
functionary
impart to Edwards, before all the members of the institution,
after morning prayers. He inveighed against his insubordination,
his profanity, and his general looseness of character, in terms
altogether too harsh, and quite disproportioned to his offence.
Edwards was cut to the quick, and he determined to have
some kind of satisfaction. He sent for me at noon to come to
his room. I found him boiling, over his grate, a kind of
ollapodrida
,
composed of mashed potatoes, tar, and brimstone. His
eye twinkled as he pointed to the `mess of pottage.'
`Slab and good, isn't it?' said he laughing.
`What in the name of wonder,' replied I, `are you going to
do with that stuff?'
`Never you mind, my boy
nous verrons
. I am going to
make a pair of gloves for a friend of mine.'
I could get no other clue to his intentions. All that he
required
of me was to help him carry the kettle at midnight to an
adjacent
creek, and to keep dark on the subject.
I promisedfor Edwards could always persuade me to
anything
and
I kept my promise.
The next morning the president came down from his room, in
the second hall, (to which he always ascended for a few moments
after coming from his home), slipping his hands along the
banisters
,
as his manner was, and entered the chapel. As he closed
the door, his hand stuck to the knob thereof. He pulled it
away with gentle violence; and looking at his dexter, found it
begrimed and black, with a specious of sombrous gray pudding.
His brow flushed with anger, as he ascended to his desk on the
rostrum.
`Students!' he said, lifting both his hands in a mock-heroic
attitude, `I have been the object of some one's narrow spite.
The bannisters leading to the second hall have been covered with
an adhesive and unclean substance, the component parts of which
I could not analytically recognise on a cursory inspection, but
which are doubtless unsavory and displeasing to the last degree.
This mingled substance, composition, or compost, has been
placed there, as an insult to me. I ask, earnestly, who is it that
has done this thing?'
No one answered, but a subdued titter ran through the chapel.
`I ask,' he repeated, `who is the author of this outrage? Who
had a hand in it?'
`Please, Sir, nobody knows,' said one Tom Hines, a friend
of Edwards; `but it is thought, Mr. President, that
you
have
had the greatest
hand in it
. It certainly appears so!'
`Silence, impertinent youth!' said the president, loftily waving
his dingy hand; `your conjectures are needless. I shall leave
no stone unturned to ferret out this mystery. Let us pray.'
This, however, was the last of the marvel. I kept Edwards'
counsel; the kettle was under the iceand his room told no
secrets. The wisdom of our noble principal never fathomed the
wonder which so troubled him. The interpretation of it was
never made known. If he is yet alive, and this sketch should
meet his eye, he may find a clue to the `occulted guilt' of
Edwards
.
We
had a great passion in those days, when we sleighed in
the vicinity, for exciting the surprise of the rustic publicans
thereabout
,
by what we called
lingual embellishments
. Edwards set
this novelty afloat. I remember a pung-ride one evening to an
inn, a few miles distant, (the sign of which, swinging from a pine
bough over the door, bore the name of `The United States
Hotel, and North American Mansion House'), where Edwards
entered in quest of some sweet potatoes for a supper. It was
an esculent much affected by us all.
`Landlord!' said he, as he entered, cracking his whip, `can
you enable us, from your culinary stores, to realize the pleasure
of a few dulcet murphies, rendered innocuous by igneous
martyrdom
?'
`I don't know
them
dishes,' answered Boniface; `I'll jest ax
my wife.'
`Oh, go the unadorned English, Edwards,' cried we all; `ask
for what we want in the mother tongue.'
`Well, here goes; in other words, landlord, can you bake us
some sweet potatoes?'
`Oh,
sartingly!
Walk in the other roomwalk inwalk
in,' said the publican, as much relieved as if he had been
reprieved
from the gallowsfor he felt mortified at his want of
comprehensive scholarship.
Poor
Edwards!he died in India. A propensity for
voyaging
overcame his soul; and for years he strayed about the world,
just for the excitement. He closed his pretty law-office, after he
had graduated, to go to sea before the mast; came home in his
tarpaulin hat, and with hands hard as stone. On the strands of
Asia, Africa, and Europe, he trode; and finally sunk under a
fever on the banks of the Ganges. His cousin, who was his
idol, died, as I believe of a broken heart. Many a foreign ship
brought letters from him to her hand; and it was ever his fond
hope to return, and, when his wanderings were over, to settle in
his native villagemake her his bridego gently with her
down the declivity of yearsand `die at home at last.'
She never smiled after she heard of his death; but sank calmly
and sweetly to her dreamless repose.
Poor Emily Egerton! I admired thee, that thou wast my
friend's best friend; and for his sake, thy beauty pleased me;
and thine eye was brighter, that its sweetest glances were for him.
Alas! for the dust that has fallen upon those lips, once so
musical
and now so dumbfor the smile that Death has broken
for the hopes that were buried with thee! But when such as thou
evanish from the world, who shall repine?
I know
thou hast gone to the place of thy rest
Then why should my soul be so sad?
I know thou hast gone where the weary are blest,
And the mourner looks up, and is glad;
Where Love hath left off, in the land of its birth,
All the stains it hath gathered in this;
And Hope, the sweet singer that gladdened the earth,
Lies asleep on the bosom of Bliss.
NUMBER NINE.
January,
1837.
Reader
do you skate? Have you ever enjoyed the
exulting
sense of standing upon some wide, ice-bound river, having
your loins girded about, and your feet shod with the preparation
of that pleasant pastime? If not, then hath the culture of your
understanding been greviously neglected. With me skating is a
passion. When the winter air is mild and bracingwhen there
are no clouds about the zenith, but a few quiet, golden ones,
hanging like a rich curtain all around the horizonthen to step
with your glittering heel upon an expanse of congelated crystal,
and outstrip the windthere is
rapture
in it. It is the
quintessence
of life and `free moral agency.' You can go
where
you
list, and
as
you list; fast or slow; gliding or shooting over the
area where you are disporting, until it is with lines `both centrio
and eccentric scribbled o'er,' and you feel that you have done
wonders. I love to push onward in a straight line, or to wheel in
curious circumgyrations; forming parallels and circles on my
bright high-dutchers; leaving droves behind, and feeling at my
heart the fiery glow of the skater's ambition; until the city, with
its spires and flags flouting the sky, disappears in the distance.
There is nothing like it, for it is, next to a sleigh-ride, the very
soul of existence. Nature to me is very beautiful in winter.
How pure is the air! What loveliness, surpassing even the
spring-time, rests on the landscape! The hills, rising pale and
blue afar; the vales and plains, dotted with farm-yards, where
the herds are huddled `in their cotes secure,' and the yellow
straw or green hay marks the place of heir pleased
imprisonment
.
From the barn, you hear the hollow-sounding flail of the
thresher; from the street, near and far, the cheerful jingle of
bells; and all around you, when you gain some eminence, you
behold the shining lakes and mountains, bright as silver in the
beams of the sun! Then again, winter is so perfectly salubrious.
Sanctified and enshrined in its atmosphere, `the dog, the horse,
the rat,' though never so defunct, are inoffensive for months;
whereas, in the solstice, they would directly fill your nostril with
indignation, and demand prompt exequies. I say I like winter,
and I care not who knows it. He that differs from me, may go
his ways. His taste mislikes me.
Charles Kemble is probably one of the best skaters in the
world. Jehu! how he used to `go it' on the Schuylkill, until
he seemed, not an aged, wig-ensconced man, in lean and
slippered
pantaloon, but a creature of the elements, endowed with the
power of out-chasing the very lightnings of heaven. His
elementary
instruction began on the Serpentne, in London; it was
completed in Germany; and he now stands before the world,
accounted
a superior skateroh, very much so! But he is very
dull in Macbeth.
Winter
gives energy to everything. A full city, in
sleighing-time
,
is a perfect carnival. Whew! how the cutters, pungs, and
fours-in-hand, sweep over the pav! How the bells
tintinnabulate
!
Woman looks sweeter then, than ever. The demoiselle
in her boa, with her muff and fur-shoes, presents a picture of
warmth and comfort, that you can not too much admire. At this
seasonperhaps in this I am peculiar`high mountains are a
feeling.' How I should like to have been with Napoleon, when
he crossed those wintry Alps! to have shared in the excitement
the dangerthe triumph! Never, in all his brilliant career,
did he perform an act more sublime and powerful, in my eyes.
This alone, had he achieved nothing more, would have stamped
him the greatest Captain of his age.
Apropos
of Napoleon. I remember hearing from somebody,
or reading in some book, or pamphlet, or newspaperbear with
me, kind reader, in this incertitude, for I have forgotten all the
particularsan anecdote of him that seems to me worth
preserving
,
or, perhaps, I should rather say, rescuing, from the
oblivion to which it is rapidly hastening. It finely illustrates one
portion of his infinitely-diversified character; and I marvel that
it has escaped the notice or the researches of all his biographers,
eulogists, critics, and censors. I must be forgiven, if, in
recalling
it, I should be guilty of a lapse from historical accuracy; I
am a sad bungler at dates, and my library boasts not a `
Chronology
.'
Thus ran the tale. One of the
detns,
whom the abrupt
resumption
of hostilities after the short peace ofTilsit, was it?
found a wanderer upon the French soil, for his greater
misfortune
,
was an Englishman of large fortune, and some rank above
that of a mere private gentleman; but whether knight, baron, or
baronet, is more than I can remember. He was a widower, with
an only child, a daughter. He had become personally known to
the Emperor, when First Consul, and a certain degree of
friendship
had sprung up between them. This friendship was in some
sort renewed, when the Englishman became an involuntary
resident
of the French capital; the rigors of detention and
surveillance
were much softened in his behalf, and he was often a
partaker
of the Emperor's hospitality; not, indeed, at the formal
leves
and
soires
of the palace, but in private and familiar visits,
of which Napoleon was fond, and to the enjoyment of which he
appropriated as much of his time as could be spared from the
immense
number and magnitude of his burdensome imperial
occupations
.
The Englishman was discreet, and the monarch
condescending
;
their
tte--ttes
were, therefore, not infrequent, and
both parties seemed to take pleasure in their repetition.
The child of the Englishman had been placed at a school in
one of the provincial towns; but he solicited and obtained from
his imperial friend permission for her to join him in Paris. He
received intelligence of her setting out, accompanied by a
faithful
domestic; but days passed away, and she came not to lighten
his solitude. His anxiety and alarm gained strength, day after
day, until at length they drove him almost to phrensy. He
implored
leave to proceed in search of her, and it was granted; but
the search proved unavailing. He was enabled to trace her some
distance on her journey to the capital, but at a certain point, all
indications disappeared, and he was driven to the miserable
conviction
that, in some mysterious and unaccountable manner, she
had perished. He returned to Paris, almost heart-broken.
The morning after his arrival, he was astonished by a sudden
visit from an officer, at the head of a body of gens-d'armes, who
arrested him in the name of the Emperor. His first emotion
was astonishment, his second indignation; and this was not a
little heightened, when the officer, with an unusual degree of
harshness and
brusquerie,
announced to him that he was accused
of conspiring against the life of the Emperor, and that he was to
be confined,
en secret,
until the day of his trial before a military
commission.
His temper was naturally quick and ardent, and it vented
itself
in reproaches, exclamations, and perhaps a few oaths; but
as they were uttered in English, they seemed to produce no effect
on the officer. He was placed in a carriage, the blinds were
drawn, and the horses started at full speed.
After riding some distance, but in what direction the prisoner
could not determine, by reason of the closeness of the vehicle, it
stopped suddenly, a bandage was drawn over his eyes, and he
was led into some building; but whether the Conciergerie, or the
Bictre, he could only conjecture. After traversing various
passages
,
in silence, but brooding over his wrongs, and almost
bursting
with indignation, his progress was arrested, the blind was
removed
from his eyes, and he found himself in presence of his
friend,
the Emperor. His first glance conveyed mere wonder;
but those which followed it, were glowing with anger, which
increased
at every moment. The brow of Napoleon wore a gloomy
frown, but the heart of the Englishman was too full of wrath to
quail even before that fearful sign; it was but reflected from his
own bold front. `Tyrant!' he exclaimed, but before he could
add another word, a door was flung open, and his blooming child
bounded, all life and loveliness, into his arms. Amazement and
happiness made him dumb; and Napoleon, smiling as none but
him could smile, turned to leave the room, with the single
remark
:
`Joy and surprise would have turned your brain; it was
better to prepare you for the shock, by rousing you to anger.'
The surpassing skill of Fouch's myrmidons had been called
into employment by the Emperor's command, and had succeeded
in discovering the child; but how, or where, I have forgotten.
Poor Napoleon!
I can never think of his brilliant career,
and desolate end, without feeling the sublimity of Massillon's
ejaculation over the dead body of his monarch, as it lay in state
before him, in the church of Notre Dame. `
God
alone is great!
'
He commissions Death, with his cold shaft, and the mighty are
fallen. The cemetery is sublimer than the battle, or the
coronation
.
There
speaks a power which is beyond all others; there,
in the rustling grass, or whisper of the cypress, we hear the
knell of nations, and the prophecy of that to which they all must
cometo dust and silence! I am tempted, here, to transcribe
one of the noblest poems ever written in our language. It may
be familiar to some of my readers, but it is worth a hundred
perusals
;
while to those who have never seen it, I convey a
treasure
and a talismana
memento mori
. The author, Herbert
Knowles, wrote it at twilight, in the churchyard of Richmond,
England. Shortly afterward, `he died and was buried in the
flower of his manhood,
THE DEAD.
`
Methinks
it is good to be here: if thou wilt, let us build three tabernacles; one
for thee, one for Moses, and one for Elias.'
The Bible
.
Methinks
it is good to be here:
If thou wilt, let us buildbut for whom?
Nor Elias nor Moses appear;
But the shadows of evening encompass with gloom
The abode of the Dead, and the place of the tomb.
Shall we build to Ambition? Ah no!
Affrighted, he shrinketh away;
For see, they would pin him below,
In a dark narrow cave, and begirt with cold clay,
To the meanest of reptiles a peer and a prey
To Beauty? Ah no!she forgets
The charm that she wielded before;
Nor knows the foul worm, that he frets
The skin that but yesterday fools could adore,
For the smoothness it held, or the tint that it wore.
Shall we build to the purple of Pride
To the trappings that dizen the proud?
Alas! they are all laid aside;
For here's neither wealth nor adornment allow'd,
Save the long winding sheet, and the fringe of the shroud.
Unto Riches? Alas!'tis in vain;
Who here in their turns have been hid,
Their wealth is all squandered again;
And here in the grave are all metals forbid,
Save the tinsel that shines on the dark coffin-lid.
To the pleasures that Mirth can afford?
The revelthe laughand the jeer?
Ah! here is a plentiful board;
But the guests are all mute as their pitiful cheer,
And none but the worm is a reveller here.
Shall we build to Affection and Love?
Ah no! they have withered and died,
Or flown with the spirit above;
Friends, brothers, and sisters, are laid side by side,
Yet none have saluted, and none have replied.
Unto Sorrow?
The dead
cannot grieve;
Not a sob, nor a sigh, meets mine ear,
Which compassion itself could relieve;
Ah sweetly they slumber, nor love, hope, nor fear
Peace, peace is the watch-wordthe only one here.
Unto Death, to whom monarchs must bow?
Ah, no!for his empire is known
And here there are trophies enow;
Beneath the cold head, and around the dark stone,
Are the signs of a sceptre that none may disown.
The first tabernacle to Hope we will build,
And look for the sleepers around us to rise:
The second to Faith, which insures it fulfilled,
And the third to the Lamb of the great Sacrifice,
Who bequeathed us them both, when he rose to the skies!
Some
one of our countrymen has written: `I never shun a
grave-yard. The thoughtful melancholy it inspires, is grateful
rather than displeasing to me.' Here we differ. I
do
shun it;
and I hope a good Providence, will keep me out of one for a
long time. I desire not a freehold in any such premises. I like
the liberal air, the golden sunshine, the excursive thought; and
I pray Heaven to detain me long from that ancient receptacle,
where my kinsmen are inurned. Give me the vital principle
below
the sun; and though I cannot be astonishingly useful to my
fellow beings, or carve my name, just now, high on the records
of fame, I can at least enjoy the luxury of fancy, feeling, and
respirationto say nothing of the pleasing enjoyment of
dreaming
,
which is in itself worth a dukedomand the rapture of
eye-sight. I love not your sackcloth misanthrope, whose whole
life is darkened by the fear of its inevitable close, and
embittered
in the mazes of metaphysics.
Speaking
of metaphysics, reminds me of Bob Edwards.
Reader, thou art already acquainted with Bob; thou hast had a
touch of his quality in the
potato
line, and hast borne him
company
in sundry expeditions from the sacred groves of Academus;
thou hast seen, that, by deeds of valiant daring, he had built up
for himself a fame which extended far beyond the terrestrial
limits that were allowed us for the exercise of our corporeal
functions
,
by the individual who instructed the youthful creatures of
our imaginations in the use of fire-arms, or, in the language of
the immortal poet,
`Taught our young ideas how to shoot.'
He was the plague of the farmers, the glory of the jollifiers, the
terror of the mothers, and the passion of the daughters, `all
over the world, for thirty miles round.'
He was an uncommon youth, was BobO, quite so!
Bob had a philosophical turn of mind, and was looked up to
by his satellites with unspeakable reverence. By tacit consent,
he was vested with an appellate jurisdiction in the little common
wealth. He sat in judgment upon all questions of law or equity,
arising between its juvenile members. He delivered his opinion
like the Oracle of Delphos, and his decrees were final.
It was winter; the length of the evenings were remarkable for
the time of year, the frigidity of the circumambient atmosphere
wasvery considerable. A thought smote Bob.
He called his associates together, he made a speech, in which,
with all the alternate fire and pathos of his Heaven-born
eloquence
,
he described the trying position in which the severity of
the weather had placed them. He spoke of the physical
enjoyments
of the human race as empty vanities, which an all-wise
Providence, for his own good purpose, had qualified with pains
and penalties. He adverted, in melting terms, to the uncommon
scarcity of game, by which, for a time, they were debarred from
the dignified and soul-ennobling pursuit of hunting foxes. He
went on to observe, that the improvement of the intellectual
faculties was one of the first duties of man; and after enlarging
with great talent upon this incontrovertible position, he proposed
to his auditors that they should organize a society for the
discussion
of subjects involving questions of abstract science. (By
the way, there are plenty of such discussions and societies
now-a-days
,
of which
cui bono
should be the motto, but whereof I
would not for a ton of gold be supposed to speak lightly. Oh,
by no means!) He proceeded to explain his views at length,
and his purpose having been received with a unanimous
approval
,
the constitution was signed, the officers were elected, and
Bob was placed in the Presidential chair of
THE METAPHYSICAL SOCIETY.
And now, reader, Bob was in his glory. Many were the
discussions
held by that erudite body, and numerous were the
elucidations
of the scientific mysteries which had baffled the mightiest
intellects of past ages. I do especially remember me of one
discussion
in which our venerated President himself largely
participated
.
It was deemed of much interest to the cause of learning,
that the debates of the society should be preserved on record;
wherefore, the office of Grand Stenographer had been instituted,
into which responsible station I had been sworn, with great
solemnity, a short time previous to the period to which I refer.
It had been determined to hold a grand debate upon a question
of grave importance. The President's proclamation had gone
forth, with an imposing aspect. Three gigantic hand-bills were
indited by his private secretary. One of these was fastened with
ten-penny nails upon the portal of the
Interniculum Frumenti,
(as the corn-crib was classically denominated;) a second on the
vestibulem of the Temple of the muses, (or, as it was termed by
the common people, the Pig-pen,) and the third was emblazoned
on the academic Stabulum.
I subjoin a true copy of the document, taken from the records
of the Society.
`SOCII SOCIETATIS METAPHYSIC.
`Convocabunt in dibus Academi C, dimidium hor post
septimum
,
die Jovis, vigesimo Januarii.
`Orationis argumentum est maximi momenti, quia involvit casus scienti,
antea nunquam agitatos.
`Quamobrem, nos, Prfectus hujus Societatis erudit, per hoc
mandamus
omnibus sociis, fautoribus Metaphysicarum, congregare accurate
dibus
ante dictis.
`Questio qu proponitur argumento, ut sequitur: `
An chimera,
bombinans
in vacuo, devorat secundus intentiones
.'
`In hac re, nusquam aberramini, sub pna sexdecim caudarum gallorum.
`
Robertus Edwardus,
Prs
.'
Such was the manifesto of President Bob; and it may not be
improper to annex, for the benefit of the general reader, a true
rendition into the vernacular, of the question on which the
Metaphysical
Society was to exercise its intellectual energies.
This, then, was the subject of discussion: `
Whether a chimera,
ruminating in a vacuum, devoureth second intentions
.'
The erudite reader can not fail to perceive the importance of
the occasion, and its tendency to create an irrepressible interest
in the republic of letters. I pass over the various speculations
on the subject which had agitated the philosophical world
previous
to the assembling of this august body; and, deeming that
the preceding remarks sufficiently introduce the main object,
plunge at once,
in medias res
.
On the twentieth day of January, in the year of grace one
thousand eight hundred and twenty-six, a grand meeting of the
Metaphysical Society of Cwas held in the academic
buildings
of that ilk. At thirty minutes and seventeen seconds past
seven o'clock, post meridiem, the great door of the ante-room
was thrown open, and the President, supported on the right by
the chief Curator, Jehoikim Smilax, and on the left by the
Censor-general
,
Eliphalet Flunk, entered the hall, with a dignified
step.
The members rose in respectful silence, and the President,
acknowledging
their salutations with gracious condescension, passed
on to his official seat. The attendant officers sat in their
respective
places, on either side of the Presidential chair, and the
Grand Stenographer,
John Ollapod,
surrounded by the
insignia
of his station, occupied his accustomed conspicuous position.
The hall, which was of large dimensions, was brilliantly
illuminated
with five dipt candles, of a superior quality, tastefully
arranged in porter bottles, of a sea-green huc. The whole scene
presented an imposing aspect, and was calculated to inspire the
beholder with feelings of solemnity and awe.
My space will not permit me to extract from the records the
whole of the President's address, which followed an unbroken
silence of three minutes, one quarter, and some odd seconds. I
subjoin only these observations:
`
My Brethren:
You are assembled to give to a subject which has
heretofore
confounded the wisdom of man, the infallible test of your
deliberations
.
The eyes of all Europe are upon you;
and you occupy an altitude
before both hemispheres, calculated to call forth your undivided energie.
Comment from me were useless.
`Now, therefore, brethren, invoking the aid of our blessed Minerva to
your righteous endeavors, I quaff this
smaller,
otherwise called cock-tail, to
the victory of truth, and the downfall of error.'
He spake, and taking from the custody of the Grand Tresurer,
who was in waiting by his side, a tin cup of considerable
capability
,
he transferred the generous fluid contained therein, to the
interior of his abdominal regions. His replenished corpus sank
gently into the official receptacle, where, after recovering his
natural equilibrium, he signified to the brethren his pleasure that
the discussion should commence. Whereupon Mr. Elnathan
Rummins arose, and thus addressed the assembly:
`
Mr. President:
In getting myself up to discourse to this learned body
on the affirmative side of the question submitted to our decision I feel a
diffidence commensurate with the stupendouseness of the subject. Yet,
having bestowed upon it much studious research and attention, I feel
imperiously
bound to express it as my decided opinion, that a chimera,
ruminating
in a vacuum,
does
devour second intentions. I will briefly submit my
reasons.
`Firstly:
I will take leave to premise, that after serious and mature
deliberation
,
I have brought my mind to the settled belief that Metaphysics is
considerable of a science; that all the ideas we have, are derived from two
sources, viz: sensation and reflection; and that the latter is the root from
which all abstract ideas are generated.
`I am discussing this question, Mr. President, upon the supposition that
the doctrine of abstract ideas is fully established. In my mind, it is entirely
so, and therefore I shall not argue this disputed point. If my
premises
are
false, my
conclusions
will collapse, and my learned opponent must benefit by
the error.
`What is a
chimera,
in the modern philosophical sense? Sir, we can
derive
no idea of it from our sense; the faculty of
abstraction
must be
resorted
to for a definition; the mind must be withdrawn from the contemplation
of external objects, and wrapping itself in the solitude of its own
originality
,
must frame from its own exclusive resources, an idea of this singular
being.
`But notwithstanding this
apparent
difficulty, there is, in fact, nothing
more easy than a description of this idea. My own reflections have led me
to the conclusion, that
a chimera is an immaterial, incorporeal, intangible,
and invisible essence, having no local habitation, and possessing neither form,
extension, nor substance
. Thus I may indulge the pleasing hope, that I
have, in a very
simple
manner, conveyed to the Society a clear apprehension
of the nature of this abstraction.
`From this description, it will be perceived, that a chimera possesses no
incarnale
attributes, but it is the emanation of a spiritual essence, and
therefore
must be eminently endowed with the faculty of thought, or, in other
words of
rumination
.
`Having thus briefly pointed out the abstract idea of a chimera, and
proved
its implied powers of rumination, I proceed, secondly to show that it
possesses the undoubted capability of ruminating in a vacuum. To this
end, let me very properly show the
nature
of a vacuum. Little need be
said on this subject.
`According to some modern philosophers, there are several species of
vacua,
but the
vacuum cacervatum
is that to which I particularly refer: this is
conceived as a space entirely destitute of matter; and, in my apprehension,
its existence was successfully urged by those illustrious men who professed
the Pythagorean, the Epicurean, and the Corpuscularian philosophy; but as
the human mind is composed of discordant principles, the spirit of
opposition
(for I cannot imagine it to have been anything else) induced the
advocates
of the Cartesian doctrines to deny its existence. They urged, that if
there be nothing
material
in an enclosed space, the walls of the enclosure
must be brought into contact; thus insisting upon the principle, that
extension
is
matter
. But the Corpuscular authors, with much promptness,
refuted
the arguments of the Cartesians and Peripateties, by the existence of
various circumstances; and they instanced planetary and cometary motion,
the fall of bodies, the vibration of the pendulum, re-refraction and
condensation
,
the divisibility of matter, etc.
`Now permit me to observe, Mr. President, that it is altogether
impossible
to effect
motion
in a
plenum
. I do not wish to make this position depend
for support upon my bare assertion; I am borne out in it by the dictum of
Lueretius, thus:
`Principium quonam cedendi nulla daret resundique
materies quoniam stipata fuisset.'
Although I might well rest here, Mr.
President
,
upon such mighty authority, I will nevertheless enter upon the proofs
which go to the establishing of this principle.
`First
. All motion is in a straight line, or in a curve which returns into
itself, as, for example, the circle and the ellipsis, or in one that does not
return into itself, as the parabolic curve.
Second:
that the moving force
must always be greater than the resistance. Now it is perfectly clear from
this, that no quantum of force, even though increased
ad infinitum,
can
produce motion, where the resistance is also infinite; consequently, it is not
possible that motion can exist, either in a straight line, or in a non-returning
curve; because, in either of these cases, the amounts of force and
resistance
would counterbalance each other; that is, they would be infinite.
`You will therefore perceive, Mr. President, that there remains only the
motion of a revolving curve practicable; and this must either be a
revolution
upon an axis, or an annular motion round a stationary body; now both
of these would be impossible in an
elliptic
curve, and consequently, all
motions
must be in circles geometrically true; and, the bodies thus revolving
must either be spheres, spheroids, or cylinders; otherwise the revolution in a
plenum would be altogether impracticable. But, Sir,
such
figures and
motions
have no existence in nature; yet we know, from the evidence of the
senses, that motion, in a non-returning curve, does exist; therefore a
vacuum
must exist.
`Having now shown that a chimera is a creature of the imagination, and
that therefore it does not require the inhalation of atmospheric air to
support
life, and having shown the nature and existence of the vacuum, it is of
course evident that a chimera may
ruminate
in a vacuum.
`I proceed, in the next place, to demoustrate, that a chimera thus
ruminating
,
does devour second intentions.'
At
this stage of his speech, Rummins exhibited symptoms of
exhaustion, and on motion of Mr. Jeremiah Tomkins, the
question
was postponed until the next ensuing meeting. Whenever
I feel disposed to make my reader bolt a few
solids,
among his
intellectual edibles, I shall fling in a scrap from the `Society.' I
think I can demonstrate thereby, that a great deal of plausible
argument can be used, to demonstrate a small amount of fact,
mingled with an immensity of error. Metaphysics, now-a-days,
can not be deemed a very
clear
science. Muddy brains have
elucidated it to death. That was not a bad description of the
art given by the Scotchman: `Metaphysics, mon, is where the
hearers dinna ken what the speaker is talking anent, and he does
na ken himsel';' but the following definition of one of the
metaphysical
tribe, by my friend Norman Leslie, is perhaps as good
a one as can be found: `
Metaphysician:
Encountered a Doctor.'
Is it
not singular, how one thought brings on another! Now
this slight discussion of metaphysics and abstraction, reminds me
of a bachelor, an accidental and slight acquaintance of mine,
who remains in single blessedness, because, he says, he has
always
been accustomed, `e'en from his boyish days,' to look at
women
in the abstract
. Fine eyes he regards merely as filmy
globes of water, that shut their coward gates against an atom;
lips he deems but horizontal lines of flesh, constituting the
aperture
into which beef, pork, potatoes, and other eatable substances
periodically enter. The bloom on the cheek of woman, he
considers
superfluous blood, prophetic of speedy decay; smiles, in
his esteem, are merely the effect of nervous excitement; and
frowns, he thinks, are the proper elucidators of the human heart,
especially woman's, which he says has always a small portion of
discontent and anxiety predominant therein. Holding such
notions
,
he is, of course, somewhat unhappy; but he dissipates his
ennui
by a copious reception of vinous fluids; and is, moreover,
a potent eater of oysters. I am half inclined to believe in
metempsychosis, and to suppose that the souls of these testaceous
articles, if souls they have, ascend him into the brain, and give
the
impetus
to his present opinions. At any rate he is quite a
dolt. I always cut him in the street. His reckless life has undone
him, as it were. He owes every body; has been often in jail;
and those who keep his company, are in something such a
situation
as one would be at sea, in a leaky boat, they must be
evermore
`bailing him out.' I think he has come to his present
sentiments in consequence of the treatment he receives; every
body, females especially, considering him a nonentity; while he
looks at
them
in the
abstract
.
To-morrow
will be Christmas. Happy day! How I envy
the young hearts that its advent will cheer! whose elastic and
bounding affections it will revive and strengthen! Would to
heaven I were a
millionaire,
for to-morrow only! There should
not be a rosy face in the Union that should not be the brighter
for my benefactions. I would distribute presents to every urchin
and miss I met; and that holiest of all pleasures,
benevolence,
should nestle warmly in my bosom.
God
bless the children!
unsullied by the guileful contacts of the world; fresh in their
feelings, simple in their desires, fervent in their loves, they are
the emblems of blessedness and peace. Truly of such is the
kingdom of Heaven; and sweetly did the characteristic
meekness
of our
Saviour
appear when he said, `Suffer little children
to come unto me!' Would that I were a boy again! Would
that I had my few years to live over again! I would enjoy the
present, as it rolled on the future; I would revel in the light of
sparkling eyes, and the smile of lips, that the grave has closed
and sealed for ever! I would sing, and shout, and fly my kite,
and glide down the snowy hill on my little craft, as in days of
yore. I would enjoy the spring, as I used once to do; that
pleasant season, as William Lackaday, Esquire, observes in the
play, `when the balmy breezes is a-blowin', and the primroses
peeps out, and the little birds begins for to sing;' and I would
make it a point to have
no enemies
. I would do this without
being a Joseph Surface, too; for I hold insincerity to be the
most detestable of all the vices for which men go unhung.
It strikes me that Christmas is not celebrated with such
soberness
and godliness as it was wont to be. People drink more than
formerly; they do not become devout over the deceased turkey,
or adolescent hen, that lies in solemn lifelessness before the eater;
but they meet in clubs, and consort with publicans and sinners.
If Christmas happeneth toward the close of the week, they `keep
up' the same until Sunday hath gone by; and it is not until the
even-song of the second day of the week ensuing the festival,
that they can bring themselves to cease from their wassail; and
even then they do it with muchoh! considerablereluctance,
exclaiming, as they ruminate bedward, `
Sic transit gloria
Monday
.
'
Before
I close with Christmas, let me relate a little story,
just now told me, connected in some degree with that glorious
holyday.
Publicans are classed in the New Testament, with sinners, as
though there were something demoralizing in the business of
keeping open house; but if the conjunction be not an error of
the translators, I know of at least one exception to the rule. The
individual is hereby immortalized.
Some twenty or twenty-five, or it may be thirty years ago, the
landlord of the Bush tavern in Bristol, England, was so far a
benevolent man, that on every Christmas-day he used to set an
immense table, at which whosoever would was at liberty to sit
and replenish his inner man with as much roast beef and
plum-pudding
as he could dispose of, a privilege of which, it may well
be supposed, the poor of that ancient and by no means elegant
city were not backward to avail themselves. But the dinner
alone, flanked as it was by an
ad libitum
distribution of stout ale
and cider, could not appease the generous propensities of mine
host of the Bush; he was in the habit, also, of giving away a
score of guineas, upon the same anniversary, which were
bestowed
in small sums of from five shillings to twenty, upon
such of the free guests as appeared to stand most in need of
something more than a dinner.
It had been observed for some weeks toward the close of a
particular year, which I do not remember, that an elderly
personage
,
whom nobody knew, was in the habit of stepping into the
Bush every day, and taking a single glass of brandy-and-water,
with which he contrived to dally so long as was requisite for the
thorough perusal of a London paper, brought down by the guard
of one of the night coaches. A London paper was a great thing
at that time, in Bristol. The gentleman was elderly, as I have
said; and moreover, his person and garb, as well as his habits,
gave token of poverty. He was thin, and apparently feeble; his
coat was seedy, his hat rusty, his nether habiliments thread-bare,
and otherwise betokening long and arduous service; and his
expenditure
never exceeded the sixpence required to pay for the one
glass of brandy-and-water. Nobody seemed to know him; and
after a few of his daily calls, he came to be recognised by the
waiters and landlord, with that happy adaptation of names for
which English landlords and waiters are remarkable, as `The poor
gentleman that reads the paper.'
If any doubts existed as to his poverty, they were dispelled
when Christmas-day arrived, and the poor gentleman was seen
taking his place at the long table, and demolishing an ample
allowance
of the beef and the pudding, for which there was nothing
to pay. `Poor fellow!' soliloquized the landlord of the Bush;
`I'm sure he can't afford that sixpence every day for his
brandy-and-water
;
I must make it up to him again. His measures were
accordingly taken; John the waiter had his instructions; and
when the poor gentleman handed his plate for another slice of
the pudding, a guinea was slipped into his hand, with the
whispered
,
`Master's compliments, Sir, and says this will do to lay
in some winter flannels for the children.' The poor gentleman
looked at the coin, and then at the waiter; then deposited the
first in the right hand pocket of his small clothes; and then drew
forth a card which he handed to John, quietly remarking: `My
thanks and compliments to your master, and tell him that if he
ever happens to come my way, I hope he'll call upon me.' This
was the card:
THOMAS COUTTS,
59 STRAND,
LONDON.
The `poor gentleman' was at Bristol, superintending the
erection
of some thirty or forty houses, which he was building on
speculation. What afterward passed between him and the
landlord
of the Bush, is not recorded; but this much is known, that
8
the said landlord soon after engaged very largely in the coaching
business; that his drafts on Coutts and Co., the great bankers,
were always duly honored; that he was very successful, and
became
one of the richest men in Bristol. And it is farther said,
that the identical Christmas guinea is still in the possession of
the `poor gentleman's' widow, her Grace the Duchess of St.
Albans.
And
now, Reader, peace be with you! This salutation by
the hand of me,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER TEN.
February,
1836.
There
is a pensive, melancholy feeling, which overpowers
the heart of a resident in a city, when he goes at twilight from
the scene of his business and his cares to the fireside of home.
As he passes along the crowded thoroughfare, jostled by the
hundreds that meet him; as he looks forward through the
uncertain
atmosphere, to forms and dwellings dimly descried, by
twinkling lamps in the distance, and sees damp walls and streets
receding from his footsteps; he falls into a train of musing.
How many deeds does the night bring on! How many an
unsuspected
and impatient eye watches the golden sun go down
into the glowing bosom of the West; how many hearts beat high
with suspense or disquiet, while the wan twilight deepens into
evening, and the stars, one by one, glittering like diamonds
through the infinite air, `set their watch in the sky!' The
affianced bride waits for her lover, counting the footsteps that fall
upon the pavement, and taxing the discipline of her ready ear
with the task of decision whether they be
his
or no; the
churchgoer
longs for the bell, whose voice proclaims the hallowed hour
of prayer, and lingers in fond solicitude for the moment when the
chapel-ward step shall be taken. In unnumbered bosoms are
kindled the emotions of praise; and they are pure and holy.
Nothing can exceed the beauty of a truly calm and chastened
affection. It is alike lovely when bestowed on
God
or man.
The relinquishment of self; the trusting dependence on the Great
Power of Nature; the fond aspirations for better enjoyments;
these are the true solace and hope of mortality.
For one, I am a deep lover of the `poetry of heaven.'
Delicate
and perfect indeed is the `glitterance of the stars.' I love to
watch their birth in the depths of the evening firmament; and to
see the moon walking in their midst; the Queen of the Evening,
whose blue pathway glitters with the fadeless jewelry of the
universe
.
Some of these glorious spheres spring with their holy
lustre upon the sight with the quickness of thought, blessing the
eye with their sweet radiance, and almost haunting the ear with
that music which seems to echo from that dim period of the past,
when the morning stars sang together. When I behold them,
devotional feelings possess my heart; and I go back on the wings
of memory to the far away scenes of my boyhood. I think
again, as I did then, that all created things make melody to their
God,
and, singing as once I sung, I say:
Ask
of the ocean-waves that burst
In music on the strand,
Whose murmurs load the scented breeze
That fans the Summer land;
Why is their harmony abroad,
Their cadence in the sky
That glitters with the smile of
God
In mystery on high?
Question the cataract's boiling tide,
Down stooping from above,
Why its proud billows, far and wide
In stormy thunders move?
It is that in their hollow voice
A tone of praise is given,
Which bids the fainting heart rejoice,
And trust
the might
of Heaven?
And ask the tribes whose matin song
Melts on the dewy air,
Why, like a stream that steals along,
Flow forth their praises there?
Why, when the veil of Eve comes down,
With all its starry hours,
The night-bird's melancholy lay
Rings from her solemn bowers?
It is some might of love within,
Some impulse from on high,
That bids their matin-song begin,
Or fills the evening sky
With gentle echoes all its own;
With sounds, that on the ear
Fall, like the voice of kindred gone,
Cut off in Youth's career!
Ask of the gales that sweep abroad,
When Sunset's fiery wall
Is crowned with many a painted cloud,
A gorgeous coronal;
Ask why their wings are trembling then
O'er Nature's sounding lyre,
While the far occidental hills
Are bathed in golden fire?
Oh! shall the wide world raise the song
Of peace, and joy, and love,
And shall man's heart not bid his tongue
In voiceful praises move?
Shall the old forest and the wave,
When summon'd by the breeze,
Yield a sweet flow of solemn praise,
And
man
have less than these?
No one, I fancy, can regard the wonderful mechanism of the
heavens, or the revolutions of this goodly frame the earth, without
emotion. I at least cannot. When I behold the moon, coursing
her sweet and mysterious way through the azure vault of evening,
or the sun, mounting from his golden tabernacle of morning
clouds, to smile from the zenith upon a beautiful world, I am
filled with wonder and admiration. The coming on of Spring,
the advent and departure of Summer, are to me scenes and
themes of amazing thought. Then, how solemnly does Autumn
come on; rustling his sallow leaf, and shaking his withered
spray, in token that Winter is near! telling the heart, as
Wordsworth
does the eye, that
`Summer ebbs; each day that follows,
Is a reflux from on high,
Tending to the darksome hollows,
Where the frosts of Winter lie.'
I value
every season as it affords me subjects for reflection.
New-Year's day is fruitful of thought. Standing upon the
threshold of a cycle, we look forward with questioning eyes into
the unknown future, wondering what it may bring to us of weal
or wo. Merciful is the cloud that hangs over that untrodden
way; grateful the uncertainty which begirts its uninvestigated
span. Methinks it adds a fresher glow to that social communion
wherewith we greet the opening year; that it gives to love a
holiness, to friendship a charm. I would that the time-honored
custom of Gotham might be extended through the Atlantic cities;
that friends might be gathered together around each other's
firesides
at the morning of the year, there to renew the sweet
feelings
and generous sympathies of life.
It is the renewal of precious and holy feelings, that makes the
new year in New-York so delightful. The citizens bid a truce
to care; and the generous principle of friendship comes fully
into play. To tell the truth, the custom begins to
radiate
from
the commercial metropolis, and its delights, `like flower-seeds by
the far winds sown,' are already springing up in other towns. I
had a taste of them at the commencement of this present year,
in the Rectangular City; enough to convince me that the mode
is germinating freely, and will soon abundantly fructify. It fell
on the day that I had some dozen friends to visit; and the
employment
was truly a New-York affair, altogether. One
hospitable
household, well known for the kindness of its members,
and the regal bounty of its domestic appointments, conducted
the matter in veritable Gotham style. On a table which
groaned
if
mahogany
can
groanwith its burden, were placed all
sorts of rich edibles, and copious excellences of great variety,
in the way of potation. Many were the pleasant-tasted things
that reminded me, through the interpretation of the palate, that I
might consider myself in New-York; and as, for the nonce, `I
drained huge draughts of Rhenish down,' I can assure the reader
that the American London was `in my flowing cups freshly
remembered
.'
Great, however, is the stability of my brain; and
so it was, that I escaped without injury; though I do religiously
believe, that should `some persons' imbibe thus much of things
spiritual and substantial, their footsteps would indicate a
knowledge
of the curvilinear zig-zag.
It
is right wholesome to me, to perceive the effect of the new
year on an old bachelor. His forehead wears less wrinkles then,
and that part to which phrenologists assign the organ of
benevolence
,
seemeth to bulge, as it were, with a preternatural
expansion
.
He becometh frisky; `takes much to imbibe,' and thinks
seriously of changing his condition. I never knew but one, that
the new year could not revivify, and he was a biped whom long
years of `scoundrelizing' had indurated, in the region of the
heart, to perfect ossification. The sacrophagus of a mummy, or
the flesh of a patriarchal turkey, the cock of his peculiar walk of
life, could not be harder. I met him, `the first of last January
was a year,
' as they say in Brotherly Love. `Well, Tompkins,'
said I, `your bosom friend Jones has been swept away, within
the past year, into the vortex of matrimony.' `Yes,' said he,
with some such a grin as Satan may have shed upon Ithuriel in
Paradise; `yes; Tom has gone, and I am
glad of it
. I don't
know why I
Should
be, though; for he never did me any injury!'
He sported this remark for a new year's original; yet, like his
wig, I believe it was not natural, but borrowed for the occasion.
It
is diverting in the extreme to observe the pompous
grandiloquence
in the advertisements of the amusement-furnishing
public
,
about Christmas and New-Year. Sublimity glares from the
theatrical hand-bill, and the menagerie
affiche
. Curiosities, then,
have a `most magnanimous value.' I remember, not long ago,
that I desired a lovely lady, a French countess, to accompany
me to a Zoological Institute, to behold
an American Eagle
. I
was pleased at the expressed wish which led me to make the
invitation
,
and proud of the prospect of showing a living emblem
of our country's insignia to one who felt an interest in the
subject
.
The bills of the institute set forth, that `the grand
Columbia's
Eagle was the monarch of its tribe, measuring an
unprecedented
length from the tip of one wing to the other, in full
plumage, and vigor.' The countess had never seen but one
eagle, in the
Jardin des Plantes
at Paris, and that was a small
one, and ungrown; so that her anticipations of novelty were as
great as mine. We went, and with interesting expectancy, asked
of the president of the institute, who was engaged in the noble
pursuit of feeding a sick baboon with little slips of cold pork, to
discover to us `Columbia's eagle.' He marshalled us to the
other end of the institute, past the cages of lions, bears, libbards,
and other animalsamong which was a singular
quadruped,
with six legsto the cage of the eagle. `There,' he exclaimed,
with professional monotony, `there
is
the proud bird
of
our
country, that
was
caught
in
the West, and
has
been thought to
have killed many animals
in
his life-time. He
was
five hours
and twenty-three minutes
in
being put into the cage,
so
strong
was
his wings. Look at him
clus
. He'll bear inspection. Jist
obsarve the keen
irish
of his eye.'
An involuntary and hearty laugh from us both, followed the
sight, and the announcement. It was a dismal looking bird,
about the size of a goodly owl, with a crest-fallen aspect, the
feathers of the tail and wings dwindled to a few ragged quills;
and the shivering fowl, standing on one leg, looked with a vacant,
spectral eye at his visiters. Nothing could be so perfectly
burlesque
,
and we enjoyed it deeply and long. I shall never be
deceived
by show-bills again.
Apropos
of
holidays
. To the young and light-hearted, they
are what they seem. To those who have passed the purple and
flowery boundaries of minority, that `infancy' of law, they are
forbidden gardens of pleasure, whose fruitage is only for the eye.
To the adult, it is a season of preparation for the payment of
billsor
williams,
as they should be more classically
denominated
that
fall due on or about the first of the year. These
absorb his soul. The mercer, the
bottier,
the manufacturer of
those glossy receptacles which environ the chamber of the soul,
all such send in their accumulated williams, until the sight thereof
astounds the receiver. Forthwith he sets about defraying the
same; and great is his satisfaction when he says
eureka!
of their
end. I have a `contemporary,' if he be yet alive, sojourning in
foreign lands, who was once visited, about Christmas, by the
senior of the firm of `Wright, Wright and Wiggins, mercers,
drapers, and fabricators of good habits.' The elder of the
housea fat and burly biped, with a turnip countenance, and
nose of extraordinary rednessbore to Wilkins his bill.
Wilkins
was oblivious.
`Can you tell me, my dear Sir, where you have ever seen me
before?'
`Certainlyyes, SirI can. You are a customer of ours,
atstreet, 27. Here's your bill.'
`Ahso it is: Wright, you are right. But, my dear Sir,
there is one trifling circumstance connected with this bill, which
makes it a little awkward. I have not the wherewithal to settle
it. This is the only obstacle in the way, at present. I do not
quote often; but you will perhaps allow me, on this occasion, to
observe, in the language of the cockney to Mathews' cab-driver:
`I han't not got no money wharsomdever; on the contrary, it is
quite the rewaase.' Beside, my friend, I have a plan from which
I never depart, in the cancelling of my leger-liabilities. I pay
my blank-book demands
alphabetically
. Your firm is Wright,
Wright and Wiggins. The plan strikes you, I see, visibly; and
its propriety is as clear, seemingly, to you, as the light on a lily,
in the spring-time, or the glow on the red side of a bursted
peach, in October. The divine thought touches you nearly, and
you acquiesce, evidently.
Adios,
my friend: as soon as I
reach your name in my payments, some ten months hence, I will
advise you promptly. I say this, with a difficult nerve; but I
trust you twig me decidedly. I mean as I say. Good
morning
good
morning!'
Reader,
since I last communed with thee, the despot
Sickness
has held me in subjection. I have had dull days, and weary
nights; but my books have been companions, and I have had,
beside, friends and newspapers. I mention this thing, partly to
excuse my brevity, and lack of variety, and also as a prelude to
this piece of advice:
Lend not thy umbrella,
nor suffer thou it to
be stolen from thee. In this wise, did I procure my
indisposition
.
The night was dark, the rains descended; the floods came,
and beat against me; the umbrella was loanedit has never
come home. Heaven forgive the borrower! There are some
who do not even borrow this
in-rainy-weather-much-to-be-desired-and-requisite
article. They
steal
it, without compunction. I
lately heard a man of
God,
at a Wesleyan conventicle, deliver
the following speech from the altar: `I would ad'nounce to the
cod'ngregation, that, prebably
by mistake,
there was left at this
house of prayer, this morning, a small cotton umbrella, much
damaged by time and tear, and of an exceeding-
ly
pale blue
color, in the place whereof was taken a very large black silk
umbrella, new, and of great beauty. I say, my brethren, it was
prebably by mistake, that of these articles, the one was taken and
the other left; though it is a very improper mistake, and should
be discountenanced, if possible. Blunders of this sort, brethren
and sisters, are getting a
leetle
too common!'
Pas encore,  present, cher lecteur
.
NUMBER ELEVEN.
March,
1836.
Glorious Bellini
! I have been listening for many
pleasant
evenings past, to the sweet creations of that composer's mind.
How sad that he died so young! Only twenty-eight, when the
shroud was wrapped around his bosom, and his tuneless ear laid
beneath the coffin-lid! But the harmonies he conceived, will
linger in holy sweetness, while taste shall last; and many an
unborn
enthusiast will yet live to bless his name. How touching
and beautiful are the tender sentences that drop in melody from
the lips of Count Rodolpho, in
La Somnambula!
With what a
divine diapason do the following words, and the chorus that
accompanies
them, fall on the ear! They are the by-gone thoughts
of one who has long been absent from his youthful home, on
again finding himself amidst the well known scenes of his dear
native village. Filled with melancholy rapture at the sight of
that which he has gained, and troubled with recollections of what
he has lost, he exclaims:
`
Scenes
of Beauty! full well I know ye
Many moments of joy I owe ye;
Of pleasures banished,
Of days long vanished;
Oh! my breast is filled with pain,
Finding objects, that still remain,
While those days come not again!
'
I know not how it is, but that last line haunts my ear
continually
.
Reader, if you are now old, you have once been young;
if young, you know what I mean, when I speak of that Golden
Age, our early days. Time, as we pass onward to that outer
gate which swings open into eternity, may give us many
enjoyments
,
but they are
satisfaction
merely; tame, passive
satisfaction
.
Troubles fall upon us like a
brutum fulmen;
incidents
that would stir the young heart to sympathy and sorrow, occur to
the middle-aged without notice or distress. How often have I
read, with supreme delight, that beautiful poem of Gray's,
suggested
by a survey of his boyhood's school, and the scenes it
embraced, at Eton:
`
Ah
! happy hillsah! pleasing shades,
Ah! fields, beloved in vain,
Where once my careless childhood stray'd,
A stranger yet to pain!
I feel the gales that from ye blow
A momentary bliss bestow,
As waving fresh their gladsome wing,
My weary soul they seem to sooth,
And redolent of joy and youth,
To breathe a second Spring.'
For my own part, I love to renew the memories of my fresher
hours, at all times. I am glad to escape from the present to the
past; for we know what we have been in happiness, but not
what we shall be. Give me a draft on the great bank of by-gone
time, rather than on the future. Truth to say, however, a
country
life is no scene in which to gain a taste for music. I know
this well. The splendid opera, the gay assembly, the
intoxicating
waltz, are there almost unknown. How imperceptibly
does our admiration of an opera grow upon us! Sound after
sound, solo after solo, duet after duet, fall upon the ear as if they
were trifles; by-and-by we love them; they adhere to our
thoughtswe deem them divine. They associate themselves
with early recollections: we think of the golden evening sunlight
that played upon the landscapes of youth; of early affections
and hopes; of the loving ones that are distantthe dear ones
that have died. Precious in the human soul, is the fountain of
remembrance!
But
a taste for music may be carried too far. I hate your
singing bore, your man of crotchets and quavers, with big eyes,
who is evermore seeking an opportunity to execute his song;
who troubles diners-out for their insincere applause, and
mistaking
jest for praise, tunes his throat anew, runs up his voice
into the affected falsetto, and discourses ill-timed harmonies, in
the tone of `the eunuch's pipe!' I hate such bipeds,
ab imo
pectore
. I dislike, also, discordant associations for music. They
are like Thespian societiesgreat afflictions. I once had a
frienda highly respectable youth, of excellent familywho
acquired a
penchant
for doing the Roscius, in a small dramatic
volunteer company. He did enact many parts, and was
sometimes
vehemently applauded by the free-admission boobies who
flocked to such exhibitions. At last he became stage-mad,
stepped
incontinently into the buskin, made a western tour, and
returned
to his native city, a legitimate loafer, with all the external
credentials of that multitudinous tribe. I encountered him not
many months ago, negotiating with the landlord at a hotel, where
I called to greet a travelling friend, in the following words: `I
say, publican, mayhap you know me not. I am every inch a
king. As Shakspeare says, `I am myself alone,' and was n't
Shakspeare a screamer? What I wish to say, can be told
shortly. `Much misery can be let on in a few words,' as Mrs.
Haller says in the Stranger. I am a little confused just now;
for truth to tell, I have taken a little potation this morning: but
though I seem confused, I know you will look it over, from one
who is really `more sinned against than sinning.' What I wish
to say is this. You know me. I am the son of General,
a well known, but not a `greasy citizen.' I wish to make
arrangements
with you for the purchase of a glass of
eau de vie,
at
a liberal credit. I throw myself upon your indulgence, and
solicit
straight for the privilege of `running my face' for the liquor
aforesaid. Will you comply? Do for oncejust for
grandeur
.'
The publican, after complimenting the father of the prodigal,
respectfully declined, and the votary of Thespis abdicated.
Speaking
of the music which is apt ordinarily to greet one's
ears in the country, the tuneful Beattie, in his Minstrel,
discourseth
thereupon with most melodious unction. It is indeed sweet,
as he avers, to listen to the harmonies of morning, when the sun
sits upon the highmost hill of journey; when the freshness of
night mingles with the bland atmosphere of the day; when the
groves are vocal, and the floods clap their hands. But there is
much more music in a city, notwithstanding we miss therein
that magnificent organ-sound of commingling woods and waters
which give their voices to the gale; that grand and viewless
instrument
,
whose ventiges are governed by the fingers of the
Eternal. The denizen of a metropolis must have indeed a busy
ear, to devour all the musical discourse with which the air at
morning is rife around him. In the town of Brotherly Love
I speak to those who knowwhat sounds vibrate upon the
tympanum
!
Who has not heard the sable vender of ground corn
exclaim: `Come and buy my ho-mi-nyoh, ye-ep!'or the
improvisatore who sells
`Brick-dust from Brandywine,
Both ni-i-ce and fi-n-ne!'
Or that peripatetic individual who goeth about with his axe and
wedges, keeping time as they strike together, to the sonorous
ejaculation: `Ah 'split-wood!' These are familiar minstrels;
and those who pass them in the streetespecially if they are
interestedlisten attentively while the speech drops upon them.
Many
chapters have been written against early rising in cities.
I like it much in theory, but it is detestable in practice. In the
country, 't is a joy to rise early. Once, under some casual
inspiration
,
from this cause, I scribbled thus. Reader, take it for
better or for worse:
STANZAS.
`Awake psaltery and harp: I myself will awake early.'
Wake,
when the mists of the blue mountains sleeping,
Like crowns of glory in the distance lie;
When breathing from the South, o'er blossoms sweeping,
The gale bears music through the sunny sky;
While lake and meadow, upland, grove and stream,
Smile like the glory of an Eden dream.
Wake while unfettered thoughts, like treasures springing,
Bid the heart leap within its prison-cell;
When birds and brooks through the pure air are flinging
The mellow chant of their beguiling spell;
When earliest winds their anthems have begun,
And, incense-laden, their sweet journeys run.
Then,
psaltery and harp, a tone awaken,
Whereto the echoing bosom shall reply,
As earth's rich scenes, by shadowy night forsaken,
Unfold their beauty to the filling eye:
When, like the restless breeze, or wild-bird's lay,
Pure thoughts, on dove-like pinions, float away.
Wake thou, too, man, when from refreshing slumber,
And thy luxurious couch, thou dost arise,
Thanks for life's golden giftsa countless number
Calm dreams, and soaring hopes, and summer skies:
Wake!let thy heart's fine chords be touched in praise,
While the pure light of morn around thee plays!
But
much as I love the
waking
of the morning, I love also its
rest. Of all visions, those are loveliest which come upon our
imaginations in the morning watch. Already fresh and
invigorated
with rest, the mind
revels
in its fanciful creations. How
many golden cities, and glorious landscapes, and worlds of
changeful waters, flecked with green and blue, have I seen in my
dreams! Oh delicious Sleep! Thou art indeed the world's
Spanish cloak, and with thy sister Night, thou wrappest the
careworn
bosom in indolent repose. Republican and Democratic
Sleep! Thou hast no predilections for parties. Thou
descendest
as soon upon an old Federalist, as his opponentupon
a Mason or an anti-Mason, as upon the tabby that slumbers by
the farmer's fire. Thou hast no balm for favorites, save that thy
wing is spread the soonest over the brow of the husbandman, and
the heart of the weary. Thou art terrible alone to the over-rich
and the over-guilty. To the dyspeptic maid, whose nights are
spent in the dissipation of parties, and amidst the hot air of
crowded assembliesto her thou art a burden. To the young,
the gay, the country-born, thou art altogether delightsome.
There
is one place where sleep is uncomelynamely, in a
church. But, dear reader, there are some somniferous men of
God,
whose words fall upon you like so many poppies. Their
languid sentences come from the `ancient nose, all
spectacle-bestrid
,'
with such a drowsy twang, that they are irresistible
stupifiers
.
I listened of late to such a one.
He never finished a
sentence
. `My friends,' he would say, `I wish to address you
upon the importance
of
. It is a subject of great importance,
and it is one
which
. When I say that it is subject of importance,
I mean to infer that it is important to the individual
who
. And
when that individual declines observing this subject, he has
reached
that state of moral turpitude,
when
. Hence we view, that he
becomes associated with those
that,
on account of the
deceitfulness
of the world, are corrupted
by!
'
If
you do not doze, reader, over that last sentence, I shall be
prepared hereafter to repay your lively spirit with better things.
This cold winter has congealed all my better thoughts. I shall
thaw into soul and sentiment, when the spring-time comes.
NUMBER TWELVE.
April,
1836.
I conceive
it a great plague to be one's own hero, and to be
the describer in the first person singular of individual adventures.
Those two great personages, Says He and Says I, are no
particular
favorites of mine. They are great draw-backs in these
my sketches; for, reader, I am, at bottom, a modest and retiring
man. Therefore should I desire in papers like these, were it
right practicable, to sink the personal, and expand into the general.
Reflection convinces me, howbeit, that this would not
do
. What
I have to say, or to sketch, would then be without form and void.
No; give me my way; let me disport as I will, and I warrant
me there shall be
something
in what I write, which will warm the
heart, or light the eye of him that reads me.
Talking
of a man's making a hero of himself, reminds me
of an old friend of mine, who is fond of telling long stories about
fights and quarrels that he has had in his day, and who always
makes his hearer his opponent for the time, so as to give effect
to what he is saying. Not long ago I met him on 'Change, at a
business hour, when all the commercing multitudes of the city
were together, and you could scarcely turn, for the people. The
old fellow fixed his eye on me; there was a fatal fascination in
it. Getting off without recognition, would have been
unpardonable
disrespect. In a moment, his finger was in my button-hole,
and his rheumy optics glittering with the satisfaction of your true
bore,
when he has met with an unresisting subject. I listened to
his common-places with the utmost apparent satisfaction.
Directly
,
he began to speak of an altercation which he once had
with an officer in the navy. He was relating the
particulars
.
`Some words,' said he, `occurred between
him
and
me
. Now
you know that he is a much younger man than I am; in fact,
about
your
age. Well, he
`made use of an expression'
which I
did not exactly like. Says I to him, says I, `What do you mean
by that?' `Why,' says he to me, says he, `I mean just what I
say.' Then I began to burn. There was an impromptu
elevation
of my personal dandriff, which was unaccountable. I
didn't waste words on him; I just took him in this way,' (here
the old
spooney
suited the action to the word, by seizing the collar
of my coat, before the assemblage,) `and says I to him, says I,
`You infernal scoundrel, I will punish you for your insolence on
the spot!' and the manner in which I shook him (just in
this
way) was really a warning to a person similarly situated.'
I felt myself at this moment in a beautiful predicament: in the
midst of a large congregation of business people; an old
grayheaded
man hanging, with an indignant look, at my coat-collar;
and a host of persons looking on. The old fellow's face grew
redder every minute; but perceiving that he was observed,
he lowered his voice in the
detail,
while he lifted it in the
worst places of his colloquy. `You infernal scoundrel, and
caitiff, and villain,' says I, `what do you mean, to insult an elderly
person like myself, in a public place like this?' and then, said
he, lowering his malapropos voice, `then I shook him,
so
.'
Here he pushed me to and fro, with his septuagenarian gripe
on my collar, as if instead of a patient, much bored
friend,
I
was his deadly enemy. When he let go, I found myself in a
ring
of spectators. `Shame, shame! to insult an old man like
him!' was the general cry. `Young puppy!' said an elderly
merchant, whose good opinion was my heart's desire, `what
excuse have you for your conduct?'
Thus was I made a martyr to my good feelings. I have never
recovered from the stigma of that interview. I have been pointed
at in the street by persons who have said as I passed them,
`That's the young chap that insulted old General , at
the Exchange!'
This
same venerable gentleman once troubled me with his
augur-
ies, in the following manner. He accosted me, up town,
a mile, I suppose, from the Exchange. `My good friend,' he
said, `I wish you to go with me to the City Reading Room, and
look at a contribution that I have published in one of the
newspapers
.
I dare say it is open to criticism. Mind you, I am not
a man of letters. I am doing a snug, winding-up business in my
latter days, and I cannot serve two masters.' I accompanied
him: he sought out the paper file, and after much research,
turned to the following:
`Shad
.Now landing, several barrels of Shad. The barrels is new, and
the shad are fresh. For sale by  , No. 85  street.'
`Now,' said he, `will you tell we whether `barrels
is
' is right?
Don't you think I ought to have used the subjunctive mood in
the future tense, and said `the barrels
are,
' and cetera? I don't
feel sure, myself; I just want your opinion. I
know,
you know;
but I want to be
positive
.'
I elucidated the matter to him as plainly as I could, and left
him; inly resolving, that if ever I saw him approaching me in
the street again, I would take to my heels and run like an
express
to get out of his way.
I
should
like to write a chapter on
bores
. There are distinct
classes of them, and it requires a philosophical mind to furnish
proper analyses of the varying
genus
. The man, for instance,
who meets you going to bank, or to dinner, and begins to talk
to you of matters and things in general, whereunto you are, for
politeness' sake, compelled to listen, what a plague he is, to be
sure! He has no heart. He listens to the loquacity of your
diaphragm with perfect composure, though it speak of wants
unsatisfied
,
and viands in expectancy. He holdeth converse with
nonentity; he keepeth you in suspense, by leaving his sentences
unfinished; and he taxeth your imagination with wonder as to
what the devil he will have to say next. You go home to a late
and cold dinner, with your whole body in a state of grumbling
dissatisfaction. You feel as if you could knock down your
grandfather. In short, you feel as every man does, when he has
been bored. It is an awful sensation. Sea-sickness is pleasure
to it. Should I hereafter describe this class, I fear I shall give
them a Rembrandt coloring; for I am confident, from the wrongs
they have done me, that I could not speak of them with my
customary coolness and impartiality.
By-the-by,
the word impartiality reminds me of a legal
biped, who possessed this quality `to a degree.' Reader, you
don't know the Hon. Abednego Babcock, do you? Taking it
for granted that you do not, I will describe him to you. Like
Wouter Van Twiller, he is about five feet six inches high, and
six feet five inches in circumference. He
potates
considerably,
and in that way has nursed for himself a nasal organ of most
scarlet rubicundity. It is a sign, as I call it, of `
grog
manifest
in the flesh.' He is a man of many friends among pot-house
lawyers and small politicians. He has never been known, I
believe
,
to give a decided opinion on any subject. I once heard
him charge a jury something after this fashion:
`
Gentlemen:
This is an action brought by the plaintiff against
the defendant. You have heard the evidence on both sides, and
the court know of no points of law that you may not be supposed
to understand already. The case is a very plain one; and if,
upon a careful review of the testimony, you should think the
plaintiff entitled to a verdict, the decision must be in his favor;
but if, on the contrary, it should appear that the defendant ought
to be the plaintiff in this suit, you will please bring in a bill to
that effect. I believe that is about all that is to be said in the
matter. If you can think of any thing else that I ought to say,
I have no objection to mention it. It is now my dinner hour.
Swear a constable.'
This was the usual impartiality of Abednego Babcock, Esq.
He would sit for hours on the bench, feeling the customary
blossoms
on his nose with his affectionate fingers; an employment
which evidently gave him great satisfaction. They do say that
whenever a flatulent attorney speaks before him, he drops right
to sleep. He says a hundred yards of
gab,
as he classically
calls it, could not change his mind, when he has it made up.
He despises every thing high-flown, or, as he sometimes terms
it,
hypherflutenated;
and thinks that, in nine cases out of ten,
a cause can be best decided by hearing only one side.
Apropos
of the bar. What a deal of bad oratory there is
about it! I have one or two good friends among the lawyers in
Gotham who could depict these grandiloquent attorneys to the
life. How much verbose pomposity of language, too, do you
find in the pulpit, where, of all other places, it is most out of
place. A few days ago, I heard an unhewn `Ambassador from
the court of Heaven,' as he
credentialized
himself, who had
taken the far west in his route to the church where I heard him,
use the following
burst
. He was speaking of Judas and
Benedict
Arnold; worthies whom he compared together. `Arnold,'
said he, `was a traitor, of whom you may have heard, who tried
for to sell his
ked'ntry
. It was the ruination of him, and for what
he
done,
he will be rewarded with infamy; for his name will
sertingly go down to the most remotest posterity, kivered all over
with Hell's arsenic!' Here he looked round upon his audience
with an air of pride, as if he would say, `
There's
a touch for
you!'
Speaking
of clerical oratory, bids me think of an event I
witnessed
lately in an Episcopal conventicle. The morning service
had been said; the rich tones of the organ were mellowing away
into silence, when the speaker arose, and named his text, in these
simple words: `
Jesus wept
.' He spoke in a strain of touching
simplicity; he painted the sorrows of the
Savior
at the death
of Lazarus; and he described in beautiful language the propriety
of his grief, by enlarging upon that inevitable condition of
mortality
which causes all to grieve. By and by I heard a faint
moan. A young and tender-hearted mother, who had but a few
weeks before buried a blooming daughter, the darling of her love,
overcome by her feelings, had fainted away. But it was no
boisterous
or harrowing language, that thus stirred within her the holy
fountain of a mother's affection. It was the words of simplicity
that fell upon her ear, and trembled in her bosom. The
circumstance
revived in my mind the memory of a sermonthe
off-spring
of untutored geniuswhich I heard in early youth.
The preacher was an unlettered woodsman, but he spoke with
correctness, with eloquence. The occasion was the funeral of a
child. The boy, a lad of four or five years old, lay on the bier
before him; His fair cheeks had not lost their rosy red, and his
little form, so decently composed in the white garments of the
grave, looked far too dainty for the earth to cover. The speaker
took his text from the touching story of Gehazi and the
Shunamite
.
I forget the place where it is to be found. `And he said
to the mother, Is it well with thee? Is it well with thy husband?
Is it well with thy child? And she answered,
It is well
.' He
went on to show his hearers, that in the case before them, it was
`
well
with the child:' and beautifully did he prove it. My heart
swells yet, at the mere remembrance of that sermon. `Mother,'
he said, `do you mourn for the child that has fallen like a
blossom
from your arms? Weep not, for
it is well
. He has escaped
the darkness of earthly sorrow; the clouds that day by day
would have rolled gradually over his spirit; the crosses of
existence
;
the gloom that follows after that golden age, ere the life
of life begins to fail and fade; he has missed all these, and in
that `better country,' where
his
Father
and
our
Father
smiles
upon him, his innocent spirit is at rest. Fond mother! distrust not
thy
God
. Lift thy heart-warm prayer to
Him
in the
night-watches
;
and as thou implorest consolation, thou mayest ask thy
God,
`Is it well with my child?' and soft as Heavenly
numbers
,
sweet as the music of an angel's lyre,
He
will answer, `
It
is well
.'
I
have
remembered this sermon, fondly and long. The
preacher was such a man as William Wirt once described, only
he was not blind. He was tall, and of goodly presence, with a
venerable snowy head, and an eye that beamed with benignity
and good will to men. Upon returning home, with my heart full
of the discourse I had heard, I wrote thus:
9
THE EARLY DEAD.
`
Why
mourn for the Young? Better that the light cloud should fade away in the
morning's breath, than travel through the weary day, to gather in darkness, and end
in storm.'
Bulwer
.
If
it be sad to mark the bow'd with age
Sink in the halls of the remorseless tomb,
Closing the changes of life's pilgrimage
In the still darkness of its mouldering gloom;
Oh! what a shadow o'er the heart is flung,
When peals the requiem of the loved and young!
They to whose bosoms, like the dawn of spring
To the unfolding bud and scented rose,
Comes the pure freshness age can never bring,
And fills the spirit with a rich repose,
How shall we lay them in their final rest;
How pile the clods upon their wasting breast?
Life openeth brightly to their ardent gaze;
A glorious pomp sits on the gorgeous sky;
O'er the broad world Hope's smile incessant plays,
And scenes of beauty win the enchanted eye;
How sad to break the vision, and to fold
Each lifeless form in earth's embracing mould!
Yet this is Life! To mark from day to day,
Youth, in the freshness of its morning prime,
Pass, like the anthem of a breeze away;
Sinking in waves of Death, ere chilled by Time!
Ere yet dark years on the warm cheek had shed
Autumnal mildew o'er its rose-like red!
And yet what mourner, though the pensive eye
Be dimly-thoughtful in its burning tears,
But should with rapture gaze upon the sky,
Through whose far depths the spirit's wing careers?
There
gleams eternal o'er their ways are flung,
Who fade from earth while yet their years are young!
Children
are queer subjects to write about. I know several
little friends of mine, that I can never believe will be grown up
wrinkled men and women. Will that little beauty become an
old woman? I'll not believe it. Will that boy, now shooting
his marble, or drawing his sled in winter, will he become a
portly-looking man, with a stern temper, a fat abdomen, and a
big bunch of watch-keys hanging just beneath his waistcoat?
Will he wear spectacles, and a cane? It seems impossible, but
it must be. There must be an end to every thing; to youth, to
its tastes, and its associations.
Reader,
I do not wish to twaddle; but there can be no harm
in announcing to you, that in my meridian the `spring time of
the year is coming.' There is a soft, bland iufluence in the air,
which comes over the spirit like the rush of an angel's wing,
filling
it with fresh and happy thoughts. I can see the trees from
my window, bursting into verdure; and the thousand voices of
the city seem sweeter to my ear. We have had a stormy winter
and a long; and those were horrid North-easters that blew along
the Atlantic coast, what time, vexed with our Yankee euroclydon,
(and we occasionally get up a passing good one,) `the sea
wrought and was tempestuous.' But now, the winter is over and
gone; the flowers appear on the earth; the time of the singing
of the birds is come; and the voice of the turtle is heard in the
land: not the `torkle upon yander's tree,' of which I made a
late quotation from a bard of Pennsylvania; but those which
william
and coo, with their beautiful necks, on the house-tops.
(I hate the word
bill,
for many reasons.) The chimney-sweep
stays longer in the quiet sunshine on his brick tower; the spirit
of spring is in his brush, and his song is louder. Commend me
to Spring. It is the gem of the seasons, beyond dispute.
Talking
of disputes, sends into my mind the thought of a
good-hearted acquaintance, who really thinks that he is immense
in controversy. He will overcome you with words, and though
they have but little argument in them, yet I have never known a
person to commence a colloquy with him who was not `worsted.'
He will go from Dan until thou come to Beersheba, just to
compass
a hard word, which he lugs in as a
puzzler
. If his
opponent
tells him he does not know what he means by such words, he
will come down upon him with the sweeping conclusion that such
ignorance is a proof that he is not a fit antagonist. Lately, he
was riding in the stage with a motley collection of passengers, in
the interior of a neighboring state. By degrees the party became
chatty, and our friend was not backward in the lingual exercise.
The conversation turned upon the merits of Christianity and
unbelief
.
There were one or two infidels in the vehicle, who took
up the cudgels for their side, with more zeal than truth or
discretion
.
They began to circumvent our traveller, when he stopped
them short by saying: `Gentlemen, it is no manner of use for
you to attempt an argument with me. I have out-talked many
of your way of thinking; and I may say, that I never met with
one yet, who was not glad enough, before I had done with him,
to get off by crying
copvi!
' He thought this the choice Italian
for
peccavi
. It is needless to say, that after this, by common
concession, `he had the floor.' But bless me! reader, now I
think of it, it is time that there should be an end to the present
number of the lucubrations of your honest friend,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER THIRTEEN.
July,
1836.
Most
people travel a
leetle
every Summer through these
United
States, in sundry portions and quarters thereof; and yet how
very few of those who go down upon the sea in ships, or along
the rail-road or the canal, seeing the sublimities and oddities of
existence, make any record of them? Therefore, gentle reader,
do I propose to enlighten thee, not with sketches of travel, but
with beneficial hints, whereby thy omnipresent whereabout, as
thou journeyest, may be regaled.
We
are passing up the Hudson. The low clouds from a
hundred
steam-boats are staining the sky in the direction of New
York, which has long since faded in the distance. The
peripatetic
colored man, who summons oblivious passengers to `the
capting's orifice,' to disburse the swindle for their transit, has not
yet gone his rounds: there is only the low gurgle of the waves
ploughed aside by the bow of the steam-boat; the half-awakened
company are promenading the deck, and the poetically-disposed
are looking at the Palisades, whose dark shoulders rise on the
west bank of the river, as if those barriers could never be
removed
,
even by the voice of the archangel, and the final trump.
By-the-way,
speaking of the last trumpet, makes me
remember
the reply of a veteran old charcoal man, of Philadelphia,
well known to the citizens thereof for the sonorousness of his tin
horn, and the excellence of his commodity. Honest
Jimmy
Charcoal
!he is removed from among the quick, and
numbered
with those who have jumped from the shoal of time into
kingdom come. He was a cheerful, good-hearted citizen; and
though he certainly did not move in the first circles, yet he spread
light and heat wherever he wentnot by his person, however;
for if ever there was a man who looked like a plenipotentiary
fresh from the court of Tophet, Jimmy was that individual.
Well, as I have said, he had a most vociferous horn, and
unremitting
were the blasts which he protruded through the same upon
the general ear. At last, some evil-disposed citizens, having no
taste for music, went to his honor the Mayor, and lodged
grievous
complaints against the distinguished
hornist,
(I use a musical
term,) setting forth that he disturbed the public bosom with his
soul-stirring instrument. After such an accusation, he was
brought before the great municipal functionary, and received a
stern and awful reprimand. Jimmy stood the rebuke as if Satan
had not only allowed him his own color, but also his courage.
His reply was cogent and conclusive: `Look here, your honor,'
said he, `I ha'nt no disposition, by no means, to complain of
them 'ere people as has complained of me. Folks in my line can
bear upwards of considerable in the way of epithets, without
changing color, or gettin' mad. But I
do
say, that I axes them as
charges me with making too much noise in the world, why they
have got up such an antipathy ag'in' my horn? And I should
like to know, if my little tin affair troubles them so now,
how
they will feel when they come to hear the big trumpet, that is to be
blew at the day of judgment;
calling them, just as likely as not,
to a coal-hole a mighty sight blacker than the one I come from?'
The Mayor was non-plussed; and the coal man went
twanging
on his ways. The officer could no more stand his logic than
his opponent could his horn.
But
I digress. Let us get back to the Hudson. Stop, ye
who travel, one day at West Point. That Cozzens gives noble
dinners; his wines are superb; and the man who likes not
creature
comforts, is a bad member of society. Go thou likewise to
the Cattskill Mountain House, whence you shall look down
beneath
the clouds on smiling counties, and towns and cities, spread
forth as on a map, at your feet. `There,' said Natty Bumpo,
`you can see
creation!
The Hudson like a ribbon; the boats
and sails on its blue and gleaming breast not much larger than
buoys and handkerchiefs. Oh, 'tis a noble scene!and when
the plains beneath are sweltering in the fervors of Summer; when
the snake creeps forth on the rock in the sunshine, and the cattle
in a thousand meadows consort together under the trees, to
breathe the air that gathers from the sleepy landscape into their
branches; then, at the Mountain House, 't is calm and cool.
I say, reader, be sure to go there; and if it is somewhat too cold
in June, it must be nice in July and August.
Magnificent
are the Cattskills, as seen from the Hudson.
How their `broad highland regions' swell and roll in sublime and
solemn undulations against the sky! How profuse the gushes
of glorious sunlight that chase each other along those lordly
ridges! As the boat glides along, these peaks are sometimes hid
from view; but like great men amid the strifes of parties, or the
changes of time, they must almost continually impress us with
their presence, and stand like distant guardians of one of the
finest rivers in the world, observable, for countless inland leagues,
overlooking streams, villages, and the grander Hudson, for
hundreds
of miles.
Albany
is a capital city. If you are a quiet person,
enamored
of ease and comfort, go to Cruttenden's, mine host of the
Eagle. Most delicious is his coffee; neatest of the neat are his
rooms; his bread is like snow; his viands done to a T; and
there is nothing equal to his own personal courtesies. Pleasant
things drop continually from his lips, and your ear may drink
wisdom and wit from them, `as the honey-bee drinks from the
rose.' He is the best possible sign of the excellence of his own
fare. His cheeks are full and healthy, and though his nose is
not bedecked with those sumptuous red carbuncles which are
usually supposed the insignia of a true Boniface, yet his figure is
portly and commanding, and `his belly is as a round goblet,
which wanteth not liquor,' as the wise man observes in his
Canticles
.
Let
me not be an out-and-outer, as touching Albany, I would
that my praise should be properly modified. The lower, or
business
parts of the city, except in the region round about the Eagle,
are not particularly attractive; but in the upper quarters, near the
Capitol Square, and along State-street, few towns in our country
`can with it compare.' I know of no place to which, in some
respects, could be better applied the lines of Byron:
`
For
whoso entereth within this town,
That sheening far, celestial seems to be,
Disconsolate will wander up and down,
Mid many things unsightly to strange e'e.'
But ascend you to the dome of the City Hall, in Capital Square,
and look forth upon the scene! It is beautiful; that's the word.
Look at the landscape to the North, heaved up in the glory and
grandeur of Summer against the sapphire walls of Heaven;
varied
with meadows and harvest-fields, and rural mansions;
observe
Troy, with its Mount Ida, and the affluent valley of the
Hudson; likewise the distant Cattskills; also the city beneath,
with those numerous `white swellings,' or domes, of the steeple
genus, which have broken out ambitiously all over the town;
look at these, and at the whole sweep of Capitol Square, and you
shall meet with great rejoicing of eye. But beware of a person
whom you may observe in the streets, perambulating about with
a basket on his arm, vending the sweet-flag root, and barks of
prickly-ash and slippery-elm. The latter, especially, should you
partake of it, will cause you to remain a day beyond your time.
Wonderfully slippery is that article, indeed; and you would
think, to hear its owner talk, `in the way of trade,' that his
tongue was made of the same material.
The
route to Schenectady is dullish; but I advise the reader,
if that personage be a male, to take the outside of the car, (by
courtesy from the powers that be,) and survey the country round.
He will see the eternal Cattskills bounding the horizon for near
two-thirds of the way; rising like pyramids, blue and lofty into
Heaven:
`Where clouds like earthly barriers stand
Or bulwarks of some viewless land.'
I am discoursing now to the traveller on the Niagara route,
and therefore I would fling in a word or two of advice to him.
When thou comest to Schenectaday, thou wilt be grievously
athirst, if the weather be warm; but I beseech thee, buy no soda
water in Old Esopus. One `lean apothecary' who dwelleth
hereabout, has an apology for the article; but drink it not! It
is indescribable; tastes like bad champagne, vinegar, and
brim-stone
.
A tumbler full of the Dead Sea would taste sweeter.
Neither be thou tempted by the boys who vend nuts and
apples
by the packet boat landing. Dishonest, and peddling
urchinstheir commodities are awful!
The
contrast between the spacious cabins of the Hudson
steamers, and the low narrow boats on the canal, even those of
the better sort, is unhappily too striking. When you enter the
latter, resign yourself to fate. You will find captains or
superintendents
,
who verily believe that there are no other places on
earth but Schenectady and Utica, and that the rest of creation is
of small account. They are stupendous persons, on a small
scale. The idea of having some fifty or sixty individuals, by
compulsion, in their power every day, gives them a sense of their
own importance, which nothing can annual; and the air of
grandeur
with which they help you to a half-boiled potato, or a
stinted radish, would befit princes. But do not offend them.
On the contrary, cause them to believe that you suppose them
incomparable; their fare rich beyond description; their charges
no swindle; and that you have no exalted opinion of the new
rail-road to be open in August, and destined to carry passengers
three times quicker, and you will get the best they have; they
receiving, at the same time, a draft on your eternal gratitude. I
do not wish to flatter these varlets; but I do say, that their bills
ought to be made payable in
slow notes;
namely, paper, payable,
the first instalment when the debtor
dies,
and the last half when
he
rises
.
It is rumored that important improvements are in
contemplation
by these great men; among others, a novel mode of making
the public mouth salutary, `from North to South.' This was
suggested by the following circumstance. A captain was helping
himself to the tooth-brush of a respectable passenger, who said
to him: `What the devil are you doing with my brush and
powder
?'
`Why,' said the captain, `I am using it because I thought
it belonged to the boat, and had been furnished by the company,
for
the use of the passengers!
'
When
you come to Utica, do not be in haste to depart. You
may kill twenty-four divisions of the common enemy; nay,
forty-eight
,
very agreeably there. Trenton Falls are not far off;
though it matters little whether you see them
before
you go to
Niagara, or on your return.
But soft; `a word or two before you go.' There is a
drug-shop
,
kept by an Italian, near the canal, on the right of Genesee
street, as you proceed to the West, where you can obtain soda
powders, and eke Seidlitz, of unimpeachable excellence. Buy
several boxes. They will serve you well on the road to the
Great Falls; where, dear reader, you shall meet me anon.
NUMBER FOURTEEN.
September,
1836.
Oh
thou who lookest over this page of mine, who participatest
in the 'portance of the travels' history of
Ollapod,
listen to me.
Wouldst thou journey with comfort through the west of New
York,
avoid the canal-boats
. At first, when you embark, all
seems fair; the eleemosynary negro, who vexes his clarionet, and
governs its tuneful ventiges, to pay for his passage, seems a very
Apollo to your ear; the appointments of the boat appear ample;
a populous town slowly glides from your view, and you feel quite
comfortable and contented. As yet, you have not gone below.
`Things above' attract your attentionsome pretty point of
landscape, or distant steeple, shining among the summer trees.
Anon, the scenery becomes tame, and you descend. A feeling
comes over you as you draw your first breath in the cabin, which
impels to the holding of your nose. The cabin is full; you have
hit your head twice against the ceiling thereof, and stumbled
sundry times against the seats at the side. Babies, vociferous
babies, are playing with their mothers' noses, or squalling in
appalling concert. If you stir, your foot treads heavily upon the
bulbous toes of some recumbent passenger; if you essay to sleep,
the gabble of those around you, or the noisy gurgle of a lock,
arouses you to consciousness; and then, if you are of that large
class of persons in whom the old Adam is not entirely crucified,
then you
swear
. Have you any desire for literary
entertainment
?
Approach the table. There shall you find sundry tracts;
a copy of the Temperance recorder; Goldsmith's Animated
Nature
,
and Plutarch's Lives. By and by dinner approaches: and
oh! how
awful
the suspense between the hours of preparation
and realization! Slowly, and one by one, the dishes appear.
At long intervals, or spaces of separation from each othersay
five for the whole length of the boatyou behold tumblers
arranged
,
with two forlorn radishes in each. The butter lies like
gravy in the plate; the malodorous passengers of the masculine
gender draw nigh to the scanty board; the captain comes near,
to act
his
oft-repeated part, as President of the day. Oh,
gracious! 'tis a scene of enormous cry and scanty wool. It
mendicants description.
I was
walking on the deck after dinner ducking my head
every moment at the cry of `
Bridge!
' when the captain joined
me, and began to relate the perils that he had encountered, during
his experience on the `deep waters' over which we were gliding.
`It is not for every one,' said he, `to appreciate the perils of an
official station like mine. That little lad who stands beside you,
and who, though a stranger to you, seems to have a desire for
your company, that urchin, could he stay with me ten years,
would be a
sailor
like me, and could relate like me his hardships.
Every year is fruitful of incident. Last yearit was in the
fall
this canawl
was visited with a galeand
such
a gale! Do
not discredit me, when I say, that, owing to the violence of it,
nearly a dozen boats were compelled to hug the shore; and
believe
me, too, when I tell you, that for twenty-five minutes this
very boat rested upon a sand bank, caused by the entrance of a
creek. Judge of my feelings at that awful moment! I ordered
on deck the cook, the steward, and the rest of the crew, together
with such passengers as were not sound asleep, insensible of
their danger, and with as much coolness as I could command,
under the circumstances, I bade them prepare for the worst.
Two venerable persons of the female sexold women, as one
wild young man, whom no danger could appal, denominated
themescaped safe to land. Dire terror ruled the hour. The
winds blew; the awful ripples dashed against the prow, as if they
were mad; and one distracted lady rushed about the deck,
inquiring
if I had seen her husband, Mr. Smilax Waterhouse.
Answering her in the negative, I bent my way to what is vulgarly
called the tail end of the boat. What a sight here met my eye!
The two ladies, it is true, had escaped safe to land, but they
were in a woful plightone of them having lost her shoe in the
water, and the other her night-cap. On horrors' head horrors
accumulated; and I was on the eve of sinking in despair, with
no hopes of ever getting off the sand-bar, when deliverance came!
A swell from the lock, a few rods above, lifted us from our
fearful
situation, and restored us to safety and comfort.
But
the grand charm and scene of a canal packet is in the
evening. If on your way from Schenectady to Utica, the sun
goes down into the rosy west, just after you leave that beautiful
gorge in the Mohawk mountains, where you see the towering
pines on one side, rising precipitously near three hundred feet
above you, and on the other, the gentle river, calmly gliding
through the vale belowforming the only tolerable scene on the
route. Well, you go below, and there you behold a hot and
motley assemblage. A kind of stillness begins to reign around.
It seems as if a protracted meeting were about to commence.
Clergymen, capitalists, long-sided merchants, who have come
from far, green-horns, taking their first experience of the wonders
of the deep on the
canawl,
all these are huddled together in wild
and inexplicable confusion. By and by the captain takes his seat,
and the roll of berths is called. Then, what confusion! Layer
upon layer of humanity is suddenly shelved for the night; and
in the preparation, what a world of bustle is required! Boots
are released from a hundred feet, and their owners deposit them
wherever they can. There was one man,
Ollapod
beheld him,
who pulled off the boots of another person, thinking the while
mistaken individual!that he was disrobing his own shrunken
legs of their leathern integuments, so thick were the limbs and
feet that steamed and moved round about. Another tourist
fat, oily, and roundwho had bribed the steward for two chairs
placed by the side of his berth, whereon to rest his abdomen,
amused the assembly by calling out; `Here, waiter! bring me
another pillow! I have got the ear-ache, and have put the first
one into my auricular organ!' Thus wore the hours away.
Sleep, you can not. Feeble moschetoes, residents in the boat,
whose health suffers from the noisome airs they are nightly
compelled
to breathe, do their worst to annoy you; and then, Phbus
Apollo! how the sleepers snore! There is every variety of this
music, from the low wheeze of the asthmatic, to the stentorian
grunt of the corpulent and profound. Nose after nose lifts up its
tuneful oratory, until the place is vocal. Some communicative
free-thinkers talk in their sleep, and altogether, they make a
concerto
and a diapason equal to that which Milton speaks of, when
through the sonorous organ `from many a row of pipes, the
sound-board breathes.' At last, morning dawns; you ascend
into pure air, with hair unkempt, body and spirit unrefreshed,
and show yourself to the people of some populous town into
which you are entering, as you wash your face in canal water on
deck, from a hand basin! It is a scene, I say again, take it for
all in all, that throws description upon the parish, and makes you
a pauper in words.
`
Ohe jam satis!
'
You may meet with much edification on board one of these
craft, in observing the working of what is called
human
nature.
At dinner, a sour old bachelor, who had been once a supercargo
to Smyrna, and then a merchant in a small wayone who had
all the stiff formality of a half-cut gentleman, without the
educacation
or tact necessary for the composition of even such a
personageprocured from a basket, which he was taking with
him on his journey, a bottle of warm champaigne. A country
friend, with whom he was accidentally travelling, was solicited to
imbibe the vinous beverage with him. This friend was one of
those
malpropos
characters, who, with the best intentions, are
always saying something wrong. On renewing his glass, he
said: `Well now, this 'ere tastes
like
somethingthis arn't like
the
sour
cider we get in the country, is it, any how?'
`I hope you don't mean,' said the fidgetty host, `that there is
anything wrong about it?'
`Oh, not by no means whatsomever. I reckon that it is good.
Let me give you a toast. Success to
American Manufactures!
'
`Sir,' respondent the ci-devant supercargo, `what do you
mean? Why do you give
that
toast, of all others? I ask you
eandidly,
is
this wine like American manufacture?'
`God bless you, neighbor, I didn't mean nothing of that kind;
and I say, let's drop the subject. Were you ever in
Newark?
'
The face of the old fellow assumed the hue of scarlet. Fire
stood in his eye. He sat down his glass, and looking daggers at
his friend, observed:
`I don't know what your object isbut you are evidently
trying
to insult me. What has
Newark
to do with this champaigne?
Do you suppose it is
made
there? Sir, your conduct is
outrageous
.'
The countryman sank back against the boat-side, observing
that he `wouldn't never attempt to get up a variety in his
conversation
again.'
This
reminds me of a scene told of Lockport. A clown
there walked up leisurely to the stall of one of those small
traders who furnish canal-tourists of limited means with `wittles
and drink,' and just as he was on the point of vending a large
lot of sausages to a hungry-looking traveller, which were to last
him until his arrival at Buffalo, the vagabond, looking
suspiciously
at the article, and addressing the seller, said:
`Is them good sassenges?'
`Yes, they
are
good sausages, you ignorant ramus. You
would like to keep me from selling 'em, if you could fix it that
way, I don't doubt.'
`No I wouldn't,' responded the loafer; `I don't know nothing
'special about them sassenges; they
may
be good sassenges; I
don't say they
a'nt
good sassenges; all I
do
say is, that
where-somever
you see them kind o' sassenges,
you don't see no dogs!
'
`I guess, on reflection,' said the traveller, `that I won't
negotiate
for them articles. That man's last remark has gi'n me a
dislike to 'em.'
Is it not pleasant to revisit the scenes of one's early days?
So silently questioned
Ollapod
himself, as he journeyed toward
the West, what time the sun was sinking in the occident, leaving
his last rays on those dark forests of pines and cedars which
begird
the lake of Oneida, in the Onondaga country. The `
exclusive
extra' performed its locomotive office with wonderful
rapidity and effect; the cattle attached thereunto having only the
labor of drawing `wife, self, and servant.'
Pleasant was it to rise at S, in the morning, and walk
about, gazing at familiar scenes, unvisited for years. Nature,
sweet nature! was still the same; and as I journeyed hurriedly
round and round, looking upon the pigmy doings of man,
compared
with the scenery fashioned by the hand of
God,
the Spirit
of the past came by, and fanned me with her fairy wings. A
thousand recollections filled my mind as I perambulated, until I
chanted, in my trance of memory, a part of a beautiful poem by
a native bard:
`
I stand
upon my native hills again,
Broad, round, and green, that in the southern sky,
With garniture of waving grass and grain,
Orchards, and beechen forests, basking lie.'
How many events come before the mind like the shadow of a
dream! Such was my sojourn in `the place where I was born.'
It was short but sweet. I found my heart filled with teeming
recollections
;
everything was new to my eye, but I felt that my
bosom was unchanged. I have, and I thank my God for the
possession, feelings and sensibilities, untainted and
unworn
. In
my spirit, I can still experience that
newness
of delight which is
said to wear off easily by contact with the world. It is not so
with me. A poem or a scene; the lapse of a beautiful river, or
the sheen of a rich woodland or field; can yield for my mind the
same fruitage of contentment which it felt and relished in other
days. For the perpetual presence of this capacity, I am deeply
and devoutly thankful. I would not exchange it for worlds.
`
Sweet Auburn
! loveliest village of!'and so forth. Every
body knows the quotation. Charming were the hours we passed
therein, with beloved friends. If I ever felt a political
predilection
which
I
never
didI could have wished, as we closed
the embowered gate of our hospitable friend S, and his
assiduous household, that he had been elected Governor of the
Empire State.
*
*
TIME
and large majorities confirmed this wish, on two subsequent
trials.
Editor
.
Auburn
was
lovely; but saving the premises of
the above-mentioned, and a very few of the same character, it
has sadly changed from `the olden time.' I say sadly, because
I deem that the improvements in tenements and marts of stone,
which the town has been garnished withal, are but continuations,
as it were, of the State's Prison. However, the least said is the
soonest mended. The
effect,
to the traveller, on entering the
place, is certainly pleasing, and indicative of great improvement.
A superb hotel y'clept the
American
I love the latter word
is there; and in the scenery round about, there is much to
please, and much to see.
Reader,
have you ever journeyed in the Genesee country?
If you have not, how much have you lost! I speak not to those
who pass the wonderful works of
God
with unobservant eyes,
but I talk to those who find sermons and good in every thing.
To such, I would say, `Surely you were charmed with the
Skaneatles, and the region round about Cayuga?' There the
country is healthy to live in, and lovely to see. Passing the lake
of Cayuga, you can not well omit to notice the peculiar
greenness
of the waters. They seem to the eye as if the grassy banks
which surround them had been
melted,
and transfused into liquid
emerald. If you should ever visit CayugaI speak now to any
one who has neglected the western tour hithertoyou will
perceive
the truth of this present writing.
It
is wonderful how all the western towns flourish which
possess
`water privileges.' How extraordinary, for example, is the
growth of Seneca Falls! Not long ago, it was a mere hamlet,
beside a little stream; now it is almost a
city;
while its whilome
more pompous neighbor, Waterloo, seems dwindling to decay,
or at least not perfectly kindled with that fire of improvement
which generally distinguishes the West.
`
Beautiful
exceedingly' is the terrestrial vestibule of the
Genesee! As we journeyed westward from the blue distances
near the lake of Cayuga toward that pleasant region, I could not
but seek to compare in my imagination the country we were
nearing, to the country we had left. The first had been
charming
to our eyescould the remainder exceed it? The far-off
uplands, over which the winds from the south-west went freshened
from the Cayuga; the green waters, that danced and eddied
along the piers of the bridge;
could
they be transcended by any
thing to come? In that predicament of the fancy, `ignorance
was bliss.' We could only say `
Nous verrons,
' and watch the
flitting landscapes, or the plunge of the wheels of the `extra,' as
they sank, with a heavy gurgle, in the rugged road.
Capital,
and most delectable to see, is the lake of Geneva,
and that beautiful gem of a town which crowns its crystal wave,
above a strip of emerald verdure, and gardens flowering in the
sun of June! `How sweet the day beams on those banks
repose
!'
As we neared them, toward the going down of the sun,
methought I was like the pilgrim of Bunyan, approaching the
glorious regions of the land of
Beulah,
and that I could discern
the spirits of the blessed `walking in white' along its romantic
terraces. It seemed `a fairy city of the heart;' and for one
short but delicious moment, I felt overcome with that enthusiasm
engendered by the eye within the mind, and deserving that
striking
observation of Madame de Stel, `the superfluity of the
soul,' thinking the while of
Percival's
noble lines to the
Seneca waters:
`
On
thy fair bosom, silver lake,
The wild swan spreads his snowy sail,
And round his breast the ripples break,
As down he bears before the gale.'
Who
was that anonymous herald of mine, who recorded
beneath
my signature, as we proceeded toward the sunset, at every
town where we paused to give breath to our cattle, the name of
Ollapod,
with many compliments in the Latin tongue?
Whoever
he was, I stretch forth to him the hand of fancy. Thou
Grand Inconnu!
touch thy dextral digits in thought; consider
thine own vehemently squeezed; and remain, if thou wilt, the
kind Unknown; at once corporeal and yet spiritual; a creation
insubstantial; an entity, yet intangible; `
umbra, civis, nihil!
'
No offence
to the turnpike company whose duty it is to
superintend the roads betwixt Geneva and Canandaigua; but
candor compels me to say, they are a set of negligent varlets,
deserving the anathemas of `all who travel by land or by water,'
especially those who abandon the cheating extras, and adopt the
Telegraph
. What right have these individuals to keep the holes
in the turnpike so deep, and yet so treacherous! One looks out
with anxious eye to see what is `going to come' in the way of
thoroughfare, and lo! distance lends enchantment to the view.
The gilded pool seems dry; the deceitful pudding of clay has a
look of solidity; but anon!
spush!
down drop the wheels
in front; creak! rings the tried and doubtful axle; `
He'ep'!
dnation!' saith the driver; `Oh!' says the timid lady within;
`Ha! ha! that was a screamer!' ejaculates the western
speculator
,
filled to the brim with animal spirits! `An oncommon deep
'ole!' says the English emigrant; `I thank
God
! we are out!'
says the politician; `Uh, umph, whe-e-ze!' ejaculates the dozing
and uncertain passenger, who has been travelling day and night
for a week; and thus the time goes on, until the day is well-nigh
spent, and you see the farewell light of day playing over the sweet
waters and Elysian bowers of
Canandaigua
.
Rich
and bountiful Ontario!called by politicians the `
infected
district,' by poets the garden of the statethe affluent
parterre of every thing good for man, or nutritious for beast.
The sheen of thy waters is yet in my eye; the breath of thy
clover fields yet regaleth my nostrils; I seem, (here in this
crowded home, with the liveried coaches rattling in my ear, and
the city's voice booming about me,) I seem to be stealing flowers
from the demesnes of some unknown Peri, or partaking the
hospitality
of friends and brethren. Beautiful country!thou art
the
rus in urbe
of my thought! In thy mansions I have been
seated, with all those culinary appliances and varied wines which
smack of the city, over hearths beneath which repose the bones
of unnumbered Indians, with no circumstance to tell me of the
country, save the hallowed stillness; the distant wheat fields
waving to the breeze of summer; the rural spire crowning the
distant hill, or the bleating of sheep, huddling together from the
heat of the day, in the shade! Precious hours! They throng
back upon my memory with influences of peace; with the hum
of bees, the voice of waving branches, the tones of childhood,
the prattle of running waters, and with the glow of the lake,
which seemed to expand as the twilight drew near,
That,
smiling from the sweet south-west,
The sunbeams might rejoice its breast.
***
One of those still and peaceful lakes,
That in a shining cluster lie,
On which the south wind scarcely breaks
The image of the sky.
He who, having seen thee once, can easily forget thee, is fit
for treason.
To the
unobservant eye, doubtless there is much in the
Genesee region that may seem dull and tame. To the
enthusiastic
,
the close-viewing, or the romantic, it is not so. The
villages
are thriving and neat; the country rich in every thing; and
`the rising generation,' the children, are lovely specimens of
juvenile humanity. We saw them, in almost every meadow we
passed, up to their knees in strawberry-vines and clover,
gathering
the blossoms of the one and the fruits of the other. Pleasant
beyond description, too, are the white dwellings in the towns,
embowered in the honey-locust tree, or lifting their pale
chimneys
behind the tall and melancholy poplars which whisper
around.
A ludicrous
incident occurred at Batavia. There is a creek
in the neighborhood, which makes `upward of considerable'
noise, after night-fall. The English passenger, who reached the
town before us, by leaving the stage and walking on foot,
imagined
it to be the Falls of Niagara, from which we were then
between fifty and sixty miles. He went out and listened. `My
God
!' said he, `what oncommon roaring falls them is! They
must
ey
-ther' be very 'igh, or else the winds is riz.' The
mistake
was not corrected, and the fellow retired to rest, with his
stupic cranium firmly impressed with the belief that his long ears
had caught the sound of the Great Cataract.
Traveler
!as thou wendest toward the West, if thou art
within some fifteen miles of Batavia, and thinkest of pausing for
the night, rescind the mental resolution, and post on to that town.
There shalt thou experience a good bed, and delicious rest, with
the murmur of the Tonnawanta breathing upon the night air thy
quiet lullaby. Do this; to the end that, rising in the morning,
thou go to Richville, and there to breakfast, which is an
hospitable
town, and hath an hotel whose superior is not to be found,
whether thou go to the south-west or north-west, or indeed to any
point of the compass. Comfortable and expeditious
Blodget
!
The voluminousness of thy periphery indicateth the epicure;
upon the pullets thou sacrificest, are the pin-feathers of youth;
thy warm cakes are done deliciously brown; thy yellow butter,
thy irreproachable eggs, thy unimpeachable coffeemy
mnemonical
palate remembers them all.
Murder Creek,
too, is in
thy vicinity; and as it goes moaning onward under the rude
bridge that spans it, the reflection of bright red mills upon its
shore, as they give back the sunbeam, gives its murder's proper
hue and `damnd spot.' The tradition is, that a poor crazy old
man was killed here by the Indians, many years ago, in the early
settlement of the country:
`
May
be be true, may be be no so;
We'll grant it is, and let it go so.'
At any rate, (
Blodget,
I thank thee for the sentence,) if
Richville
hath the memory of death, it hath likewise, and in full
profusion
,
the means of life.
It
is anti-agreeable to post over a road which looks like a
river,
and where the course your conveyance is to take is
indicated
by stakes implanted in the solid part of that `undiscovered
country' over which you are rolling as it were in a ship. Such
was our experience through a part of the Genesee region. But I
caught
one
view from the window of our coach, which I shall not
10
soon forget. Along the distant uplands of the Genesee there
lay a long plain of mist, with irregular indentations, like the bays
of a lake; above them arose a gorgeous array of clouds, and
between both, a wide stretch of verdure. The mist looked like
an ocean; the fragments that sailed by themselves, or hung in
motionless masses in the air, appeared like towers and temples.
The effect was indescribably magnificent.
Ten
miles to the east of Buffalo, I looked out from our
conveyance
,
filled with anxious expectation. For the most part, the
day had been a day of wind and storm; but the tempest had
passed over, the winds had gone back to their caves, and the sun
looked forth from the west, with features of unutterable beauty.
A vast curtain of clouds rolled up from the north and north-west,
leaving the clarified sky so darkly and serenely blue, that it
almost approached the purple. It was that part of the heavens
which bent its unfathomable arch over the expanse of Erie and
Niagara, on its resounding journey to the Ontario. Far as the
eye could reach, on every hand, save the rising road toward the
west, all the region round about was level as the floor of a city
saloon. But the radius embraced by the eye was small, from
that very circumstance. The only evidence we had of our
proximity to those great inland oceans, just mentioned, was
traceable in the bending heads of those distant forest trees which
were higher than the surrounding monarchs of the wild. These,
with the orchard trees on both sides of the way, inclined to the
east at an angle of three horizontal to one vertical foot.
There
were the symptoms of approach to Old Erie. There the
constant
winds from the west had howled their winter anthems, and
wailed in praise of the strength and grandeur of Omnipotence.
As I was saying, I looked forth from our vehicle; and becoming
too much excited with expectation to remain within, a gentleman,
who knew my impatience, counselled me to wait until we reached
a slight eminence beyond, where he told me I should in all
probability behold a sight worth seeing. This vague
announcement
sharpened my curiosity. At last, the trivial eminence was
reached, and my friend bade me cast my glance to the
north-west
.
I looked, and beheld, rising above the level distance,
apparently thirty miles off, a spiral pillar of steamy mist, against
the
perfect
sky, uplifting itself with slow and solemn movement,
ending in a column of faint, and quivering, and beautiful crimson.
`What do you think that is?' said my friend.
Quite unable to answer the question, I confessed my
ignorance
in the phraseology of Polonius: `By the mass, I cannot tell.'
`That,' said he, `
is the spray from the Niagara!
'
I felt my blood rush quicker, and tingle through my veins, at
the mere mention of the name. I mounted on the outside with
the driver, and surveyed every object near and far with the
intense
delight and quick sense of novelty which I have cherished
from my youth.
`How high is the sun?' I inquired of the postillion, after the
seeming lapse of a few moments, as the great orb appeared
rapidly
nearing the horizon, `and what is the distance from Buffalo?'
`The sun is two hours up yet, Sir, and I expect we are a
mil
d
and a half from the
city
jest about'answered Whip.
It was not without a laugh at his idea of calling Buffalo a city,
that I buttoned the over-coat which the freshening wind from
Erie, yet unseen, had rendered requisite, and abandoned myself
to the intoxication of my expectant thoughts. Shortly, we began
to ascend a rise of ground; higher sweeps of landscape rollen
upward from afar; smokes, as from distant steam-boats, arose
heavenward; bright domes appeared; and all at oncebeauti
ful sight!the `
city,
' with its spires, and squares, and streets
lay at my feet; a magnificent thoroughfare,
Old Main,
as the
Buffalonians call it, stretched for miles before my eye;
palaces
were around me; the thick spars of innumerable ships streamed
their colors on the breeze; water-craft were hastening to the
Canadas, lying greenly and beautiful across the bay; and beyond
all, Lake Erie stretched its tremblingly blue expanse toward the
West, with shadows of golden clouds trailing over its bosom,
and ships melting afar off into nothingness, toward the chamber
of the evening sun! Reader, Buffalo is a wonder and a marvel.
Approach it as I did, in summer, and on Sunday. To its
various
portals, as did the strangers to old Rome,
`Cast round thine eyes, and see
What conflux issuing forth, or entering in;
On embassies from regions far remote,
In various habits, on the Appian road,
Or on the Emilian.'
The
whole of the Genesee country is but a tame, yet it is a
beautiful prelude, to those splendid pictures in that magnificent
scenery of the West, of which Buffalo forms the opening view.
`Tell me,' said I to my Jehu, `what is the population of this
`
city,
' which we are approaching?'
`It is nigh to twenty thousand,
friend!
' ejaculated the
dispenser
of
impulses
to the cattle before him, with an evident feel
ing of pleasure that he was showing wonders; `and what's
more, stranger, we shall soon be at the
Eagle
. Jest let me ask
you, `
Squire,
did you ever see any thing like that 'are?'
I turned to the direction of his whip, to the south-west, where
a bay of Erie bent into the woodlands, stretching for miles.
`What is that?' I inquired.
`Why, it's
Buffalo!
You see the streets of the outskirts,
marked out in the edges of the woods, several miles off; you
see the white buildings among the green trees, where the
stumps
is n't yet
grubbed
up; and where they
do
say, that sheep and
deer is enclosed in the cellars of the houses, built to nearly the
second story; and yet they say, and I believe it, that there is n't
a house in all Buffalo,
fur
and
nigh, out
-skirts and
in
-skirts, that
has n't more tenants than can be disposed of.'
I continued to gaze in the direction he had pointed; and
truly the sight was beyond the blazon of tongue or pen. It
seemed to my eye as if more than half of the city of Buffalo had
been but yesterday redeemed from the wilderness. A town of
brick, large, stately, and imposing in itself, was encompassed on
all sides by extending tenements of white, sufficient in number
to form a dozen country villages; in the middle of the town were
country seats, surrounded with parks, through which the deer
bounded, as in those early days, not long ago, when the shores
of Erie were forests, and the lake was crossed only by the
adventurous
canoe of the daring Indian; when if a young Pale
Face came to tempt them, he was admonished by the Red Skins
to forbear:
Son
of the stranger! wouldst thou take
O'er yon blue hills thy lonely way,
To reach the still and shining lake,
Along whose banks the west winds play?
Let no vain dreams thy heart beguile;
Oh, seek not thou the Fountain Isle!
Bright, bright, in many a rocky urn,
The waters of our deserts lie;
Yet at their source, the lip shall burn,
Parched with the fever's agony;
From the blue mountains to the main,
Our thousand floods may roll in vain.
Even there our hunters came of yore,
Back from their long and weary quest;
Had they not seen the untrodden shore,
And could they midst our wilds find rest?
The lightning of their glance was fled,
They dwelt among us as the dead!
They lay beside the glittering rills,
With visions in their darkened eye;
Their joy was not amidst the bills,
Where elk and deer before them fly;
Their spears upon the cedar hung,
Their javelins to the winds were flung.
They bent no more the forest bow,
They armed not with the warrior-band;
The moon waved o'er them, dim and slow
They left us, for the Spirit Land!
Beneath our pines, you green-sward heap
Shows where the restless found their sleep.
For
the rest, wherein is narrated the visit of
Ollapod
to the
Great Cataract, and to those divers points of interest which are
to be found by the way, as the returning traveler journeys toward
the Atlantic sea-board, is it not all recorded in the diary, of which
the foregoing is but a little part? Of a verity, dear reader,
Providence permitting, thou shalt hear again, anon, from `the
man of many wanderings.'
NUMBER FIFTEEN.
October,
1836.
Sonorous
and stirring are the sounds of the bell at the
Eagle,
in Buffalo, which summons the wayfarer to the bolting of his
meridian, nocturnal, and matutinal meal! Wo to him, the
education
of whose jaws, in the swift movements of mastication, has
been neglected! It were better his mother had not borne him,
than to have him seated at the table. However, I say nothing
to this point. Eating is earthly and sensual; and the
knife-and-fork
system of pursuing it, especially where you cannot select
your own hardware, is devilish. Commend me to the Turk. I
could not eat with satisfaction at the
table d'hte
of any inn in
the country, (some
ten
excepted, which it would be invidious to
name) did the table groan with a feast like that which covered
the parental board of Katrina Van Tassel, that Dutch
beau ideal
of our beloved Irving.
Talking of Washington Irving
. I take it for granted,
good reader, that you have never encountered him; for be it
known, except in the elevated circle where he moves and shines,
he is one who loves not to be `seen of men.' He hates your
pointings-out in the streets, and greetings in the markets: these he
leaves to be struggled after, with painful yearnings, by the flimsy
fry which injudicious friends would inflate to his capacity and
standard. It is a year ago since I had the pleasure of repeating
the pleasure of discernment and intercourse with this genial,
affectionate
,
and noble man. I have for
Irving
and I am
willing
to confess ita kind of love. His veracious books,
comprising
the History of New York, have created more risibility
under my waistcoat, than any volumes from the past or of the
present. I read them regularly once a year. There is about
them such a transparent flow of witsuch glorious satiresuch
happiness of expressionsuch more-than-meets-the-eye
phrases
that,
take them up when and where I will, they violate my
sobriety, and seduce me into a hearty guffaw. As
Geoffrcy
Crayon
,
I am charmed with him; as an historian, I honor him; as a
patriot and a gentleman, I throughly revere him. What a style
is his! None of your shallow tinsel, your unnatural emblems,
your forced conceits, your windy tropes: all is truth, gentleness,
nature. God bless the
gentleman!
Well, as I was saying, 't is
now about a year since I saw him last. It was a bridal scene.
Sweet was the gusto of the Marcobrunner upon the lips of my
friend Gand his comrade
Ollapod,
when the splendid
coach flashed its whirring wheels between the green walks of the
Park and our apartment at the
Clinton
. (As yet, famed
Astor's
was not.) `Considerable if not more' were the oglings we
received
,
as our satin-lined coats fluttered their white aspects
around the door of the carriage; and the flowery favors I bore,
elicited envious looks `from each pedestrian churl,' as we rolled
along Broadway toSquare.
Imagine
it a few moments after sunset, in a superb
drawing-room
,
a few steps from a famous
plaza
`I think they call it.'
The rosy lingering of a June sky enable you to discern yourself
surrounded with grooms and bride's-maids, some half a score.
Carriages bustle up beneath you, freighted with beauty; the harp
rings from the hall; the sweet perfume from a hundred
bouquets
float through the apartment. The past and present meet
together
.
Warm hands are in your grasp; fair smiles and happy
laughter beam and echo around. `Where,' one could not but
think, `may we all be within the year! Some, now around me,
will be on the ocean, in the service of their country; some in
Italysome in Egyptsome in Greece.' And so they are.
Descend
with me to the bridal saloon. There stands the
holy man. We proceed, `in order due;' and forming that `open
line,' which never looks so beautiful as on such an occasion,
hear the vows that bind together two loving hearts. Silks rustle,
kisses echo, diamonds gleamfairy voices murmur around. By
the way, that kissing is a pleasant business. It is highly
commended
of St. Paul; and though I may, as that worthy apostle
once said of himself, `speak as a fool,' yet I am going to make
a hitherto unattempted literary effort. I trust it will be well `got
up.' I am going to do what Solomon said could not be done;
namely, describe something new. This is the age of
improvement
.
`Ladies and gentlemen, stand back, and you will see'
a kiss on paper
. Do n't be incredulous. I will give you the
sound in types. Listen! When two pairs of affectionate lips
are placed together, to the intent of osculation, the noise educed
is something like the ensuing
epe-st'weep'st-e'e!
and then the
sound tapers off so softly and so musical, that no letters can do
it justice. But this is a digression. If any one thinks my
description
imperfect, let him
surpass
it, if he can!
`
Who
is that gentleman, standing by the pier-table, in the
other drawing-room?' said I to a friend. `I am oblivious of his
name, but his countenance is familiar. He has a noble
forehead
a
discerning eyea most goodly presence. How the
organs of humor expand in his temples! What a benevolent
smile plays around his lips!and he seems, too, the focus of
all eyes.'
`Yes,' I was answered, `and he deserves it. That is
Washington
Irving
.'
The remembrance of the face struck me in a moment. We
had met before, but not as acquaintances; and the pleasure of
an introduction offered by my friend, a long-tried compeer of
Crayon,
was accepted with prompt alacrity. My memory of
that interview, and the prolonged colloquy to which, from
circumstances
,
it gave rise, is really among the most pleasant of my
life. Irving had unknowingly done me sundry favors abroad,
when Secretary of Legation at the Court of St. James, by the
transmission of letters for me to America, through the department
of state. For these I thanked him cordially. A stoup of wine
followed; and how numerous were the excellent sayings that
went forth from his lips, over those gouts of floating gold we
quaffed together! Geoffrey seemed almost disposed, for the
nonce, to eulogize the Benedict. `The rustling of silks and the
creaking of shoes betrayed his fond heart to woman.' A gleam
of genuine pleasure laughed in his eye. In dress simplein
manners gentle, and easily entreatedhe takes the hue of the
time and the taste of his company so gracefully upon himself,
that you think you have known him for years. And if you are
a reader, so you have. I wondered at the verdict once given me
respecting him, by Fanny K, that at the aristocratic dinners
of London he was quite reserved, and sometimes
sleepy
.
Methought
(as he passed on from subject to subject without
impediment
from
the changes in the city of his heart, since the days
of Stuyvesant and Van Twillercorrecting now and then, with
right good will, my erroneous pronunciation of some of those
jaw-sundering Dutch names) that there was something in the
atmosphere
of home, and the sweet pomp of a bridal scene, which
won upon his affection, and sent a genial glow to his inmost heart.
Would that the properties of social life might permit a transcript
of the constant felicities which he then and there diffused into the
porches of mine ear! Thoughts, common perhaps in themselves,
clothed in such exquisite and
telling
expression; fancies evoked
from every-day facts; happy terms and phrases innumerable.
Could I record them, how much would they enrich this my fifth
subsection of number fifteen!
Revenons a Buffalo
. He who would form a just
appreciation
of this wonderful city, let him, as I did, (if he have
literary
acquaintances and comrades of the mind, but personally
unknown
,)
take the arm of a friend, and as the twilight comes on,
go down through Main-street to the Erie pier. What a sight!
It is one which makes the heart of the observer swell with pride
that he was born an
American
. `It was a Sunday evening,' as
Southey would say, when I coursed with my friend along the
crowded quay of Buffalo. The sun had gone down beyond the
far headlands toward the occident, and a track of quivering gold
stretched for leagues to the west, over the dancing waves of that
inland ocean, Erieportraying the ruddy brightness of the
day-god's
car. Inspiring music filled the atmosphere; the streamers
of steam craft, (ready, like a mighty war-horse, to burst their
tether, and pawing the waves with impatience,) flouted the sky;
the tramp of unnumbered feet echoed along the pavements; the
church-going bells rang from afar. I stopped for some minutes
to gaze upon the face of a beautiful Indian girl, of the Seneca
tribe, as she offered me her gay-colored moccasins. I would
not buybut I could not go. I waited, therefore, with pleased
delay, affecting not to understand her broken English; watching,
the while, how her voluptuous lashes rose and fell over those
dark, surprised, and dewy eyes. She was perhaps sixteen;
graceful beyond words, yet stately as Juno, and her form
moulded
in the fulness of youth. There was such a world of
intelligence
in her glance, and in that soft blush, half olive and half
ruby, which glowed on her cheek, that (I might as well own
it) the bosom of
Ollapod
was marvellously troubled. Laugh
not, readerbut to that bright remnant of a perishing race the
enthusiastic Benedict kissed his hand! Yes, and the tawny
digits of the fair Seneca went to her lips, and a smile, bright as
a line of unsullied sunlight from the pearly gates of Eden,
beamed
upon the parting glance of
Ollapod
. 'T was evanescent
but how nice!
I
have
no idea of being statistical: my limited acquaintance
with
Daboll,
and other arithmetical gentlemen, forbids me from
dabbling in figures. But, if any one desires to see practical
multiplication
,
whether in persons or in property, let him go to
Buffalo
.
`Where are those steamers bound?' asked I of my friend,
as we stood upon the pier which, in front of warehouses for many
a rood in extent, was covered to the height of fifteen and
sometimes
twenty feet with unhoused merchandise, for which the
houses themselves, glutted to the overflow, had not admission.
`Oh, only a few hundred miles up the lake.'
`
A few hundred miles!
' I exclaimed astonished: `In the name
of aquatic locomotion, how far
can
they go? Do you pretend
to say they can proceed farther to the west than I have come
from the south-east?'
A hearty laugh followed this observation, which startled the
bystanders
.
Just at this moment a steamer got under way. She
moved majestically along the side of the pier, passing ships
almost
innumerable; bugles and trumpets hallowed the air with
those national songs which do so stir my blood; and really I am
quite unable to describe my elateness of spirit, as she turned the
point where the light-house lifts its tall pharos over land and
wave, and went musically along the bosom of Erie, the wreaths
of smoke and flame shooting in gusty grandeur from her
chimneys
.
Fifteen hundred miles
might that craft travel along the
west, toward the setting sun. What was lately there? The howl
of the wolf and the Indian, the whoop on the war-trail, and the
solemn yell around the council-fire. From those dim shores,
now fading into the indistinctness of twilight, went up the smoke
of the wigwam, or the gleam from the pine torch, by whose light
the red man guided his venturous canoe! What is there now?
Towns rear their bristling spires and masts, and send their
spiritboats
along the waters like things of life: the hallowed chimes
of the Sabbath reach the Indian in his hut, and the raven on his
bough. The Past has vanished as a scroll; and the bustling, the
usual Present is around us, with the hiss of its rail-road engines,
the thunders of its steaming apparatus, and the rolling of the
triumphant
wheels of commerce. It seems to me, too, that in these
western regions the soul of man glows with a newer fire, and
fresher impulse; as if some Indian Prometheus, seeing the decay
of the Red Nations, had sent a fervent spirit into the bosoms of
their white successors. A word here in the reader's ear. If
thou goest to Buffalo, ascend thee to the dome of the
American,
and cast thine eyes southward. There, league on league,
stretches
the blue and primeval wilderness, and from the wigwams of
the Senecas the smokes go up, as in the days when the whole
forest was their dominion, and the Pale Faces feeble and few.
Look then around you.
Magic
is there! The tide of power,
rising and rolling onward, sends its roar to your ear; and you
see the progress of that mighty flood of enterprise which is yet to
fill the West with a noble and prosperous people. If you are
an American, your heart will bound proudly within you, until
you will feel as if, like the green mountains of ancient Israel, you
could break forth into singing. If you love your native land,
travel through it,
and your affection will increase and multiply
mightily. Yes, my glorious country! every additional mile I
traverse of thy boundaries, adds to the flame of my attachment.
Filled with a brave and generous people, who have done more in
the same space of time than any nation
ever
did to promote the
honor and liberty of manI love thee! Thou hast, too, thank
God
! the elements of perpetuity within thee:
`
Seas,
and stormy air,
Are the wide barriers of thy borders, where
Thou laugh'st at enemies; who shall then declare
The date of thy deep-founded strength, or tell
How happy in thy lap the sons of men shall dwell!'
I woke
early at the
Eagle,
excited and unrefreshed. The
idea of seeing Niagara the next day impressed me so deeply,
when I retired the evening before, that I was unable to sleep;
and had I been thus disposed, there were influences enough
about me to prevent somnolency, even in a sloth. It was the
Eden of a weasel, the place where I lay. The apartment was
named
The Pasture,
by a facetious fellow-traveller; and verily,
many were the bipedal animals who `ruminated bedward'
therein
.
I slept opposite a speculator in Michigan lands; and, as if
determined never to be caught napping, he slept
with his eyes
open
. The effect was really frightful. By the light of the moon,
streaming through the window, I saw his cunning opticsfull
of bargain and saleglaring upon me. Sometimes it seemed
as if all the mortal light had departed from them; yet still they
glared into mine. I aver, with sincerity, that those eyes never
closed the live-long night. They seemed aliveyet dead. I
thought of Coleridge's lines in the `Auntient Marinere:'
`
An
orphan's curse might drag to hell
A spirit from on high;
But oh! more terrible than that,
Is the curse of a dead man's eye:
Seven days, seven nights, I saw that curse,
And yet I could not die.'
One who is not
single
in every sense of the word, should bestow
his rib and maid in an adjacent apartment, taking himself what
the gods might be willing to confer in such emergencies. As I
said, I awoke early; and performing certain orisons with a razor
belonging to the establishment, (
God
knows how many chins it
has reaped in its time!) before a glass which screwed my
countenance
into a horrific caricature, I made ready to accompany
`self and party' to the Falls.
Behold
us on the deck of the steamer Victory. The breeze
of morning is fresh and fair; the engine hisses and trembles;
carriages throng to the pier; ladies, with albums under their arms,
thick green veils over their pretty faces, and in habiliments of
travel, throng on board. Agitation and expectancy give them
color; veil after veil is put back, like gossamer; calm brows and
glancing eyes appear. Among these,
Ollapod
recognises many;
some, seen and flirted with of yore. By and by the green
waters of Erie begin to melt into the less turbulent Niagara; you
float calmly along, observing and observed. How much
pleasure
is clustered in such moments!
There
is, among those who have not seen it, a wonderful
misapprehension respecting the
river
Niagara. It is
not
like a
river; it seems a moving lake. Grand Island, too, with the
uninitiated
,
is deemed a small tract of ground, without particular
attractions; a place, perhaps, for the country-seat of some
millionaire
.
Yet it is between three or four leagues long, and the
greater part of it is a solid wilderness, with as it were a
lake
on
either
side. Perhaps, untravelled reader, this may give you an
idea of the
river
of Niagara.
As you
approach the northern end of Grand Island,
anticipation
stands on tiptoe. I ascended to that sacred portion of the
steamer y'clept the roof of the wheel-house, where the sound of
the paddles gurgled out a kind of lullaby to my spirit. The blue
sky had changed: from the waves of Ontario, and the stretch of
Niagara, the morning mists had arisen, and formed into clouds.
These rolled upward, in long ribs of purple and gold, from the
north, one above another, like some celestial stair-case, leading,
as did the dreamy ladder of Jacob, into Heaven. As we parted
the ripples with a nimble prow, the deer were seen, starting
from their coverts, in the woods of the island, while the eagle,
scared from the arms of his favorite and aspiring cedar, soared
with his shrill scream into the abyss of Heaven, where his form
was soon swallowed up in the distance.
Shortly
after you leave Grand Island, you expand into a
scene which, to my agitated remembrance, resembles the
Tappan
Zee
of the Hudson. All now is expectation. Every eye
is bent to the north. `How far is it from Chippewa?' asked I,
of a friendly delegation of journalists and legislators, whose
genial
spirits and intercourse I cherish with the warmest
recollections
.
`Not far,' was the answer; `you will be there soon.'
At
the distance of five miles from Niagara Falls, you catch
the first distinct view. Is it sublime?
No
for distance so
softens and deceives, that you can not appreciate it. You strain
your outward-looking eyes, till the retina aches with gazing.
What do you see? A cloud of apparent smoke, along the
northern border, the
nil ultra
of the lake you are ploughing; and
on either side all is apparently a wide shore of rocks and woods;
beyond, a terrible gulf, of which you see nothing but the
ceaseless
cloud that rises at its dim and dismal edge.
`
And
that is
Niagara!
' said I, as the mountainous spray,
volume after volume, swelled upward in the sun. `Well, I
seem
disappointed.'
`
Do
you?' said my friend, the legislator, with a triumphant
accent on the first branch of the interrogation. `You see the
cataract is as yet afar off; just put your hand to your ear,
guarding
it from the tumult of the machinery, and tell me if you do
not hear something?'
I did so; and sonorous, full, and replete with a sense of awe,
the voice of the cataract swelled in my ear.
All
was now expectancy and enthusiasm. I could scarcely
stand still. Before me, like the pillar of fire to the host of the
Israelites, rose that eternal column of snowy mist, tinct and
garnished
by the sunbeamand I had caught the sound of Niagara.
I scarcely
know how I left Chippewa. I am aware that
all my travelling movements and precautions were executed with
habitual discretion; but I can not explain to any one the
new
sensations I experienced on our way to the Falls. When at the
distance of some two miles from the cataract, there seemed to be
an increasing shadow, like that of an eclipse, in the atmosphere.
The dimness increased; and on passing a lapse of woods, and
emerging again in sight of the river, I felt assured that a storm
was coming on. I ordered our postillion to stop.
`Is there no house,' I inquired, `between this and Niagara?
There is a thunder-shower coming on; I hear it growling.'
It
would have done your heart good, to have heard the laugh
of that driver. It was loud and long; it bubbled up from his
heart, as if what he had just heard was the best joke he had
listened
to for years.
`Bless your soul, friend, it's not going to rain. What you
see, is the cloudy mist, and what you hear, is the roar of them
Falls, yender. Jest wait a minuteand then'
`
Stop
!' said I, rising in our barouche, while, gilded by the
westering sun, I caught, as we wheeled around a clump of trees,
the first view of the vast green gulf and circle of the
Horse-Shoe
Fall
.
My
good reader, you must excuse my enthusiasm. It has
been said that Niagara can not be described. I think it can be.
Can not one record on paper the thoughts provoked by the
objects
of grandeur and magnificence that have met his eye?
Verily
,
I trow so; and I will
try
. The first mistake corrected by
an approach to Niagara, is as to its width. You have supposed
it an outlet from one lake to another, pressed into narrow
boundaries
,
and urged onward by irresistible impulses. You were
deceived
by fancy. The river is like some bay of an ocean; as if
indeed the Atlantic and Pacific, one far below the other, should
meet, by the former being narrowed to the width of one or two
miles, and falling to the depth of more than two hundred feet,
with rocks and islands on the edge of the vast gulf, frowning and
waving between.
Very
soon we reached the Pavilion. The selection of an
apartment, visitation to the barber, and the donning of a cool
summer dress, were all speedily accomplished. The ceaseless
hum of the Falls was in my hearingit shook the windows of
the Pavilion, from which I gazed. Below, at a few rods distance,
the mighty Niagara plunged into its misty abyss: above, to the
south, it seemed as if an ocean, fierce as that tide which `keeps
due on to the Propontic and the Hellespont,' was rushing madly
down to some undiscovered cavern, where its fury was lost and
suspended for ever.
Descending
through the garden and the open common which
intervene between the Pavilion and the distant river to the
eastward
,
we struck the road, and observed the sign which pointed
`
To the Falls
.' Here let me say a word, which I think
will give the idea of Niagara vividly to one who has never seen
it. It seemed to me, as I looked from the window of the
Pavilion
,
that the river was nearly on a level with the house. Well,
I passed over the places I have mentioned; and at the guide-post
aforesaid, we began to make a most precipitous descent, over
rude stair-cases, bedded in miry clay. In a few moments we
were nearly on a level with the river, which was in full view, and
close at hand. At that instant, the first impression of the vast
power
of Niagara struck my mind; but it was faint and feeble,
compared with those that succeeded. For miles, looking
upward
at the stream, it resembled a foaming ocean, vexed by the
storms of the equinox. We proceeded to the house which heads
the perpendicular descent to the bed of the river, at the foot of
the Falls. Those who dress for deeds of aquatic daring with
more deliberation than myself, would have changed their ordinary
attire for those simple and coarse habiliments usually adopted by
those adventurous spirits who get their drenched certificates for
going under the sheetbut for my part, I had not the patience.
Endowing myself with an oil-cloth
surtout,
I began to descend
the stair-case leading to the base of the cataract.
The
descent seemed interminable. I thought I had travelled
an hour, still moving round and roundin darkness, and alone.
It was a solemn probation, during which I had time to nerve my
spirit for the grandeur and the awe with which it was soon to be
impressed. At last, I made my egress from the stair-case into
the presence of the Wonder.
My
first idea was, that a tremendous storm had brewed since I
began to descend. Several rods to the south, the Falls, dimly
seen, boomed and thundered with a noise so stunning, that I was
almost distracted. At my feet, there rolled onward what seemed
a
lake of milk
having about it nothing darknot even a
glimpse of water-color. I saw, near by, a tall black figure,
smiling
graciously, like some good-natured Charon, ready to
transport
his customers across the River of Death. He announced
himself as the conductor of gentlemen under the Falls. Taking
his hand, I approached them. At a certain point, as we drew
nigh, I begged him to stop. The mist had surged upward from
my vision, and before me
broke down,
as it were,
the Atlantic,
from a height so dizzy that it made the eye shrink from gazing;
the distant side of the vast semicircle hid from view by a
rainbow
,
and the awful mass of green, mad waters, rushing to the
abyss, with a noise like the breaking up of chaos!
What is like
that scene!
It is itself alone; to depict it comparisons fail. You
must describe itself.
I know not how it was, but such a sense of awe and majesty
descended at that moment upon my spirit, that I burst into tears,
and shivered through every nerve. What an awful hum and
moaning pierced the hearing sense! Above me, hideous rocks
rose for hundreds of feet; dark shelves, wet with the eternal
tempest around them; and at every moment a stormy gust would
drive a deluge of water in my face, taking my breath, and
chilling
me, as it were in the depth of the solstice, even to the bone.
As we shouldered the dark ledges which extended under the
sheet, I almost shrank from the desperate undertaking; and
never did lover, howsoever deeply skilled in `holy palmistry,'
press the jewelled hand of his mistress with such affection as
that wherewith
Ollapod
grasped the sable fingers of his African
conductor. His splay feet and amphibious-looking heels
seemed
to stamp him some creature of the elements; a Caliban,
schooled to generous offices by some supernatural master.
When
you approach within ten feet or so of that tremendous
launch of waters, then is the time to pause for a moment, to steep
and saturate your soul with one pre-eminent and grand
remembrance
.
For me, if
millions
of human beings had been around
me, I should have felt
alone
and as one who, having passed
beyond the dominions of mortality, stood presented before the
marvels of his God! It is a place for the silent adoration of the
heart for
Him
`Who made the world, and heaped the waters far
Above its loftiest mountain.'
Whence came those ceaseless and resounding floods? From
the `hollow hand' of Omnipotence! Fancy stretches and plumes
her adventurous pinions from this point: she goes onward to the
Upper Lakes,
and their peopled shores; she pursues her voyage
to the dark streams and inland seas of the west; and returning,
finds their delegated waters pouring heavily and with eternal
thunder down that dizzy steep! Thought, preying upon itself,
is lost in one deep and profound sense of awe; of recollection,
of prospect. I may change one word from Byron, to express
my meaning:
By
those that deepest feel, is ill exprest
The indistinctness of the laboring breast:
Where thousand thoughts begin, to end in one,
Which seek from all the refuge found in none.'
From the spot of which I speak, you can easily imagine that
there has come upon you the deluge, or the day of doom. The
voices of eternity seem to burden the air; look up, and the dark
rocks, like the confines of Plegethon, seem tottering to their fall;
where you stand, the whirlwind which bears upon its pinions
drops heavier than those of the most dismal tempest that ever
rent the wilderness on land, or wrecked an armament at sea, is
moaning and howling. Casting a glance at the upper verge of
the Falls, you see the turbulent rapids, thick, green, and high,
shrinking back, as it were, from their perilous descent, until a
mass of waves behind urges them, resistless, onward; to speak
in thunder, and to rise in mist and foam, the children of strife,
yet parents of the rainbow, that emblem of peace.
I once
asked an elderly friend, in whose domicil I was a
favored
inmate, and who suffered much from the gout, whether
there might be any pain, known to myself, which would compare
with it. `No!' he replied: `I never met anything of the sort in
my life: there is nothing on earth like it; and I am destitute of
any descriptive comparison. I am not dead at present; I hav' n't
been as yet to
Tophet;
and therefore can't tell whether gout is
like that, or purgatory; but I believe it to be as near that as
anything
.'
It is thus with Niagara. There is no emblem: it has no
rivalit is like no rival. Its multitudinous waves have a glory
and a grandeur of their own, to which nothing can be added,
and from which nothing can be taken away.
It
has been said, that the tremors or presentiments of those
who march to battle, are dissipated by the bustling of caparisoned
horses, the rolling of the war-drum, the clangor of the trumpet,
the clink and fall of swords, `the noise of the captains and the
shouting.' Some such kind of inspiration is given to the thought
ful and observant man, who goes under the Great Fall of Niagara.
As I moved along behind my sable guide, holding on to his
dexter,
`Even as a child, when scaring sounds molest,
Clings close and closer to its mother's breast;'
while the waters dashed fiercer and more fiercely around about
me; methought I had, in an evil hour, surrendered myself to
perdition, and was now being dragged thither by the ebon paw
of Satan. Shortly, however, the stormy music of Niagara took
possession of my soul; and had Abaddon himself been there, I
could have followed him home. For one moment, only, I
faltered. The edge of the sheet nearest the Canada side, from
its rude and fretting contact with the shore above, comes down
with a stain of reddish brown. Near Termination Rock, you
pass by that dim border of the Fall, and exchanging recent
darkness
for the green and spectral light struggling through the thick
water, you are enabled to discern where you are. My
God
! It
is enough to make an earth-tried angel shudder, familiar though
he may be with the wonder-workings of the Eternal. Look
upward
!
There, forming a dismal curve over your head, and
looming in the deceptive and unearthly light, to a seeming
distance
of many hundred feet, moaning with that ceaseless anthem
which trembles at their base, the rocks arise toward Heaven,
covered with the green ooze of centuries, hanging in horrid
shelves, and apparently on the very point of breaking with the
weight of that accumulated
sea
which tumbles and howls over
their upper verge! There is no scene of sublimity on earth
comparable to this. You stand beneath the rushing tributes from
a hundred lakes; you seem to hear the wailings of imprisoned
spirits, until, fraught and filled with the spirit of the scene, you
exclaim, `
There is a God!
and this vast cataract, awful,
over-powering
as it is, is but a plaything of
his
hand!'
There
is one dreadful illusion to which the untrained eye is
subject, under this water-avalanche. You know, travelled reader,
that when you journey swiftly in a rail-road car, the landscape
seems moving past you with the speed of lightning. You see
distant trees and fields, apparently out of compliment to the
locomotive
,
wheeling off obsequiously to the right and left. Every
grove seems engaged in a rigadoon. This
illuso visus
is
particularly
discernible on the face of Niagara, when you are beneath the
Falls. Look at the sheet but for one moment, and you find yourself
11
rising upward with the swiftness of thought. Turning your
eye to the rocky wall which bounds you, for a moment you give
a side-long glance at its dizzy extent. Heavens! what was that
noise? Did not a portion of the rock above, some massy
mountain
of stone, then fall? No, it was only the thunder of
commingled
rapids,
which united at the edge of the precipice, and
rushed impetuously into the abyss together. It is this which
makes such heavy music, such solemn tones, in the distant voice
of Niagara.
A most
thorough bath, such a one as I never took before,
gave me, after my changed dress, and proper probation, a
superior
appetite for joining a supper party at the Pavilion. I
remember
the pleasure I once enjoyed, during a summer sojourn
at West Point among congenial spirits. Every day, at dinner, in
the large mirrors which bedeck the dining saloon at
Cozzen's
capital establishment, what time we discussed viands and wines,
I could see the reflected Hudson and its shores, the distant
mountains towering into the sky, and steam-craft moving; while
`from town to town,
The snowy sails went gledming down.'
You seem to think, if you are anything of an economist, at
Niagara, that you are likely to get from your host
the worth of
your money
. He gives you `green or black tea,' and all the
appointments
of a good supper, and he flings in a view of Niagara
from the dining-room windows, without any extra expense! Its
music shakes your hand as you lift your coffee to your lip; its
bounding and agitated lapse smites your eye, as you sip the juice
of the Mocha berry, yet you never find it i' the bill. If you wish
to be
fleeced,
however, employ a guide to tell you when is the
time to say `Good gracious! how sublime!' and to show you
the thousand little nothings in the vicinity of the Falls, which,
compared with them, are as it might be to pit a flea in fight
against a lion or an elephant. Ye blind guides! door-keepers
of the gates of sublimity, which you can not speak of or describe,
save in the stale terms of business! Ye tell a man whose heart
and mind are overflowing with awe and wonder
when
to use his
eyes! Ye are varlets all; akin to that enterprising man,
mentioned
,
if I mistake not, by Goldsmith, who issued proposals to
bite off his own nose by subscription; or, rather, to that builder
of
chapeaux,
who exclaimed in a paroxysm of delight, as he
stood at the foot of the Canada Fall, `By the
Lord
! what a
glorious place
for washing hats!'
Well,
I have sojourned near and surveyed Niagara, until it
is pictured in my mind, and I know it as it were a favorite book.
A word here, then, to tourists who have that chief marvel of the
world to see. There will perhaps be disappointment in a far-off
view, as you go from the south; for the majestic rush of the
rapids, and the heavy plunge of the fall, you can not see. To
my
New York
reader I can give a simile. Supposing the
Hudson
ran from the bay of your metropolis rapidly to the north.
Plant its shores, from the city to the Palisades, with bold
headlands
and ancient forests. At the Palisades, let the river break
off, and fall to the distance of between one and two hundred feet,
and then go heaving onward to Sing-Sing, through a huge
natural
canal, wide as itself, crowned, at the top of the high
precipices
which border its sides, with shaggy pines and hemlocks,
and flowery shrubs and parasites, where the vulture wheels, and
the boding owl makes his complaint at evening. This is a faint
idea of Niagara. You should sit for hours, in the eastern portico
of the Pavilion, looking at the waves as they rush over the
Horse-Shoe Fall. Continually, large masses of them, green as
the richest verd-antique, shoot in blended company down into
the `abysm of hell' beneath. From this point they are full of
beauty. Unable to keep together, they burst into foam; so that
the continual recurrence of this has the effect of a long waste of
the finest embroidery, in flowers, leaves, and vines, on a ground
of green. Over them plays the rainbow, spanning them with its
heavenly arch, and shining lovingly upon the madness of which
it is created; stretching itself to the distant island, where its
ethereal colors smile on the rich woods and golden waters. There,
in the portico aforesaid, is the place to sit and inly ruminate. I
saw one fat John Bull, `a round and stocky man,' in a checked
travelling shirt, and a swallow-tailed coat, whose skirts were
almost
pulled round beneath his arms, standing like some
corpulent
fowl on the last ledge of Table Rock, peering into the Falls,
then only about ten or twelve feet from his side, with a telescope
twice as long as his body! It was a pure specimen of the
sublime
and the ridiculous.
Here
let me play the counsellor to the visiter at Niagara. I
offer my opinion with confident diffidence. Doubtless you desire
to receive at the Falls, and to carry away with you, the strongest
impression. Do not therefore
go down
to the foot of the
cataract
on the Canada side. Take your
coup d' il
as you drive in
your carriage to the Pavilion. Take your supper there, as did
the goodly company of your adviser,
Ollapod
. Supposing you
are an
American
which I trust you areyou will of course
feel a sort of pride in believing that the best view is on the
American
side.
And so it is:
yet to look at the United States' part
of the cataract, you would say it was a mere mill-dam. It is
thus that distance deceives. You cannot see the movement of
that far-off water, or hear distinctly the horrid sound with which
it plunges from its cloud-kissing elevation to the depths below.
But if you would obtain the deepest and strongest thoughts of
Niagara, do as I say. Observe the semicircular cataract on the
Canada side from the
csplanade
of the Pavilion, but do not go
down to the base of the Fall. Let the view remain upon your
mind as a beautiful picture; keep the music in your ear, for it
is a stern and many-toned music, that you cannot choose but
hear. Order the coachman to transport your luggage to the ferry
below the Fallssome mile or so. There embark: you will
be
frightened,
doubtless, as you gaze to the south, and see the
awful torrent pouring down upon you; but you may take the
word of the ferry-man that for some dozen or twenty years he has
never met with an accident: you may believe him, for the air of
truth breathes through his large grim whiskers. You will see the
waves curling their turbulent tops, and dark rocks emerging from
their milky current and seething foam, within a yard of your
prowbut be not afraid. You are soon at the foot of
THE AMERICAN STAIR-CASE.
And here, after all, kind reader, is the place for a view. Do not
look about you much. Be content with the thunder in your ears,
and wait until some practised and tasteful observer, kindly acting
as your
cicerone,
bids you stop just at that point on the stair-case
where the plunging
river,
on the American side, dashes
downward
in its propulsive journey. There, by the onward plunge
of the cataract, which bounds in a
ridge
over the abyss,
describing
as it were a
circular
fall, the view of Goat-Island is
completely
cut off, and the whole sweep of the FallsCanadian,
American, and allis seen at once; apparently one unbroken
waste of stormy and tumultuous waters. You must be a
demigod
,
if you can stand on that hallowed ground, shaking with the
accents of a
God,
spanned with
His
bow, resounding with
His
strength, and laughing in
His
smile, without emotions of
indescribable
wonder. Thus, with a trembling hand, and a spirit
saturated with the grandeur of the scene,
Ollapod
pencilled his
hasty, weak, and inexpressive scrawl:
Here
speaks the voice of
God
! Let man be dumb,
Nor, with his vain aspirings, hither come;
That voice impels these hollow-sounding floods,
And with its presence shakes the distant woods;
These groaning rocks the
Almighty's
finger piled;
For ages here
His
painted bow has smiled;
Mocking the changes and the chance of time
Eternalbeautifulserenesublime!
For
the rest; as touching the
sound
of Niagara; our
wanderings
over Goat Island; the fair friends we met perambulating
there; with divers other peregrinations; the journey toward the
orient; the scenes of Lewiston, Queenston, Lockport,
Rochester
that
lovely and most hospitable city; shall they not be
presented to thee, kind reader, in the next subsections of
Thine, heartily, and to serve,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER SIXTEEN.
January,
1837.
Beloved Reader:
We parted company at the foot of the
staircase, leading from the foamy current of Niagaraupup,
as it were from the caverns of Pandemonium to Paradiseto
`the American side.' Let me act as a guide-book to your eyes,
while we proceed.
Look backward, occasionally, whenever you have opportunity,
through the apertures of your pathway, at the clouds of mist that
circle into rainbows around you, and at the milk-white torrent
which rolls and murmurs beneath. Far below you, `moves
one that gathers luggage.' You shall see him with your trunks
and carpet-bags, climbing the dizzy
steppes
in your trail, the
omega of your party, until you find yourselves in the land of
Jonathan.
Apparently, you are in a forest. A few cottages are skirting
its edge, or the neighborhood round about; but beyond, all seems
ancient and primeval. You almost look to encounter an Indian.
But the Great Cataract is at your side, and where it breaks off
into the cloudy eternity below, which now you cannot see, the
green verdure slopes to the very edge of the precipice, marked
with the shoe-prints of a thousand feet. What fairy shapes of
pretty
soles
are there! Of some,
Ollapod
was constrained to
say, `Surely, these delicate marks indicate that the pedal
pressure
of those who made them would scarcely leave its impress
upon the fringed gentian, or the upspringing lily.'
Slowly and contemplatively we lingered about this haunted
and hollow-sounding region. It seemed, indeed, as if the earth
beneath, to its centre, and the heavens above, even to the abyss
of the empyrean, were shaking and vocal with `the sound of
many waters.' There is no escaping from the voice of Niagara.
Go where you will; wander for miles and miles from its green
and changeful vortex; yet your ear drinks in its deep and solemn
melody. For me, in one hour during the many I passed in its
hearing, I deserted all my companions, and roamed for a league
into the melancholy shades. Was I beyond the warning that
Niagara was nigh? Not so. On every gale came that vast and
solemn concert of water-sounds; the humming middle-gush, the
high-measured roll and gurgle, the awful under-tone! They
seemed to
fill all the air
. It is not like thunder; not like the
murmurs of the coming whirlwind, nor the troubled groan of a
volcano. It pervades the landscape round; the leaves tremble
at its breath; the bird shrieks, as if in fear, and springing from
the branch that overlooks the stream, soars through rainbows and
bright clouds beyond the scene. The cataract utters its horrid
whereabout on every breeze. You listen to its murmurs, until
the heart is intoxicated with their sublimity, and the eye moist
with emotion. Now they sound like the crackling flames,
spreading
for leagues over mountain woodlands; then like doleful bells,
heard at intervals in the pauses of a funeral; then, like
`The rolling of triumphant wheels, the harpings in the hall,
The far-off shouts of multitudes are in their rise and fall.'
Alternately stormy and plaintive, deep and faint, as the wings of
the wind aspire or are depressed, they create a mingled and
many-toned diapason, which, to be
felt,
must be heard; and to
be heard, must be remembered for ever. They are like the
blast of the tempest, as described in `The Auntient Marinere,'
when
`his sails did sigh like sedge,
As the rain poured down from one black cloud,
While the moon was at its edge:
When the roaring wind did roar far off,
It did not come anear;
But with its sound it shook the sails,
That were so thin and sere.'
Do not,
good reader, go bounding rapidly through and among
the scenery on the American side of Niagara, with a fleet
footstep
and an unobservant eye, but use all gently. Thus did we.
Every tree you meet, almost, contains the initials of the thousands
who have come and gone from that overpowering and
magnificent
wonder. We pushed onward, without care or sorrow, filled
and intoxicated with admiration, and wist not, as it were, whither
we went.
Crossing a fearful bridge, we reached Goat-Island; but
Ollapod,
lagging behind his less imaginative companions, stood
in the middle of that frail causeway, and listened and gazed upon
the mad waves of a river, as they dashed and growled beneath;
seeming himself, meanwhile, to be rushing `up stream,' as if
astride of a comet. Yet this river, as viewed from the Canada
side, appears like a silver ribbon, flaunting in bright relief against
a back-ground of sable rock, and forms but the merest tithe of
the American Fall.
How many sublime and pleasant recollections fill my mind,
as I call up, in the stillness of this autumnal and contemplative
evening, that magnificent scene! In the quiet of my domestic
retirement, the last leaves of summer quivering at my window,
with low and melancholy whispers; pale statues (thou, Bard of
Eden, and thou, Swan of Avon, and ye, Muses of Greece,
whose presence still haunts, or seems to haunt, the olive woods,
by streams of old renown!) gleam, and send their shadows along
the wall; but I go back, on the wings of memory, to those
cloudless
and soul-fraught hours, until the voice of Niagara is in my
ear, and the bounding impulse of its tide seems gathering in my
apartment. I am lost in recollection:
`
When
eve is purpling cliff and cave,
Thoughts of the heart! how soft ye flow!
Not softer, on the western wave
The golden lines of sunset glow.
Then all by chance or fate removed,
Like spirits, crowd upon the eye;
The few we likedthe one we loved,
And all the heart is memory!'
That
was a beautiful and placid face, which we encountered
on our way to the island; yea, and a sweetly-moulded form. I
remember it well; and so do all who have sojourned, transiently
or long, among the elysian bowers of New-Haven. Charming
De
F! The queen of Commencements, and Junior
Exhibitions
!
Cynosure of sophomore eyes, with an atmosphere
about thee of music and the frankincense of youth! Idol of
unhewn
and wondering freshmen, who gaze at thee as they would
at a distant star, moving in brightness through the dark blue
depths of Heaven! Who, wedded and blessed, or single and
hipped, but would look upon thee as a sumptuous and beauteous
picture? No one, be it confidently averred, in whose mind a
taste for grace and loveliness were not `clean gone for ever.'
Thou art associated in my memory with the sun-bows and green
woods and waters of Niagara; and art destined there to last,
`Unto thylke day i' the which I shall crepe
Into my sepulchre.'
One
thing will impress you, as you wander about Goat-Island.
After you have stood upon the high rocky tower, (connected by
a quivering plank, as it were, with the awful edge of the
precipice
,)
and looked for miles around you, upon a waste of stormy
waters, plunge at once into the quiet and wooded paths of the
island. Travel ononon. Now, you may fancy that you
are alone, and Niagara out of hearing. Is it so? Pause a
moment
.
There comes through the thick leaves and branches
around you, though you are
far
from the Falls, a many-toned
and hollow voice, which makes every leaf to tremble. The
light stems
thrill
to the rushing breath of the cataract. Yet it is
not sudden, like the sound of a cannon, or the pealing of the
thunder: it is constant, yet changeful; heavy and solemn; yet
at times, fairy and musical: but
it fills all the air
. There is no
pause, no cessation, no stay. The roar is eternal. It is the
utterance
of the
God
who lifted that horrid ledge into heaven, and
stretched that awful chasm for leagues toward the frozen pole.
Fail
not, tourist, to visit the Cave of the Winds, and to go
southwardly from the
Biddle
stair-case, under the American
ledge. Mind not the tempest, which will sweep over you
occasionally
from the distant cataract, in a cloud of spray on the
wings of the gale. There is inspiration in the heart, as you
inhale
the awful hymn-notes of the torrent, and the freshness of
that watery air. It is like breathing upon a high mountain in
winter, above a wide plain, where a wider stretch of white fades
at last, on the edge of the horizon, into a universal blue. Look
up, ever and anon. How fearfully those heavy pines look over
the ledges, at the height of many a hundred feet! There the
blue sky looks down upon you, and the fleecy cloudchild of
the waters and the morningunfolds its skirts of fleecy gold!
Beautiful, awful, impressive scene!
They
told us a good story of an Irishman and Scotchman,
from Canada, who came on the American side last winter, to
settle an ancient grudge by fisticuffs. `They fought like brave
men, long and well;' long hung the contest doubtful; and the
by-standers wist not which should prevail; whether or shamrock
or thistle. At last the antagonists fell to the ground; they rolled
to the edge of the river; one, minus his linsey-woolsey coat-tail,
clung to some shrubbery on the precipitous bank; the other fell
to the distance of sixty feet, saving his life by striking among
the thick boughs of a parasitical tree growing out of the rock, and
festooned with thick vines, the seed of which some wandering
breeze had wafted to a fissure in the rock, where it had been
nourished by the presence of leaf-dust and spray, until it had
flourished into strong and vigorous fertility. The discomfited
warrior was drawn up by a rope, let down for his aid, and hooked
to his wounded inexpressibles, having fallen only a small part
of the distance to the river's bed.
A day
or two (employed in good dinners at the Cataract
House, a personal inspection and liberal purchases of Indian
gimcrackeries on the Island, leave-takings with friends,
appointments
for Saratoga, Rockaway, Trenton, or Newport) can be
passed richly at Niagara. If you have an ounce of poetry
about you, reader, remain there until you can go the whole
circuit
on every side, and in every quarter
alone
. Go out, free
from all human presence, and hold communion with your
God
.
So shall you bring away with you cherished and kindling thoughts,
never to die.
We
bowled briskly away from the Cataract Hotel, one rainy
afternoon; the mud was up to the axle of our extra; and as we
wheeled around an opening through the thick shrubbery, on our
way to Lewiston, not far from the
The Devil's Hole,
a polite
name given to a horrid chasm in the rocky wall which bounds
Niagara on either side, from Queenston to the Pavilion, I caught
my parting view of
The Wonder
. Down rolled that heavy
stretch of wide and foaming waters, the spray rising in clouds
from its base; the wreathing vapors making themselves wings for
the wind, and ready to sail away, like airy messengers, perhaps
to be steeped in sunlight over Lake Erie, so that they which but
a little while before were mounting with thunder in their bosoms,
could soar away and be at rest.
As you journey to the North,
Dan Tourist,
forget not to pause
on the brow of that
long
hill which overlooketh the old town of
Queenston, in Canada, the monument of
Brock,
and eke the
town of Lewiston on the republican side. As we neared this
spot, the sun broke out from his hiding place, and diffused over
the landscape, for many, many leagues, a sweet and melancholy
smile. Magnificent sight! The monument, arose like a shaft
of ebony against a sky of the richest crimson. Old Niagara
went meandering onward to Ontario, like a vast serpent of gold,
creeping through a landscape of surpassing loveliness. The
Mother and the Daughter of two countries seemed brought
together
in loving propinquity; and the hills afar, the vales
between
,
`the rain drops glittering on the trees around,' and the
trembling leaves, gave melody to the breeze and beauty to the
eye.
Before
we supped, I opened the window of our hostelrie at
Lewiston, to catch the last sound of the Falls. On the fitful
gusts, and swayed to full or gentle modulations by the creeping
tides of air that swept through the twilight, came `the voice of
many waters.' Harp sublime! Anthem unending! Organ of
the
Almighty!
I seem to hear thee still!
If
you visit Niagara, I
think
I would perform the journey in
October
. Oh, when the trees are clothed in their many-colored
autumnal robes; when the day-god goes to his rest as a monarch
goes to his slumbers, drawing around him his curtains of purple
and gold; when the mellow fruits drop richly from the trees in
thine orchard; when the honey-locust leaf, or `ash, deep
crimsoned
,'
falls to the ground;
`When the sound of dropping nuts is heard, though all the leaves are still,
And twinkle in the smoky light the waters of the rill.'
then
go to Niagara. You will return with the chastening
solemnity
of the season upon you; with emblems of eternity in your
mind; with remembered whispers of a
God
sounding in your
ear, and with thanks to
Him
`Who made the world, and heaped the waters far
Above its loftiest mountains.'
Stood
at the door of the
Cataract Hotel,
on the American
side, while the postilion was placing their `travelling dress' upon
his cattle, and watched a handsome squaw trudge through the
heavy rain, with a papoose, or young baby, at her back, covered
with a white blanket, and suspended by a wampum belt from her
forehead. How statelily she stepped! She had the walk of an
empress, as she bounded away into the woods. Poor soul!
Probably on her way to her lonely wigwam, to lament in the
autumn, when the sun goes down in an ocean of rainbow-colored
foliage, and the wilderness echoes to the moan of the dying year,
the departing glories of her race,
`Like thee, thou sun, to die.'
Exceedingly
amused at the air and manner of a decided
`loafer,' a sentimentalist withal, and a toper, who had come out of
his way from Buffalo to see the Falls. `Landlord!' said he, to
the Boniface of the Cataract, `and you, gentlemen, who stand on
this porch, witnessing this pitiless rain, you see before you one
who has a tempest of sorrows a-beatin' upon his head continually.
Wanst
I was wo'th twenty thousand dollars, and I driv the
saddling
profession. Circumstances alters cases; now I wish for to
solicit charity. Some of you seems benevolent, and I do
believe
I am not destined to rank myself among those who could
travel from Dan to Beersheba, and say all is barren. No, I scorn
to brag; but I am intelligent beyond my years, and my
education
has been complete. I have read Wolney's Ruins,
Marshall's
Life of Washington, and Pope's Easy on Man, and most
of the literature of the day, as contained in the small newspapers.
But the way I'm situated at present, is scandalous. The fact is,
my heart is broke, and I'm just Ishmaelizing about the globe,
with a sombre brow, and a bosom laden with wo. Who will
help mespeak singly, gentlemenwho will `ease my griefs,
and drive my cares away?' as Isaac Watts says, in one of his
devotional poems.'
No answer was returned. A general laugh arose. The pride
of the mendicant was excited: rage got the better of his
humility
;
and shaking his fist in the face of the by-standers, he
roared out:
`You're all a pack of poor, or'nary common people. You
insult honest poverty; but I do not `hang my head for a' that,'
as Burns says. I will chastise any man here, for two three-cent
drinks of
Monagohale
whiskey; yes, though I have but lately
escaped shipwreck, coming from Michigan to Buffalo, and am
weak from loss of strength; yet I will whip the best of you. Let
any on ye come over to the Black Rock Rail-road Dee-pott, and
I'll lick him
like a dn!
'
`Never mind that,' said one; `tell us about the shipwreck.'
`Ah!' he continued, `that
was
a scene! Twenty miles out
at sea, on the lake; the storm bustin' upon the deck; the waves,
like mad tailors, making breeches over it continually; the
lightnings
a bustin' overhead, and hissing in the water; the clouds
meeting the earth; the land just over the lee-bow; every mast
in splinters; every sail in rags; women a-screechin'; farmers'
wives emigratin' to the west calling for their husbands; and hell
yawnin' all around! A good many was dreadfully sea-sick; and
one man, after casting forth everything beside, with a violent
retch, threw up his boots. Oh, gentlemen, it was awful! At
length came the last and destructivest billow. It struck the ship
on the left side, in the neighborhood of the poop, and all at
waust I felt something under us breakin' away. The vessel was
parting! One half the crew was drowned; passengers was
praying
,
and commending themselves to heaven. I alone, escaped
the watery doom.'
`And how did you manage to redeem
yourself
from
destruction
?'
was the general inquiry.
`Why, gentlemen, the fact is, I seen how things was a-goin',
and
I took my hat and went ashore!
'
The last I saw of this Munchausen, was as our coach wheeled
away. He had achieved a `drink,' and was perambulating
through the mud, lightened, momentarily, of his sorrows.
As you journey to the North, from Niagara to Lewiston, you
catch, ever and anon, through the leafy screen of the trees,
distant
views of the Great Cataract. In the pauses of your carriage
wheels, come the thunder of the torrent and the dimness of the
spray. On your left, there is `
a great gulf fixed,
' to which the
Gulf of Hades might be imagined to have resemblance. Now
and then, crowned with glittering rainbows, you see the Falls, like
the `great white sheet let down from Heaven,' as beheld of old
in the portable larder that met the apostle's startled vision. Then
a thickening cloud of spray, filled with `thunderings and voices,'
hides it from your view. Mile after mile, you continue your
tour, the great Gulf still at your side, the complaining river
rolling
apparently leagues beneath you; horrid chasms and frowning
precipices, around whose bases the foaming waves eddy and
howl; until, by and by, you ascend that incomparable hill which
overlooks the scenes of Lewiston and Queenston. The
delighted
eye beholds the sinking current grow calmer and calmer; the
blue vistas of Canadian woods and plains stretch themselves in
blending colors and undulations to the far and fairy radius of the
horizon; and as the river rolls onward to the Ontario, like a huge
serpent of gold winding through the landscape; as the tall shaft
of
Brock's
monument paints its delicate outline against the
evening
sky, and the fainter sound of the distant cataract is taken on
the freshening wind, among the far-off cedars, waving against a
gush of farewell crimson in the west; the scene is inspiration,
and the place becomes religion.
While
our supper was in preparation at Lewiston, I opened
the window which looked toward the South, in the direction
whence we had come. Haply, thought I, the cataract may yet
send its farewell voice to my ear. I listened attentively,
auribus
erectis,
and solemnly on the swelling gusts and creeping murmurs
of the evening, as they rose and fell, swayed by the sweeping of
the tides of air, came the majestic hum and
air-tremble
of the
Falls!
*
*
There
is a repetition of certain impressions here, owing to a misdirection on the original
MR. I have thought it best, however, to retain the original
form.
Editor
.
How impressive was that sound! Throned afar in the
forest; sceptred with its gorgeous coronet of lunar rainbows; its
regal impulse rushing through the darkness on the wings of the
wind; Niagara lifted to heaven its vocal and eternal anthem! How
many generations, thought I, shall come and go; how many
loving hearts go back to dust; how many lips be dumb in death,
and their soft breath with pain
Be yielded to the elements again,
before Niagara shall be tuneless, or its stormy tones be muffled!
Power more than kingly! Voice, louder and steadier than the
clangor of battle, or the peal of the ephemeral earthquake,
ingulfing
plains and cities! In the language of the bard, `Thy days
are everlasting!' Thou camest from the palin of
Him
who hath
measured the earth, and who sees the pestilence stain the
noon-day
at his bidding! Who that breathes, will ever behold the
consummation of thy destiny? None! Autumn after autumn,
with its gold-dropping orchards its painted woodlands and hollow
sighs shall come and go; spring will prank the earth with
violets
and verdure; summer shall glow, and deadly winter pale the
earth; but over all thou will triumph, until this sphere shall
heave at the voice of the
Almighty,
and the trump of the
Archangel
!
Of
the road from Lewiston to Lockport, and of that famous
country town, what shall I say? I would say
nothing
but I
must say something. I feel in the predicament wherein is placed
Dennis Bulgruddery,
in the play, with respect of his rib.
`I can hear nothing bad of her,' he says to a guest at the `Red
Cow,' which hotel he kept; `you can say nothing good of her,
without telling a dd lie; and in coorse, the less you say, the
better.' Thus I am situated and circumstanced, as touching the
road and last place herein before mentioned.
With a postillion (of the just-adopted Telegraph) dressed in a
flaming red coat, for which he had exchanged his own for a `
consideration
,'
with a deserting private in the Canadian army, we
pushed slowly on from Lewiston to Lockport.
Mud,
without
end or bottom, alluvial pudding, thickened and gurgled on every
side. Postillion was not to be hurried. No; `he was a free
Amerikin driver, be Gosh,' was his reply to one or two
Birmingham
or Sheffield agents, hastening homeward in the next packet
from New York; `and he guessed that anybody that went for to
stir him up in the
lively
line, would get crucified and come over,
almighty slick.' And he kept his word. Through pools, and
over particularly stony and dangerous spots, he wended swift as
Phton with his aerial team; but where the thoroughfare was
good, a snail would have distanced his lagging move.
Lockport
is famous for its deep cut in the canal.
Representations
of this great achievement I had seen in print, and had
supposed that it was a marvel of the first water. It came to pass,
therefore, when we saw the sole steeple of the village rising over
a level country in the east, that we looked earnestly for the Deep
Cut. We continued to gaze until we had reached the hotel,
when we sallied forth in the rain, with a friend or two, in rabid
quest of the wonder. The first view we obtained was from the
village bridge. Never was there a more complete disappointment.
The line of the canal, to the west, appears very like its usual long
and snake-like length; and I put it to the reader, if one very
often
looks upon a more
common
thing than a canal, after you have
travelled across, and alongside, and around it, for some two or
three hundred miles? This, then, was the Deep Cut! Oh,
minimum of marvels! A look or two was
suffegeance
. It was
a rainy day; the village grocers were taking in their cod-fish and
fly-bespotted macaroni; every thing was gloomy and dismal:
consequently it was resolved
nem. con.,
to give the Deep Cut a
dead
cut, which was suddenly performed.
In the lower town, our vehicular machinery stuck fast in the
mud. This afforded time for a maiden lady, of whom I shall
speak anon, to sally forth from an indifferent-looking domicil,
near the upper quartier, and take her seat. At last the
embedded
wheels asserted their freedom, and went
gushing
along at the
rate of a mile an hour, precisely like the pawing wheels of a
steamboat in a heavy sea on Long Island Sound.
Stopped
a few minutes to say how-d'ye-do to a clever
relation
.
Found ample time for my purpose, while the coach was
lumbering by. Looked out from his handsome law-office upon
a wide domain of mud, and meadows filled with stumps, and
ancient logs, reeking with the rain. Everything looked
remorselessly
unprepossessing. The clay in the road was of a yellowish
cream color, some uniform fifteen inches deep, beside.
Anathematized
the town to my sometime companion, averring solemnly
unto him, that if Lockport were built of ducats, and the abdomen
of every little hill in its neighborhood pregnant with precious
stones and jewels, I would not there reside. I still hold my
mind; but mayhap a fair day, a robe of sunshine over that
region
,
and other appliances and pleasaunces to boot, would have
altered my opinions. But what I've writ, I've writ; perchance
unjustly to the place. But `situated, and I might add,
circumstanced
as I was,' and with my present memories, I must say
`
them's
my sentiments.' Fair words I blow to the winds, and
candor reigns supreme. Yet I have heard those whose judgment
is
law
with me on the subject of scenery, declare that Lockport
is possessed of delightful haunts; that the neighborhood around
is like a paradise, in summer. I will believe them; and I charge
the elements with the verdict of my first impressions.
We
soon found that the maiden lady who entered at Lockport
was a person of great scholastic acquirements, and of a very
communicative
turn of mind. A few miles from that town, (which
whoso entereth, if in our way of thought, will reach without
emotion
and leave without regret,) we entered, out of a lonely and
muddy turnpike, much the same as that at Lockport, upon that
delectable road, denominated
Ridge
. It is good in rain or shine.
Some inquiries being made, whether we were not on better
ground, the maiden oped her vocal orifice, and observed: `A'yes;
that were the Ridge-d Road which we have stricken, on the
brow of the hill, o'er which the driver have just riz!'
Shortly after this, she abdicated, and was deposited at the
house of a friend by the way-side.
What
shall I say of Rochester, one of the Queens of the
West? The approach to it is through a delicious country, that
will yet be cultured by the hand of taste into a very Eden. What
fair embowered towns, with their white steeples, occur at
intervals
on every side! What a sweet and rosy generation is rising
around! We saw them, as it were, by legions; fine healthy
responsibilities
,
courtesying or bowing to the traveller, their shining
faces illumined with intelligence, made brighter at the school
from which they went and came.
The entrance to Rochester, from the West, is impressive by
contrast; and when you are once rattling over its pavements, and
through its long streets, you fancy yourself in New York, or eke
in Philadelphia. The suburbs are beautiful. I envied so
deeply
the lot of some certain friends who escorted us along the banks
of the fair Genesee, and showed us the Falls of that charming
river, that their residences still rise to my eye as the very acme
of rural establishments. From the roof of one, (which must be a
palace anon,) I looked down upon flowery walks, the sparkling
cataract
,
the vast pine forests to the north; the blue Ontario beyond;
the city, with its turrets, some of which are like those which peer
above an old feudal town in Europe; upon rail-cars rattling to and
fro, while the horns of canal-men came musically upon the breeze;
upon the shady dwellings of good old friends in the suburbs; and
as I looked, I said, `
This shall be glorified by Ollapod!
'
In
a survey of the environs of Rochester, there is enough to
kindle the dullest imagination. Prophecy itself will be distanced
in its predictions by the swift-coming future. To-day, you
may wander over a flowery meadow, or through the tangled
thickets of a forest, scarcely as yet redeemed from the darkness
of the past; to-morrow, the new street springs into being; the
bustle of trade fills the late quiet atmosphere; the flouring mill
sends its busy wheels round and round; the clink of the
blacksmith's
hammer, the hum of the cotton-gin, the saw of the
carpenter
:
all the sounds and sights of city life, greet your ear and
your vision. As I journeyed with attentive friends in the suburbs,
I pointed out to them places where country seats could be
erected
,
in the most calm and poetical retreats. Alas! I found too
soon, that these sweet recesses were already marked out in
village
lots, and that within `an incredibly short space of time,'
they would be converted into paved thoroughfares, and
manufacturing
or commercial blocks!
One sees enough in these embryo cities of the West, to
dissuade
him from anything like prophecy. The barren place,
touched by the wand of enterprise, springs at once into newness
of life: a community, famed for pure morality, and the honest
but unbending and resolute energies of its members, as in the
case of Rochester, goes on from strength to strength, until its
friends become surprised with unexpected triumphs, the traveller
amazed at the increase of population, and the patriot charmed
with the prospect of days to come. For me, there is something
of sadness in this stirring and changeful scene. By and by, the
music of the pine will be lost to the gale; the cataract will
minister
to the stomachs of a voracious public; and the wave that
laughed and tumbled picturesquely in the sunshine, will be
seduced
into the mill-race, or made to minister to the
dollar-and-cent
gyrations of the spinning jenny! Oh, dreadful profanation!
But few will lament the loss of the forest or the torrent, when
the `almighty dollar' can be made, by their subserviency or their
removal, to propagate and fructify!
Well
perhaps it is best. You can not satisfy one
gastronomic
craving with a green tree or a golden sunset; and a
waterfall
butters no parsnips. Your turnip will not come from a cloud,
nor will your requisite potato drop from a rainbow. Neither do
beef-steaks come from the moon. Wherefore, while there are
abdominal cavities to be refreshed, for the benefit of frail
humanity
;
while rosy lips are but the glowing gateways of pork, and
beans, and cabbage; while these exist, with their diurnal wants
and requirements, it will be quite useless to gainsay their
demands
,
or to sentimentalize upon their unpoetical aspects.
Wherefore, I pray and beseech of you, worthy reader, not to
expect that I shall, on every occasion, burst forth, like a steamer
at the highest heat, into the misty utterance of poetry and of
romance. Let us congratulate each other upon our country. It
is a glorious onedo n't you think so? Are you an American?
Give us your hand! You like the stars, the eagle, and the
stripesdo you not? Give us another grip! We shall shortly
meet again. Are you going? Give us a lock of your hair.
No? Wellnever mind; we shall meet again. Till then,
God
bless you!
Ever thine,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER SEVENTEEN.
March,
1837.
`
Give
you good den,' Reader. We have been deprived of
each other's companionship for several weeks, and for my part I
am becoming lonesome without your eye. I love that you should
scrutinize my sentences; appreciate a good thing, if I happen to
acquit myself thereof; and use that thrice blessed quality of
forgiveness
with respect to a bad one. It pleases me to think that
eyes whose mortal glance will probably never meet my own, may
linger for a moment on my page, and that some thought may be
conveyed, through those starry and lustrous media, to a spirit not
displeased.
12
Some
of my contemporaries have supposed that the estate of
a Benedict forbiddeth the resident therein to disport himself as
aforetime, in the flowery fields of fancy, and to ambulate at
random
through the remembered groves of the academy, or the rich
gardens of imaginative delight. Verily this is not so. To the
right-minded man, all these enjoyments are increased; the ties
that bind him to earth are strengthened and multiplied: he
anticipates
new affections and pleasures, which your cold individual,
careering
solus
through a vale of tears, with no one to share with
him his gouts of optical salt water, wots not of. As a beloved
friend once said unto me: `When a good man weds, as when
he dies, angels lead his spirit into a quiet land, full of holiness
and peace; full of all pleasant sights, and `beautiful
exceedingly
.'
One's dreams may not all be realized, for
dreams
never are;
but the reality will differ from, and be a thousand fold sweeter,
than any dreams; those shadowy and impalpable though
gorgeous
enitties, that flit over the twilight of the soul, after the sun
of judgment has set. I never hear of a friend having
accomplished
hymenization, without sending after him a world of good
wishes and honest prayers. Amid the ambition, the selfishness,
the heartless jostling with the world, which every son of Adam is
obliged more or less to encounter, it is no common blessing to
retire therefrom into the calm recesses of domestic existence, and
to feel around your temples the airs that are wafted from fragrant
wings of the Spirit of Peace, soft as the breath which curled the
crystal light
`of Zion's fountains,
When love, and hope, and joy were hers,
And beautiful upon her mountains,
The feet of angel messengers.'
No common boon is itwe speak in the rich sentence of a
German writerto enjoy `a look into a pure loving eye; a
word without falseness, from a bride without guile; and close
beside
you in the still watches of the night, a soft-breathing breast,
in which there is nothing but paradise, a sermon, and a midnight
prayer!'
Old John Milton,
whose pale statue looks down upon me
with `ful gret solempnite' from his niche, as I write, enlarges
with great gusto upon the married state, and his verdict has been
quoted a thousand times; but I believe that respectable
gentleman
,
and tolerable author, found at last that the state
matrimonial
,
as far as himself was concerned, was not so delectable as
the airy tongue of fancy had syllabled to his ear. But the truth
is, Milton was not a fair judge. He was no more fitted to
possess
a wife, than Richard the Third was. The reason is obvious.
He was engaged in the construction of gorgeous castles in the
air: spirits that `play i' the plighted clouds' were his familiars;
and the battles that he superintended in heaven, and the hot work
that he had of it in the other place, were enough to keep him in
a perfect and constant fever. How could such a man come down
to the bread-and-butter concerns of every day life?the gentle
hint of Mr. Russell the tailor, with whom he boarded in Bunhill
Fields, that it was about time to elevate the pecuniary
quid pro
quo
for victuals and drink that had fulfilled their offices in his
incarnate
tabernacle? How could he go to the green grocer's and
get a cabbage for Mrs. Milton, or anything of that sort, when he
was busy in populating Pandemonium? or see about procuring
for himself a new pair of unwhisperables from his host, when he
was engaged in arranging a throne for Apollyon, and drawing the
convention of his peers together, to make speeches, and discuss
matters of public interest? Indeed, his kingdom was not of this
world; his mind soared away from the dim dust and smoke of
London, up to the gates of Paradise, to pastures of eternal
verdure
,
rivers of refreshing waters, and thoroughfares of bullion,
glistering in the violet and golden radiance of an unfading sky.
Supposing that one of his little responsibilities had bawled in his
ear for a sugar-plum, just at the moment when he had got Satan
into one of his heaviest fights, a kind of gravy running from his
wounds? Would he not have exclaimed, petulantly, (in the
identical
words which he puts into the mouth of the Arch-fiend,) `Oh
hell!' It is quite likely; and perhaps followed up the
ejaculation
with a box upon the ear of the young offender. The truth
is, he was always
in nubibus,
or else above them; his mental
retina expanding, and drinking in the imperishable and glorious
prospects of the upper world. He had not the serenity of
Shakspeare
.
His wing was not so strong; but like `the sail broad
vans' of the Great Enemy, he waved them as if they were moved
by the impetuous rush of a whirlwind. For the common things
of this work-day world, he cared little or nothing. He was
among
men, but not
of
them. The only woman that he ever
sincerely
loved, was Eve. He attended to her with constant
devotion
.
He prankt her pathway with roses: he spread around her
the amaranth bowers and banks of Eden and Asphodel; and the
land which he bequeathed her, was, to use the language of an
auctioneer's advertisement, `well watered and timbered.' He
hated Satan `as he did the devil;' and I am inclined to think
that he has exaggerated the demerits of that famous individual.
But I am wandering. I demand back my spirit for other
matters.
Reader o'
mine, have you been sleighing this winter? There
were some three days of the genuine weather for that object, in
the Philadelphia meridian, and the improvement thereof was
great. Every one partook of the general joy. Little dogs ran
like mad through the streets, and their barks were a mingling of
laughter and yell, evidently the produce of excessive
animal
spirits. It was delightful to embark in a full sleigh, bells ringing
cheerfully in the ear, the city lessening in the distance at one's
back, and the broad white waste of the country expanding to the
eye! There is a sense of chastened solemnity about the dull
brown woods, mingling afar with the pale blueness of the distance,
and the crimson of an evening sky, fading gradually behind their
branches.
`While soft, on icy pool and stream,
Their pencilled shadows fall.'
I hardly know of anything which carries me more forcibly back
to younger and purer days, than a winter's scene. There is
something in sleigh-ride remembrances that stirs a potent
witchery
of pleasure in the very depths of the heart. Sometimes when,
after a heavy fall of snow, a southern wind has arisen, bringing
rain upon its wings, and when the breath of Boreas has afterward
breathed over it, in competition with his
opposite
neighbor, a
a gloss shines over the whole face of the earth; and, as the sun
rises or goes down, the entire radius of the horizon seems like a
waving ocean of blue and gold!
Then
to see the sun go down,
or to see it rise!
Then
to see the large dazzling stars in the
vault of midnight, or the moon walking in brightness, or
suspended
like a vast balloon of transparent light in heaven! Then
the soul goes up to
God:
there is an eloquence in the stillness
of the night; the ear
hums with silence,
and fairy voices seem
breathing from the snow. The unclouded grandeur of
Omnipotence
kindles the mind; there is solemnity in the howl of the
watch-dog from the hill-side; in the sluggish clouds, rolling
their languid and fleecy skirts upward from the horizon.
Sleigh-riding
and skating are my delights. Give me a
satisfactory
pair of
high-dutchers,
curled fantastically over the toe of
my boots, the straps nicely adjusted, the line of steel ringing and
thrilling along my
sole,
the Delaware or Fair-Mount dam for my
theatre, and I can enact more wonders than a man; playing such
tricks before high heaven, that a disinterested angel might bend
complacently from his pavilion in the upper air, to scrutinize my
gyrations, and see how I performed.
Sliding down the hill, on the other hand, is an eminent bore.
I wonder at my urchin infatuation in having ever patronized it.
There is such a world of labor, and such a meager amount of
pleasure. One half of it, to use an appropriate phrase, is `
up-hill
business.' If there are any young countrymen among my
readers who have a lake in their neighborhood, I can tell them
of a system greatly in vogue when I was a student. The
following
is the recipe:
Take a pole, say twenty feet long; place it on a little upright
stick of wood, cut so that at the top two branches may be
removed
,
so as to be something in the shape of a letter Y: let this
be fastened in solid ice, when the lake is right firmly encrusted,
and safe as a floor: then place the pole at the bottom of the
triangle described by the branches of the upright stick; let a long
rope be at the end of the pole, and at the end of the rope a sled,
with runners that cross each other at right angles, under a high
box, filled with boys and girls, properly seated. Two stout
fellows
can easily turn the pole in the cavity of the Y, something in
the way in which an oar is pulled in a regatta. Wait a moment,
reader, I beseech you, and see the effect, when the impulse has
crept to the rope's end. The sled starts like a comet behind
time: it describes a far-off circle, widening and widening; the
passengers can scarcely see; they breathe quickly but happily;
and I verily believe that (being conscious of safety, even were
the ice as thin as a wafer,) any goodly company of young people
thus engaged can enjoy a very satisfactory prologue to the
sensations
of an aeronant on a trip, and feel as Virgil did when he
begged Mcenas to rank him among the lyric poets:
`Sublimi feriam sidera vertice.'
Talking
of poets and prologues, bids me discourse of the
great merit of
Shakspeare
in these impressive productions.
His prologues are seldom spoken; stage people exclude them
from the public, and it is only now and then that they become
closet familiars with the scholar. Shakspeare's prologues teem
with meaning and description. Strong, brief, and simple, they
are yet full of adventure and action. Take the following as an
example. It is the opening of `
Troilus and Cressida:
'
`
In
Troy there lies the scene. From isles of Greece,
The princes orgulous, their high-blood chafed,
Have to the port of Athens sent their ships,
Fraught with the ministers and instruments
Of cruel war. Sixty and nine that wore
Their crownets regal, from th' Athenian bay
Put forth toward Phrygia; and their vow is made
To ransack Troy; within whose strong immures
The ravisht Helen, Menelaus' queen,
With wanton Paris sleepsand that's the quarrel.
`To Tenedos they come;
And the deep-drawing barks do there disgorge
Their warlike fraughtage: now, on Dardan plains,
The fresh and yet unbruisd Greeks do pitch
Their brave pavilions: Priam's six-gated city,
Dardan and Tymbria, Ilias, Chetas, Trojan,
And Antenorides, with massy staples,
And corresponsive and fulfilling bolts,
Skerr up the sons of Troy,' etc.
Well,
after all, life itself is but a dim prologue to that day
of days, when the curtain of eternity will be lifted, and `the
swelling act' begin! The thought is a deep one. Here, we are
begirt with mystery. The Past rises with its shadows, only to
the eye of Imagination: of the Wrong that has flourished and
been successful, we know not yet the destiny; of the Right that
has suffered, in weariness and painfulness, we know not the
reward
.
Who shall unravel the marvel, or dispel the illusion?
Of the events which happened, reader, when we were yet `in the
dark night of our fore-beings,' or ever the stars, or the moon
walking in brightness, or the sunglorious shadow and faint
type of
God
!had touched our mortal vision, who shall tell?
The time gone is a dream; the time to come, unknown.
Truly
did one of yore say, as he discoursed of sepulchral mementoes,
and turned his thoughts to the lofty structures of Egyptian
ambition
:
`Time sadly overcometh all things, and is now dominant,
and sitteth upon a sphynx, and looketh unto Memphis and old
Thebes; while his sister, Oblivion, reclineth semi-somnous on a
pyramid, making puzzles of Titanian erections, and
turning old
glories into dreams
. History sinketh beneath her cloud. The
traveller, as he paceth amazedly through those deserts, asketh of
her who builded them, and she
mumbleth something,
but what it
is, he heareth not.' Thus it is, that the position of our being
defies
all primary or ultimate inquiry. If we look back, there is a
point where knowledge fades into conjecture; if onward, we
stand upon the border of a sea which has but
one shore,
and
whose heavings beyond are infinite and eternal! Of what avail
is it, then, that we bend over the lore of antiquity, or wax pale
over the lamp of midnight; that we walk in the fields, catching
the faint utterance of the voice of
God
? We spend our strength
for naught: the clouds roll with an uncomprehended impulse;
the wave heaves, the verdure brightens, the wind turneth in its
circuitsbut what are we? We drink the sunshine and the
breeze; passions warm us; doubt overshadows, hope inspires,
fear haunts us: but we are still in mystery. Pleasure and pain
are equally uncertain; the morrow is in a mist, and yesterday is
nothing. Our friends die;
God
changes their countenance and
takes them away; and where is the balm for so bitter a sting?
It is to consider the earth as no abiding place; to rely on a power
beyond our own; to disdain the sneer of the bigot, the hot
language of the zealot, and to cherish in one's heart of hearts
that essence of the beatitudes
the religion of life
.
Let
no vain hopes deceive the mind:
No happier let us hope to find
To-morrow than to-day:
Our golden dreams of yore were bright
Like them the present shall delight,
Like them decay.
Our lives like hastening streams must be,
That into one engulfing sea
Are doomed to fall:
The sea of deathwhose waves roll on,
O'er king and kingdom, crown and throne,
And swallow all!
Alike the river's lordly pride,
Alike the humble rivulet's glide
To that sad wave;
Death levels poverty and pride,
And rich and poor sleep side by side,
Within the grave!
To
this
complexion at last must we come; and our
questionings
of the elements, or of the mind, are alike in vain. How
often has passionate Grief invoked the hosts of heaven to restore
the lost! Yet when the clod has once fallen with its hollow
sound upon the coffin lid; when its melancholy echo has sunk
unheard over the tuneless ear of Death, who that has stood by,
and heard the requiem for the departed soul, but has wondered
for its flight? Where is the heart that has not poured forth its
plaint, amid the stillness of the night, when the ear
`From echoing hill or thicket, oft has seemed
To hear celestial voices?'
It is then that the soul longs for
the astrologer's power
the
consultation of the stars. Among these orbs, gemming the night
with lustre, where do the Departed dwell? Who can pierce the
blue mystery above, to tell? There they shine from age to age;
glorious clusters, flooding the empyrean with paths of light, and
looking down in beauty on the mutations of a `wicked and
perverse
world!' Is it among those floating jewels, scattered from
the crown of the Almighty, where the prismatic light gleams from
the gates of Paradise, that the wicked cease from troubling, and
the weary are at rest?
`
Answer
me, burning stars of night,
Where hath the spirit gone,
That past the reach of human sight
Even as a breeze hath flown?
And the stars answer me: `We roll
In light and power on high,
But of the never-dying soul,
Ask that which cannot die!'
By
the way, I would not speak too reverently of astrology;
for I consider it a mythological humbug, which was exploded at
Belshazzar's feast. When that distinguished personage was in
the midst of his entertainment; when the lamps shone brightly
over fair women and brave men; there came a passage of
supernatural
chirography over against him on the wall of his palace,
which he could not decipher. Scratching his royal head, in
grievous doubt, he called unto him his astrologers and
soothsayers
,
(celestial proof-readers,) but `they could not make known
unto him the interpretation of the thing.' Ever since reading this
sketch of that princely dinner, I have had a great distrust of your
star-gazers. I am of this mind with Browne: `We do not
reject
or condemn a sober and regulated astrology; we hold there
is more truth therein than in astrologers; in some more than
many allow, yet in none so much as some pretend. We deny
not the influence of the stars, but often suspect the due
application
thereof; for though we should affirm that all things were in
all things; that heaven were but earth celestified, and earth but
heaven terrestrified; or that each part had an influence upon its
divided affinity below, yet how to single out these relations, and
duly to apply their actions, is a work oft-times to be effected by
some revelation and
cabala
from above, rather than any
philosophy
or speculation here below. What power soever they have
upon our bodies, it is not requisite they should destroy our
reasons
that
is, to make us rely on the strength of Nature, when
she is least able to relieve us; and when we conceive heaven
against us, to refuse the assistance of the earth, created for us.'
Talking
of stars, leads me to astronomy, and thence to the
calculations of the exact sciences, whereby that prescience of
the future, which approaches divinity, and seems to snatch a
prerogative
from the Almighty, is revealed. The
profanum vulgus,
even, have a dim but
indefinable
reverence for figurative lore.
Thus
Teddy O'Rourke,
in the play, when he usurps the place
of my learned friend, Doctor
O'Toole,
after the `
Salve
Dominum
!
'
of Doctor
Flail,
and the puzzling reply of `
Scumulum
Tag'roogeen!
' goes on to bewilder himself in the mazes of `
cataphysics
,'
and the literature of `the Thabans, the Russians, the
Turks, and the rest of the Greeks,' and winds up with the
knockdown
conclusion, `
Thim's mathematics!
'
But
that's neither here nor there. I wish to touch upon a
subject familiar to every youth who has handled a pen while a
student, and sat up till midnight to court the
nine,
when he should
have been in bed by
ten
. I mean the producing of tributes for
albums. Oh! bore of bores! How many despairing digits, at
the command of young virgins, have ploughed themselves into
the dandriff of the unpractised writer, in order to procure one or
two ideas to dilute into an album! No one can tell the amount
of misery that is inflicted in this way upon the youthful portions
of mankind. There is no release from a thraldom of this kind;
and if by dogged obstinacy you should happen to effect your
redemption
thence, you are like the `Prisoner released from the
Bastile,' whereof all juveniles have read. No one will know you;
you will be cut by the lover of your bright-eyed cousin, and by
herself. In fact, one might as well stipulate wantonly for a bad
epitaph from a cutter of tomb-stones, as to attempt release from
the scribblative obligation. There is no discharge in that war of
the pen. For me, I can say with the apostle, that if all I had
recorded in albums, from a desire to preserve my female
friendships
,
and to do what is denominated `the
handsome
thing,' `I
suppose
the world could not contain the books that had been written.'
Once, however, I was put to my trumps. A respectable
milliner
,
who had made a beautiful bonnet for a cousin, desired her,
as a special favor, to procure me to `head the list' of contributors
to her album. I received the volume. It was a
blank-book,
and
the first two pages were devoted to memoranda of disposed-of
millinett, dimity, ribbons, gros-de-naps, and so forth. The pages
were ruled across in
blue,
and rectangularly, near the outer edge,
in
red,
forming squares for the register of dollars and cents. A
thought struck me, that I could make a novel
hit
in the
ars
poetica
,
by bringing in
figures
to my aid. `
Figures,
' thought I,
`are certainly allowable in poetry; and though I cannot flatter
the vanity of the fair owner of this quarto, (for she was very nice
and very pretty, except that one of her optics leered askew,) in
my verse, perhaps I may do it in my motto.' For that I drew
upon the Scriptures: and the sum total of the whole followeth:
`TO MISS LUCRETIA SOPHONISBA MATILDA JERUSHA CATLING:
Thou
hast ravished my heartthou hast ravished my heart with
one
of thine
eyes! Thy neck is like the tower of David, builded for an armory, whereon there
hang a thousand bucklers, all shields of mighty men. How beautiful are thy feet,
with shoes!
Thy neck is as a tower of ivory: thine eyes like the fish-pools in Heshbon,
by the gate of Bath-Rabbin: thy nose is as the tower of Lebanon, which looketh
toward
Damascus. How fair and pleasant art thou, O love, for delights!'
[
From the Canticles, or the Song of Songs, as originally written by Solomon,
and sung by him at Jerusalem, with great applouse
.]
Thou
canst not hope, oh! nymph divine,
That I should ever court the
9
Or that when passion's glow is done,
My heart can ever love but
1
When from Hope's flowers exhales the dew,
Then Love's false smile deserts us
2
Then
Fancy's radiance' gins to flee,
And life is robbed of all the
3
And Sorrow, sad, her tears must pour
O'er cheeks where roses bloomed be
4-19
Yes! life's a scene all dim as Styx;
Its joys are dear at
3
f
6
Its raptures fly so quickly hence,
They're scarcely cheap at
18
d
Oh! for the dreams that then survive!
They're high at pennies
25
The breast no more is filled with heaven,
When years it numbers
27
And yields it up to Manhood's fate,
About the age of
28
Finds the world cold, and dim, and dirty,
Ere the heart's annual count is
30
Alas! for all the joys that follow,
I would not give a
quarter-dollar!
251.97
This, charming
artiste,
is the sum
To which life's added items come.
If into farther sums I stride,
I see the figures multiplied.
Subtract the profit ones from those
Whose
all
to loss untimely goes,
And in the aggregate you find
Enough to assure the thinking mind
That there's an overplus of evil,
Enough to fright the very d1!
Thus, my dear maid, I send to you
The balance of my metre due;
Please scrutinize the above amount,
And set it down in my account;
A wink to a horse is as good as a nod
Your humble servant,
Ollapod
.
By
the way, is it not wonderful, that though in relation to
celestial
prospects, figures cannot lie, yet in terrestrial matters they
are mendacious to the last degree? It is even so. There are
numerous
improvements in our country, for example, which a few
years ago would have been stigmatized as the dream of the
minstrel
,
now apparent as the certainties of fact. Who, ten years
since, would have thought of a
ship canal
from the lakes to the
ocean!passing through fertile regions, bearing the white sail
on its waters, the wealth of the interior, and the stores of Ormus
or of Ind on its bosom! Yet a few years, and the wilderness
which once was barren, shall resound with the hum of commerce,
be dimmed with the smoke of cities, and astonished with the
bustle
of mercantile life. We are not a stationary people: we go
onward; and if the best spirit that ever was filled of yore with
high dreams of hope for the country, were now among us, what
would be the scene of its vision?
Imagination
furls her wing,
and lets
Reality
take the lead.
But I forbear. I am at my sheet's edge. Hereafter I will
seize the theme, now but begun,
`and bear it with me, as the storm
Bears the cloud onward.'
Till then, gentle reader, I am wholly thine.
Ollapod,
NUMBER EIGHTEEN.
April,
1837.
Kind Reader:
All eyes of late have been turned toward
Washington. The last process of president-making has there
been perfected, and the beauty of the republican system made
manifest. The national metropolis, which is indeed, and
punning
aside, a
capital
place, was crowded to abundant repletion.
Men, it is said, in the annals of that week, slept wheresoever
they could place their superabounding skulls; some in rail-cars,
some in the corners of suburban fences, and others, like the
harvests
of old, were `gathered into barns,' consorting with jealous
rats, and provident mousers; lashed by the scampering tails of
the one, and visited by the omniscient whiskers of the other.
In truth, from all we hear, it was a pressing time altogether, and
the bed-market was never so
tight
before in the memory of the
oldest inhabitant of Washington. But why should I enlarge upon
this pointan imaginary one as far as I am concerned?
`Of the people that suffered from evils that were,
I can not tellfor I was not there.'
But the pressure thitherward has awakened the remembrance
of a visit to that region some dozens of moons ago.
Washington
is always
sui generis,
in its main features; and turnpikes,
sheets of water, with towns and cities, do not change materially
in so short a time.
Every one who has crossed the line of Mason and Dixon,
knows what sort of a river the Delaware is. On one side, as
thou goest toward the south, from the city of
Penn,
thou
perceivest
the low shore of Jersey, calm and green; on the other,
in the direction of the occident, may be seen the undulating
slopes and swells of Pennsylvania, melting into distance; before
thee is the crystal river, an affrighted member of the
ichthyological
tribe, frightened by the coming boat, springing now and then
from its bosomsaltation by steam.
Consider me on my way to the City of Distances. The
difference
between the two shores and states is preserved, as far as
you go. I pointed out to my friends, G. W. Cand Le
Compte Cl, the beauty of the scenes we were passing.
The latter enjoyed them with that keen and relishing sense,
natural in one but a few months in the country, `and sharp with
his eyes.' The tame canals of Europe, the
trekschuyt,
and the
sleepy landscapes from its portals of observation, were contrasted
with the free and majestic movement of our good steamer, and
the scenes from its airy deck, or its cabin windows.
We
are on the Chesapeake. It is early autumn. A few frosts
have descended upon the woodlands, whose painted masses hang
over the edge of the distant wave, like an ocean of rainbows,
just breaking in turbulence upon a lake of pure and molten
silver
.
Golden flashes of sunshine play in tremulous lines for
miles along the wave; the distant sail flits into indistinctness, and
the duck, poising its wing on the western gale, skims the blue
ridges in the south-east like the messenger of a spirit, dropping
ever and anon to float on its nest on the billow, and turn its quick
iris to the smoky craft, gliding like a `sea chimera' on the distant
waste.
The
approach to Baltimore was likest to magic. A long pile
of rosy clouds, whether the incense of the city, or the offspring
of the bay, clung to the base of the town, steeped in the gushes
of the sunset, and extending for miles on either hand. Above
these clouds rose the domes of cathedrals, churches, and
minsters
!
and over all, the slender but simple and majestic shaft, at
which whosoever looketh, he shall be instantly reminded of the
Father of his Country, the immortal
Washington
. It springs
toward the heavens with a plain but a commanding austerity.
There, around the crowning statue, breathes the air of freedom;
there circulates the sunlight which gilds the pinion of the eagle,
or lights the plumage of the dove, as she sails to her rest.
The
City of Monuments is worth a week of observation.
When thou touchest that spot, oh, Tourist! rest thee there
awhile. Go forth into the town. Remain not too long at morn
over Barnum's rich coffee and cakes, nor at noon over his wines,
those succulent, magical things, but get thee out into the
thorough-fares
.
Convey yourself to the Holiday-street Temple; and if
the gas
be
dubiously fragrant, thou wilt get respectable dramatics,
and thine evening shall be well nigh spent ere it seem begun.
Baltimore,
like Boston, is a city of ups and downs. It is
memorable to me; for it was in that city of monuments that I
had well nigh lost my life. That spice of the adventurous which
has accompanied me from my earliest days, led me to ascend the
long ladder, said to have been some seventy feet high, placed on
the outside of the great dome of the cathedral, then undergoing
repairs. The upward distance lent an enchantment to my eye,
which was irresistible. I fancied that the view from the `topmost
round' of those tapering ladders, tied together with ropes, would
be
magnificent
. I was not disappointed. The bay melted afar
into the iris-blue of air; that golden edging, which hangs over
forest tops and waters in summer, whose tremulousness makes
the eye ache with gazing, and fills the heart with happy and
ethereal
feelings. Landward, the country spread brightly around,
seamed with brown roads, and fading afar into apparent ridges,
and swells of cedar-green. It was a calm and cheerful day, and
every object in unison one with another. The air was rarefied
and sweet; the last odor of the latest flowers of summer seemed
floating by in the sunshine: and I fancied that the voices of
summer-birds
,
taking their farewells for distant climes, were mingling
with them. The shipping in the harbor sent every pennon to the
gale; the flag-staffs waved their signals, and, what with the fresh
breeze, and the beauty of the morning, it really seemed a
galaday
.
After having fed my eyes with the beauty of the scene, from
the extreme height of the ladder, the voices of the workmen in
the cupola, or on the balustrade above, making a pleasant hum
in my ear, I prepared to descend. But the moment I looked
toward
the earth, a
dizziness
came upon me, which almost led me
to instantaneous self-abandonment. My brain reeled, my eyes
grew dim; a sleepy sensation crept over me; the whole
cathedral
seemed to recede from my gaze; and for a moment I
seemed
as if sailing in the air. I had not descended more than a
dozen rounds, when my tottering steps and trembling hands
really seemed to refuse their office. My sickness increased, and
a languor crept over my perceptions, like the effect of an
anodyne
.
I felt myself absolutely becoming
indifferent
to my peril,
though I knew it well. I was in truth as if in a dream; and I
can safely aver, that I felt myself losing all consciousness, when
I heard one of the laborers aboveand the words came to my
ear as if from the supernatural lips of a spirit`
My God! that
young gentleman is going to full!
'
This sentence went like fire to my brain, and rolled like a flood
of lava over every nerve. It restored me instantly to a full
perception
of my case, and my course. I grasped the rounds of
the ladder with the firmness which a drowning man exhibits
when clutching, in the bubbling groan of his last agony, at the
slenderest spar. Every foot-fall shook the ladder from end to
end; and when I touched the ground, I felt precisely as if
rescued
from the grave.
From
Baltimore to Washington, the route is what one might
call
dull
. Such, at least, was the impression of the road upon
our party of three and a servant, as we wheeled over the yellow
line, y'clept a turnpike. The view therefrom is limited, being
confined to a few brown landscapes, describing, as it were, a
stone's-throw-radius on either hand. One stirring scene,
however
,
I must needs except. There is a point, as you go from
Baltimore, Washington-ward, where the former city lifts itself in
supreme beauty along the line of the horizon. Dome, tower,
and temple, point their glowing indices toward that heaven to
which their ministering spirits guide the way; a wide lapse of
silver bounds the view; and over all, like a pyramid above the
plains of Memphis or of Thebes, or like to the Needles, named
of her who wooed an
Anthony
to her bosom, and who fed
from those fair orbs the scorpion which killed her; rose that thin
shaft which commemorates the fame of
Washington,
the
Saviour
of his Country
. As I turned my head, (thrust forth in
search of the picturesque, from the window of our coach), to
survey the parting glories of that tall white column, my heart
swelled into my throat; for, my dear American reader, I am
peculiarly susceptible of patriotic influences. A sign-post, with
Washington
at its top, calls forth my admiration. I have wept
at the plaudits of an audience at the theatre, when the falling of
a new drop-curtain has disclosed the form or features of the
Pater Patri
. Simple, republican, austere in honor, sublime in
war, beloved in peace; when shall we look upon his like again?
I am not of those who fancy that any eulogy can be misused
upon his memory; nor do I think that terms and tributes, though
often repeated, can ever grow familiar or aged, when applied to
his name. Therefore I offer, as the best
synopsis
of his merits,
a stanza which may be familiar to many, and yet new to the
majority of those who now follow my words:
`
His
was Octavian's prosperous star
The rush of Csar's conquering car,
At Battle's call;
His Scipio's virtue; his the skill
And the indomitable will
Of Hannibal:
His was Aurelius' soul divine,
The clemency of Antonine,
And generous will:
In tented field and bloody fray,
An Alexander's vigorous sway,
And stern command:
The faith of Constantineay, more
The fevent love Camillus bore
His native land.'
The sun had gone to bed in a pile of fleecy and feathery
clouds, flushed like the heart of a summer rose, long before we
had reached the Great Capital. A storm came on; the rain
pattered heavily against our carriage-window; and when we first
caught the reflection of lights against them from the lamps in the
vicinity of the capitol, it seemed as if we had embarked in a
vehicle, chartered by Pheton, to be conveyed whithersoever his
eccentric whipship would.
A presentation
at the American court, at a private
audience
,
and with a foreign functionary, is not an ordinary matter
of your working-day world. With anticipations of this sort, so
it was that I was awakened by our attendant in a crowded
sky-parlor
at
Gadsby's
through whose uppermost casement I looked
and saw the splendors of an autumnal morning sun streaming
over the capital, at the distant end of Pennsylvania Avenue.
But what a strange mlange of town and country between!
Fields near at hand; rural waters twinkling nigh; and at long
intervals, the indications of a city. One finds no direct chance
of deciding upon his whereabout. At first, he fancies it may be
rus in urbe;
at the next moment, he concludes himself surrounded
cum urbs in rure
. Thenceforth, those abstru'se mysteries, the
points of a compass; properly belonging to the shipman's card,
and not manipulated by lubbers o' the land; become to him
inexplicable
enigmas. He knows the contradistinction of heads
and heels, barely; all facts beyond outventure his philosophy.
There
is a halo of `glorification,' after all, about a
functionary
,
high in office and place, which makes the heart of your
humble denizen beat quicker, as he approaches the imperial den.
Thus it was with me, as our coach wheeled up to the mansion
where le Compte was to find himself accredited. The
ceremonies
on such occasions are pleasant to the spectator, and though
simple, are imposing. A group of gray-heads and time-worn
forms; expressions of polite regards, in different accents and
various
language; bows and kind assurances, are the staple scenes
and sounds on such occasions.
At the same time, it is right republican to see the President,
with a free-and-easy air, ask his Secretary of State to light a
paper that he may convey the blaze thereof to a pipe, the stem
of which would not measure in length more than three inches,
and the smoke from the bowl thereof would coil up within a
hair's breadth of the presidential nose. It reminds one of those
calm and luxurious times, signalized in the reign of
Wouter
Van Twiller,
in the days when the
Knickerbockers,
pyramids
of their day and generation, towered aloft in Dutch and
daring
dignity.
Among
the fair women of that day and hour, was the gifted
and accomplished **** L. Song, it was said, had breathed
around her footsteps from lyres of fame; and one devoted bard,
(so Rumor breathes) poured after her when abroad, the song that
ensueth. He had heard, erroneously, that she was dead:
`TO CORA.
I.
`
I sang
to thee my matin hymn
In life's auspicious hour,
Ere the sunlight of joy grew dim,
O'er beauty's vernal bower;
For all the wealth of heaven above,
And all beneath the sea,
I would not then have sold the love
Thou freely gav'st to me.
II.
`When youth's bright hopes began to fail,
I sung an altered strain
The farewell to the fading sail
That bore thee o'er the main;
And as I pressed thy gentle form,
And heard thy parting vow,
Thy kisses on my lips were warm,
Thy tears were on my brow!
III.
`Still fall those tears? Sweet mourner, no!
Beyond the unquiet wave,
Thy broken heart forgot its wo,
But only in the grave!
There Memory weepswhile trusting Love
Looks through the clouds of even,
To view thine angel form above,
A habitant of heaven!'
Nothing can well be prettier, or more pathetic, than this
effusion
;
yet the catastrophe part, as my friend of the Albany Argus
would say, was `gratuitous.' The parties afterward, mayhap,
read it together, and pointed out the chronological inaccuracies;
which reminds me, or
might
remind me, of a circumstance lately
related in one of the western papers, where a gentleman who had
been advertised as deceased, wrote a polite note to the editor of
the journal, (who had thus among his
personal
ship-news
recorded
a false clearance for eternity), somewhat as follows:
`My Dear Sir:
Will you allow me to correct a slight statement in your
last, with reference to my death? I am grateful for the compliments to my
character in your obituary notice, and I believe them
deserved
. That I
tried to do the handsome thing while I lived, is most true; true, too, is it, that
I never backed out of a fight, and never saw the man that could whip me,
when alive; and I say the same yet, `being dead,' according to your story.
But when you state, that I left my affairs unsettled, and my widow and
those eleven children unprovided for, I have only to state, that
you lie in
your throat!
I mean no offence in what I say; I speak in the aggregate
sense of the term. Being a dead man, and printed
down
as such in your
columns, I am incapable of mortal resentments; but I leave as my avengers,
Cain, Abel,
and
Simpkins,
printers and publishers of the
Occidental
Trumpet and Mississippi Battle-Axe
. To the editor of that paper, I submit
my fame. To his indomitable coolness, never yet ruffled by repeated
contumely
,
and invulnerable to contempt, I confide my reputation: feeling
certain that one who has never found satisfaction for an insult, (nor sought
it indeed,) can fail to be a champion in my cause. That he may be in peril
in my advocacy, is possible; but he knows how to shun it. He is
independent
,
for he is unknown; he is fearless, for no man will touch a hair of
his head. To that important
Gulliven,
in whatsoever cave or fastness he
may dwell, I surrender my fame.
Yours, 'till death,
Roswell Adams Greene
.'
13
But I wander, and I recall my rambling spirit back to the
American capital.
Attended
church. 'Tis a dull business in Washington.
One's devotional feelings, that in ordinary cities kindle and rise
heavenward, at the anthems of the choir, or the pealing of the
organ, come down, in the metropolis of the republic, to the
shallow
and factitious distinctions of this common sphere of earth.
The preachers at Washington have been variously described.
Just before the session of the National Legislature, as at the
period of which I speak, crowds of the reverend cloth convene,
for the chaplaincy of Congress, and other purposes. Of course,
as many of these as can, accomplish the entr to the
metropolitan
desk, to display their powers. The divine I had the
happiness
to hear, in some respects resembled the man whom my dear
lamented
Sands
described in his `Scenes at Washington.'
Argument
was his hobby; and he would curtail a sentence of
its dimensions, and subvert all gleanings, scriptural, historical, or
political, to fortify the same. He reminded me of that queer and
rural divine, of whom I have heard in Massachusetts, who found
his congregation indulging in all the extravagances of provincial
fashion, and rebuked them
en masse,
(especially the fairer part,
who indulged in flaunting top-knots, and dresses of the head),
by choosing for one of his sermons the following text:
`
Top-knot
come down!'
From this text he deduced a world of sacred
ratiocination. He expatiated upon the uselessness of top-knots,
and enlarged upon his scriptural injunction that they should come
down. Toward the close of his sermon, he confessed that he
had merely adopted a
clause;
but he said that any detached
sentence, even, from Holy Writ, was profitable for
reproof
and
instruction
. `The context of the clause,' he added, `I will now
join with the text. It is thus written; `Let him that is on the
house-
top not come down
.' Comment is unnecessary!
There
is a story of this same man of
God,
now gathered to
his fathers, (or named at least of him,) for which I have great
respect
.
It seems that he encountered a confirmed infidel one
evening
at a donation-party; a man who respected the pastor of the
town, though he did not credit his doctrines. By accident, they
engaged in a controversy, and the infidel endeavored to prove, by
Holy Writ, in the same text-choosing method for which his
opnent
was proverbial, that the priests of old were drunkards, and
that they imbibed `potations pottle deep,' in public.
`How do you prove that? Give me an instance,' said the
clerical gladiator.
`Well,' was the reply, `look at the coronation of
Solomon,
where it is expressly stated that Zadok, the priest who anointed
him, `
took a horn
.' '
`Yes,' said he of the cloth, `but you do n't give the whole
passage, which is this: `And Zadok the priest took a horn
of
oil,
and anointed Solomon,' '
`I did not say what he did with his horn,' rejoined the infidel;
`I only contended that he
took
it.'
`Good, very good!' responded the divine, warming at the quiz
which he saw was directed towards himself: `you are ingenious
in your argument; but I can prove by the Scriptures, in the
same way, that instead of being here, resolving doubts and
disputing
with me, you should be swinging on a gallows at this
moment
,
by your own consent and deed.'
`No, no;
that's
beyond your skill; and if you will establish
what you propose, by any kind of ratiocination, I will confess my
deserts, as soon as they are shown.'
`Agreed. Now do we not read in the Bible, that `Judas went
and hanged himself?' '
`Yes, we do.'
`Do you not find in another part of the Sacred Word, `
Go
thou and do likewise?
' '
`Yes; you have proved that as far as you go. What next?'
`Only one clause more,' replied the divine. The Bible also
says, `
What thou doest, do quickly
.' Now, my friend, go and
hang yourself at once!'
`Not till I show you the text to your charity sermon, preached
for the Widow's Society in Boston, last spring. Here it is;
and there is a word there, which you either have not properly
written or properly read.'
Saying this, he drew a pamphlet from his pocket, and pointed
to the opening passage. It ran thus: `Then he rebuked the
winds, and the sea, and lo! there was a great
clam!
' `Why do
bring your texts to such an amphibious and testaceous
termination
?'
The good man was thunderstruck. He acknowledged that
there was an error; but he contended that shell-fish might have
existed at that ancient period:
`E'en though vanquished, he could argue still.'
Unfortunately,
typical mutations in published
mss
. have
come down to the present day. Not many moons since, I was
called upon by a small and humble-looking person, in green
spectacles
,
behind which there rolled two enormous gray eyes. He
said he was a man of many occupations, and sometimes dabbled
in literature. He had thoughts of buying some western lands,
if any one would credit him for six years, and in that way make
his fortune. A friend in Texas had also assured him that he
could get some lots there on the same terms. In these
enterprises
he wished me to join him. But first, and before showing
me some poetry which had been spoilt in the publication, he
wished me to loan him a shilling, and accept his note to that
amount, `with sixty days to run.' A humorous thought struck
me, and I chose the latter, with the direction that he should try
it for discount at the United States' Bank. The next day I
received
a carefully-written `business letter' from him, which (after
promising to call on me in an hour after I received it) contained
the ensuing:
December
17.
`
My Dear Sir
:
I have had an interview with Mr.
Biddle,
and truly
lament
my inability to communicate satisfactory results. I fear that until the
resolution of the Senator from Ohio, in regard to the repeal of the Treasury
order, is finally disposed of, the trading interests will materially suffer.
`The Board of Directors, however, have some reason to indulge in the
pleasing hope, that a small keg of ten-cent-pieces will arrive from Tinnlcum,
some time during the ensuing week; in which case, the president has
promised
to exert his influence in my behalf on the next discount-day.
`If we should be successful in ultimately elevating the breeze (raising the
wind) on my promissory note, we can proceed without delay to our
contemplated
acquisitions in Michilimackinac lands, and Texas scrip.
`Your obedient friend,
Zebedee Fussy
'.
He was with me, almost before I had read his letter. `Ah!'
said he, `reading my scroll, I see. Funny circumstance. But
never mind. You make pieces sometimes for the
Knickerbocker
,
don't you?apt kind o' pieces, that come out of your
head? I borrow that there periodical, sometimes, of a friend,
and I seen a piece-t there about a man who was the `Victim of
a Proof-reader.' I am one of that class. Two years ago I was in
love. I was
jilted
. Hang details; the upshot is the main thing.
Well, I had tried the young lady, and found her wanting; and I
thought I would quote a line of Scripture onto her, as a motto
for some bitter and reproachful verses.' So, holding a
manuscript
in one hand high up, and placing the other arm a-kimbo,
he read as follows:
`TO ONE FOUND WANTING.
`
Mene, mene, tekel upharsin!
'
Scripture
.
`
Thou
art no more, what once I knew
Thy heart and guileless tougue to be;
Thou art no longer pure and true,
Nor fond, to one who knelt to thee;
Who knelt, and deemed thee all his own,
Nor knew a dearer wish beside;
Who made his trembling passion known,
And looked to own thee for a bride.
`What is the vow that once I heard
From those balm-breathing lips of thine?
Broken, ah! broken, word by word,
E'en while I worshipped at thy shrine!
Broken by thee, to whom I bowed,
As bends the wind-flower to the breeze,
As bent the Chaldean, through the cloud,
To Orion and the Pleiades.
`But thou art lost! and I no more
Must drink thy undeceiving glance;
Our thousand fondling spells are o'er
Our raptured moments in the dance.
Vanished, like dew-drops from the spray
Are moments which in beauty flew;
I cast life's brightest pearl away,
And, false one, breathe my last adieu!'
Here he stopped, his gray eyes rolling in a wild frenzy, and
drew a newspaper from his breeches pocket. `Sir,' said he,
striking an attitude, `I sent them verses for to be printed into the
`
Literary Steam-boat and General Western Alligator
.' It is a
paper, Sir, with immense circulation. A column in it, to be read
by the boatmen and raftsmen of the west, is immortality. I say
nothing. Just see how my effusion was butchered.
I
can't
read it.'
I took the paper, a little yellow six-by-eight folio, and read
thus:
`TO ORE, FOUND WASHING.
`
Mere, mere, treacle, O'Sartin!
'
Sculpture
.
`
Thou
hast no means, at once to slew
Thy beasts, and girdless tongues to tree;
Thou hast no l'argent, pure and true,
Nor feed, for one who knelt to thee:
Who knelt, and dreemed thy all his own,
Nor knew a drearer wish betidle,
Who maid his tumbling parsnips known,
And looked to arm thee for a bridle!
What
is
the row? what once I heard
From those brow-beating limps of thine?
Brokers! oh, brokers! one by one,
E'en while I worshipped at thy shine!
Broker by three! to whom I lowed,
As lends the wind-flaw to the tries!
As burst the chaldron thro' the clod,
To Onions, and the fleas as dies!
But thou art lost! and I no more
Mus dirk thy undeceaving glance;
One thous & friendly squills are o'er,
Our ruptured moments in the dance!
Varnished, like dew-drops from the sprag,
Are moments which in business flew!
I cut life's brightest peal a-wag,
And, false one, break my busta dieu!
On breaking into a loud laugh at the utter stupidity of this
typical metamorphosis, I found that the stranger grew red in the
face. He snatched the paper from my hand, and disappeared, making his bow as he retired.
And, beloved reader, having exceeded my boundaries, let me
do the same.
Thine till doomsday,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER NINETEEN.
August,
1837.
Whether
you be gentle or simple, reader, whether poetical
or prose enamored, you have been free from any inflictions or
productions of mine, whichsoever you may please to call them,
any time these several months. If the omission has been
grievvous
,
you may have had a monition that your life is not all
sunshine
,
many things being oft anticipated, which come not to hand
of him that desireth them; if pleasing, you are now reminded,
that pleasures of a sublunary character are too brief to have long
uniform continuance, since `diuturnity of delight is a dream, and
folly of expectation.' So much for prefatory philosophy.
Plato
,
when he paced along the olive walks, beneath the groves of
Academe, or listened to the prattle of shining Grecian streams
of yore, never knew what it was to meditate the exordium of a
magazine paper. As yet, when he flourished, `editors and
agents
of periodicals' never took prominent parts in university
processions
,
with toll-gate keepers, sea-serpents and American eagles,
as was jocosely related of the late conflagratory assemblage in the
edifice of Brown, on Providence Plantations.
By the way, I laughed extremely at the piece to which I
allude
,
which was full of delightsome and most facetious things,
right aptly conceited. It was an imaginary procession at Brown
University, on occasion of burning all the literary productions of
the students for the last five or six years. Had the sacrificial
mandate extended to the honorary members of her societies, then
would
Ollapod
have been obliged to be present with his
offering
to the insatiate elements; and with `survivors of the Boston
massacre, in coaches,' or `superannuated toll-keepers of the
Pawtucket Turnpike,' followed in the train of the great marine
visitor at Nahant, or that supposed bird, met by the dreamer (
immortalized
by the muse of
Sands
) who sailed a-night it in his
vision, what time his spectral charger waved to the breeze of
midnight
`the long, long tail, that glorified
That glorious animal's hinder side!'
I'll
warrant me a dozen of Burgundy, with all olives and
appurtenances
thereunto properly belonging, that this same
humorour
description gave offence to those who support the dignity of
a time-honored
alma-mater
. But they must have laughed in
their sleeves at the witty conception of it. Yet it is an old
saying
,
`A blow with a word strikes deeper than one with a sword.'
`Many men,' saith the profound old Democritus, Junior, `are as
much gauled with a jest, a pasquil, satyre, epigram, or the like,
as with any misfortune whatever. Princes and potentates, that
are otherwise happy, and have all at command, secure and free,
are grievously vexed with these pasquilling satyrs: they fear a
railing
Arctine,
more than an enemy in the field; which made
most princes of his time, as some relate, allow him a liberal
pension
,
that he should not tax them in his satyrs. The gods had
their Momus, Homer his Zoilus, Achilles his Thersites, Philip
his Demades; the Csars themselves in Rome were commonly
taunted. There was never wanting a Petronius, a Lucian, in
those times; nor will be a Rabelais, an Euphormio, a Boccalinus,
in ours. Adrian the Sixth, pope, was so highly offended and
grievously vexed with pasquils at Rome, he gave command that
satyre should be demolished and burned, the ashes flung into the
river Tiber, and had it done forthwith, had not Ludovicus, a
facete companion, dissuaded him to the contrary, by telling him
that pasquils would turn to frogs in the bottom of the river, and
croak worse and louder than before.' A right pithy description
is this, of the effect of wit and words.
I have
sometimes guffawed immeasurably, at the sharp cuts
and thrusts not seldom indulged by the current writers of our
country, both in periodicals and newspapers. Not that I par
ticularly affect the vapid abortions which appear in each
department
,
as now and then they must inevitably do; but names and
sources might readily be mentioned in both, whereat the general
lip shall curl you a smile, as if by intuition. Our magazines have
a goodly sprinkling of the cheerful; and in dull times, one can
but wish that they even had more. There is a spirit, and I
mentioned
but now the name of its incarnate habitation, which has
gone from among us, no more to return. Ah me!that spirit!
It was stored with sublunary lore; calm, philosophical, observant;
a lens, through which the colors of a warm heart, full of genuine
philanthropy and goodness, shone forth upon the world. It was
sportive in its satire, and its very sadness was cheerful.
Grasping
and depicting the Great, it yet ennobled and beautified the
Small. Its messengers of thought, winged and clothed with
beautiful plumage, went forth in the world, to please by their
changeableness, or to impress the eye of fancy with their
enduring
loveliness. Such was the spirit of
Sands,
whose light was
quenched for ever, while `inditing a good matter' for the very
pages which now embody this feeble tribute to his genius.
*
*
Robert C. Sands;
who, while engaged
in writing an article for the
Knickerbocker
Magazine, was struck with paralysis, and almost immediately expired.
Editor
.
I
well remember, when I first approached his native city, after his
death, how thick-coming were the associations connected with his
memory, which brought the tears into my eyes. The distant
shades of Hoboken, where he so loved to wander; the spreading
bay, whereon his `rapt, inspired' eye had so often rested; the
city, towering sleepily afar; the fairy hues of coming twilight,
trembling over the glassy Hudson, sloop-bestrown; the
half-silver
,
half-emerald shades, blending together under the heights of
Weehawkenthese, appealing to my eye, recalled the Lost to
my side. I looked to the shore, and there
`
The
shadows of departed hours
Hung dim upon the early flowers;
Even in their sunshine seemed to brood
Something more deep than solitude.'
No bard,
`holy and true,' was ever more deeply imbued than
Sands
with `the spirit of song.' Sublimity, tenderness,
description
,
all were his. But in his dissertations on all subjects, his
struggling humor at last came uppermost. From classic stores,
he could educe the novel
jeu d'esprit;
from fanciful premises,
the most amusing conclusions. Having given a pleasant line or
two from one of his happiest sketches, I feel irresistibly inclined
to encompass the whole. It is necessary beforehand, to discern
the preamble of the argument. A fellow-minstrel has indited and
published to the world a fanciful picture of the national eagle, in
all its original wildness, surrounded with characteristic scenery.
The subject is a grand one, but over-colored; and would seem
to have been drawn according to the admitted principle of the
writer in composition, that `whatever he writes is either
superlatively
good, or sheer nonsense.' The former quality sometimes
predominates; but there is enough of the latter in
all
he has
written. The minstrel just mentioned also gave birth to a
midnight
phantom, or the sketch of a most supernal steed; the
burlesque
presentment whereof is hereto annexed, together with
certain
allusions to the feathery emblem of the republic, which show
that the limner knew how to kill two rare objects with one
satirical
`fragment of granite:'
`
A misty
dreamand a flashy maze
Of a sunshiny flushand a moonshiny haze!
I lay asleep with my eyes open wide,
When a donkey came to my bedside,
And bade me forth to take a ride.
It was not a donkey of vulgar breed,
But a cloudy visiona night-mare steed!
His ears were abroad like a warrior's plume
From the bosom of darkness was borrowed the gloom
Of his dark, dark hide, and his coal black hair,
But his eyes like no earthly eyes they were!
Like the fields of heaven where none can see
The depths of their blue eternity!
Like the crest of a helmet taught proudly to nod,
And wave like a meteor's train abroad,
Was the long, long tail that glorified
That glorious donkey's hinder side!
And his gait description's power surpasses
'T was the beau ideal of all jack-asses.
I strode o'er his back, and he took in his wind
And he pranced before and he kicked behind
And he gave a snort, as when mutterings roll
Abroad from pole to answering pole
While the storm-king sits on the hail-cloud's back,
And amuses himself with the thunder-crack!
Then off he went, like a bird with red wings,
That builds her nest where the cliff-flower springs
Like a cloudy steed by the light of the moon,
When the night's muffled horn plays a windy tune;
And away I went, while my garment flew
Forth on the night breeze, with a snow-shiny hue
Like a streak of white foam on a sea of blue.
Up-bristled then the night-charger's hair too,
Like a bayonet grove, at a `shoulder-hoo!'
`Hurrah! hurrah! what a hurry we made!
My hairs rose too, but I was not afraid;
Like a stand of pikes they stood up all,
Each eye stood out like a cannon-ball;
So wrapt I looked, like the god of song,
As I shot and whizzed like a rocket along.
Thus through the trough of the air as we dash'd,
Goodly and glorious visions flash'd
Before my sight with a flashing and sparkling,
In whose blaze all earthly gems are darkling.
As the gushes of morning, the trappings of eve,
Or the myrind lights that will dance when you give
Yourself a clout on the orb of sight,
And see long ribands of rainbow light:
Such were the splendors and so divine,
So rosy and starry, and fiery and fine.
`Then eagle! then stars! and then rainbows! and all
That I saw at Niagara's tumbling fall,
Where I sung so divinely of them and their glories,
While mewed in vile durance, and kept by the tories;
Where the red cross flag was abroad on the blast,
I sat very mournful, but not downcast.
My harp on the willows I did not hang up,
Nor the winglets of fancy were suffered to droop,
But I soared, and I swooped, like a bird with red wings
Who mounts to the cloud-god, and soaringly sings.
`But the phantom steed in his whirlwind course,
Galloped along like Beelzebub's horse,
Till we came to a bank, dark, craggy, and wild,
Where no rock-flowers blushed, no verdure smiled
But sparse from the thunder-cliffs bleak and bare,
Like the plumage of ravens that warrior helms wear.
And below very far was a gulf profound,
Where tumbling and rumbling, at distance resound
Billowy cloudso'er whose bottomless bed
The curtain of night its volumes spread
But a rushing of fire was revealing the gloom,
Where convulsions had birth, and the thunders a home.
`You may put out the eyes of the sun at mid-day
You may hold a young cherubim fast by the tail
You may steal from night's angel his blanket away
Or the song of the bard at its flood-tide may stay,
But that cloud phantom donkey to stop you would fail!
`He plunged in the gulf't was a great way to go,
Ere we lit mid the darkness and flashings below;
And I lookedas I hung o'er that sulphurous light
Like a warrior of flame!on a courser of night!
But what I beheld in that dark ocean's roar,
I have partly described in a poem before,
And the rest I reserve for a measure more strong,
When my heart shall be heaving and bursting with song!
`But I saw, as he sailed 'mid the dusky air,
A bird that I thought I knew everywhere,
A fierce gray bird with a terrible beak,
With a glittering eye, and peculiar shriek:
`Proud Bird of the Cliff!' I addressed him then
`How my heart swells high thus to meet thee again!
Thou whose bare bosom for rest is laid
On pillows of night by the thunder-cloud made!
With a rushing of wings and a screaming of praise,
Who in ecstacy soar'st in the red-hot blaze!
Who dancest in heaven to the sound of the trump,
To the fife's acclaim, and bass-drum's thump!
Whence com'st thou,' I cried, `and goest whither?'
As I gently detained him by his tail-feather.
He replied, `Mr.
Neal!
Mr.
Neal!
let me loose!
I am not an eagle, but only a goose!
Your optics are weak, and the weather is hazy
And excuse the remark, but I think you are crazy.
Sands
was a lover of nature, with an affection `passing the
love of women;' and he entered into the very heart of her
mysteries
.
Lately, I made a pilgrimage to a scene which he has
depainted
,
in one of those quiet, rich, and noble sketches, which
have gained such celebrity to his pen. It was the
Kaatskills
.
It
fell on a day, when the guns and thunder of artillery
proclaimed
,
according to the Fourth-of-July orators, `the Birth-day
of Freedom,' that we made our way from the crowded city to the
majestic craft that was to convey us up the Hudson. What a
contrast did the embarkation scene present to the tranquil
Delaware
,
and the calm, sweet city of fraternal affection! Thousands
of garish pennons were abroad on the gale; the winds, as they
surged along on their viewless wings, were heavy with the sound
of cannon, the rolling of chariot-wheels, and the shouts of
multitudes
.
To me, it is an edifying and a thought-inspiring sight, to
look from the promenade-deck of a receding steamer upon a city,
as it glides into distance. The airy heights, dwelling-crowned,
around; the craft going to and fro; the thousand destinations of
the throngs that fill them: the hopes and fears that impel them.
Some are on errands of business; some, on those of pleasure:
`For every man hath business, and desire,
Such as it is,'
Yonder a gay ship, her sails filled with air and sunshine, hastens
through the Narrows. She is a packet, outward bound. We
see her as she goes. Within her are hearts sighing to leave their
native land; from tearful eyes there extends the level of the
telescope
which brings the distant near; and at some upper casement
in the town, a trembling hand waves the white 'kerchief, still
descried
;
at last it trembles into a glimmer; the ocean haze rises
between, and the bosom which it cheered goes below to heave
with the
nausea marina,
and feel the benefits of an attentive
steward.
It
is beautiful to ascend the Hudson, on the birth-day
christened
as aforesaid. On every green point where the breeze
rustles
the foliage, and around which the crystal waters roll, you
may see the grim ordnance, belching forth its thunder-clap and
grass wadding; the brave officers and `marshals of the day,'
sporting their emblems of immortal glory; the urchins, with
chequered pantaloons, and collars turned over their coats, their
tender hearts and warm imaginations excited and wild with the
grandeur of the scene; and as you pass some beautiful town, you
may see the stars and stripes waving from an eminence, near the
meeting-house or town hall; and as you pass the line of a street
which tends to the river, you may eke observe `the orator of the
day,' with his roll of patriotism and eloquence in his hand,
marching
sublimely onward, behind prancing chargers, heroes in gay
attire, meditating death to any possible foes of the country, on
any future battalious emergency; and sustained and soothed (he,
the orator) by the brattling of brass horns, and the roll of the
stirring drums behind him; the ladies, meanwhile
God
bless
them!looking neat and cheerful at the windows, or in the
streets. Then for the tourist to see the places in such a transit,
hallowed in his country's history; the old head-quarters of
Washington,
as at Newburgh, above whose humble roof, near
which one tall and solitary Lombard waved and whispered
mournfully in the air, there streamed a faded red banner, that
had caught the roll of the war-drum in the revolution, and rustled
its folds more quickly at the gun-peals that sent an iron storm
into invading breasts! And then, to think that millions on
millions
,
in `many a lovely valley out of sight,' in states, and
territories
stretching to the flowery prairies, and where the setting sun
flames along the far mountains of the west, the same anthems
were ascending; the same glorious love of country inculcated;
it is a train of thought ennobling, pure imperishable! Then it
is, that the mind has visions which no vocabulary can clothe and
wreak upon expression; when the faculties ache with that
indescribable
blending of love, hope, and pride, such as was faintly
shadowed by the minstrel, when he sang:
`
Breathes
there a man with soul so dead,
Who never to himself hath said,
This is my own, my native land!'
Presupposing
that a man is possessed of a soul, it is my
belief
that he cannot traverse the Hudson, even if it be for the
hundredth
time, without new and delicious sensations. The noble
shores, now broken into sweet and solemn vistas, until they
become
steeped in romance; the capacious bays; the swelling
sails; the craft of all sorts, hastening to and fro; all are
impressive
and beautiful. You have such a variety of steamer life
about you, too; that is the best of itodd congregations of
character. Yonder stands, looking at the shores, and now and
then at his watch, a man who, by his look, should be a divine.
He hath a white cravat around his neck, tied behind with extreme
closeness, at `the precise point betwixt ornament and
strangulation
.'
He proceedeth to the bow of the boat to look to his
luggage
.
Such a one I saw; and he was accosted, somewhat
abruptly
,
by a clock-pedlar, who had been whittling a pine shrub,
near the taffrail, (and whistling the
sublime
national song of
Yankee
Doodle, that most
dignified
effusion,) and who bespake him
thus: `Square, you do n't know nawthing about that young
woman
,
yender, do ye?with that lay-lock dress onto herdo ye?'
`No,' replied the ambassador from the high court above, `I do
not; and I wonder at your asking
me
such a question.'
`Why, I axed you, 'cause I seen you a-looking at her
yourself
;
and 'cause I think she's blamenation elegint!'
`That's enough, my friend; you had better run along,' was
the august reply; and the colloquy ended.
Paused
for a moment at Rhinebeck, to release a passenger in
a small boat, let down amid the agitated foam at the steamer's
side. How sad, that the beauties of a landscape should be
stained
by the memories of death! Here once lived, drinking the
spirit of golden youthful hours, and rejoicing in existence, a warm
and devoted friend, now alas! no more
John Rudolph
Sutermeister
. The pestilence, for such it was, swept him
from being, in the pride of his intellect, and the full flush of his
manhood. As I surveyed the place where he had embarked for
the last time for the metropolis, in whose romantic suburbs his
bones were so soon to lie, the illusion as it were, of a dream, came
over me, and I almost fancied I could see him coming on board.
I thought of the many pleasant hours we had consumed together,
in walks where romance and early friendship sanctified the groves,
as the red sun, tinting the lake, and closing the flowers, and
beautifying the tender woodlands of spring, went down behind
the cedars of the west, in a sea of gold, and crimson, and purple.
Those were blessed hours; moments when the enthusiasm, the
glowing hopes, the far-reaching thoughts, which take to
themselves
the wings of the eagle, and soar into the mysteries of
unborn
years, coloring the future from the gorgeous prism of the
imagination, all were ours. How, at that point of reminiscence,
did they throng back to my experience and my view! I fancied
that my friend was by my side, his arm in mine; and a voice, like
the tones of a spirit, seemed breathing in my ear:
`Yet
what binds us, friend to friend,
But that soul with soul can blend?
Soul-like were those hours of yore
Let us walk in soul once more.'
Poor Shade! He seemed ever to have a presentiment of his
coming and early doom; and his prophetic vision often pierced
the future, in lines akin to the solemn stanzas which close his
beautiful `Night Thoughts:'
`When
high in heaven the moon careers,
She lights the fountain of young tears;
Her rays play on the fevered brow;
Plays on the cheek now bright no more
Plays on the withered almond bough,
Which once the man of sorrow wore!
* * * * *
`Behold this elm on which I lean,
Meet emblem of my cruel fate;
But yestermorn, its leaves were green
Now it lies low and desolate!
The dew which bathes each faded leaf,
Doth also bathe my brow of grief.
Alas! the dews of
Death
too soon
Will gather o'er my dreamless sleep;
And thou wilt beam, O pensive moon,
Where love should mourn, and friends should weep!'
But he was translated to an early paradise, by the kind fiat of
a benevolent
God
. Pure in heart, fresh and warm in his
affections
,
he loved to live, because he lived to love; and he is now
in that better country,
`Where
light doth dance on many a crown,
From suns that never more go down.'
He had a languid but not unpleasing melancholy about his life,
which entered into his verse, and moaned from every vibration
of his excelling lyre. How beautiful, how touching, how
mournful
,
are these bodings in his song:
`Give
not to me the wreath of green
The blooming vase of flowers;
They breathe of joy that once hath been
Of gone and faded hours.
I cannot love the rose; though rich,
Its beauty will not last;
Give me, give me the bloom, o'er which
The early blight hath passed:
The yellow budsgive them to rest
On my cold brow and joyless breast,
When life is failing fast.
`Take far from me the wine-cup bright,
In hours of revelry;
It suits glad brows, and bosoms light
It is not meet for me;
Oh! I can pledge the heart no more,
I pledged in days gone by;
Sorrow hath touch'd my bosom's core,
And I am left to die;
Give me to drink of Lethe's wave
Give me the lone and silent grave,
O'er which the night-winds sigh!
`Wake not, upon my tuneless ear,
Soft music's stealing strain:
It can not soothe, it can not cheer
This anguish'd heart again:
But place th' olian harp upon
The tomb of her I love;
There, when heaven shrouds the dying sun,
My weary steps will rove;
As o'er its chords Night pours its breath,
To list the serenade of death,
Her silent bourne above!
`Give me to seek that lonely tomb,
Where sleeps the sainted dead,
Now the pale night-fall throws its gloom
Upon her narrow bed;
There, while the winds which sweep along
O'er the harp-strings are driven,
And the funereal soul of song
Upon the air is given,
Oh! let my faint and parting breath
Be mingled with that song of death,
And flee with it to heaven!'
One
picks up a marvellous degree of gratuitous and most
novel information from the miscellaneous people who pass hither
and thither in steam-craft. Bits of knowledge strike you
unaware
;
and if you believe it, you will be a much wiser man, when
you greet the morrow morn after a day's travel. For example,
when we had passed the shadowy highlands, and the Kaatskills
were seen heaving their broad blue shoulders against the brilliant
horizon, a man with a pot-belly, in a round-about, with a
bell-crowned
hat, over which was drawn a green oil-skin, shading his
tallowy cheeks, and most rubicund nose, approached my side,
and interrupted my reverie, by volunteering some intelligence.
`Them is very respectable mountains,' he said, `but a man do n't
know nothin' about articles of that kind, unless he sees the tower
of Scotland. I am not, as you may likely be about to inquire,
a natyve of that country; but I have saw friends which has been
there; and furthermore, the mountains there was all named after
relations of mine, by the mother's side. At present, all them
elewated sections of country is nick-named. Now the name of
Ben. Lomond has been curtailed into an abbreviation. That hill
was named after an uncle of my grandfather's, Benjamin Lomond.
Ben. Nevis was a brother of my grandmother's, who had the
same given name; and a better man than Benjamin Nevis never
broke bread, or got up in the morning. From all accounts, he
was consid'rable wealthy, at one time; though I've hear'n tell
since, that he was a bu'sted man. But just to think of all them
perversions! Is n't it 'orrid?' With this and other information
did this glorious volunteer in history break in upon my musings;
and when he turned upon his heel, and clattered away, he left me
with an impression of his visage in my mind akin to that which
the fat knight entertained of Bardolph: `Thou art our admiral;
thou bearest the lantern in the nose of thee; thou art the knight
of the burning lamp. I never see thy face, but I think of
hellfire
,
and Dives, that lived in purple; for there he is in his robes,
burning, burning.'
You
would scarcely think, arrived at Kaatskill Landing, on
the Hudson, that just before you enter the coach which conveys
you to the mountain, that any extraordinary prospect was about
to open upon your vision. True, as when on the water, the
great cloud Presence looms afar; yet there is a long level
country
between it and you; and it is too early in the day to drink in
the grandeur of the scene. You are content with watching the
complex operations of that aquatic and equestrian mystery, a
horse-boat, which plies from the humble tavern at the water's
edge to the other shore of the Hudson. The animals give a
consumptive
wheeze, as they start, stretching out their long necks,
indulging in faint recollections of that happy juvenescence, when
they wasted the hours of their colthood in pastures of clover, and
moving with a kind of unambitious sprawl, as if they cared but
little whether they stood or fell; a turn of mind which induces
them to stir their forward legs more glibly than those in the
opposite
quarter, quickening the former from pride, and `contracting
the latter from motives of decency.' This is said to be their
philosophy; and they act upon it with a religious devotion,
`worthy a better cause.'
As you move along from the landing, by pleasant and quiet
waters, and through scenes of pastoral tranquillity, you seem to
be threading a road which leads through a peaceful and
variegated
plain. You lose the memory of the highlands and the
river, in the thought that you are taking a journey into a country
as level as the lowliest land in Jersey. Sometimes the
mountains
,
as you turn a point of the road, appear afar; but `are they
clouds, or are they not?' By the mass, you shall hardly tell.
Meantime, you are a
plain-
traveller, a quiet man. All at once
you are wheeled upon a vernal theatre, some five or six miles in
width, at whose extremity the bases of the Kaatskills 'gin to rise.
How impressive the westering sunshine, sifting itself down the
mighty ravines and hollows, and tinting the far-off summits with
aerial light! How majestic yet soft the gradations from the
ponderous
grandeur of the formation; up, up, to the giddy and
delicate
shadowings, which dimly veil and sanctify their tops, as `
sacristies
of nature,' where the cedar rocks to the wind, and the
screaming eagle snaps his mandibles, as he sweeps a circuit of
miles with one full impulse of his glorious wing! Contrasting
the roughness of the basis with the printed beauty of the
irishued
and skiey ultimatum, I could not but deem that the bard of
`Thanatopsis' had well applied to the Kaatskills those happy lines
wherein he apostrophizes the famous heights of Europe:
`Your
peaks are beautiful, ye Appenines,
In the soft light of your serenest skies;
From the broad highland region, dark with pines,
Fair as the hills of paradise, ye rise!'
Be
not too eager, as you take the first stage of the mountain,
to look about you; especially, be not anxious to look
afar
. Now
and then, it is true, as the coach turns, you can not choose but
see a landscape, to the south and east,
farther off
than you ever
saw one before, broken up into a thousand vistas; but look you at
them with a sleepy, sidelong eye, to the end that you may finally
receive from
the Platform
the full glory of the final view. In
the meantime, there is enough directly about you to employ all
your eyes, if you had the ocular endowments of an Argus.
Huge rocks, that might have been sent from warring Titans,
decked with moss, overhung with rugged shrubbery, and cooling
the springs that trickle from beneath them, gloom beside the way;
vast chasms, which your coach shall sometimes seem to
overhang
,
yawn on the left; the pine and cedar-scented air comes
freely and sweetly from the brown bosom of the woods; until,
one high ascent attained, a level for a while succeeds, and your
smoking horses rest, while, with expanding nostril, you drink in
14
the rarer and yet rarer air; a stillness like the peace of Eden,
(broken only by the whisper of leaves, the faint chant of
embowered
birds, or the distant notes that come `mellowed and
mingling from the vale below'), hangs at the portal of your ear.
It is a time to be still, to be contemplative; to hear no voice but
your own ejaculations, or those of one who will share and
heighten your enjoyment, by partaking it in peace, and as one
with you, yet alone.
Passing
the ravine, where the immortal Rip Van Winkle
played his game of nine-pins with the wizards of that
neighborhood
,
and quaffed huge draughts of those bewildering flagons,
which made him sleep for years, I flung myself impatiently from
the `quarter-deck' of the postillion whose place I had shared; I
grasped that goodly globe of gold and ivory which heads my
customary canethe present of `My Hon. friend' S, and
which once drew into itself the sustenance of life from that
hallowed
mound which guards the dust of
Washington,
and
pushed gayly on, determined to pause not, until my weary feet
stood on the Platform. The road was smooth and good; the
air refreshing and pure, beyond description. The lungs play
there without an effort; it is a luxury to breathe. How holy
was the stillness! Not a sound invaded the solemn air; it was
like inhaling the sanctity of the empyrean. The forest tops soon
began to stir as with a mighty wind. I looked, and on both sides
of the road there were trees whose branches had been broken, as
if by the wings of some rushing tempest. It was the havoc of
winter snows.
There
is a wonderful deception in the approach to the
Mountain-House, which, when discovered, will strike the
traveller
with amazement. At one point of the road, where the
mansion
which is to terminate your pilgrimage heaves its white form
in view, (you have seen it from the river for nearly half a day,)
it seems not farther than a hundred rods, and hangs apparently
on the verge of a stupendous crag over your head; the road
turns again, it is out of sight, and the summits, near its
locus in
quo,
are nearly three miles off. The effect is wonderful. The
mountain is
growing upon you
.
I continued to ascend, slowly, but with patient steps, and with
a flow of spirit which I can not describe. Looking occasionally
to the east, I saw a line of such parti-colored clouds, (as then I
deemed them,) yellow, green, and purple, silver-laced, and
violet-bordered
,
that it meseemed I never viewed the like kaleidoscope
presentments. All this time, I wondered that I had seen no
land for many a weary mile.
Hill after hill, mere ridges of the mountain, was attained;
summit after summit surmounted; and yet it seemed to me that
the house was as far off as ever. Finally it appeared, and
a-nigh; to me the `earth's one sanctuary.' I reached it; my
name was on the book; the queries of the publican, as to `how
many coach-loads were behind,' (symptoms of a yearning for the
almighty dollar, even in this holy of nature's holies,) were
answered
,
and I stood on the Platform.
Good Reader!
expect me not to describe the indescribable.
I feel now, while memory is busy in my brain, in the silence of
my library, calling up that vision to my mind, much as I did
when I leaned upon my staff before that omnipotent picture, and
looked abroad upon its
God
-written magnitude. It was a vast
and changeful, a majestic, an
interminable
landscape; a fairy,
grand, and delicately-colored scene, with rivers for its lines of
reflection; with highlands and the vales of
States
for its
shadowings
,
and far-off mountains for its frame. Those parti-colored and
varying clouds, I fancied I had seen as I ascended, were but
portions
of the scene. All colors of the rainbow; all softness of
harvest-field, and forest, and distant cities, and the towns that
simply
dotted the Hudson; and far beyond where that noble river,
diminished to a brooklet, rolled its waters, there opened mountain
after mountain, vale after vale, State after State, heaved against
the horizon, to the north-east and south, in impressive and
sublime
confusion; while
still beyond,
in undulating ridges, filled
with all hues of light and shade, coquetting with the cloud, rolled
the rock-ribbed and ancient frame of this dim diorama! As the
sun went down, the houses and cities diminished to dots; the
evening guns of the national anniversary came booming up from
the valley of the Hudson; the bonfires blazed along the peaks
of distant mountains, and from the suburbs of countless villages
along the river; while in the dim twilight,
`From coast to coast, and from town to town,
You could see all the white sails gleaming down.
The steam-boats, hastening to and fro, vomited their fires upon
the air, and the circuit of unnumbered miles sent up its sights
and sounds, from the region below, over which the vast shadows
of the mountains were stealing.
Just before the sun dropped behind the west, his slant beams
poured over the south mountain, and fell upon a wide sea of
feathery clouds, which were sweeping midway along its form,
obscuring the vale below. I sought an eminence in the
neighborhood
,
and with the sun at my back, saw a giant form depicted in
a misty halo on the clouds below. He was identified,
insubstantial
but extensive Shape! I stretched forth my hand, and the
giant spectre waved his shadowy arm over the whole county of
Dutchess, through the misty atmosphere; while just at his
supernatural
coat-tail, a shower of light played upon the highlands,
verging toward West Point, on the river, which are to the eye,
from the Mountain-House, level slips of shore, that seem scarce
so gross as knolls of the smallest size.
Of
the grandeur of the Kaatskills at sunrise; of the patriotic
blazon which our bonfire made on the Fourth, at evening; of the
Falls, and certain pecuniary trickeries connected with their grim
majesty, and a general digest of the stupendous scene, shall these
not be discoursed hereafter, and in truthful wise? Yea, reader,
verily, and from the note-book of thine, faithful to the end,
Ollapod.
NUMBER TWENTY.
November,
1837.
We
parted, good my reader, last at the Kaatskillsno? `It
was a summer's evening;' and with my shadow on the mountain
mist, I ween, vanished in your thoughts the memory of me. Well,
that was natural. A hazy, dream-like idea of my whereabout
may have haunted you for a momentbut it passed. I can not
allow you to escape so easily. `Lend us the loan' of your eye,
for some twenty minutes: and if you are a home-bred and
untravelled
person, 't is likely, as the valet says in Cinderella, that
`I may chance to make you stare!'
In
discoursing of the territorial wonderments in question,
which have been moulded by the hand of the
Almighty,
I can
not suppose that you who read my reveries will look with a
compact
,
imaginative eye upon that which has forced its huge radius
upon my own extended vision. I ask you, howbeit, to take my
arm, and step forth with me from the piazza of the Mountain
House. It is night. A few stars are peering from a dim azure
field of western sky; the high-soaring breeze, the breath of
heaven
,
makes a stilly music in the neighboring pines; the meek crest
of Dian rolls along the blue depths of ether, tinting with silver
lines the half dun, half fleecy clouds; they who are in the parlors
make `considerable' noise; there is an individual at the end of
the portico discussing his quadruple julep, and another devotedly
sucking the end of a cane, as if it were full of mother's milk; he
hummeth also an air from
Il Pirata,
and wonders, in the
simplicity
of his heart, `why the devil that there steam-boat from
Albany does n't begin to show its lights down on the Hudson.'
His companion of the glass, however, is intent on the renewal
thereof. Calling to him the chief `help' of the place, he says
`Is that other antifogmatic ready?'
`No, sir.'
`Well, now, person, what's the reason? What was my last
observation? Says I to you, says I, `Make me a fourth of
them beverages;' and moreover, I added, `Just you keep doing
so; be
constantly
making them, till the order is countermanded.'
Give us another; go! vanish!`disappear and appear!
The obsequious servant went; and returning with the desired
draught, observed probably for the thousandth time: `There!
that's what I call the true currency; them's the
ginooyne
mint
drops;
ha
ha
ha!these separate divisions of his laughter
coming out of his mouth at intervals of about half a minute each.
There
is a bench near the verge of the Platform where,
when you sit at evening, the hollow-sounding air comes up from
the vast vale below, like the restless murmurs of the ocean.
Anchor yourself here for a while, reader, with me. It being the
evening of the national anniversary, a few patriotic individuals
are extremely busy in piling up a huge pyramid of dried pine
branches, barrels covered with tar, and kegs of spirits, to a height
of some fifteen or twenty feetperhaps higher. A bonfire is
premeditated. You shall see anon, how the flames will rise.
The preparations are completed; the fire is applied. Hear how
it crackles and hisses! Slowly but spitefully it mounts from
limb to limb, and from one combustible to another, until the
whole welkin is a-blaze, and shaking as with thunder! It is a
beautiful sight. The gush of unwonted radiance rolls in
effulgent
surges adown the vale. How the owl hoots with surprise
at the interrupting light! Bird of wisdom, it is the Fourth!
and you may well add your voice to swell the choral honors of
the time. How the tall old pines, withered by the biting scathe
of Eld, rise to the view, afar and near; white shafts, bottomed
in darkness, and standing like the serried spears of an
innumerable
army! The groups around the beacon are gathered
together
,
but are forced to enlarge the circle of their acquaintance, by
the growing intensity of the increasing blaze. Some of them,
being ladies, their white robes waving in the mountain breeze,
and the light shining full upon them, present, you observe, a
beautiful appearance. The pale pillars of the portico flash
fitfully
into view, now seen and gone, like columns of mist. The
swarthy African who kindled the fire regards it with perspiring
face and grinning ivories; and lo! the man who hath mastered
the quintupled glass of metamorphosed
eau-de-vie,
standing by
the towering pile of flame, and, reaching his hand on high, he
smiteth therewith his sinister pap, with a most hollow sound; the
knell, as it were of his departing reason. In short, he is making
an oration!
Listen to those voiceful currents of air, traversing the vast
profound
below the Platform! What a mighty circumference do
they sweep! Over how many towns, and dwellings, and streams,
and incommunicable woods! Murmurs of the dark, sources and
awakeners of sublime imagination, swell from afar. You have
thoughts of eternity and power here, which shall haunt you
evermore
.
But we must be early stirrers in the morning. Let us
to bed.
You
can lie on your pillow at the Kaatskill House, and see
the god of day look upon you from behind the pinnacles of the
White Mountains in New Hampshire, hundreds of miles away.
Noble prospect! As the great orb heaves up in ineffable
grandeur
,
he seems rising from beneath you, and you fancy that you
have attained an elevation where may be seen
the motion of the
world
. No intervening land to limit the view, you seem
suspended
in mid-air, without one obstacle to check the eye. The scene
is indescribable. The chequered and interminable vale, sprinkled
with groves, and lakes, and towns, and streams; the mountains
afar off, swelling tumultuously heavenward, like waves of the
ocean, some incarnadined with radiance, others purpled in shade;
all these, to use the language of an auctioneer's advertisement,
`are too tedious to mention, but may be seen on the premises.'
I know of but one picture which will give the reader an idea of
this ethereal spot. It was the view which the angel Michael was
polite enough, one summer morning, to point out to Adam, from
the highest hill of Paradise:
`His eye might there command wherever stood
City of old or modern fame, the seat
Of mightiest empire, from the destined walls
Of Cambalu, seat of Cathaan Can,
And Sarmachand by Oxus, Temir's throne,
To Paquin of Sinan kings; and thence
To Agra and Lahor of great Mogul
Down to the golden Chersonese; or where
The Persian in Ecbatan sat, or since
In Hizpahan; or where the Russian Ksar
In Mosco: or the Sultan in Bizance,
Turchestan born; nor could his eye not ken
The empire of Negus, to his utmost port,
Erocco; and the less maritime kings
Mombaza, and Quiloa, and Melind,
And Sofala, thought Ophir, to the realm
Of Congo and Angola, farthest south;
Or thence from Niger flood to Atlas' mount,
The kingdoms of Almanzor, Fez, and Suz,
Morocco, and Algier, and Tremizen;
On Europe thence, and where Rome was to sway
The world; in spirit perhaps he also saw
Rich Mexico, the seat of Montezume,
(And Texas too, great
Houston's
seatwho knows?)
And Cusco in Peru, the richer seat
Of Atabalipa; and yet unspoiled
Guiana, whose great city Geyro'ns sons
Call El Dorado.
Of
the Falls, sooth to say, little can be ejaculated in the
eulogistic
way. The cataract is only `on hand' for a part of the
time. It is kept in a dam, and let down for two shillings. The
demand for the article has sometimes exceeded the supply,
especially
in dry weather. We quote the sales, as per register,
while there, at perhaps some three hundred yards. Oh,
Mercury
!
Scenery by the square foot! Sublimity by the quintal!
It
looks to be a perilous enterprise, to descend the Kaatskills,
You feel, as you commence the `facilis descensus,' (what an
unhackneyed
phrase, to be sure!) very much the sort of sensation
probably experienced by Parachute Cocking, whose end was so
shocking. The wheels of the coach are shod with the
preparation
of iron slippers, which are essential to a hold up; and as
you bowl and grate along, with wilderness-chasms and a brawling
stream mayhap on one hand, and horrid masses of stone
seemingly
ready to tumble upon you on the other; the far plain
stretching like the sea beneath you, in the mists of the morning;
your emotions are
fidgetty
. You are not afraidnot you,
indeed
!
Catch you at such folly! No; but you wish most
devoutly
that you were some nine miles down, notwithstanding, and
are looking eagerly for that consummation.
We
paused just long enough at the base of the mountain, to
water the cattle, and hear a bit of choice grammar from the
landlord
;
a burly, big individual, `careless of the objective case,'
and studious of ease, in bags of tow-cloth, (trowsers by courtesy,)
and a roundabout of the same material; the knees of the
unmentionables
apparently greened by kneeling humbly at the
lactiferous
udder of his only cow, day by day. He addressed `the
gentleman
that driv' us down:'
`Well, Josh, I seen them
rackets!
'
`Wa' n't they almighty bright?' was the inquisitive reply.
This short colloquy had reference to a train of fire-works
which were set off the evening before at the Mountain House;
long snaky trails of light, flashing in their zigzag course through
the darkness. It was beautiful to see those fiery sentences
written
fitfully on the sky, fading one by one, like some Hebrew
character, some Nebuchadnezzar scroll, in the dark profound, and
showing, as the rocket fell and faded, that beneath the lowest
deep to which it descended, there was one yet lower still, to
which it swept `plumb-down, a shower of fire.'
We presently rolled away, and were soon drawn up in front
of the Hudson and the horse-boat, at the landing. The same
unfortunate animals were peering forth from that aquatic vehicle;
one of them dropping his hairy lip, with a melancholy expression,
and the other strenuously endeavoring to remove a wisp of straw
which had found a lodgment on his nose. The effort, however,
was vain; his physical energies sank under the task; he gave it
up, and was soon under way for the opposite shore, with his
four-legged
fellow traveller, and three bipeds, who were smoking segars.
It
is right pleasant and joyous to see the number of juvenile
patriots who are taken forth into the country, (whose glories for
the first time, perhaps, are shed upon their town-addicted eyes,)
on the great national holiday. To them, the flaunting honors of
the landscape have a new beauty, and a joyous meaning; the
sun hangs above them like a great ball of fire in the sky; the
waters wear a glittering sheen; and the wide moving pulse of
life beats with a universal thrill of happiness to them. I could
not but note the number of urchins in the steamer, whom their
`paternal derivatives' were guiding around, and showing to
their
vision at least, `all the kingdoms of the world, and the glory of
them.'
Well,
to those who are disposed to glean philosophy from
the mayhap less noticeable objects of this busy world, there are
few sights more lovely than childhood. The little cherub who
now sits at my knee, and tries, with tiny effort, to clutch the
quill with which I am playing for you, good reader; whose
capricious
taste, varying from ink-stand to paper, and from that to
books, and every other portable thingall `moveables that I
could tell you of'he has in his little person those elements
which constitute both the freshness of our sublunary mortality,
and that glorious immortality which the mortal shall yet put on.
Gazing upon his fair young brow, his peach-like cheek, and the
depths of those violet eyes, I feel myself rejuvenated. That
which bothered Nicodemus, is no marvel to me. I feel that I
have a new existence; nor can I dispel the illusion. It is harder,
indeed, to believe that he will ever be what I am, than that I am
otherwise than he is now. I can not imagine that he will ever
become a pilosus adult, with harvests for the razor on that downy
chin. Will those golden locks become the brown auburn?
Will that forehead rise as a varied and shade-changing record of
pleasure or care? Will the classic little lips, now colored as by
the radiance of a ruby, ever be fitfully bitten in the glow of
literary
composition?and will those sun-bright locks, which hang
about his temples like the soft lining of a summer cloud, become
meshes where hurried fingers shall thread themselves in play?
By the mass, I can not tell. But this I know. That which
hath been, shall be: the lot of manhood, if he live, will be upon
him; the charm, the obstacle, the triumphant fever; the glory, the
success, the far-reaching thoughts,
`That make them eagle wings
To pierce the unborn years.'
I might `prattle out of reason,' and fancy what, in defiance of
precedent furnished by propinquity of blood, he possibly
might
be; an aldermanic personage, redolent of wines and soup;
goodly in visage, benevolent in act, but strict in justice. I might
fancy him with a most voluminous periphery, and a laugh that
shakes the diaphragm, from the
imo pectore
to the vast
circumference
of the outer man. These things may be imagined, but not
believed. Yet it is with others as with ourselves: `We know
what they are, but not what they may be.' Time adds to the
novel thoughts of the child, the tricks and joyance of the urchin;
the glow of increasing years, the passion of the swelling heart,
when experience seems to school its energies. But in the flush
of young existence, I can compare a child, the pride and delight
of its mother and its kindred, to nothing
else
on earth, of its own
form or image. It is like a young and beautiful bird; heard,
perhaps, for once, in the days of our juvenescence, and
remembered
ever after, though never seen again. Its thoughts, like the
rainbow-colored messenger discoursed of in the poetic
entomology
of La Martine:
`
Born
with the spring, and with the roses dying
Through the clear sky on Zephyr's pinions sailing;
On the young flowret's open bosom lying
Perfume, and light, and the blue air inhaling;
Shaking the thin dust from its wings, and fleeing,
And soaring like a breath in boundless heaven:
How like Desire, to which no rest is given!
Which still uneasy, rifling every treasure,
Returns at last above, to seek for purer pleasure.'
In
truth, I do especially affect that delightful period in the life
of every descendant of old Fig Leaves, in Eden, which may
truly be called the
April
of the heart. How sweet are its smiles!
And on the face of babyhood, `the tears,' to use the dainty term
of Sir Philip Sidney, `come dropping down like raine in ye
sunshine
,
and no heed being taken to wype them, they hang upon
the cheekes and lippes, as upon cherries which the dropping tree
bedeweth.' Halcyon season! Its pure thoughts and rich
emotions
come and go, like the painted waftage of a morning cloud;
or most like that fulness of pearls which may be shaken from the
matin spray. The night, to such, comes with its vesper hush
and stillness, like the shadow of a shade. Sorrow is transient,
and Hope ever new. Sabbath of the soul, fresh from its
God
!
To the vision of these, how brightly the leaves move, and the
breeze-crisped waters quiver! How their quick pulses bound,
in the newness of existence, at that which is ancient and
disdained
of the common eye! To them, every color is prismatic,
and wears the hue of Eden. With thoughts like these, however
un-novel,
I apostrophize `
My Boy
:'
Thou
hast a fair unsullied cheek,
A clear and dreaming eye,
Whose bright and winning glances speak
Of life's first revelry;
And on thy brow no look of care
Comes like a cloud, to cast a shadow there.
In feeling's early freshness blest,
Thy wants and wishes few:
Rich hopes are garnered in thy breast,
As summer's morning dew
Is found, like diamonds, in the rose,
Nestling, mid folded leaves, in sweet repose.
Keep thus, in love, the heritage
Of thy ephemeral spring;
Keep its pure thoughts, till after age
Weigh down thy spirit's wing;
Keep the warm heart, the hate of sin,
And heavenly peace will on thy soul break in.
And when the even-song of years
Brings in its shadowy train
The record of life's hopes and fears,
Let it not be in vain,
That backward on existence thou canst look,
As on a pictured page or pleasant book.
In
the wonder which we feel as to children growing old, we
are apt to associate ourselves with them. When one who, in the
hey-dey of his blood, and before the glow of the
purpureum
lumen
of his `bettermost hours' has begun to diminish, is led to
regard (and to
hear,
beside, for the fact rings often at his
auricular
portals) that a vital extract is extant, he wonders if that
`embryon atom' will ever come to denominate the agent of his
being as `the old gentleman!' Of course, it must be impossible.
Yet `there is no mistake on some points.' In the course of his
travels, Old Time effects many a marvel; but he pushes on with
his agricultural implement, and streaming forelock; (nobody
`does him proud,' and he disdains the toupe,) until his
oldest
friends are metamorphosed, and his youngest begin to experience
how `
tempora mutantur, et nos mulamur in illis
.' This reminds
me of a song, which I like amazingly, because it contains such a
mingling of truth, beauty, and melody:
I often
think each tottering form
That limps along in life's decline,
Once bore a heart as young, as warm,
As full of idle thoughts as
mine
!
And each has had his dream of joy,
His own unequalled, pure romance;
Commencing, when the blushing boy
First thrills at lovely woman's glance.
And each could tell his tale of youth
Would think its scenes of love evince
More passion, more unearthly truth,
Than any tale, before or since.
Yes! they could tell of tender lays
At midnight penned, in classic shades,
Of days more bright than modern days
Of maids more fair than living maids.
Of whispers in a willing ear,
Of kisses on a blushing cheek
Each kiss, each whisper, far too dear
For modern lips to give or speak.
Of prospects, too, untimely crossed,
Of passion slighted or betrayed
Of kindred spirits early lost,
And buds that blossomed but to fade.
Of beaming eyes, and tresses gay,
Elastic form and noble brow,
And charmsthat all have passed away,
And left them
what we see them now!
And is it thus!
is
human love
So very light and frail a thing!
And must Youth's brightest visions move
For ever on Time's restless wing?
Must all the eyes that still are bright,
And all the lips that talk of bliss,
And all the forms so fair to sight,
Hereafter only come to this?
Then what are Love's best visions worth,
If we at length must lose them thus?
If all we value most on earth,
Ere long must fade away from us?
If that
one
being whom we take
From all the world, and still recur
To all
she
said, and for her sake
Feel far from joy, when far from her.
If that one form which we adore,
From youth to age, in bliss or pain,
Soon withers and is seen no more
Why do we loveif love be vain?
In what strange contrast with a picture like this, does the
beautiful
Uhland
place some of his nature-colored characters! How
sweetly does he draw the picture of two devoted beings,
practising
palmistry, with palm to palm, and uttering a world of downy
nonsense beneath the rolling moon:
`
In
a garden fair were roaming,
Two lovers, hand in hand;
Two pale and shadowy creatures,
They sat in that flowery land.
On the lips, they kissed each other,
On the cheeks so full and smooth;
They were wrapt in close embracings
They were warm in the flush of youth.'
These are very apt verses to be made directly out of a man's
head, are n't they? How the author must have been haunted
with visions all
`Sweeter than the lids of Juno's eyes,
Or Cytherea's breath.'
I forgot
to observe, that the postillion of whom I have
spoken
,
was
rather
profane. He told a story of his experience some
years before, with a divine, who was riding with him, on his
professional
seat, in the west, to attend a `protracted meeting.' `It
was about 'lection time,' said he, `and I had just gi'n in my vote.
Of
course,
I was used with
hospitality;
and I was a leetle `
how-come-you-so
?'
as Miss Kimball says in her Tower. Well I
driv on, at an uncommon rapid rate; (that's a fact;) and
whensumever
I threw out the mail-bags at a stoppin' place, I
replenished
the inner individual. At last I became, as the parson
observed
,
`manifestly inebriated;' and he ondertook for to lecter
me!
I said nothing, until he observed, or rather remarked, that `he
should not be surprised if I fell from my seat some day, and
would be found with my head broke, and extravagantsated blood
on the pious matter.' '
Well,' says I, `I should n't be surprised; it would be just
my dd etarnal luck!'
`He did n't say no more all the trip. I shot him up.'
`But the election'it was inquired`did you succeed in
that?'
`Oh, yes; and the man that we put in, made a fool of himself
at Albany, into the Legislature, and there was a piece put into a
book about him a'terwards.'
`Ah?what was it?'
`Here it is,' was the reply of my gentleman, as he drew from
his pocket a worn fragment of a printed page.
`On the first day of the session, he was enabled to utter the
beginning
of a sentence, which would probably have had no end, if
it had not been cut short, as it was, by the Speaker. On the
presentation
of some petitions, which he thought had a bearing on his
favorite subject, the election by the people of public notaries,
inspectors
of beef and pork, sole-leather, and staves and heading,
he got on his legs. `When,' said he, `Mr. Speaker, we consider
the march of intellect in these united, as I may say confederated,
States, and how the genius of liberty soars, in the vast expanse,
stretching her eagle plumes from the Pacific Ocean to Long Island
sound, gazing with eyes of fire upon the ruins of empires'
just at which point of aerial elevation, the Speaker brought
down the metaphorical flight of the genius, and that of the
aspiring
orator together, by informing the latter that he should be
happy to hear him when in order, but that there was now no
question before the House!
'
*
*
Sands
.
`What was the name of this man?' was a query following this
eloquent extract.
`Smith, Sir, was his name; Smith, John Smith, of Smithopolis
and surrogate of Smith County. He was the first man in
Smithville
;
was a blacksmith in his youth, a goldsmith a'terwards, and
John Smith through all. A consistent man, Sir; no
change
with him; always upright, but always poor; unchanging, for he
had nothing to change with! He was a distinguished man; had
letters advertised in the post office; owned a blood horse;
led the choir at church; read `the Declaration' on every
Fourth-of-July
;
made all the acquaintances he could; was exceedingly
fussy on all occasions. In short, he was a very great man in a
small way. His speech will stand as a memorial of his genius,
when the Kaatskills shall be troubled with the mildew of time,
and the worms of decay!'
Well
the reign of autumn, for the present year, has come;
and there will doubtless be the annual quotations of description
in the newspaper market. Some of it will remain on first hands,
and the rest will find a ready circulation. Meditation will vent
itself upon apostrophe; poetry will be engendered; old songs
will be re-sung. It is, in truth, a delicious season, and no one
can be blamed for yielding himself up to its influences. When
the first yellow surges of September sunlight seem to roll through
the atmosphere; when the dust of the city street, as you look at
some stately carriage, whose wheels are flashing toward the west,
seems rising around them like an atmosphere, colored betwixt
the hue of gold and crimson: when the mountains put on their
beautiful garments, where tints of the rainbow mingle with the
aerial blue of the sky; when the winds have a melancholy music
in their tone, and the heaven above us is enrobed in surpassing
purity and lustre;
then,
the dwellers in great capitals may
perhaps
conceive
of the richness and fruition of the country; but
they cannot approach the reality. The harvest moon has waned;
the harvest home been held; the wheat is in the garner; the last
peaches hang blushing on the topmost branches where they grew;
the fragrant apples lie in fairy-colored mounds beneath the
orchard
trees, and the cheerful husbandman whistles at the
ciderpress
.
As September yields her withered sceptre into the grasp
of October, the hills begin to invest themselves in those
many-colored
robes which are the livery of their new sovereign. As
my observant friend, (a well-belovd Epenetus,) who hath
discoursed
of matters outre-mer, so richly hymns it, then there comes
A mellow
richness on the clustered trees;
And, from a beaker full of richest dyes,
Pouring new glory on the autumn woods,
And dipping in warm light the pillared clouds,
Morn, on the mountain, like a summer bird,
Lifts up her purple wing; and in the vales
The gentle wind, a sweet and passionate wooer,
Kisses the blushing leaf, and stirs up life
Within the solemn woods of ash deep crimsoned,
And silver beech, the maple yellow leaved
Where Autumn, like a faint old man, sits down
By the way-side a-weary. Through the trees
The golden robin moves; the purple finch,
That on wild cherry and red cedar feeds,
A winter bird comes with its plaintive whistle,
And pecks by the witch hazel; while aloud,
From cottage roofs, the warbling blue-bird sings.
To me, there is nothing of that dark solemnity about the
autumnal
season, which it has to the morbid or the foreboding. It
comes, laden with plenty, and breathing of peace. There seems
a sweet monition in every whisper of the gale, and the rustle of
every painted leaf, which may speak a world of tranquillity to the
contemplative mind. If there be sadness around and within, it
is the sadness which is cherished, and the gloom that purifies; it
is that doubtful twilight of the heart, which is succeeded at last
by a glorious morning. We think with the serene and
heavenly-minded
Malcolm, of the distant, or the departed, who have gone
before us to lay down their heads upon pillows of clay, and
repose
in the calm monotony of the tomb. Reflection asserts her
sway, and the spirit expands into song:
Sweet Sabbath of the Year!
When evening lights decay,
Thy parting steps methinks I hear,
Steal from the world away.
Amid thy silent bowers,
'T is sad but sweet to dwell,
Where falling leaves and fading flowers
Around me breathe farewell.
Along thy sun-set skies,
Their glories melt in shade;
And like the things we fondly prize,
Seem lovelier as they fade.
A deep and crimson streak
The dying leaves disclose,
As on Consumption's waning cheek,
Mid ruin, blooms the rose.
The scene each vision brings
Of beauty in decay;
Of fair and early-faded things,
Too exquisite to stay;
Of joys that come no more;
Of flowers whose bloom is fled;
Of farewells wept upon the shore
Of friends estranged, or dead!
Of all, that now may seem
To memory's tearful eye
The vanished beauty of a dream,
O'er which we gaze and sigh!
And
now, reader,
Benedicite!
`Hailand farewell!'
Decidedly thine,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER TWENTY-ONE.
December,
1837.
As I was saying last month, beloved reader, that `I am
thine in promise,' or to that purport, I have anchored myself in
my
fauteuil,
to the end that I may be thine in fulfilment. In our
conversation about the Kaatskills, I omitted sundry pertinent
matters
,
with the which, however, malgr the postponement, I shall
not here afflict. Since that period, I have for the most part been
pent i' the populous city, amid the wakeful noises by day thereof,
and by night the calm security of the streets thereof. I affect
the supernatural bawl of the watchman, as it rings up to my
pillow
;
I love the serenade which the neighboring lover sings to his
fair, and of which I get the good as well as herself; I like to see
the straggling cloud go floating over the slumbering town at
midnight
,
with the moon silvering its edge; or mayhap to note the
sheen of a star greeting the vision over a chimney-pot. All these
have charms for my eye and ear; I seem to see holy sights and
shapes in the firmament; the winds come and go on their circuits,
unknowing how many brows they fan; and at times they hush a
whole metropolis to silence, insomuch that its wide boundary
scarce produces so much noise `as doth a chestnut in a farmer's
fire.'
By-the-by,
when the sun begins to set at right declensions,
and make his winter arches, I always think of the roaring fires in the
domicil of the rural husbandman, with feelings akin to envy. Ye
who toast your heels by anthracite; who survey the meagre `blue
blazes' of Liverpool coal, and whose nostrils take in the dry odor
thereof, being reminded thereby of those ever-burning brimstone
beds, where Apollyon keeps his court, and Judas has his
residence
;
ye, I say, who have a life-long intimacy with these sorts of
fuel, can have but small conception of a winter's fire in the country.
Far round doth it illuminate the apartment where it rages;
intolerable
is proximity thereunto; and its `circle of admirers' is always
large, because they can not come a-nigh. A pleasant disdain is
felt for the snow which whirls on whistling wings against the pane;
the herds are huddled in their cotes secure; and the storm has
permission to mumble its belly full, and spit snow at its pleasure.
Hugeous reminiscences of delight come over my spirit, in this
connexion; post-school-hours; the steaming bowl of flip, or
those orthographical convocations, where buxom maidens exulted
in their secret heart, as tall words were vociferously mounted, in
correct emission, by greenhorn swain. Sleigh-rides likewise;
amatory pressures, under skin of buffalo or bison; long
processions
through wintry villages, whose tall smokes rose from every
chimney; pillars of blue, standing upright in the air, like columns
of sapphire. Cider, with its acidity of remembrance; apples, that
melted on the tongue, as they descended toward the diaphragm;
landscapes of snow; and slides down hill!not forgetting those
skating achievements, which for the time being fill the mind with
such pride. All these circumstances and events, with curious
confusion
,
hang in a nucleus about my memories of a rural hearth;
`but these I passen by, with nameless numbers moe.'
Shakspeare
had a good notion of the comforts to which I refer. He
puts a lovely sentiment into the mouth of King Richard IL,
when he causes him to utter to the royal lady this tender
language
:
`Good sometimes queen, prepare thee hence for France:
Think I am dead; and that from me thou tak'st,
As from my death-bed, my last living leave.
In winter's tedious nights, sit by the fire
With good old folks; and let them tell thee tales
Of woful ages, long ago betid;
And ere thou bid good-night, to quit their grief,
Tell thou the lamentable fall of me!'
I have
not, howbeit, reader, as might be inferred from what
has been herein before written, spent all the mean season spoken
15
of, in the busy capital. I have made, with household
appurtenances
,
and delights, and responsibilities, an autumnal tour or `
excrescence'
into the country, round about the Empire Town.
Quotidian columns have borne the register thereof; hence
Benevolence
prompt to crucify farther infliction. The landscapes
surveyed were beautiful; though it may be said of the eminences,
as Mr. William Lackaday observes in the play, of his boy-seen
uplands: `Them there hills wasn't clothed with much werder.'
How many steam-boat accidents are occurring constantly!
One of late astonished the peaceful Delaware. But it did one
good act. The explosion blew away a piece of very bad
orthography
in the cabin of one of those craft which ply between
Philadelphia
and Camden. Perilous voyages do they make, indeed.
Nurses with their blooming charges, and who have never been
to sea, embark in them to behold the wonders of the deep! The
disaster I speak of arose from that which made the angels fall.
'T was curst ambition. One boat was going several inches ahead of
another, and urged its engine to the rate of at least fifty miles the
hour. Rivalry was awakened; the captain of the hapless craft
yelled to his assistant: `Josey, we'll have a race with that t'other
imperent boat!
Put that other stick of wood into the furnace!
My pride is elewated. Never mind the expense
this
time!'
The command was given; the boiler collapsed; and ambition
was ended! The orthography blown from the steamer was
this:
`No smoking
aloud
in the cabing!'
This was an injunction obeyed per force, for it could not be
broken.
*
*
Apropos
of this `supererogatory and adscititious' prohibition. The small
steamers which ply on the beautiful Connectieut, above the ancient fortification
of `Goed Hoop,' renowned in
Knickerbocker's
veracious history, and now
known as `Dutch Point,' have but one paddle-wheel, which is placed some six or
eight feet astern. The voyager in these petty craft is forcibly struck with the
necessity of obeying a printed order, conspicuously posted:
`No smoking abaft the
wheel!'
And those who watch from the shore the locomotive column of spray,
(like the `pillar of cloud by day' that concealed the Israelites,) which hides the
boat from view, on its upward passage, must also be of opinion that his `pipe'
would be soon `put out,' who should attempt to smoke in so moist a
region.
It specified tacit fumigation:
`Nothing could live
Twixt that and silence;'
and the unnecessary monition was no great loss, either to luxury
or learning.
Let
me here register a letter which I have received from the
Jehu who voted for Smith, of Smithopolis. He conveys several
curious sentiments; and among other matters, records the demise
of the person to whom he was indebted for a lecture:
`November the 5th,
1837.
`
My Dear Sir:
`I have seen a piece which you made and put into a perryoge published
down into the city of New York, to which I am a-going to indict a reply.
My indictment will be short, as some of the parties is not present to which
you have been allusive. But with respect of that there diwine person you
spoke of, I am sorry to remark, that he is uncommonly dead, and wont
never give no more lectures. He was so onfortnight as to bu'st a
blood-vessel
at a pertracted meeting; and I han't hearn nothing onto him sence.
His motives was probable good; but in delivering on 'em, it struck me
forcibly
that he proximoted to the
sassy
. However, I never reserves ill will,
not ag'inst nobody; and I authorize you to put this into printing, ef'so be
that you deem it useful. That's what Smith used to say, when he
published
his self-nominations in the newspapers, that a man with a horn (they
tell me that he has a very large circle of kindred) used to ride post about
and distribit.
`In the sincere congratulation that there has not nothing been said in
this communication unproper for the public ear, and for giving you the
descriptions
of the rackets, and other messuages respecting me, which you
deeded to the public, I remain yours until death do us part.
`Mr.
Ollapod,
M. D.'
`
Post Tillion
.
Now there is no finding fault with a correspondent of this
description
.
Plain, unadorned, he gives his thoughts the drapery
of inkdresses them in blackand there they stand, (`what is
written remains,') evidences at once of his frankness and his
erudition
.
To me, such documents, though light, and perhaps
unpalatable
to those who prefer the heavier condiments of literature,
form the cream or the dessert of life's plenteous table.
Talking
of dessertsby which (whisper) I do n't mean the
boundless contiguity of western wildernesses, nor the sandy
bounds of Zahara, but the after-glories of a dinnerI have of
late arrived at some curious embellishments of delicacies, on the
part of those who are bent upon improving the English language,
at all hazards; upon extending it to the utmost latitude of dainty
expression and culture. The Astor House, I learn, at its
Ladies'
Ordinary, has furnished forth some glorious specimens of
English improved. `Sir,' said an exquisite, desirous of
partaking
a certain delicacy for himself and his fair:
`Have you at present any of the
chastised idiot-brother?
'
`Ha n't seen no relations of your 'n here to-day,' murmured
the waiter, `with an imperturbable and `furtive' smile.'
`Don't be impertinent, fellow!' was the reply; `I mean
something
to eat!'
`If you want to eat anything in the
idiot
line,' replied the
servant
,
aside, as his inquisitor fingered his mustache, `I guess
you 'd better put some butter on your hair, and swallow
yourself
'
And here the sacrilegious usher of sauces and glasses indulged
in a half-suppressed guffaw.
`Dar' say you consider that funny, my short
help,
' said the
inquirer; `but what I want is what
you
call
whipped-syllabub
.
Heaven help your ignorance!'
The requisite was handedthe exquisite appeased. But his
quiet was brief. Calling to him the same locomotive assistance,
he inquired:
`Now, individual, I want some
sacrificed-threshed-indigent-williams
.
Have you got any?'
`Not one, upon my soul, your honor; that is, if you mean
turnips.'
`Turnips! curse turnips! you double-distilled Vandal; you
Gothyou Visigoth! I mean, have you got any roasted
whippoor-wills
?'
`Holy Paul!' said a Hibernian `help,' who had drawn anigh,
attracted by the discussion; `in the name of the Virgin, what is
them?
'
Just at this juncture, the eaves-dropping by-stander who
furnishes
the
mem.
of this, came away, leaving the emerald son
more verdant to look at than his native islestaring as if in a fit
of astronomy, in eclipse-time.
One
of my autumnal recreations, good my reader, is hunting.
I pull a most fatal trigger. Venerie delighteth me, when the day
is good and the game abundant. I love (Heaven forgive me!) to
bring down the squirrel, with the half-munched chestnut in his teeth,
what time his bushy tail, no longer waving in triumph over his
back, as he bounds from limb to limb, quivers in
articulo mortis
.
I confess me none of your cockney venators. Some of these
I have seen place the deadly muzzle of a double-barrel rifle at
the unsuspecting tail of a wren, while the proximity of metal and
feathers was less than an inch; and when they fired, they
plunged
back some several yards, overcome with horror, though the
bird had flown without injury, save indeed some blackened
down, in extremis; a trifle, with life safe, and the world before
her.
The poetry of gunpowder is in making it
tell
. To go out when
the woods are so beautiful that you deem a score of dying
dolphins
hang on every tree,
`When the sound of dropping nuts is heard, though all the trees are still,
And twinkle in the smoky light the waters of the rill;'
to hear the delicate tread of the game on the leaves, rustling amid
the murmurs of solemn winds, as the westering sun scampers
down the west, with a face as red as if he had disgraced the solar
family by some misdemeanor; and then, in some thick recess of
passing foliage, and innumerous boughs, then and there to bore
winged fowl, and my gentleman quadrupeds of the sylvan
fastness
,
with cold lead, is exhilarating. All kinds of volant things
that wing the autumn air; all sorts of movers on four legs; to
make these succumb to the behests of minerals, deadly salts, and
a percussion cap to set them on, is a kind of great glory in a very
small way. I miss in my excursions of this nature, the kind of
sport which I fancy they who course the fields and glades of
England must peculiarly enjoy; hare-hunting, namely. `The
ancients,' saith my choice `Elia,' `must have loved hares. Else
why adopt the word
lepores,
(obviously from
lepus,
) but from
some subtle analogy between the delicate flavor of the latter, and
the finer relishes of wit in what we most poorly translate
pleasantries
.
The fine madnesses of the poet are the very decoction
of his diet. Thence is he hare-brained. Haram-scarum is a
libellous, unfounded phrase, of modern usage. 'T is true the
hare is the most circumspect of animals, sleeping with her eyes
open. Her ears, ever erect, keep them in that wholesome
exercise
,
which conduces them to form the very tit-bit of the admirers
of this noble animal. Noble will I call her, in spite of her
detractors
,
who from occasional demonstrations of the principle of
self-preservation (common to animals,) infer in her a defect of
heroism. Half a hundred horsemen, with thrice the number of
dogs, scour the country in pursuit of puss, across three counties;
and because the well-flavored beast, weighing the odds, is
willing
to evade the hue and cry,
with her delicate cars shrinking
perchance
from discord,
comes the grave naturalist, Linnus,
perchance
,
or Buffon, and gravely sets down the here asa timid
animal. Why, Achilles, or Bully Dawson, would have declined
the preposterous combat!' This is speaking sooth, and
vindicates
the fame of that class of tremulous tenants of rural haunts,
whose ears, most unhappily, are sometimes longer than their lives.
Sometimes
I surmount my pony, and traverse for miles the
banks of the Schuykill; moving, now fast, now slow, as humor
prompts, or clouds portend. The city fades behind me; the
beautiful eminence of Fairmount, its spouting fountains, its
statues
in the many-colored shade; the sheen of the river; the
trelised
pavilions that hang on its side; the hum of waters, or the
cheerings of some regatta, mingle with far obscurity and airy
nothing; and then, as I ride, I sing the song of Anacreon Little,
laying every tone to my heart, like a treasure and a spell:
`
Along
the Schuykill a wanderer was roving,
And dear were its flowery banks to his eye;
(I am bounding alongat a good rate am moving
I have lost the last linesunregained, if I try.')
Thus I murder the post-meridian hours, when the weather-office
is propitious, and its clerks attentive.
By-the-way,
how often have I pondered on the extreme
surprise
experienced by Balaam, of Old Testament memory, when he
rode out one day on business. His meditations were most
unexpectedly
interrupted by the beast he rode; and he was
immensely
astounded, when he found out the garrulity of the animal.
True to her sex, (for she was of the tender gender,) she
commenced
a few sentences of small-talk, greatly to his dismay.
And who could marvel? What man but would listen,
auribus
erectis,
when he ascertained that his own ass was opening a
conversation
with him? 'T was thus with Balaam. He was well
nigh demented. He pommelled his beast with great vehemence;
but she turned her head to him, and said in the Hebrew dialect:
`
No Go!
'
Is it not wonderful, that those who are skilled in biblical
history
,
who weigh evidence by the ounce, and inference by the
pound, is it not a marvel, that they have never traced the
obstinacy
of this four-footed individual to the right motives? She
was, in sooth, the great progenitress of
Animal Magnetism;
and
she presented, in her own person, the first instance of
clairvoyance
on record, either in prose or rhyme. It was at her hinder feet
that
Mesmer
sat, in thought, and caught the inspiration of his
science. Balaam sat on her patient back, burdened her
hallowed
vertebras, nor knew how much wisdom he bestrode.
Blinded mortal! He looked ahead for the cause of his
detention
.
He saw no reason why he should not push on; and in
the Egyptain obliquity of his heart, he `whaled' his ass to a
degree
.
It did no good; on the contrary, 't was quite the reverse.
The ass and the angel were looking steadfastly at each other;
but Balaam saw but one of the parties. He noted not the
glittering
and glorious obstacle that stopped the narrow way. The
loose and expressionless lips of his ass spoke like a book; the
clairvoyance
was established; but the effect was slow.
Henceforth
,
when the magnetic science is discussed, honor its foundress.
Render unto that ass the things which are asses'.
I have
achieved a victory which should fire the heart of any
tasteful bibliomaniac.
I stand seized of Lamb
. Understand me,
reader, t' is no juvenile mutton, whereof I am possessed; not
adolescent merino, or embryo ram. By no manner of means;
contrariwise, it is
Talfourd's
brief memoir, and a most
succulent
correspondence, by the author of `
Elia
.' 'T is a thing
over which a father may waken his boy, in the small hours of the
morning, (being yet unmovd bedward,) by a multitudinous
guffaw
.
Rosy slumber, ruptured by obstreperous laughter; but ah!
how decidedly unavoidable!
Yes; I write myself proprietor for the nonce of a London
edition. My name is written in a Book of the Life of Lamb.
Most hugeously do I relish his quaint conceits, and those dainty
sentences, the fashioning whereof came to him unbidden, from
spirits of the olden time, bending from the clouds of fame. (
By-the-by
,
what an unconscionable dog was Ossian! He always
kept a score or two of heroes, sitting half-dressed on cold clouds,
making speeches. 'T was most unkind of him. But he lived
in a rude age.) Lamb was one of those precious few of whom
the world is not worthy. He wrote from the impulses of a noble
heart, guided to new expression by a mind clear as the brook of
Siloa, that flowed by the oracles of
God
. He was not one of
your persons who are dignified by the phrase `all heart,' for he
had a prolific brain, which all-hearted people generally lack. Of
course, he disciplined himself betwixt a desk at the India-House,
and his social hours, or studious; but what golden fruitage sprang
therefrom! None of your crude sentences, half formed, unlicked,
unpolished; but full of meaning; succinct to the eye, and
harmonious
to the ear. There is a light from his pen, which can
illumine the saddest hour. He went forth to amuse and
enlighten
,
as the sun gets up in the morning to cheer the world,
`with all his fires and travelling glories round him.' Essayist
incomparable
!
How would he have looked writing a prize-tale
for the horror-mongers!
In
respect of these latter things, how many double-distilled
atrocities of that kind are now and then committed at this day!
They must be filled with blood and murder; piracy, thieving,
villany
of all sorts must be thrown in, to make the mixture `slab
and good.' This is the result of the ten thousand pages of trash,
which the want of a copy-right law entails upon us from
England
.
Improbability
is the first ingredient, to which
assassination
,
seduction, and all kinds of crime, must approximate. Let
me give a specimen:
`THE FATAL VOW.
`
It
was late in the fall of 18, (convenient blank!) when, as the night
had come on, on a stormy evening, a dreadful tempest arose in the west.
The lightning flashed, the thunder faintly bellowed for a time; but soon the
lightning discontinued, though the thunder moaned on. It was pitch dark
darkness Egyptian. The sight was palsied and checked within an inch of
the eye. At this juncture, two men on horseback might have been seen, at
the distance of half a mile from the river, riding through a thick wood.
One of them was of sallow complexion, with huge black whiskers; he rode
a horse of the color called by rural people `pumpkin-and-milk,' or
cream-color
,
rather. In his holster were two pistols. He wore a broad slouching
hat, apparently unpaid for. A frown, blacker considerably than hell,
darkened
his brow. Turning to his companion, a weazen-faced man, with a red
head, mounted on what is called a `calico mare,' he said:
`Well, Jakarzil, shall we do the deed to-night?'
`It would ill befit the noble Count d'Urzillio de Belleville,' said the
dependant
,
`to shoot that ill-fated lady at the present time. It would not
look
well.'
`I care not for the looks!' replied the count, curling his lip, and placing
in his sinister cheek a piece of tobacco, `I must have vengeance! If the
candle is not at the casement, I shall bu'st the door. I want revenge!'
`TO BE CONTINUED.'
This is like the modern tales. Meditated butchery,
successful
scoundrelism, and other delectables, make up their sum. As
the fragment just read may never be concluded, I will mention
the fate of the parties. The hero shot his grandmother out of
pique,
and was hung; Jakarzil, his man, is in the penitentiary
for horse-stealing.
Some
of my unpoetical friends think I have underrated the
Falls at Kaatskill. Heaven save the mark! They have never
seen Niagara, and are therefore content with a few grim rocks,
the gate of a mill-dam, and grandeur by the gallon; for thus,
in a manner, is it sold. No! Let these untravelled but clever
fellows once hear the roar that shakes Goat-Island, and the
region
round about; see the river that pours its mile-wide breakers
down, and mark the rainbow smile! Ever thereafter will they
hold their peace.
One
or two credulous persons have fancied that the sketch of
`Smith of Smithopolis' was designed as an imputation upon the
name. The said imputation is disdained, by these presents. I
have a decided regard for that style and title: companionship,
familiarity, personal knowledge, (so grateful to the inquiring
mind,) are its synonyms. Beside, I honor the name, for sundry
associations. Who has never rode in a rail-car, a steam-boat, or
a coach, with a person of the name of Smith? Or heard him
speak at a public meeting? Or owed him a trifle? Or had a
trifle due from him, the Smith aforesaid?
Nemo
`I undertake
to say'(in fact I not only
undertake
this vocal enterprise, but I
accomplish
it.) Aside, reader, 't is a criticism on the phrase;
which whoso uses when he knows what he is about to set down
in palpable chirography, is a
sumph
unqualified:
Anglice,
one
of the flat'uns, named of
Stulti
.
The Smiths are numerous, 't is said. Grant it. Who pays
more post-office revenue? Who more quickly resents a jeer
upon the name? Tell me that. `Not Nobody.' Would you
look for heroes? The Smiths could supply them. For female
goodness and devotion? The same, from the same. For wit,
genius, and elevated talent?
Vide
Horace and James, of the
Addresses, and Richard Penn; the studious scholar, good
lawyer
,
quaint citizen, novelist, poet, dramatistevery thing clever.
I had
many more things to say, courteous reader; but I fear,
from what I have written, you may augur a bore. Heaven
forfend
!
Consequently, thine in conclusion, I write myself,
henceforth
,
now, and formerly,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER TWENTY-TWO.
March,
1838.
A month
Reader, or two months, how fast they get by!
How they `push along and keep moving!' With their
'portance
to the prince or the beggarto the monarch or the
mauvais
sujet
they sweep away. When one is at his ease, and in
quiet, how imperceptibly they glide! When friends are looked
for, or home is nearing on the wave, how melancholy slow!
Time ambles, canters, trots, walks, or halts, as it were, with
thousands at a time. Those who wish his gait the tardiest,
methinks
,
are those who take their `last stand' upon a scaffold, and
await that dubious moment which divorces Spectacle from
Strangulation
.
That is a period of which one cannot complain that it
is dull. Like passages in modern novels, (as per booksellers'
advertisements) it is of `thrilling interest.' The only passenger
in the black coach just bound for the unknown country waits with
exemplary patience for the driver, not willing to leave. Right in
his premises, he comes to a wrong conclusion. His neck answers
for it.
Since
I read that curious piece of `Elia's on the splendors
of the pillory rather than its disgraces, I have had some little
curiousness to meditate on that matter; whether it were possible
that one should felicitate himself on a position of the kind;
whether pride could be born of pillory conceptions, or thoughts
of grandeur from the gallow-tree. I think they can. 'Twas a
proud remark of the Earl Ferrers, when on his way to the
gallows
,
in 1796, when he observed to his sheriff, who
complimented
him upon attracting so great a concourse of people: `I
suppose
they never saw a lord hanged before.' This incident should
be used by some play-wright of modern times, and entitled `The
Earl's Last Chuckle.' This same lord, on the day fixed for his
execution, was driven to the gallows in his own landau, dressed
in sumptuous garments, the choicest of his taste. Those who
demur from gibbet dignity, should have heard the courteous
colloquies
which did ensue betwixt him and his sheriff aforesaid.
The latter, `seating himself by his lordship, politely observed,
that it gave him the highest concern to wait upon him on so
melancholy
an occasion: adding, that he would do every thing in
his power to render his situation as
agreeable
as possible, and
hoped his lordship would impute it to the necessary discharge
of his duty.'
There are objects of great interest, too, one might suppose, on
a scaffold, as well as in the pillory.
Par example,
in the case
in question. `His lordship (by mistake) gave ten guineas to the
executioner's assistant, which was immediately after demanded
by the master; but the fellow refused to deliver it, and a dispute
ensued, which
might
have discomposed his lordship.'
Of course it might. Perhaps he had been a sporting character.
Would he not have felt some anxiety to settle the controversy,
and see fair play before he went, so as to
die in peace?
Indubitably
.
He should have been `spared that sight'but
he
was
spared, before it ended.
Well
as there is nothing too low to be dignified by some
faint coloring, so there is naught too high not to be dimmed. I
look upon the moon as an orb of pearly lusture; upon the stars
as diamonds and jewels; yet ragged clouds, like volant pauper's
breeches, patched with yellow, red, or white, around their edges,
sail by the stars, and moon, and sun, smirching their beauty, and
borrowing brightness not their own.
Yet I respect the moon. Fair politician! She changes when
she will. Impartial dispenser of radiance `on tick;' she gets
what she can, and gives all she gets. I honor the planet.
Prolific
mother of hoaxes and sentiment! Grand cloud silver-plater!
Meek, virtuous EminencePresence serene! Thus wert thou
once apostrophized, by one now no more:
O moon!
at midnight's contemplative hour,
When placid slumber holds his noiseless reign,
Throbs my exulting heart to see thee shower
Thy streaming splendors upon rock and plain:
From earth aloof my panting spirits soars,
Communing with revolving worlds on high.
Till, lost in deep amazement, forth it pours
Its hymn of praise to
Him
who lit yon sky,
And gave to my young gaze this wondrous scenery!
O moon! aside the helmsman lays his chart,
To mark thy beams reflected on the sea;
And faithful mem'ry on his lonely heart
Gives back the light of childhood's revelry.
On his lone pathway may the auspicious gale
Propel the expanded canvass o'er the wave:
Bright be the cynosure which lights his sail
Nigh be the mighty arm outstretched to save,
When the blue waves run high, the sea boy from the grave!
O moon! the sentinel at midnight hour
Rests the dark vigil of his eye on thee,
And pours his benison to that high power
Who dressed for him that gorgeous scenery:
While the bright beams their softer splendors wake,
And on his burnished casque and armor play,
He hears not the light footstep in yon brake;
His thoughts have wandered to his home away
His wife and infant boyare their young bosoms gay?
O moon! on thee at the lone hour of night
The lover gazes with a swimming eye!
And deems that she to whom his heart is plight,
Gazes as fondly on yon glorious sky:
Anon his ardent fancy seems to trace,
In the bright mirror of night's lonely hour,
`The light of love, the purity of grace,'
Which charmed his youthful eye in summer's bower,
When to his heart he pressed his bosom's dearest flower.
Again he deems, in fancy's wanton flight,
Some bark of pearl in beauty sailing there:
Slow piloting its dubious path in light,
Through the calm ocean of the evening air!
Oh! how his bosom burns to tempt the gale,
With his own loved one, on that azure sea;
With hope's soft zephyr to impel the sail,
And no obtrusive, daring eye to see
His own endeared caress and love's warm witchery.
J. R.
Sutermeister
.
'
Twas
a new idea to me, that conveyed of late by the author
of Leslie, surnamed Norman, that the only things you see, after
crossing the Atlantic, which you have seen before, are the orb
of day, sometimes vulgarly called Phbus, or the sun, the chaste
Regent of the Night, or Luna, that green-horns sometimes
denominate
the moon, and those jewels of heaven`doubloons of
the celestial bank,' as a Spanish poet calls themsometimes
named stars, by plain, uninitiated persons. These, it seems, are
the only old acquaintances a man meets abroad. They are not
to be put by. A man may curse his stars, indeed, but he
cannot
cut
them. As well might the great sea essay `to cast its
waters on the burning Bear, and quench the guards of the
ever-fix
d
pole.' Therefore shall I learn henceforth yet more to love
those dazzling planets, fixed or errant, because in no long time I
may meet them in Philippi. Precious then to me will be their
bright companionship! Milky feelings will come over me, as
I scrutinize the
via lactea,
with upturned eyes; conscious will
be the moon; inexpressibly dear every glimpse of the lesser
lights that rule the night with modest fires. Without the
slightest
premonitory symptoms of astrology, and being withal no
horologe consulter, I yet do love the stars. Rich, rare, and
lustrous
,
they win my gaze, and look into my soul. I have seen
them at Niagara, glinting upon the mad breakers through the
lunar rainbow, with their perpetual flashes; on the big lakes of
the interior, as if the calm waters were but another sky; on the
placid Schuylkill, when the breath of clover-fields came
freshened
from the wave it never wrinkled; and I have seen them
oh climax of beauty!on the `
Grand Erie Canawl,
' just before
taking a berth in copartnership with bed-bugs! Enough of stars.
I am waxing theatrical.
One
word more, though, before I dismiss these luminaries.
That verse of Byron's, wherein he compares the object of some
early affection to a star, dropping from its sphere, always struck
me as peculiarly beautiful. Look at it, reader, and say so too:
`
I know
not if I could have borne
To see thy beauty fade;
The night that followed such a morn,
Had worn a deeper shade.
And thou wert
lovely to the last
Thy day without a cloud hath past,
Extinguishednot decay'd;
As stars, that school along the sky,
Shine brightest, when they fall from high
.'
The same individualwho was a highly nice person for
making apt pieces of metre out of his headhas, in the
handsomest
manner, volunteered his services for the moon, at the
close of the following passage:
`
I do
remember me, that on a night like this,
I stood beneath the Coliseum's wall
Mid the chief relics of almighty Rome:
The trees that grew along the broken arches,
Waved dark in the blue midnight, and the stars
Shone through the rents of ruin:
from afar
The watch-dog bay'd beyond the Tiber, and more near,
From out the Csar's palace, came the owl's long cry,
And interruptedly of distant sentinels the fitful song,
Begun and died upon the gentle wind.
And thou didst shine, thou rolling moon! upon all this
And cast a wide and tender light, which softened down
The hoar austerity of rugged desolation,
Leaving that beautiful which still was so,
And making that which was not, till the place
Became religion, and the heart ran o'er
In silent worship.'
One
cannot write, by any possibility, with a sense of pleasure,
when his subject brings too many things to his recollection, and
pours remembrance full upon the eye. I love to go back to the
moon-light eves of other years; and I do confess, that the
shimmer
of a star over a city chimney; the rustle of vines in its garden
walks; or the soft hum of a summer shower at night, tinkling on
a thousand shadowy roofs around, and gurgling down the
conduits
of the eavesthose regular eaves-dropperscan awaken
in me a multitude of pleasant thoughts, which lie too deep for
tears. Unanswered aspirations come before me with their
solemnities
,
and I hold a deeper communion with my
Maker
. Some
soft instrument of music, touched by a fair hand, in the nocturnal
hours, adds to the quietude, and I thank that Spirit for its spell,
in hurried numbers:
When
the worn heart its early dream
In darkness and in vain pursues,
How shall the visionary gleam
Of joy o'er life its charm diffuse?
How shall the glowing thought aspire,
The cheek with passion's flush be warm,
Or the dim eyes resume their fire,
Their sunshine, victory of the storm?
Ah, who can tell? Not thou, whose words
Are lightest, liveliest of the throng;
Whose carol, like the summer bird's,
Pours out the winning soul of song;
Not thou, whose calm and shining brow,
The sadness of thy strain belies;
Whose spirits, like thy music, flow,
Won from the founts of Paradise!
By-the-by,
the first individual from whom I ever heard an
amatory effusion, was an immense arrangement of flesh and
blooda milliner, from Yorkshire, in England. She had come
from home, with her large fat face, with all the bloom on, and
with big watery eyes. How she would flatter herself that she
was enchanting the students, as, in quizzing convocations, they
invited her at green-horn parties, (after a turn at Blind Man's
Buff, or some such highly intellectual game,) to sing `Oh 'tis
Love'tis Love!' Her stupendous chest seemed to expand
with the tender passion; and ohears, that were searched with
the volume of her notes, attest the facthow she tortured the
attentive tympanum! In form, as I have said, she was immense;
a John Reeve in petticoats, and not unlike that most fantastic
Cupid. Gentle Giantess! Many years have passed, since she
chaunted to those roystering `Academy boys!' If she yet live,
she might say `
Here!
' to Elia's description of her whilome
Oxford
counterpart: `There may be her parallel upon the earth, but
surely I never saw it. I take her to be lineally descended from
the maid's aunt of Brainford, who caused Master Ford such
uneasiness
.
She hath Atlantean shoulders; and, as she stoopeth
in her gaitwith as few offences to answer for in her own
particular
as any of Eve's daughtersher back seems broad enough
to bear the blame of all the peccadillos that have been committed
since Adam. She girdeth her waist, or what she is pleased to
esteem as such, nearly up to her shoulders, from beneath which,
that huge dorsal expanse, in mountainous declivity, emergeth.
Respect for her alone preventeth the idle boys, who follow her
about in shoals, whenever she cometh abroad, from getting up and
riding. But her presence infallibly commands a reverence. She
is indeed, as the Americans would express it, something awful.
Her person is a burthen to herself, no less than the ground which
bears her. To her mighty bone, she hath a pinguitude withal,
which makes the depth of winter to her the most desirable season.
Her distress in the warmer solstice is pitiable. During the
months of July and August, she usually renteth a cool cellar,
where ices are kept, whereinto she descendeth when Sirius rageth.
She dates from a hot Thursdaysome twenty-five years ago.
Her apartment in summer is pervious to the four winds. Two
doors in north and south direction, and two windows fronting the
rising and the setting sun, never closed, from every cardinal point
catch the contributory breezes. She loves to enjoy what she calls
a quadruple draught. That must be a shrewd zephyr, that can
escape her. I owe a painful face-ache, which oppresses me at
this moment, to a cold caught, sitting by her, one day in last July,
at this receipt of coolness. Her fan, in ordinary, resembleth a
banner spread, which she keepeth continually on the alert to
detect
the least breeze. She possesseth an active and gadding
mind, totally incommensurate with her person. No one
delighteth
more than herself in country exercises and pastimes. I have
passed many an agreeable holiday with her in her favorite park at
Woodstock. She performs her part in these delightful
ambulatory
excursions by the aid of a portable garden chair. She
setteth
out with you at a fair foot gallop, which she keepeth up till
you are both well breathed, and then she reposeth for a few
seconds. Then she is up again for a hundred paces or so, and
again resteth; her movement, on these sprightly occasions, being
something between walking and flying. Her great weight
seemeth
to propel her forward, ostrich-fashion. In this kind of relieved
marching, I have traversed with her many scores of acres on those
well-wooded and well-watered domains. Her delight at Oxford
is in the public walks and gardens, where, when the weather is
not too oppressive, she passeth much of her valuable time.
There is a bench at Maudlin, or rather, situated between the
frontiers of that and Christ's college; some litigation, latterly,
about repairs, has vested the property of it finally in Christ's;
where at the hour of noon she is ordinarily to be found sitting,
so she calls it by courtesy, but in fact, pressing and breaking of
it down with her enormous settlement; as both of those
foundations
,
who, however, are good-natured enough to wink at it, have
found, I believe, to their cost. Here she taketh the fresh air,
principally at vacation times, when the walks are freest from
interruption
of the younger fry of students. Here she passeth her
idle hours, not idly, but generally accompanied with a book;
blest if she can but intercept some resident Fellow, (as usually
there are some of that brood left behind at these periods,) or stray
Master of Arts, (to most of whom she is better known than their
dinner bell,) with whom she may confer upon any curious topic
of literature.
Yet
the burden of love and song, after all, hallows every thing
it bends withal. Poetry is your true dignifier of the work-day
world. In amber, your fly may go down balmy to other ages,
that without that sweet consistence for an overcoat, shall smell to
heaven from the shambles,-or be passed with a buzz of contempt
by surviving friends of his race, of either gender, as they disport
themselves, in impassioned union, on a warm summer pane.
Even servitude may thus be embellished by song, and the
humblest
stations win the highest flights. Here followeth a strain to
a
waiter's
memory, well known to the denizens of Brotherly
Love, in other hoursbut now laid i' the earth, with all odors
and honor. Some lines therein shall be seen
italicized
. 'Tis a
work of mine, for which I crave the pardon of the friend from
whose rare harp the numbers come:
ODE TO BOGLE.
DEDICATED, WITH PERMISSION, AND A PIECE OF MINT-STICK, TO META B,
AGED FOUR YEARS.
`Restitult rem cunctando.'
Eun. ap. Cicero
.
`Of Brownis and of Bogilis ful is this buke.'
Gawin Douglas
.
Bogle!
not he whose shadow flies
Before a frighted Scotchman's eyes,
But thou of Eighth near Sansomthou
Colorless color'd man, whose brow
Unmoved the joys of life surveys,
Untouched the gloom of death displays;
Reckless if joy or grief prevail,
Stern, multifarious
Bogle,
hail!
Hail may'st thou Bogle, for thy reign
Extends o'er nature's wide domain,
Begins before our earliest breath,
Nor ceases with the hour of death:
Scarce seems the blushing maiden wed,
Unless thy care the supper spread;
Half christened only were that boy,
Whose heathen squalls our ears annoy,
If, supper finished, cakes and wine
Were given by any hand but thine;
And Christian burial e'en were scant,
Unless his aid the Bogle grant.
Lover of pomps! the dead might rise,
And feast upon himself his eyes,
When marshalling the black array,
Thou
rul'st the sadness of the day;
Teaching how grief should be genteel,
And legatees should
seem
to feel.
Death's seneschal! 'tis thine to trace
For each his proper look and place,
How aunts should weep, where uncles stand,
With hostile cousins, hand in hand,
Give matchless gloves, and fitly shape
By length of face the length of crape
.
See him erect, with lofty tread,
The dark scarf streaming from his head,
Lead forth his groups in order meet,
And range them,
grief-wise
in the street;
Presiding o'er the solemn show,
The very Chesterfield of wo
.
Evil to him should bear the pall,
Yet comes two late or not at all;
Wo to the mourner who shall stray
One inch beyond the trim array;
Still worse, the kinsman who shall move,
Until thy signal voice approve.
Let widows, anxious to fulfil,
(For the first time,) the dear man's will,
Lovers and lawyers ill at ease,
For bliss deferr'd, or loss of fees,
Or heirs impatient of delay,
Chafe inly at his formal stay;
The Bogle heeds not; firm and true,
Resolved to give the dead his due,
No jot of honor will he bate,
Nor stir towards the church-yard gate,
Till the last parson is at hand,
And every hat has got its band
.
Before his stride the town gives way
Beggars and belles confess his sway;
Drays, prudes, and sweeps, a startled mass,
Rein up to let his cortge pass,
And Death himself,
that ceaseless dun,
Who waits
on
all, yet waits
for
none,
Rebuked beneath his haughty tone,
Scarce dares to call his life his own.
Nor less, stupendous man! thy power,
In festal than in funeral hour,
When gas and beauty's blended rays
Set hearts and ball-rooms in a blaze;
Or spermaceti's light
reveals
More `inward bruises' than it heals;
In flames each belle her victim kills,
And `
sparks fly upward
' in quadrilles,
Like iceberg in an Indian clime,
Refreshing Bogle breathes sublime,
Cool airs upon that sultry stream,
From Roman punch or frosted cream
So, sadly social, when we flee
From milky talk and watery tea,
To dance by inches in that strait
Betwixt a side-board and a grate,
With rug uplift, and blower tight,
'Gainst that foul fire-fiend, anthracite,
Then Bogle o'er the weary hours
A world of sweets incessant showers,
Till, blest relief from noise and foam,
The farewell pound-cake warns us home
Wide opes the crowd to let thee pass,
And hail the music of thy glass.
16
Drowning all other sounds, e'en those
From Bollman or Sigoigne that rose;
From Chapman's self some eye will stray
To rival charms upon thy tray,
Which thou dispensest with an air,
As life or death depended there.
Wo for the luckless wretch, whose back
Has stood against a window crack,
And then impartial, cool'st in turn
The youth
whom love and Lehigh burn
.
On Johnson's smooth and placid mien
A quaint and fitful smile is seen;
O'er Shepherd's pale romantic face,
A radiant simper we may trace;
But on the Bogle's steadfast cheek,
Lugubrious thoughts their presence speak.
His very smile,
screnely stern,
As lighted lachrymary urn
.
In church or state, in bower and hall,
He gives with equal face to all:
The wedding cake, the funeral crape,
The mourning glove, the festal grape;
In the same tone when crowd's disperse,
Calls Powell's hack, or Carter's hearse;
As gently grave, as sadly grim,
At the quick waltz as funeral hymn
.
Thou social Fabius! since the day,
When Rome was sayed by wise delay,
None else has found the happy chance,
By always waiting, to advance.
Let time and tide, coquettes so rude,
Pass on, yet hope to be pursued,
Thy gentler nature waits on all;
When parties rage, on thee they call,
Who seek no office in the state,
Content, while others push, to wait.
Yet, (not till Providence bestowed
On Adam's sons McAdam's road,)
Unstumbling foot was rarely given
To man nor beast when quickly driven;
And they do say, but this I doubt,
For seldom he lets things leak out,
They do say, ere the dances close,
His too are `light fantastic toes;'
Oh, if this be so, Bogle! then
How are we served by serving men!
A waiter by his weight forsaken!
An undertakerovertaken!
L'ENVOI.
Meta!
thy riper years may know
More of this world's fantastic show;
In thy time, as in mine, shall be,
Burials and pound-cake, beaux and tea;
Rooms shall be hot, and ices cold;
And flirts be both, as 't was of old;
Love, too, and mint-stick shall be made,
Some dearly bought, some lightly weighed;
As true the hearts, the forms as fair,
And equal joy and grace be there,
The smile as bright, as soft the ogle,
But nevernever such a Bogle!
One
word in your ear, reader, before we part. The writer
of the foregoing is a `Monster.' If you would see his like, (in
some men's opinion,) consult Homer, Milton, and Dante,
passim
.
You shall not find, in all their pages, a monster of more
note,
or
one that less deserves the name. He is a summer's morning
monster, and wears the brighter as the calmness of the mid-day
hours plays full upon him. I have given you a clueresolve
me my Riddle.
Totally thine,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER TWENTY-THREE.
May,
1838.
It
is no long time, respected Reader, since we communed
together
.
Yet how many matters have happened since that period,
which should give us pause, and solemn meditation!
We
are
still extant; the beams of our spirit still shine from
our
eyes;
yet there are many who, since last my sentences came to yours,
have drooped their lids for ever upon things of earth.
Numberless
ties have been severed; numberless hearts rest from their
pantings, and sleep, `no more to fold the robe o'er secret pain.'
All the deceits, the masks of life, are ended with them.
Policy
no more bids them to kindle the eye with deceitful lustre; no
more prompts to
scmblance,
which feeling condemns. They are
gone!`ashes to ashes, and dust to dust;' and when I think of
the numbers who thus pass away, I am pained within me; for I
know from them that our life is not only as a dream which
passeth
away, but that the garniture, or the carnival of it, is indeed a
vapor, sun-gilt for a moment, then colored with the dun hues of
death, or stretching its dim folds afar, until their remotest outlines
catch the imperishable glory of eternity. Such is life; made up
of successful or successless accidents; its movers and actors,
from the cradle to three-score-and-ten, pushed about by Fate:
not their own; aspiring but impotent; impelled as by visions,
and rapt in a dreamwhich who can dispel?
To those
who take every event in their lives as a matter of
`special providence;' who make a shop-keeper and supercargo
of Omnipotence; who refer to celestial interposition the recovery
of a debt, the acknowledgment of a larceny, or the profits on a
box of candles, or a bundle of ten-penny nails; who perceive
something
more
than a special providence in the death of a
sparrow
,
or the fall of a brick-bat, sent from vagrant hand; to those,
all argument of reason would be useless, even if they who
employed
it were warm and sincere, as I know
I
am, in a belief of
the
general
watchfulness of my Creator over men's wo and weal.
But, as in things that are of the earth earthy, there is but a step
from the sublime to the ridiculous, as was said by the great
captain
of his age, so it appears to me is it with things celestial. It
seems impossible for the human intellect to appreciate that
trifling
ubiquity of supervision which some credulous persons, more
devout
than intelligent, impute to the supervision of the Almighty.
That God is everywhere, admits of no dispute; but when we
ramify his discernments into the scrutiny of those minutest
matters
which would scarcely attract for a moment the observation
even of low-minded men, we create an anomaly which has, in
proportion to its indifference, an aspect of frivolity, and an
attitude
of common-place. It seems to establish or defend that
theory, which pronounces that whatever
is,
is right. This is a
phrase of
Pope's,
which in my humble opinion contains much
more poetry than philosophy. To maintain that all which
is,
is
right, does away, in my poor sense, with all true appreciation of
rectitude and wrong. It nullifies the Decalogue. If the
postulate
be true, why the tablets of the law, or that divine mountainous
sermon? What need of statues, or the jury of a man's peers?
Why arraign a man who abstracts the horse from his stable,
without
a `by y'r leave' from the owner, or seduces a ram from the
pasture, without clover or salt? Why should penitentiaries be
filled? Why Auburn or Sing-Sing hear the groans of the
prisoners
?
If all that
is,
is right, these prisoners have but done their
duty; counterfeiting is but a pastime, though fruitful; perjury is
a species of verbal romance, sanctified by a kiss on calf or
sheepskin
;
larceny and burglary, the acts of brief visitors who make
strong
attachments;
and even murder itself, a modification of the
code d'honneur
a kind of `popping the question' in the great
matter of the future; sometimes put with lead to the aorta, or with
steel to the jugular.
But
while I impugn the philosophy of Pope, in the phrase
hereinbefore mentioned, let me not arraign his verse, or cast one
doubtful shade upon the brightness of his thoughts, or the sweet
harmony of his numbers. How often have their cadences
satisfied
my ear, and enriched my mind! In his Elise, the actual,
solemn swell of the music which distracted the nun betwixt the
choice of Earth or Heaven, seems pouring from the strain. He
brings to my mind those sunny seasons when my sense of
harmony
,
though less acute, was perhaps more rapturous, than now;
when the rustle of leaves, the casual trills of summer birds, the
chiming dance of waters, and the zephyrs, floating from the
fragrant
south or balmy west, seemed to breathe of the concords, and
herald the dulcet airs, of Paradise. Sometimes, in the jostling
din and bustle of active life, I lose these harmonies for a little
season, and I feel oppressed with the spirit of discontent and
complaining; and could say within me, as do the Hebrews in
their service of the morning of the ninth of Ab, lamenting the
sweet bells lost from the priestly robes of Israel; the lost language
of seers and poets, the ephod, and the memorials, `The voice
of wailing hath passed over my melodious psalteries; wo is me!'
Is there any poetry equal in severe simplicity, and quiet
natural beauty, to that of the Hebrews of Israel? I confess that
I think not. In his inspired wanderings, I can conceive that
Shakspeare walked as it were arm-in-arm with Moses and the
prophets; with that complaining man of Uz, who held colloquies
with the Almighty, in whirlwind and storm. In truth, as I have
pored over some of the beautiful inspirations of the Dispersed of
modern days, they come to my spirit like `the airs of Palestine.'
Indeed, I have had great doubts, whenas I have overlooked the
pages which have been lent me by a Rabbi of the Synagogue,
written on one page with mysterious characters, and on the other
with the
pure
English version of those venerated Scriptures,
whether the renderings of
Yarchi
and
Leeser,
and others, were
not more beautiful than those which have given to us the Word,
from the sovereign command of the First James of England.
Let us list the following, as read in the Fast of the ninth of Ab.
`The lot of the Lord's inheritance is Jacob. He encircled him,
and he watched him, and he guarded him as the apple of his eye.
As an eagle stirreth up her nest, fluttereth her young, spreadeth
abroad her wing, taketh them, beareth them aloft on her pinions,
so the Lord did lead him.' And how eloquently do they
complain
!
`Where,' they ask, in their deep and briefest language,
`where is the residence of the Divine Glory? the house of the
Levitic order, and their desk? Where the glory of the faithful
city?
Where are the chiefs of thy schools, and where thy judges?
Who arrange the answers to them?who ask concerning thy
mysteries? Where are they
who walk in the paths of truth,
enlightened
by the brightness of thy shining?
'
There is something extremely touching to me in these
Israelitish
lamentations. They were wailed
con amore,
and by the
card. I truly believe, that all the sackcloth poetry of modern
time, put together, would give a mere dividend of the great
capital
of dolor employed by the olden-time Hebrews. They wept
and howled copiously, yea, abundantly. There is something,
after all, sacred in sorrow. It has a
dignity,
which joy never
possesses. The sufferings of Medea in Euripides; the scenes
betwixt Andromache and Hector; the pangs of Virginius; these
are remembered, and will be, when the glittering treasures of
Crsus at Delphi shall be forgotten, and the gay
mcasures
of
Gyges be lost to
men
. Here is a strain in this kind; one that
was spent at the close of a summer day, some year or so agone.
It needs a little preliminary blazon.
You must know, reader, that there lieth, some three miles or
so from Brotherly Lovea city of this continent, a delectable
citya place of burial, `Laurel Hill' by name. On a sweeter
spot, the great sun never threw the day-spring of the morning,
nor the blush of the evening West. There the odors and colors
of nature profusely repose; there, to rest of a spring or summer
afternoon, on some rural seat, looking at trees, and dancing
waters, and the like, you would wonder at that curious question
addressed of Dean Swift, on his death-bed, to a friend at his side:
`Did you ever know of any really
good weather
in this world?'
You would take the affirmative. Well, thus I sang:
Here
the lamented dead in dust shall lie,
Life's lingering languors o'erits labors done;
Where waving boughs, betwixt the earth and sky,
Admit the farewell radiance of the sun.
Here the long concourse from the murmuring town,
With funeral pace and slow, shall enter in;
To lay the loved in tranquil silence down,
No more to suffer, and no more to sin.
And here the impressive stone, engraved with words
Which Grief sententious gives to marble pale,
Shall teach the heart, while waters, leaves, and birds
Make cheerful music in the passing gale.
Say, wherefore should we weep, and wherefore pour
On scented airs the unavailing sigh
While sun-bright waves are quivering to the shore,
And landscapes bloomingthat the loved should die?
There is an emblem in this peaceful scene:
Soon, rainbow colors on the woods will fall;
And autumn gusts bereave the hills of green,
As sinks the year to meet its cloudy pall.
Then, cold and pale, in distant vistas round,
Disrobed and tuneless, all the woods will stand;
While the chained streams are silent as the ground,
As Death had numbed them with his icy hand.
Yet, when the warm soft winds shall rise in spring,
Like struggling day-beams o'er a blasted heath,
The bird returned shall poise her golden wing,
And liberal nature break the spell of death.
So, when the tomb's dull silence finds an end,
The blessed Dead to endless youth shall rise;
And hear the archangel's thrilling summons blend
Its tones with anthems from the upper skies.
There shall the good of earth be found at last,
Where dazzling streams and vernal fields expand;
Where Love her crown attainsher trials past
And, filled with rapture, hails the better land!
Thus I strummed the old harpsichord, from which I have
aforetime, at drowsy hours and midnight intervals, extracted a
few accidental numbers, (more pleasant doubtless to beget than
read,) `sleepless myself, to give to others sleep!'
Well,
that is the only way to write without fatigue, both to
author and reader. In all that pertains to the petty businesses
which bow us to the routine of this work-day world, I am as it
were at home. I am distinctly a mover in the great tide of
Action
sweeping on around me; yet when I enter into the
sanctuary
of the Muses, lo! at one wave of the spiritual wand, this
`dim and ignorant present' disappears. I breathe a rarer
atmosphere
.
Visions of childhood throng upon my soul; the blue
mountain-tops; the aerial circles of far-off landscapes; the hazy
borizon of ocean-waters; the wind-tossed verdure of summer;
the hills that burst into singing; and the sweet harmonies of
nature
Universal
Parent!all appeal to my spirit. This
dismemberment
of the ideal from the actual, is a fountain of
enjoyment
,
which whoso knows not, has yet the brightest lessons of
life to learn. He has yet to enter that fairy dominion which
seems the intermediate territory betwixt the airy realms conceived
of in this world, and the more radiant glories of that undiscovered
country,
`from whose bourne
No traveller returns.'
There is something in the feeling, beyond the impulses of
fame, beyond the `mouth honor, breath,' which the falsest of the
world are the most ready to bestow; something beyond the empty
plaudits, the spurious honors, of the multitude, given to-day,
withheld to-morrow. Anathemas a moment gone, benedictions
now, these are the marks and signals of the multitude. I would
not seek their favor, for their disapproval is the same in the end.
It is a curious truth, that no man realizes fame, until he is
beyond
it; that the tardy honors which men receive from kingly or from
republican powers, generally come too late to be appreciated
or rather, too late to be of value.
Yet
there is something exceedingly solemn in the mutability
of a name. 'T is indeed as a vapor, which appeareth but for a
little season, and then vanisheth away. I like not this
life-after-death
repute, this post-mortem vitality. `Give it to me, if I
deserve
it, while the breath of existence sports in my nostrils;
while I can walk, and hear and see, and jostle among men!'
Such are my aspirations, malgr the littleness of it. To have
antiquaries
puzzling themselves with one's merits, supposing that
they might reach beyond his sepulture, is to my mind a dry and
arid prospect. One wants to be quiet. `To subsist in bones,'
saith my old friend, Sir Thomas Browne, `and to be but
pyramidally
extant, is a fallacy in duration. Vain ashes, which in
the oblivion of Names, Persons, Times, and Sexes, have found
unto themselves a fruitless continuation, and only arise unto late
posterity, as emblems of mortal vanities, antidotes of pride.
Oblivion
blindly scattereth her poppy, and deals with the memory
of men, without distinction to merit of perpetuity. Who can but
pity the founder of the pyramids? Herostratus lives that burnt
the temple of Diana; he is almost lost that built it. Time hath
spared the epitaph of Adrian's horseconfounded that of
himself
.
In vain we compute our felicities by the advantage of our
good names, since bad have equal durations; and Thersites is
is like to live as long as Agamemnon, without the favor of the
Everlasting Register. The Canaanitish woman lives more
happily
without a name, than Herodius with one; and who had not
rather have been the good thief than
Pilate?
Who knows
whether the best of men be known? Or whether there be not
more remarkable persons forgot, than any that stand remembered
in the known accompt of time?' These be puzzling queries.
In
our own country, methinks I can depaint the means and
methods of posthumous fame. Here, if one who had attained to
some eminence in his life-time, could awake fifty years after he
had been quietly inurned, and be permitted to read the
newspapers
,
he might find that a steamer of his name had burst her
boiler; `a terrible accident, with loss of lives,' on river
Mississippi
or Ohio; or mayhap that a horse, commemorating his
cognomen
,
had been beaten at the Eagle or other course, with the
particulars. Perhaps that he had devoted himself to posterity;
to be cited in other years as the source whence sanguinary
mixtures
of renown had sprung; advertised in hand-bills; and to aid,
perhaps, in promoting to the legislature his owner, or guardian,
or friend. This is fame, or a part of its mode of bestowment,
here below. Fame!a bet-worda paragrapha
feuille
volante
a hand-bill. Thank the powers! I have precious little
thereof. And the most I would have, reader, is to write myself
your friend,
Ollapod
.
NUMBER
TWENTY-FOUR
October,
1839.
Sitting
down, good my reader, to write a few paragraphs,
named of the above, I was sorely perplexed as to the number. `
Ollapodiana
:'
Number
what?
By the mass, I could not tell;
the time was so long; my thoughts and subjects were a broken
chain; I seemed, indeed, to have but just returned from some
other land, beyond the influence of days, and hours, and all those
vile admeasurements of time, so rigidly observed by such as send
Williams (bills, in the vulgate,) for services rendered in artisan
line, and by banking institutions. Time seemed to have
dissolved
all partnership with my vitality, and I was well nigh upon the
point of exclaiming upon him, in the tone of honest Diccon, in
Gammer Gurton's Needle:
`out upon thee,
Above all other loutes, fye on thee!'
But I checked the malediction. `Out upon Time?'no!
Thou reverend softener of human sorrow; thou who, throned
upon the clouds of undiscovered fate, or with thy bright lock and
thy insatiate weapon, enrobed in the sunshine of hope, and gay
with that golden haze which plays above the distant vale of vernal
Expectation; no! not out upon thee! Friend to the wretched,
thou shouldst be a woman, for men, in the profundity of their
blundering, talk of events in thy `womb;' Great Unsexed, and
yet evermore preserving in the primer thy masculine identity; thy
rather
disreputable and misplaced queue; and displaying in thy
somewhat ancient physiognomy that desire of getting-ahead, so
peculiar to thy respectful fellow-citizens, the American people.
They speak of thee with respect, yet they take thee
unceremoniously
`by the forelock,' whether thy yellow hair floats on the
eastern mountains, or thou tremblest at the gates of the West.
Twin-brother of
Eternity!
oh, why so taciturn to human hearts,
whose yearning core would thrill with undying rapture, to hear
the particulars of the doings and scenes in that vast country, the
dim dominion of thy Great Relation!
Observe,
my friend, I am not writing
against
time; so let us
slowly on. My impressions of the old gentleman are sometimes
extremely fantastic. I was looking, the other day at a playful
young cat, just emerging from the fairy time of kittenhood;
something
between the revelry of the fine mewer, and the gravity
without
the experience of the tabby. Now one would think that no
great subject for contemplation. It would be looked upon by the
million as inferior to astronomy. But it is the connexion of the
events having reference to the quadruped, which renders her of
interest.
Time
will expand her person, increase her musical
powers, and bring her admirers. In her back, on winter
evenings
,
will sleep a tolerable imitation of the lightnings of heaven.
She will make great noise o' nights, and lap at interdicted cream.
So much for her exteriorher love-passages and obstreperous
concerts. But look within! That compact embodiment of
ligaments
and conduits, now treading gingerly over those fading
leaves, and grapes of purple, what may they not be hereafter?
Whose hearts may they not thrill, when strung on the sonorous
bridge of a cremona, guided to softest utterances by the master
hand? How many memories of youth, and hope, and fond
thoughts, and sunny evenings, and bowers by moonlight, radiant
with the beams of Cynthia, and warm with the sweet reflex of
Beauty; the heart, touched by the attempered entrail,
rosin-encompassed
and bow-bestrid, may bound in age with recollections
of departed rapture. And all from what? Smile not at the
association
,
my friendfrom Time and cat-gut.
It
is a pleasure to the bereaved, to think that time, which
sadly
overcometh all things, can alone restore the separated, and
bring the mutually-loved together. Time, which plants the
furrow
,
and sows the seed of death, stands to the faithful spirit a
messenger of light at that mysterious wicket-gate, from whence
we step and enter upon the vast Unknown. Compare with this
enlarged, this universe-embracing view, which breaks at once
upon the soul, the act of laying down in what to some may seem
a sleep of cold obstruction; and where is the resemblance of the
one, or what eye hath heard, or what heart conceived, of the
infinitude
of the other: where the blooming immensity of a
dominion
,
beyond all realms enrolled of earth, spreads brightly to
the sight, illumined for ever with the bountiful smile of the Giver
of Good.
Now there are some who do love marvellously to talk about
the dainty glories of Spring. One of this sort is my friend
Daffodilly
.
Daf. is a clever individual, with a heart as open as
the day to the charities of life. But he turns up his nose at all
the seasons, excepting Spring. The sight of an early flower in
April makes his head a watering-pot. He is troubled with a
kind of
green-
sickness, and reads Thomson as though his like
never was nor could be. He has the `pink incense' always upon
him. Summer he despises; and Autumn, to him, is one scene of
storm and gloom. Winter he associates with blue noses,
cracked
lips, and the absence of all feeling among men. `But Spring!'
he says, `that opens the heart, that excites the sympathies of men
and hens, and produces glory and goslings!' I verily believe
that Daff. would listen with more delight by the side of a green
frog-pond, to the swollen concert of its occupants, in spring-time,
than to the sweetest opera in the world, I know his taste, and I
know a glorious book
*
*
Professor
Longfellow
's
`Hyperion.'
he has not read. Let me commend unto
him this passage therein: `In all climates, Spring is beautiful.
In the South, it is intoxicating, and sets a poet beside himself.
The birds begin to sing; they utter a few rapturous notes, and
then wait for an answer in the silent woods. Those green-coated
musicians, the frogs, make a holiday in the neighboring marshes.
They, too, belong to the orchestra of Nature; whose vast theatre
is again opened, though the doors have been so long bolted with
icicles, and the scenery hung with snow and frost, like cobwebs.
This is the prelude which announces the rising of the broad
green curtain. Already the grass shoots forth. The waters leap
with thrilling pulse through the veins of the earth; the sap
through the veins of the plants and trees; and the blood through
the veins of man. What a thrill of delight in spring-time! What a
joy in being and moving! Men are at work in gardens; and in
the air there is an odor of the fresh earth. The leaf-buds begin to
swell and blush. The white blossoms of the cherry hang upon the
boughs like snow-flakes; and ere long, our next-door neighbors
will be completely hidden from us by the dense green foliage. The
May-flowers open their soft blue eyes. Children are let loose in
the fields and gardens. They hold buttercups under each other's
chins, to see if they love butter. And the little girls adorn
themselves
with chains and curls of dandelions; pull out the yellow
leaves to see if the school-boy loves them, and blow the down from
the leafless stalk, to find out if their mothers want them at home.
And at night so cloudless and so still! Not a voice of living
thing, not a whisper of leaf or waving bough, not a breath of
wind, not a sound upon the earth nor in the air! And over
head bends the blue sky, dewy and soft, and radiant with
innumerable
stars, like the inverted bell of some blue flower,
sprinkled
with golden dust, and breathing fragrance. Or if the
heavens
are overcast; it is no wild storm of wind and rain; but clouds
that melt and fall in showers. One does not wish to sleep; but
lies awake to hear the pleasant sound of the dropping rain.'
I must
say, myself, that after we have done with June, the
summer mislikes me. The sun becomes impertinent; his choler
increases, untill he is absolutely insufferable, and you fly from his
presence. You can hunt small panting birds in the woods, then,
if you have the heart, as they sit on the boughs, with their hot
mouths open; and great is the glory thereof. I once damaged
the fetlock of a wren in that way, from the end of a rusty musket,
which kicked the hunter over; and sent the entrails of a red
squirrel, from the corner of a zig-zag fence, upon the
roundabout
of a traveller, who was journeying westward in a stage of
the Telegraph line; my venatory exploits being all within the
compass of these.
As I write, I can appreciate the
autumn-feeling
something
holy and peculiarprevailing within me. I can see, by the
increasing
azure of the sky, by the enlarged clearness of the
distant
landscapes, when the eye greets them from the city, and by
the transparent briskness of the air at evening, that the summer
has gone, and the autumn-time begun. The woodlands stand in
calm solemnity, robed in that rainbow coloring, the herald of
their fallen honors, and the November storm. At such a season,
the heart goes back, as on wings of the dove, to departed friends,
and vanished pleasures; and the sad hours of memory come up
in long review.
The evening approaches. The clouds arise; rain-drops
patter
on the branches; the winds are loud: the hours pass
imperceptibly
.
I will writeand rest:
'T is an autumnal evethe low winds, sighing
To wet leaves, rustling as they hasten by;
The eddying gusts to tossing boughs replying,
And ebon darkness filling all the sky;
The moon, pale mistress, palled in solemn vapor,
The rack, swift-wandering through the void above,
As I, a dreamer by my lonely taper,
Send back to faded hours the plaint of love.
Blossoms of peace, once in my pathway springing,
Where have your brightness and your splendor gone?
And
Thou,
whose voice to me came sweet as singing,
What region holds thee in the vast
Unknown?
What star far brighter than the rest contains thee,
Beloved, departedempress of my heart!
What bond of full beatitude enchains thee,
In realms unveiled by pen, or prophet's art?
Ah! loved and lost! in these autumnal hours,
When fairy colors deck the painted tree,
When the vast woodlands seem a sea of flowers,
Oh! then my soul exulting bounds to thee!
Springs, as to clasp thee yet in
this
existence,
Yet to behold thee at my lonely side:
But the fond vision melts at once to distance,
And my sad heart gives echo
she has died!
Yes! when the morning of her years was brightest,
That Angel-presence into dust went down;
While yet with rosy dreams her rest was lightest,
Death for the olive wove the cypress crown;
Sleep, which no waking knows, o'ercame her bosom,
O'ercame her large, bright, spiritual eyes;
Spared in her bower connubial one fair blossom
Then bone her spirit to the upper skies.
There let me meet her, when, life's struggles o'er,
The pure in love and thought their faith renew:
Where man's forgiving and redeeming Lover
Spreads out his paradise to every view.
Let the dim Autumn, with its leaves descending,
Howl on the winter's vergeyet Spring will come:
So my freed soul, no more 'gainst fate contending,
With all it loveth, shall regain its home.
No more, my readersave only I am thine.
O.
NUMBER TWENTY-FIVE
.
April,
1840.
How do you bear yourself, my friend and reader, on the
subject
of
winter
generally? What are `your views?' If you are
young and sanguine, with no revulsions or tempests of the heart
to remember, I will warrant that you like old Hyem, and
patronize
that most windy individual, Boreas, of that ilk. Well, you
have a free right to your opinion, and if you held it two years or
less ago, you had the honor to agree with me. But I confess on
that point a kind of a warped idiosyncracy; an unaccountable
change of opinion. The truth is, reader, between you and me,
there is not much dignity in winter, in a city. When, in the
country, you can look out upon the far-off landscapes, the cold
blue hills rising afar, and where a snow-bank
is
really what it is
cracked up to be; where the blast comes sounding to your
dwelling over a sweep of woods, and lakes, and snowy fields, for
miles of dim extension, there is some grandeur in the thing. But
what is it to hear a blast, half choked with the smoke and soot
of the city, wheezing down a contemptible chimney-pot, or round
a corner, where the wind, that glorious emblem of freedom, has
no charter at all to `blow out' as he pleases, but is confined by
the statute of brick-and-mortar restrictions?
I begin
to affect the softer seasons; and I look with more
than usual earnestness for the coming-on of Spring. I am not
universal chronologist enough to know whether the
creation
began
in the spring, but I should suppose it did. If, when `the
morning stars sang together,' there was one out of tune; one
whose rle was imperfect; that belonged rather to the stock
company of stars; that took no part in the concert; I apprehend
it must have been one of those cold winter stars, that glister, and
go through you, with their cold and unimpassioned blinking. I
do not affect the `dog star;' but I must admit that the stars of
spring, summer, and of autumn, are my favorites. Those of
spring seem to
throb
with love, and light, and joy, that
multitudes
of flowers are springing, and that unnumbered sighs are
breathing, in the world beneath; as if indeed they knew and
relished
the fact, that the roses and violets had again appeared on the
earth; that `the time of the singing of the birds had come, and
the voice of the turtle was heard in the land.' True, the
summer
stars have rather too fervent a glitter; they look down with
a tropical kind of aspect, and induce one to go on the shady
side of a street, even at evening, in order to avoid the intense
heat of the moonshine. At such hours, one seems to have
reached that point, mentioned in nautical phrase, which I
translate
for ears polite, where the first settlement beyond purgatory
is to be remunerated, and there is no tar to cancel the obligation.
As for the autumn stars, they are to be praised in
numbers;
not
in a series, but in verse, as dazzling and pure as the light they
dispense, and the thoughts they awaken. Whoever gazed at
them, in their homes of blue infinity, without rapture and
gratitude
?
Talking
of gratitude, reminds me of one of the most
extraordinary
developments of that quality, which I ever remember to
have heard of any where. It occurred in a southern city; where
there did live a person, otherwise called an individual, who was
considered one of the most parsimonious of all the tribe of Adam.
He had gone for nearly fifteen years without the imbuing of his
personal top, or apex, with a new hat. He was singularly
irrascible
,
owing to the fact that he peculiarly answered to the
comprehensive
definition of man in general; he was an irregular
digestive
tube, with the principle of immortality at his top, and
pedal grain upon his understanding. Having worn his
eternal
ram-beaver into greasy desuetude, he came to the conclusion
to get a new one; which he didprice twelve dollars. It was
placed, in glossy youth, upon his hall-table; the `
old
hat,' as he
called it
only
after he had got its successor, was removed, and he
sat down to his dinner with all the certainty that the next day he
would strike the town with a fresh sensation. He was not often
`on the street;' for be it known,
He was a man retired in wealth,
An ancient man, in feeble health.
But the fatal sisters with their intolerable shears, clipt his hope
in the bud. A varlet who had watched him all the way from the
hatter's to his homea sort of crazy lounger of the place, more
knave than fool, though enough of eitherdetermined to `regain
his felt, and feel what he regained.' And as the citizen sat at
meat, and thinking of the novelty of hat which he should sport on
the morrow, it came to pass that the varlet entered, and stole the
unhackneyed chapeau from the hall. He left in the place of it,
his own miserable head-gear, open at top, and smothered in
grease, with the following words on a slip of whitey-brown paper,
in pencil:
`
My Suffering Sir:
`I have taken your new hat, but I leave you my
eternal gratitude
.
`Your anonymous friend,
`
B. Barlow
.
`P. S. I leave you an
open
apology for what I have taken, which I wish
you to show to a candid world.'
`B. B.'
Great was the proprietor of that hat's consternation, (this is
rather an obscure, but a very common, mode of transposition,)
when he came out after dinner to seek what was lost. `
Confound
him! curse him!' was his vehement ejaculation. `Curse
his `gratitude!' What good does that do me?
Where is my
new hat?
'
I have
read, with a great deal of interest, the extraordinary
and quite original proposition, by the favorite writer and pulpit
orator of the `Messiah' congregation,
*
*
Rev.
Orville Dewey
; who suggested, in a secular address, that the whistle
of the locomotive might yet give place to a safety-valve that should `discourse
most excellent music.'
Editor
.
concerning the progress
of music. There are few who do not love the concord of sweet
sounds; if they are, we have assurance, on the highest literary
authority, that they are fit for stratagems, and the `spoils of
victory'
won thereby. But I launch forth at once upon a strong
expression, which I seldom use, when I say, that I rather think
that the subsequent theory of my favorite aforesaid is likely to
make an immense revolution in the progress of musical science;
namely,
music by steam
. When we look back to what was done
in the musical days of `Salmagundi,' when a fall of snow,
parliamentary
deliberations, and other soft and sleepy transactions,
were expressed by appropriate music, we find that the science,
like the witness in his box, `stared into the face of the public
with rapid strides.' There was no evading the current melody.
But this was in the infancy of the science, in our happy land.
And I have been thinking it most surprising that this matter has
not before been discovered. I have supposed that it must have
been owing to the alarming want of taste which has been
ascertained
to exist, by those who are only enabled to remark on
this most obstruse and interesting subject, that there are `two
beats in a bar; two down, and two up.' Indeed, it is a curious
thing, this same music. My old friend, Sir Thomas Browne,
with all the inquiry of his mind, tells us that he considers the
question, `what songs the syrens sang,' as a decided enigma;
and I believe it has never been accurately ascertained what tune
was `pitched upon,' when the morning stars sang together. But
we may venture to indulge the idea that they were all perfect in
their parts, from the glittering
basso
to the effulgent
tenore;
the
Bear, the Pleiades, and all. Under the circumstances, and with
no opportunity for rehearsal, I am persuaded that the whole
concert
was as well `got up' as could have been expected in the
case, and at so short a notice.
I have
turned this subject of steam-music extensively over in
my mind, of late; and I have married myself to the idea, after a
very short courtship, that it is a kind of thing that must
go on
.
At the first blush, indeed, it might appear chimerical; but I ask
the skeptic why the steam-whistle of a locomotive should not
discourse
in tones more soft and winning? Why can not a
locomotive
ask a cow to leave a railroad track in a politer manner
than in that discordant shriek, which excites the animal's
indignation
,
and awakens her every sentiment of quadrupedal
independence
?
I protest against such conduct. We presume a
locomotive
to buzz, and
vapor,
and deport itself pragmatically; but
its conversation by the way ought to be chastened into something
like propriety; and please Apollo, I think it will. I once saw
an animal of this stamp killed instantly by the crushing transit of
a train; and I thought I saw in the singular turn of her upper
lip, as her torn-out heart lay yet palpitating on the rails, a
peculiar
curl of disdain, in her dying moments, at the treatment she
had won. I put this down, because I hope 't will be
remembered
as a warning to whistlers in especial, and the great generation
of calves unborn.
On
one of those warm April-like afternoons, with which, in
our Philadelphia meridian, the fierce February chose to delight
us, as if by contrast, I sat by my open window, which
commands
,
through and over pleasant trees, fine glimpses of the
country: and
`As the red round sun descended,
Mid clouds of crimson light,'
I began to feel coming upon me the influence of a reverie. For
a long time, my good friend whom I `occupy' at present with
this matter, I have had my day-dreams sadly broken in upon;
in the few roses I have gathered, I have found the cypress
mingling
among their faded leaves; and a voice, as from the lowly
leafiness of an autumnal wilderness, has spoken of the lost and of
the past. Why is it, that though the mind may wander, the
heart
can never forget? Well could I say with him who sings
so well:
`
Thou
unrelenting Past!
Strong are the barriers round thy dark domain;
And fetters, sure and fast,
Hold all that enter thy unbreathing reign.
`In thy abysses hide
Beauty and excellence unknown; to thee
Earth's wonder and her pride
Are gathered, as the waters to the sea!'
17
And there they rest in dust and cold obstruction! Oh, that
those who walk about in the beauty of the morning, with the
greenness of earth around them, and the mysterious vitality which
makes the elements in their nostrils, would think of this;
considering
truly their coming end!
But
I digress entirely; being about to say, that this reverie
was superinduced by looking at some observations that had been
made upon the charming theory of my friend. I thought of the
time when such a thing as steam-music should at least equal the
common museum-music, if not surpass it, and distance
conclusively
the airs wherewith the goodly puritans of yore were wont
to chant the immortal metre of Sternhold and Hopkins.
Imagination
took a wide rangeand presently I was in a dream.
And methought in my dream, that I was in the second story
parlor of the `Atlantic and Pacific Hotel, and United States'
Half-way House,' on the very top of the Rocky Mountains.
This hotel was built of marble, with splendid Corinthian pillars,
gracing a portico nearly three hundred feet long. Meseemed I
had just arrived there by rail-road, in four hours and a half from
Philadelphia, which I remembered, as I left, was on each side
of the Schuykill, that being central, as the Thames is in London.
We did not stop at Pittsburgh, or any of those immense
metropoles
,
but whizzed at the rate I have mentioned. My destination
was to the city of Memphis, on the shore of the Pacific, where I
expected to arrive at two o'clock the next day.
A considerable village stretched along the mountain, although
the place was not in existence three weeks before. After a
sumptuous repast, and a beautiful view of the
country,
east and
west, which I may hereafter describe, I took up the village
newspaper
.
It was entitled the `New-Babylon Observer, and
Register
of the World.' The copy I held in my hand bore the date
of May the seventeenth, nineteen hundred and forty. It was sent
round the place by a rail-car, and was thrown into the dwellings
by machinery, conducted by steam. The first paragraphs that
struck my eye, were these, amply emblazoned, suddenly to
catch the general eye:
>`REPORTED FOR THE NEW-BABYLON OBSERVER.
`TERRIFIC CIRCUMSTANCE!
`
It
becomes our painful but imperative and extraordinary duty, to
promulgate
the facts of a disaster which reached us to-day, by the mail from
Thebes,
via
the perpendicular railroad. As a party were ascending, with
the locomotive playing a lively tune, assisted on the piana-forte by another
locomotive, that had been hired by Signor
Goitini,
preparatory to his first
concert in New-Babylon, some religious persons of the `United States'
Established
Mormon Church,' insisted that the tune, being irreverent, should
be changed. This offensive tune was no less than the well known and
popular song, (supposed to have been written in England, previous to the
subjugation of that place by the Russians,) entitled `Proceed it, ye
Crippled
Ones, Babylon's Nigh.' This complimentary course on the part of
the locomotive, and the gentlemanly engineer with whom it associates, was
hissed by the Mormons, until they were overcome by the
encores
of the
majority. The locomotive was of course embarrassed, but we understand,
continued to play. One of the Mormons, enraged beyond measure at this
circumstance, rushed forward through the door-ways of the train, and
wantonly
turned the stop-cock of `What's become of Good Old Daniel?' one
of the slowest tunes of the day. The consequence was, that the train
proceeded
with the greatest discord, because the latter tune was for the
backtrack
,
in descending the mountain. The result was, the cars were thrown
off the rails, down a precipice of nearly three hundred feet; but owing to
the exertions of Mr.
Inclination Plain,
first engineer, they were got
back by his Upward Impulse Screw, which has thus far answered
admirably
,
stopping cars in mid-air, if they run off a precipice, and returning them
safely, by means of the patent steam wind-bags, which extend beneath the
trains, and destroy their gravity.
`We are authorized to state, that no blame attaches to the quick-tune
party; whereas the slow-tune faction were entirely in the wrong. Thus
has a science, invented by a monk of the Unitarian order, in the city of
Alleghania, (then called New-York,) and which worked its way into so
much respect and favor, been the cause of danger, by the pertinacity of a
few. We trust it will not occur again; if it do, we shall proclaim it to the
tune of the Rogue's March, through the whole of New-Babylon, in our
Steam-car Extra. No doubt our dastardly contemporary, of the `
War-horse
of Freedom and America's Champion,' whose prospectus and types
arrived last night, and whose first number appears to-morrow, will endeavor
to contradict this statement. We dare him to his teeth to do so. He
knows, while the snaky blood writhes at his caitiff heart, and the malignity
of twenty-three demons, (we think we should be justified in mentioning
more,) glares from his diabolic eye, that what we state is fact; and that
each member of the quick-tune party, in asserting his inalienable musical
rights, was as innocent as an unbegotten merino.'
Reader,
the record of my reverie is not ended, but my sheet
is full. If I live and prosper, we will meet again. Heaven bless
you, and all the children!
Ever thine,
Ollapod
.
THE END OF OLLAPODIANA.MRS. HEMANS.
We
weep not, when the yellow leaves are gathered,
While Autumn's peace and plenteousness abound;
When from the tinted boughs, like rainbows withered,
The golden fruit drops richly to the ground;
When solemn Nature round her sadness throws
A mellow glory and a warm repose.
We weep not then, amid the fruitage falling,
Whose affluent incense rises to the sky;
Though then we hear soft spirit-voices calling,
That tell how loved and cherished things must die;
For to the fairest blooms a change must come,
That the ripe treasures may be garnered home.
'Twas thus with thee, Beloved! their holy mission
Thy heart and soaring lays at last fulfilled;
Then rolled the cloud beyond the spirit's vision,
Till all the music of thy lyre was stilled;
And like a melting wave, or waning sun,
Passed from this vale of ill the Gifted One!
'Tis well, divinest Soul, with thee! for Heaven
Had filled thine inmost thoughts with sacred dreams;
And to thy reverie and song was given
A world of radiant and immortal gleams;
Yea, gorgeous pictures of a better land
Did ever to thy view their scene expand,
Now, all their fadeless pomp and glow perceiving,
Thou breathest freely, in celestial air;
Thy tender heart hath ceased its weary grieving,
And the pure mind is bathed in rapture there;
While, mid fair ways no earthly foot hath trod,
In white thou walkest, present with thy
God
!
Thou hearest melody, whose flowing numbers
Once came but faintly to thy mortal ear,
When ills of time were lost in evening slumbers,
And magic Fancy brought her Eden near;
Thou hast thy yearning hopes' fruition now
The wreath of Paradise surrounds thy brow!
Thou hearest harps delicious, sweetly ringing,
And sister Spirits fan thee with their wings;
With them thou minglest, and with them art singing,
Where, named of Life, the crystal river springs;
Where, like some changing prism, expand the skies,
And purple hills from vernal vales arise.
Thou art in glory, oh rejoicing Spirit!
Thou look'st on flowers that no pale frost may stain;
And from a changeless Friend thou dost inherit
A lyre triumphant, breathing not of pain;
Thou hast thy
Home
at last, from sorrow free,
And all is blessedness and peace with thee!
Philadelphia
.
W. G. C.`SYMPOSIUM RUMPO-DRACONIS:
Congregere in Pons Cayuguum, Februarius Sexdecim, nox media, pro
jocus et exercitatio, et animi relaxatio.
Object
.
Elevation of the Ancient Henry
.
Hy. Wilford,
Prases
.
feb
. 15 1
t
.
N. B. Preliminary Rendezvous. H. No. 3. R. No. 4.'`
My Dearest Deer:
`
Sithence
that love, which is the lightest bird in the world, hath
nestled in my bosom, it hath proved so full of egg, that I have been forced
to suffer him to lay there. But sithence he hath laid it, he hath sate upon
it a long tyme, and at length hath hatched this little pullet which I now
send you. The breeding of it will cost you little; all the food it will
require
will be caresses and kisses. And withal, it is so well taught that it
speaks better than a paraqueto, and so will tell you my sufferings for you.
It hath in charge to inquire of you whether or no you are yet displeased
with me, and to let me know your mind, not by a pullet so big as this, but
by the least chicken you please, if I may have your favor; with this promise,
that if you have laid aside your rigor, I shall send you no more pullets, but
present you with full-grown birds, full of valor and affection.
Lysis
.THE DEAD.
`
Methinks
it is good to be here: if thou wilt, let us build three tabernacles; one
for thee, one for Moses, and one for Elias.'
The Bible
.
Methinks
it is good to be here:
If thou wilt, let us buildbut for whom?
Nor Elias nor Moses appear;
But the shadows of evening encompass with gloom
The abode of the Dead, and the place of the tomb.
Shall we build to Ambition? Ah no!
Affrighted, he shrinketh away;
For see, they would pin him below,
In a dark narrow cave, and begirt with cold clay,
To the meanest of reptiles a peer and a prey
To Beauty? Ah no!she forgets
The charm that she wielded before;
Nor knows the foul worm, that he frets
The skin that but yesterday fools could adore,
For the smoothness it held, or the tint that it wore.
Shall we build to the purple of Pride
To the trappings that dizen the proud?
Alas! they are all laid aside;
For here's neither wealth nor adornment allow'd,
Save the long winding sheet, and the fringe of the shroud.
Unto Riches? Alas!'tis in vain;
Who here in their turns have been hid,
Their wealth is all squandered again;
And here in the grave are all metals forbid,
Save the tinsel that shines on the dark coffin-lid.
To the pleasures that Mirth can afford?
The revelthe laughand the jeer?
Ah! here is a plentiful board;
But the guests are all mute as their pitiful cheer,
And none but the worm is a reveller here.
Shall we build to Affection and Love?
Ah no! they have withered and died,
Or flown with the spirit above;
Friends, brothers, and sisters, are laid side by side,
Yet none have saluted, and none have replied.
Unto Sorrow?
The dead
cannot grieve;
Not a sob, nor a sigh, meets mine ear,
Which compassion itself could relieve;
Ah sweetly they slumber, nor love, hope, nor fear
Peace, peace is the watch-wordthe only one here.
Unto Death, to whom monarchs must bow?
Ah, no!for his empire is known
And here there are trophies enow;
Beneath the cold head, and around the dark stone,
Are the signs of a sceptre that none may disown.
The first tabernacle to Hope we will build,
And look for the sleepers around us to rise:
The second to Faith, which insures it fulfilled,
And the third to the Lamb of the great Sacrifice,
Who bequeathed us them both, when he rose to the skies!STANZAS.
`Awake psaltery and harp: I myself will awake early.'
Wake,
when the mists of the blue mountains sleeping,
Like crowns of glory in the distance lie;
When breathing from the South, o'er blossoms sweeping,
The gale bears music through the sunny sky;
While lake and meadow, upland, grove and stream,
Smile like the glory of an Eden dream.
Wake while unfettered thoughts, like treasures springing,
Bid the heart leap within its prison-cell;
When birds and brooks through the pure air are flinging
The mellow chant of their beguiling spell;
When earliest winds their anthems have begun,
And, incense-laden, their sweet journeys run.
Then,
psaltery and harp, a tone awaken,
Whereto the echoing bosom shall reply,
As earth's rich scenes, by shadowy night forsaken,
Unfold their beauty to the filling eye:
When, like the restless breeze, or wild-bird's lay,
Pure thoughts, on dove-like pinions, float away.
Wake thou, too, man, when from refreshing slumber,
And thy luxurious couch, thou dost arise,
Thanks for life's golden giftsa countless number
Calm dreams, and soaring hopes, and summer skies:
Wake!let thy heart's fine chords be touched in praise,
While the pure light of morn around thee plays!`TO MISS LUCRETIA SOPHONISBA MATILDA JERUSHA CATLING:
Thou
hast ravished my heartthou hast ravished my heart with
one
of thine
eyes! Thy neck is like the tower of David, builded for an armory, whereon there
hang a thousand bucklers, all shields of mighty men. How beautiful are thy feet,
with shoes!
Thy neck is as a tower of ivory: thine eyes like the fish-pools in Heshbon,
by the gate of Bath-Rabbin: thy nose is as the tower of Lebanon, which looketh
toward
Damascus. How fair and pleasant art thou, O love, for delights!'
[
From the Canticles, or the Song of Songs, as originally written by Solomon,
and sung by him at Jerusalem, with great applouse
.]
Thou
canst not hope, oh! nymph divine,
That I should ever court the
9
Or that when passion's glow is done,
My heart can ever love but
1
When from Hope's flowers exhales the dew,
Then Love's false smile deserts us
2
Then
Fancy's radiance' gins to flee,
And life is robbed of all the
3
And Sorrow, sad, her tears must pour
O'er cheeks where roses bloomed be
4-19
Yes! life's a scene all dim as Styx;
Its joys are dear at
3
f
6
Its raptures fly so quickly hence,
They're scarcely cheap at
18
d
Oh! for the dreams that then survive!
They're high at pennies
25
The breast no more is filled with heaven,
When years it numbers
27
And yields it up to Manhood's fate,
About the age of
28
Finds the world cold, and dim, and dirty,
Ere the heart's annual count is
30
Alas! for all the joys that follow,
I would not give a
quarter-dollar!
251.97
This, charming
artiste,
is the sum
To which life's added items come.
If into farther sums I stride,
I see the figures multiplied.
Subtract the profit ones from those
Whose
all
to loss untimely goes,
And in the aggregate you find
Enough to assure the thinking mind
That there's an overplus of evil,
Enough to fright the very d1!
Thus, my dear maid, I send to you
The balance of my metre due;
Please scrutinize the above amount,
And set it down in my account;
A wink to a horse is as good as a nod
Your humble servant,
Ollapod
.`My Dear Sir:
Will you allow me to correct a slight statement in your
last, with reference to my death? I am grateful for the compliments to my
character in your obituary notice, and I believe them
deserved
. That I
tried to do the handsome thing while I lived, is most true; true, too, is it, that
I never backed out of a fight, and never saw the man that could whip me,
when alive; and I say the same yet, `being dead,' according to your story.
But when you state, that I left my affairs unsettled, and my widow and
those eleven children unprovided for, I have only to state, that
you lie in
your throat!
I mean no offence in what I say; I speak in the aggregate
sense of the term. Being a dead man, and printed
down
as such in your
columns, I am incapable of mortal resentments; but I leave as my avengers,
Cain, Abel,
and
Simpkins,
printers and publishers of the
Occidental
Trumpet and Mississippi Battle-Axe
. To the editor of that paper, I submit
my fame. To his indomitable coolness, never yet ruffled by repeated
contumely
,
and invulnerable to contempt, I confide my reputation: feeling
certain that one who has never found satisfaction for an insult, (nor sought
it indeed,) can fail to be a champion in my cause. That he may be in peril
in my advocacy, is possible; but he knows how to shun it. He is
independent
,
for he is unknown; he is fearless, for no man will touch a hair of
his head. To that important
Gulliven,
in whatsoever cave or fastness he
may dwell, I surrender my fame.
Yours, 'till death,
Roswell Adams Greene
.'December
17.
`
My Dear Sir
:
I have had an interview with Mr.
Biddle,
and truly
lament
my inability to communicate satisfactory results. I fear that until the
resolution of the Senator from Ohio, in regard to the repeal of the Treasury
order, is finally disposed of, the trading interests will materially suffer.
`The Board of Directors, however, have some reason to indulge in the
pleasing hope, that a small keg of ten-cent-pieces will arrive from Tinnlcum,
some time during the ensuing week; in which case, the president has
promised
to exert his influence in my behalf on the next discount-day.
`If we should be successful in ultimately elevating the breeze (raising the
wind) on my promissory note, we can proceed without delay to our
contemplated
acquisitions in Michilimackinac lands, and Texas scrip.
`Your obedient friend,
Zebedee Fussy
'.`November the 5th,
1837.
`
My Dear Sir:
`I have seen a piece which you made and put into a perryoge published
down into the city of New York, to which I am a-going to indict a reply.
My indictment will be short, as some of the parties is not present to which
you have been allusive. But with respect of that there diwine person you
spoke of, I am sorry to remark, that he is uncommonly dead, and wont
never give no more lectures. He was so onfortnight as to bu'st a
blood-vessel
at a pertracted meeting; and I han't hearn nothing onto him sence.
His motives was probable good; but in delivering on 'em, it struck me
forcibly
that he proximoted to the
sassy
. However, I never reserves ill will,
not ag'inst nobody; and I authorize you to put this into printing, ef'so be
that you deem it useful. That's what Smith used to say, when he
published
his self-nominations in the newspapers, that a man with a horn (they
tell me that he has a very large circle of kindred) used to ride post about
and distribit.
`In the sincere congratulation that there has not nothing been said in
this communication unproper for the public ear, and for giving you the
descriptions
of the rackets, and other messuages respecting me, which you
deeded to the public, I remain yours until death do us part.
`Mr.
Ollapod,
M. D.'
`
Post Tillion
.`
My Suffering Sir:
`I have taken your new hat, but I leave you my
eternal gratitude
.
`Your anonymous friend,
`
B. Barlow
.
`P. S. I leave you an
open
apology for what I have taken, which I wish
you to show to a candid world.'
`B. B.'>`REPORTED FOR THE NEW-BABYLON OBSERVER.
`TERRIFIC CIRCUMSTANCE!
`
It
becomes our painful but imperative and extraordinary duty, to
promulgate
the facts of a disaster which reached us to-day, by the mail from
Thebes,
via
the perpendicular railroad. As a party were ascending, with
the locomotive playing a lively tune, assisted on the piana-forte by another
locomotive, that had been hired by Signor
Goitini,
preparatory to his first
concert in New-Babylon, some religious persons of the `United States'
Established
Mormon Church,' insisted that the tune, being irreverent, should
be changed. This offensive tune was no less than the well known and
popular song, (supposed to have been written in England, previous to the
subjugation of that place by the Russians,) entitled `Proceed it, ye
Crippled
Ones, Babylon's Nigh.' This complimentary course on the part of
the locomotive, and the gentlemanly engineer with whom it associates, was
hissed by the Mormons, until they were overcome by the
encores
of the
majority. The locomotive was of course embarrassed, but we understand,
continued to play. One of the Mormons, enraged beyond measure at this
circumstance, rushed forward through the door-ways of the train, and
wantonly
turned the stop-cock of `What's become of Good Old Daniel?' one
of the slowest tunes of the day. The consequence was, that the train
proceeded
with the greatest discord, because the latter tune was for the
backtrack
,
in descending the mountain. The result was, the cars were thrown
off the rails, down a precipice of nearly three hundred feet; but owing to
the exertions of Mr.
Inclination Plain,
first engineer, they were got
back by his Upward Impulse Screw, which has thus far answered
admirably
,
stopping cars in mid-air, if they run off a precipice, and returning them
safely, by means of the patent steam wind-bags, which extend beneath the
trains, and destroy their gravity.
`We are authorized to state, that no blame attaches to the quick-tune
party; whereas the slow-tune faction were entirely in the wrong. Thus
has a science, invented by a monk of the Unitarian order, in the city of
Alleghania, (then called New-York,) and which worked its way into so
much respect and favor, been the cause of danger, by the pertinacity of a
few. We trust it will not occur again; if it do, we shall proclaim it to the
tune of the Rogue's March, through the whole of New-Babylon, in our
Steam-car Extra. No doubt our dastardly contemporary, of the `
War-horse
of Freedom and America's Champion,' whose prospectus and types
arrived last night, and whose first number appears to-morrow, will endeavor
to contradict this statement. We dare him to his teeth to do so. He
knows, while the snaky blood writhes at his caitiff heart, and the malignity
of twenty-three demons, (we think we should be justified in mentioning
more,) glares from his diabolic eye, that what we state is fact; and that
each member of the quick-tune party, in asserting his inalienable musical
rights, was as innocent as an unbegotten merino.'PROSE MISCELLANIES.
A CHAPTER ON CATS.
I met
with a good article the other day in a native magazine,
on the subject of
whiskers
a pilosus and prolific theme.
Talking
of whiskers reminds me of cats. The transition is natural.
Feline quadrupeds are justly celebrated for their claims to
admiration
in respect of whiskers. In the conformation of his
mandibular
appendages, Nature has been generous with the cat. Not
only do they stand out from his face like the elongated
mustaches
of old Shah Abbas of Persia, but there is within them a
sleepless spirit, a shrewd and far reaching sense, which puts to
shame the similar ornaments on the faces of bipeds of the
genus homo. They,
indeed, can make their whiskers look well, by
baptizing them with
eau de Cologne,
and Rowland's Macassar
Oil, or peradventure, the unctuous matter won from the `tried
reins' of defunct bears; but where is the intelligence, the
discernment
,
of their rivals?
The whiskers of a cat are truly sparse and unseemly; but
their qualities of observation and apprehension furnish an ample
recompense for the absence of beauty. How many a heedless
rat or truant mouse has paid the forfeit of his life by those
all-scenting
properties which are concentrated in the whiskers of a
feline hunter! How have their little ribs cracked between the
jaws of some notorious tabby, and their long tails lashed her
head in the agonies of dissolution! This, however is a painful
subject, and I perceive that in treating it I am falling into the
sentimental
.
Talking of sentiment, as connected with cats, reminds me of an
epoch in my life, over which the shadows of unpleasant fate hang
like clouds in an evening firmament, and turn the past into
darkness
.
Shall I rend away the veil, as your crack novelist would
say, and harrow up my recollections, until my heart swells and my
head aches with the melancholy retrospection? Perish the idea!
Nono: prepared as I am to go all lengths along the fence
which divides me from the dominion of memory, yet when I look
at
that
length, I feel as though I could not `go it!' Butyes
no matter; the warning of my example may be of service to some
reader, who may happen hereafter to be `situated, and I may
say, circumstanced,' as I was.
I am a respectable young bachelor, with a courteous address, a
musical taste, some acquaintance with letters, and a too
susceptible
heart. In choosing my whereabout in this good city of
brotherly love, where I arrived a few years ago from the country,
to hang out my tin sign of `Attorney,' etc., I sought for such
lodgings as would be convenient to the office, where I wrote my
briefs, and took in my clients. Acting on this principle, I made
my
cong
one bright May morning to a landlady in Chestnut
street, of whose table and apartments I had heard the best `
exclamation
.'
She was a short, pursy woman, with a long neck, a
lawn cap on her head, and a most respectful demeanor. The
cap was thin, and the gray hair was very perceptible under the
same; but on her forehead were parted two raven waves:
`the dowry of some second head,
The skull that bred them in the sepulchre.'
Pleased with her smile, for it was benevolence itself, I asked her
if she could furnish me with a small parlor and bed-room
adjacent
?
Her reply showed that her benevolence did not extend
to her native tongue, which she grossly maltreated in divers
hostile
expressions, then and there used on the premises. She
responded
that the `parlors was all took, but one in the third story,
with a bed-room contagious, for which I would be taxed five
dollars
and three levys a week.' I replied that I did not wish to be
taxed with apartments subject to
levies;
that the property of which
I desired to stand seized as tenant, ought to be unincumbered,
and beyond the discomfort of any pecuniary lien or claim. I
was soon eased on this point by an affirmation, on the part of the
respondent, that a
levy
was a coin; corresponding, as I afterward
learned by some fiscal inquiries, to a New-York shilling.
A few moments' conversation in the parlor, into which I was
invited, finished the business. I took the lodgings, and with
pleased alacrity ensconced myself therein. Every thing went on
much to my satisfaction. The victuals and drink were
praiseworthy
,
the lodgers few, principally boarding-school misses,
beyond
a certain age, learning the then latest music, such as `The
Minstrel's Return from the War,' `When my Eye,' `Come where
the Aspens quiver,' `Lightly Tread,' et cetera. With these airs,
accompanying themselves on a broken-winded piano, a chattel of
the establishment, did they diurnally bore my ears.
I soon became perfectly domiciliated. The ladies grew more
and more communicative; and it was sadly-pleasing, to see the
pensive manner in which they would flirt their fans when we all
sat by the windows at nightfall in the great parlor below, which
commanded a broad view of the street. Sometimes on these
occasions
,
when in a reverie, I used to hum some familiar air; and
this once led one of the oldest ladies, whose education had just
been
finished
by the greatest instructress in the city, to remark
that `she was sure I could sing
lovely,
if I should try; but that
she believed I did n't want to
let on
.' I did not at first
comprehend
this phraseology of the fair scholar, and it remains until this
day with me a mystery undefined. It is understandable, but not
explainable. I made an answer to the remark, that was apposite
enough not to expose my ignorance of the lady's meaning; for it
is well to stand high in the estimation of those who are
completed
in `composition, drawing, geography, and the use of the
globes.'
I did not however bless the parlor with much of my presence.
The one which had been assigned me was a perfect gem of an
apartment. Everything in it was neat; and I took no small
delight
in hanging it with paintings and pictures. It looked
directly
into Chestnut-street, our Philadelphia Broadway, and I was
wont to sit by the casement in the summer twilight, listening to
the negligent footfalls of the promenaders, who strolled abroad on
the thousand errands and purposes of business or pleasure.
Directly to the east, a door opened into my bed-room, the
contagious
apartment of which my landlady had spoken. Here the
window looked into a garden, the property of the next resident
on the street. And a fine garden it was. Flowers of every hue,
the first and fairest of the year, were glowing along the walks in
red, golden, and purple luxuriance. The verdant and ductile
vines gadded over tasteful trellices, and the breath of growing
things floated up to my casement like incense.
Perhaps the reader may desire to know what this has to do
with the subjects of
cats?
You shall see anon. The facts are
extant, and must not remain unwritten.
I soon found my bed-room
contogious,
sure enough. I could
not study, because of a fair dulcinea across the garden. Even at
night we used to look at each other. It was a kind of indistinct,
moonshiny speculation, it is truebut it had its raptures.
My inquiries respecting the damsel were of the most
satisfactory
kind. Her name was Florence Dillon. She was just
seventeen
;
amiable, and accounted rich, but for the latter
consideration
I cared not a rush when connected with her. It was a
source of unbounded perplexity to me how I should manage to
make her acquaintance. I consorted with few of those young
men, wearing bushy whiskers, white inexpressibles, vacant
countenances
,
and small canes, with which Philadelphia abounds; for
I had never fancied their amusements of riding to the Lamb
tavern for a julep, fighting dung-hill fowls on the Schuylkill, or
playing at faro in the obscure dens and alleys of the town.
Being
unaccomplished in these fashionable amusements, and withal
rather addicted to reading and mental improvement, my
associates
were limited, for I found few spirits either choice or
congenial
.
Finally, a lucky chance favored my desires. I saw Miss
Florence one evening at the theatre, with her brother. Just at
the close of the first play, it came on to rain. I ascertained by
accident that the Dillons were without an umbrella. I knew they
had a very short distance to go, and therefore would not be likely
to call a coach. I immediately rushed home and procured my
own umbrella, and one in addition. When I returned, the green
curtain had dropped, and they were in the lobby, on the point of
departure. The shower was then at its height. It was one of
those nights when play-bill boards are dripping; when pedestrians,
swift in locomotion, are seen in long perspective along the streets,
with their umbrellas shining in the lamp-light; a doleful night,
especially at the theatre,
`When tender Beauty, looking for her coach,
Protrudes her gloveless hand, perceives the shower,
And draws the tippet closer round her throat:
Perchance her coach stands half a dozen off,
And ere she mounts the step, the oozing mud
Soaks through her pale kid slipper. On the morrow
She coughs at breakfast, and her gruff papa
Cries, `There you go! this comes of play-houses!'
Determined to be gallant, yet coloring a little at my boldness, I
took the liberty of offering my umbrella to the gentleman, giving
him at the same time some information respecting its necessity
on account of the weather. My impression is that my manner
was agreeable, for Miss Dillon surveyed me with a very
affectionate
recognition; and her soft blue eyes, shaded by rich brown
hair, parted on her beaming brow, were filled with what
Thomson
would call `lively gratitude.'
I called the next evening at Dillon's, per promise, for my
umbrella
.
I found the family most agreeable. The mother was
delighted to hear me praise her favorite minister, after I found
out who he was; and the father was what is now-a-days called
`a gentleman of the old school;' namely, one whose education
has been wofully neglected, but whose assaults upon the
venacular
are overlooked on account of his good nature, good dinners,
and good wine.
Thenceforth I was a faithful visitor two or three times a week.
I grew desperately enamoredmy passion was returned: I was
a happy youth; I walked among the stars. I bent my soul to
distinction in my calling, and resolved to merit my mistress
before
I won her, or to amass, in the words of Diggory's adviser in
the play, `summat to make the matrimonial pot boil.'
The charming Florence was amiability itself. I found her
affections
were so exuberant, that she bestowed them upon
everything
within the magic circle of her presenceeven upon
animals
.
Among the objects of her esteem was a cat; a beautiful,
tortoise-shell creature, I confess, but deserving the objection
which the housemaid preferred against her, of having `never had
no broughtage up.' She had been Miss Dillon's companion
from her childish years, and had grown to graceful and dignified
maturity under her fostering hand. I will not deny that I
respected
the old tabby for her sake. We used to discuss her
merits often. I little thought the venerable quadruped would
blight my hopes, and precipitate all my wo.
Florence and myself were soon accounted engaged. We used
to walk arm in arm in the street, to let the gossips know that such
was the fact. I plunged like a gladiator into the law; I was a
favorite at court; and my causes and fees, in hand and in
prospect
,
were neither few nor small.
I am subject, in summer, to restlessness. Thick-coming
fancies
mar my rest, and my ear is peculiarly sensitive to the least
inappropriate sound. One sultry evening in July, I returned
home later than usual, from an arbitration, wherein I lost a cause
on which I had counted certainly to win. I suspect I bored the
arbitrators with too long a plea, and too voluminous quotations
of precedents; for, when I finished, two were asleep, and most
of the others yawning. They decided against my client, and I
came home mad with chagrin, and crept into bed, longing for
speedy oblivion in the arms of Sleep.
But that calm sister of death would not be won to my embrace.
I lay tossing for a long time in `restless ecstacy,' until vexed and
overwearied nature at last sunk to repose. I could not have
slumbered over ten minutes, before I was awakened by the most
outrageous caterwauling that ever stung the human ear. I arose
in a fury, and looked out of the window. All was still. The
cause for outcry appeared to have ceased. Now and then there
was a low, gutteral wail, between a suppressed grunt and a squeal;
but it was so faint that nothing could have lived 'twixt that and
silence. After a listening probation of a few minutes, I slunk
back into my sheets.
I had scarcely dozed quarter of an hour, when the
obnoxious
vociferations arose again. They were fierce, ill-natured, and
shrill. I arose again, vexed beyond endurance. All was quiet
in a moment. I am not given to profanity; I deem it foolish
and wicked; but on this occasion, after stretching my body like
a sheeted ghost, half out of the window, and gazing into the
shadows of the garden to discover the object of my annoyance, I
exclaimed, in a loud and spiteful voice, which expressed my
concentrated
hate:
`
Dn that cat!
'
`Young gentleman,' said a passing guardian of the night, from
the street, `you had better pop your head in, and stop your
noise. If you do n't, you will rue it; now mind-I-tell-ye.'
`Look here, old Charley,' said I, in return, `do n't be
impertinent
.
It is your business to preserve the peace, and to
obviate
every evil that looks disgracious in the city's eye. You
guard the slumbers of her citizens; and if you expect a dollar
from me at Christmas, for the poetry in your next annual address,
you will perform what I now request, and what it is your solemn
and bounden duty to do. Spring your rattle; comprehend that
vagrom cat, and take her to the watch-house. I will appear as
plaintiff against the quadruped, before the mayor, in the morning.
Her character is badher habits are scandalous.'
`Oh, pshaw!' said the watchman, and went clattering up the
street, singing `N'hav pa-a-st dwelve o'glock, and a glowdee
morn.'
I reverted to my pillow, and fell into a train of conjectures
touching the grimalkin. Possibly it might be the darling old
friend of Miss Dillon. Then I thought of othersthen I slept.
I can not declare to a second how long my fitful slumber
lasted
,
before I was startled from my bed by a yell, which proceeded
apparently from a cat in my room. I had just been dreaming of
a great mouser, with ears like a jackass, and claws, armed with
long `pickers and stingers,' sitting on my bosom, and sucking
away my breath. I sprang at once into the middle of the room.
I searched everywherenothing was in the apartment. Then
there rushed toward the zenith one universal cat-shriek, which
went echoing off on the night-wind like the reverberation of a
sharp thunder-peal.
My blood was now
up
for vengeance. One hungry and fiery
wish to destroy that diabolical caterwauler, took possession of my
soul. At that instant the clock struck one. It was the
death-knell
of the feline vocalist. I looked out of the window, and in
the light of a stray lot of moonshine, streaming through the tall
chimneys to the south-east, I saw Miss Dillon's romantic favorite,
alternately cooing and fighting with a large mouser of the
neighborhood
,
that I had seen for several afternoons previous, walking
leisurely along the garden wall, as if absorbed in deep meditation,
and forming some libertine resolve. In fine, they each seemed
saturate with the spirit of the Gnome king, Umbriel, in the drama,
when he
`stalked abroad,
Urging the wolf to tear the buffalo.'
The death of one of these noisy belligerents being determined on,
I looked round my room for the tools of retribution. Not a
moveable
thing, however, could I discover, save a new pitcher, which
had been sent home that very day, and to which my name and
address were appended on a bit of card. I clutched it with
desperate
fury, and pouring into my bowl the water contained in it,
I poised it in my hand for the deadly heave. I had been a
member
of a quoit club in the country, and the principles of a clever
throw were familiar to me. I resolved to make the vessel
describe
what is called in philosophy a
parabolic curve,
so that while
it knocked out the brains of one combatant, it should effectually
admonish the survivor of the iniquity of his doings. I
approached
the windowbalanced the pitcherand then drave it home.
Its reception was acknowledged by a loud, choking squalla
faint yell of agony, and then a respectful silence. Satisfied that
my pitcher had been broken at the fountain of life, and that the
silent
tabby would not soon tune her pipes again, I retired to bed,
and slept with the serenity and comfort of one who is conscious of
having performed a virtuous action.
In the morning, the cat was found `keeled up' on a bed of
pinks, with her head broken in, and her ancient and venerable
whiskers dabbled in blood. The shattered pitcher lay by her
side. The vessel had done its worstso had my victim. The
body was taken off early in the forenoon, and decently interred
by the gardener, who said to the chambermaid in my hearing,
that `Miss Florence must n't not by no means whatsomever come
for to know that the old puss had gone the v'yage.' Stupid
hind! He neither knew the cause of the animal's death, nor the
impossibility of its concealment.
Sorrow is always communicative. Betty had scarcely made
the beds in the mansion, before she hied to Miss Florence's
apartment
,
and related to her the doleful demise of her spotted
companion
.
They forthwith descended together into the garden;
reconnoitred
the spot where the poor thing breathed her last, and
found my broken pitcher with the card attached, on the very
theatre
of destruction.
Suspicion was aroused. I was the object. Circumstantial
evidence was clear against me. When I went home to dinner, I
found a note from Florence, accusing me of the murder. I could
have turned state's-evidence, and poured the tide of obloquy upon
the vile paramour of the deceased; but I scorned all subterfuge.
I answered the note immediately, acknowledging that, in a
moment
of bewilderment, drowsiness, and passion, I perpetrated the
deed, and throwing myself upon her generosity for pardon.
But it was in vain. I had made a wrong throw. Another angry
note reached me at supper. This, I was determined to answer
in person, and called, as soon as tea was over, in a state of
profuse
perspiration, to effect that object.
I found Miss Dillon perfectly furious. Her fair face was red
with indignation; consuming fires flashed from her eyesthose
orbs which I had praised so often, and which were wont to
exhibit
only the light of `generous meanings.' She inexorably
refused
all attempts at an apology. She gave me back my
miniature
and ring, and protested that I might spare myself any
further
concern on her account. She was deeply-read in
elementary
school-books, and she quoted copiously from a didactic
piece in one of them, I think the American Preceptor, `On
Cruelty to Animals,' in which it is conclusively shown that the
man who would harm `a necessary cat,' would not scruple to
treat his father like a pickpocket, his wife like a fisherwoman, and
his children like puppies. She repeated that she had done with
me, and signified a hope that I would take that remark for her
ultimatum.
Just after supper, of a July evening, a young man does not
feel cool enough to pocket the slightest contumely. I arose
with great dignity, and told Miss Dillon, that I had no desire to
press my suit; that if she demurred, I was ready to confess the
judgment, and bow to the same. I observed that from the
specimens
of her temperament that had just then fallen under my
notice
,
I could have little regret in sundering a chain which had
altered so soon from silk to iron. Memory began to disturb my
feelings, and the thought of what I was about to lose, made my
voice womanish; so I cocked my hat on fiercely, bowed politely,
and walked rapidly out of the apartment with the tread of a sullen
stage hero, who mutters in soliloquy, and `dialogues with his
shadow.'
Since that period, I have been, in the main, a melancholy man.
I am pale, and cynical. The `
opposite
sex,' as Mrs. Trollope
calls them, charm me not as of yore. I am a waif upon the
community
,
wherein none take an interest. I loved Florence Dillon
as I shall never love again; and the
cause
of our disuniona
nullifying cathas given me a sovereign antipathy to all the
race. I have no ill-will against young kittens, with their tender
voices and affectionate eyes; and I can contemplate even an old
cat in the virtuous retirement of the country, purring drowsily by
a winter's fire, with some complacency. Then, the tenor of her
life is equable and innocent. She is not subject to be led away
after fantastical delights; she goeth not into temptation. But
your city grimalkins have no moral character. Their habits are
loosetheir clamors unceasing. Romantic appointments by
night, and household pilferings by day, make up their existence;
and the only time they are harmless, is in those fitful moments
when
`their little life,
Is rounded with a sleep.'
They fight and bustle like those celebrated Kilkenny
combatants
,
which ate each other up in such wise that not the tail-end
of either remained for a token of victory; `that died and left no
sign.' They creep into cradles, and feed upon the fragrant
breath of young children; and a fatal instance of this kind was
recorded in our newspapers only a few months ago. If well
used, they grow familiar, and strew your garments with a bequest
of hairs; if you maltreat them, or despitefully use them, they
will waste the night-watches in mewing to keep you awake.
It is well to evoke consolation even from trouble. I know
some good jokes of cats, which I can enjoy, even though I know
that my Florence is the wife of a stupid old bacheloran
`eligible match,'a man with his brains in his purse, and his
attainments
in his breeches' pocket; in brief, a dough-head of the
heaviest description. Yes! thank old Time, I am better than I
was when I was so love-sick. A good story pleases me of late,
as it did in my better days. Here is one, which excited my
cachinations. I will vouch for its truth.
An anonymous wag not long ago placed an advertisement in each
of our city journals, signed by an eminent house on the Delaware
wharf, and stating that
Five Hundred Cats
were wanted
immediately
by the firm. The said firm in the meantime knew
nothing of the matter.
On visiting their counting-house the next morning, the partners
found the streets literally blocked up with enterprising cat-sellers.
Huge negroes were there, each with ten or fifteen sage, grave
tabbies tied together with a string. Old market women had
brought thither whole families of the feline genus, from the
superannuated
Tom,
to the blind kitten. The air resounded with the
squallings of the quadrupedal multitude. New venders, with
their noisy property, were seen thronging to the place from every
avenue.
`What'll you
guv
me for this 'ere lot?' said a tall
shad-woman
,
pressing up toward the counting-room. `The newspapers
says you allow liberal prices. I axes a dollar a piece for the
old 'uns, and five levys for the kittens.'
`You have been fooled,' said the chief partner, who appeared
with a look of dismay at the door, and was obliged to speak as
loud amid the din as a sea-captain in a storm. `I want no cats.
I have no use for them. I could not eat them. I could n't
sell them. I never advertised for them.'
A decided mendicant, a member of the great family of
loafers
,
with a red,
bulgy
nose, and bloated cheeks, who had three
cats tied to a string in his hand, now mounted a cotton bale, and,
producing a newspaper, spelt the advertisement through as
audibly
as he could under the circumstances, demanding of the
assembly
as he closed, `if that there advertysement was n't a true
bill?' An unanimous `Sarting!' echoed through the crowd.
Encouraged by the electric response, the loafer proceeded to
make a short speech. He touched upon the rights of trade, the
liberty of the press, the importance of fair dealing, and the
benefits
of printing; and concluded by advising his hearers to go the
death for their rights, and `not to stand no humbug.' Such was
the effect of his eloquence, that the firm against which he wielded
his oratorical thunder, found it necessary to compromise matters
by treating the entire concourse to a hogshead of wine. The
company separated at an early hour, consoled for the loss of
their bargains and the emptiness of their pockets, by the
light-someness
of their heads and hearts.
Gentle Reader,my tale is told. If you love cats, I have no
objection, because it is none of my business. `
De gustibus,
' etc.
But if I have not deposed enough to justify
my
hatred of all the
tribe, then argument is powerless, and truth a matter of
moonshine
.
18
AMERICAN POETS, AND THEIR CRITICS.
This
is some fellow,
Who, having been praised for bluntness, doth affect
A saucy roughness, and constrains the garh,
Quite from his nature: He cannot flatter, he!
An honest mind and plainhe must speak truth:
An' if they take it, so; if not, he's plain.
These kind of knaves I know, which in this plainness
Harbor more craft and more corrupter ends,
Than twenty upright, careful observants,
Who weigh the matter nicely.
Shakspeare
.
The
fact is as undeniable as it is generally acknowledged, that
since the death of Lord Byron, the best fugitive poetry of the
United States has been greatly superior to that of England. We
have bards among us whose productions would shine by the side
of seven-tenths even of the authors collected in those ponderous
tomes entitled the `British Classics,' or `Select British Poets.'
Let any reader of taste look over those collections, and see how
much matter there is in them, of no superior merit, floating
down the stream of time, like flies in amber, only because it is
bound up with productions of acknowledged and enduring
excellence
.
Let a reader glance, for example, at the volume of Aikin
or even of Hazlittthough that is less exceptionableand he
will find many effusions, whose authors, permissively, are almost
sanctified to fame, that are yet greatly inferior to no small portion
of American fugitive poetry. This may not at present be readily
acknowledged; because it is a weakness of human nature, that
men are apt to attach far less credit to the productions of
contemporary
writers, than each of those same writers and his
productions
receive, after the palsy of death has descended upon the
hand that recorded, and the heart that indited.
We need not cite examples in favor of the foregoing
declarations
.
Their truth, we believe, is familiar, both to the American
public, and the tasteful readers of Europe. In speaking of
American poetry, we mean that which has been produced by
natives
,
born and bred; not the forlorn effusions of certain
transplanted
foreigners, who have labored so long and so
unsuccessfully
to be numbered among the bright train of native bards. We
mean the writers and the products of `our own, our native land.'
We feel a glow of honest pride in their array. In the works of
Hillhouse,
we have a strength, a finish, and a profoundness of
knowledge, which strike the mind and heart like the page of a
Milton; productions unsurpassed by any of recent origin, for
their correctness, their grandeur, and beauty. In the effusions
of
Bryant,
the Thomson of America, we have those faithful
pictures of natural life and human affection, fraught with the
soundest philosophy, which can not fail or die. They are
destined
to live with the
Seasons;
to appeal with their pure truth
and sweet fidelity, to the intellect and love of other generations.
We may mark in
Halleck,
the Byronic spirit and fire of song;
the English undefiled; thrilling the bosom in his lyrics, and
charming the taste in his lighter lays. In
Percival,
may be
seen the flowing diction and imagery of Moore; and in
Sprague,
a pathos and harmony, which Pope himself has never exceeded.
Are not these allegations undeniable? What European
tragedy
,
produced within the last thirty years, is superior to the
Hadad
of Hillhouse? What poet, in that time, has surpassed in
ease and truth the best poems of Bryant? Who, during the
same space, abroad or at home, has written a more soul-stirring
lyric than Halleck's Marco Botzaris? Will the best productions
of Percival suffer by a comparison with the latest, and of course
the maturest, of Moore or Campbell? Will Byron's Prize
Address
at Drury Lane
compare
with Sprague's at the Park
Theatre
?
Has not the latter been pronounced every way superior,
even in England? We propose these questions with pride.
They have already been triumphantly answered on both sides of
the Atlantic.
But this is not all. There are other names, full of promise,
growing yearly more lustrous in our literary annals, to which we
have not time or space at present to allude. They are names
borne by scholars and men of intellect, whose busy pursuits may
repress the influence of song within them, but can not mar their
power. From them, and their compeers, something elevated and
lasting may in due time be confidently expected.
There is one cause which has perhaps operated somewhat
against a proper appreciation of the writers we have mentioned.
Their actual merits are in our opinion undervalued, on account
of the complaints occasionally made of them by journalists, that
no one of them has produced a
long poem
. This is very true;
but we do not conceive it necessary that a man should create a
labored epic to substantiate a claim to the character of a first-rate
poet. Gray has descended to posterity, and will go on to other
ages, in his incomparable Elegy; Goldsmith is not less
extensively
known by his Hermit, than by his other productions;
while Milton, and Pope, and numerous others whom we might
name, are commended to the general world more by
passages
in
their great works, than by the entire works themselves.
Therefore
we may say confidently, that all the native poets we have
mentioned, have written matter which possesses all the elements
of perpetuity; poems, which though short, are perfect; full of
nature and life, without blemish or stain.
That we have such poets in our country, and that there are
those who, by patient thought, unobtrusive study, and the
untiring
pursuit of knowledge in aid of their natural genius, are
desirous
to emulate such examples, until they themselves may
deserve
approbation and success, is, we believe, a source of
gratification
to the mind of every
American
critic. The course of our
highest authorities in literature, the North American Review
and the Christian Examiner, exhibits a patronizing and
discriminating
spirit in this matter, which is worthy of all praise,
since it will conduce in an eminent degree to the advancement of
polite letters in our country. The editors of these eminent
journals
in no instance permit their pages to be made the conduits of
private bile, and individual spleen. They judge with justice,
and in kindness they condemn. They permit no scribe who is
scouted by the public, and whose name, when known, is an
antidote
to his adverse opinions, to sully their leaves with the
suggestions
of envious and revengeful sentiment, the results of
disappointed
authorship, and a galling sense of personal obscurity.
They look to the
promise
of native works, and exhibit that good
sense and feeling by whose guidance they escape the
mortification
of seeing themselves the objects of ridicule, and their opinions
utterly reversed, both in Europe and America. They are
regarded
with respect, as men above the reach or the persuasion
of contemptible motives; and with the law of courteous
impartiality
guiding their pens, they perform, with honest impulses,
their duty to the literary efforts of their countrymen.
It is a matter of praise, also, that these are gentlemen, the
merits of whose productions entitle them to sit in judgment upon
the works of others. Theirs are the benefits of an unbroken
education; the enlarged views and information acquired by
travel; the proper sentiments inspired by a love of the land of
their birth; and the honest desire to increase rather than
diminish
the reputation of their fellow-laborers in kindred pursuits.
This course inspires in their contemporaries throughout the
country a feeling of respectful confidence, which is the parent
and prompter of every intellectual undertaking.
We sincerely wish that we might pursue this just tribute to
other quarters of similar pretensions; but we find it impossible.
Two quarterlies remainthe
United States
and the
American
Reviews, both of Philadelphia. The former has as yet put forth
but one number, which is highly national and liberal in its
character
,
and promises well for those which are to succeed; but the
work has not existed long enough to merit the praise which we
do not doubt it will deserve and receive. The American
Quarterly
has struggled along in the hands of different publishers, until
the present time. The conductor of the work, very properly,
has always refrained from laying any claim to consideration in the
matter of poetry. It has never interested his mind, nor occupied
his attention; he professes to experience none of its soul; and
while the other departments of his periodical are sustained with
a very laudable degree of talent, that of poetical criticism has
been usually consigned to a person so utterly unfit for the office
as to excite surprise and derision wherever his agency in this
division
of the Review is known.
In discussing the merits of this individualwhich we shall do
with all possible gentleness, consistent with the evils we are to
exposewe disclaim every sentiment of unkindness or sinister
partiality. We know that in literature, as in politics, he who
undertakes to lead or guide, should be able satisfactory to
answer
two questions that may be asked concerning him: `Is he
honest?
Is he
capable?
' We know that poetry is an important
part of belles-lettres; and we desire to see no misleading of the
general mind, in relation to its state and progress in our republic.
We would invest this high department of art with a divine and
holy atmosphere, into whose magic circle no motives of envy, of
chagrin, of policy or revenge, should be permitted to enter. If
we succeed in proving that these incitements
have
hitherto defiled
the oracles of criticism, and poisoned the rich flow of song
among us, then we shall be amply repaid for the use of the facts
we have gathered, and the lash we wield.
It is difficult to describe a
live critic,
without some particulars.
Johnson and Gifford gave these, each for himself. In the present
case we shall eschew all personality, which we condemn; and in
giving a few points of an author, shall avoid touching the man.
Imprimis
there is, in the city of Brotherly Love, on the
corner of one of its rectangular thoroughfares, a small store, or
shop, in which is sold Irish linen; whether ready made or not,
we can not tell. It is the mart of a Quarterly Critic; once a
practiser of the Galenian art, and as we have learned, with a
success
equalling the Asclepid of yore. In Hibernia he was
`raised;' to America he came; in Philadelphia he pitched his
tent; and rejecting physic, took to trade, in which he now
transacts
a decent business, in a small way. We mention these
biographical
items in the outset, as arguments that his profession is
neither literary nor akin to it; and that he is consequently quite
unable to serve both Mercury and Apollo at once.
Speculation, however, is the spirit of the age; and our
Censor
determined not to be entirely occupied in the linen line.
Accordingly he came the evil eye over an unfortunate publisher,
who consented to issue a monthly magazine and Review of
Literature
under his supervision. Previous to this, we should
remark
,
he put forth a poem entitled `The Pleasures of
Friendship
,'
a mediocre volume, containing, we venture to assert, more
palpable
plagiarisms
than can be found in any book of its size
in Christendom. The magazine was begun; and with it began
the criticisms of the editor. Beside these operations, he had
other irons in the fire; he had novels in embryo. Before
alluding
to these, we will show the gradations by which our critic
rose to the acquisition of his present acumen as a quarterly
reviewer
.
When this monthly was in its maturity, the reputation of Lord
Byron
was at its height. They who once blamed, had become
eulogists; the best intelligences of both hemispheres were
warmed
by his genius, and vocal in his praise. But our profound
reviewer cared for none of these things. He expressed great
commiseration for the noble poet. He speaks of him in his
work, as a man `whose heavy volumes of stanzas have pestered
the world; a mere titled
rhymester;
the author of a mass of
hobbling, teeth-grinding poetry; the major portions of whose
writings possess
not the smallest particle
of the soul of poetry;'
and after an assortment of criticisms, quite equal to the foregoing,
he
lumps
the merits of Byron in the following summary passage:
`That in the multiplicity of his Lordship's writings we should,
by dint of
industrious research,
discover
some
easy flowing
passages
and brilliant ideas, is not much to his creditfor we can
find the same things in the dull heroics of Sir Richard
Blackmore
.'
Finally, Byron is advised by our Aristarchus, in 1824,
to quit poetry, wherein he is so deficient, and turn his attention
to
prose,
in which he might hope for decent success!
Nothing seems to have yielded this critic more unqualified
delight
than the death of Lord Byron. It gave a clearer field for
his publications; it `left the world for
him
to bustle in.' His
ecstacies on hearing of that sad event, were irrepressible. He
came forth with a
Te Deum
in his Review, from which we make
a few extracts: `Wo, now,' saith he, `to these witlings, (the
admirers
of Byron,) who have neither ears to discover harmony,
nor skill to count numbers; who mistake rhymes for wit; the
Great Dagon of their idolatry is no more! Well may they raise
the ul-ul-loo; he who
bullied the crowd
into the reading of
bad
English,
who inflicted upon men of good taste the penance of
perusing
hobbling numbers and false rhymes, has withdrawn from
the scene of his exploits! Bellow forth, ye rugged verse lovers,
till ye split your lungs with lamentations! Stiff, unwieldly couplets,
or barbarous Spenserians, made the vehicles of unnatural
quaintness
or
affected
originality of ideas, have no longer a sprig of
nobility
to dignify them, or give them attraction to the unreflecting
multitude!'
Our Reviewer's opinions of Sir
Walter Scott,
(a
gentleman
of Abbotsford, North Britain, who wrote some novels and
poetry,) are kindred with those he entertained of Lord Byron.
He speaks of him as `an unknown Scotchman;' and of certain
Waverley novelsthat received by far the most praise on their
appearance, and continue to be cherished with fond admiration
by every reader of tasteas `slovenly and insipid productions;
abounding with affected sentimentality, blackguards and
scoundrels
,
common as thistles in a Scotch glen; with sheepish
heroes
,
foot-balls to every one that might choose to kick them.'
These `blundering works,'
*
*
So unbounded is the popularity of one of these very novels; so strong the hold
which it has taken upon the general reverence; that a large and flourishing town
has arisen where the scene was laid. Its crowded streets are rife with bustle and
animation, and its hotels thronged continually with visitors. Had it not been for
the genius of
Scott,
the place would be at
this moment a rural waste.
he condemns
in toto;
calls them
`
disgraceful
literary manufactures, common-place, and
stupidly
constructed.' In conclusion, he gave it as his candid opinion,
that `the sooner Sir Walter Scott ceased to write, the better for
himself and the public.' This, reader, was when the author of
Waverley was covered with renown, and after he had produced
some of his most immortal productions!
It is well known that Sir Walter Scott was a fervent admirer
and friend of
Washington Irving
. His letter, warmly
commending
the efforts of our celebrated countryman, published last
year in a daily journal of high authority,
The New-York American.
expressed the ardor of
the Baronet's esteem and respect for the author of Knickerbocker.
He also applauded him, publicly, in Peveril of the Peak. We
regret to say, that our critic has as contemptuous an idea of Sir
Walter's opinions, as of his works. We can best show how
widely he differs from the author of Waverley, respecting Irving,
by quoting his opinions of that writer, as contained in the
Philadelphia
Monthly Review. In that periodical he speaks of
Geoffrey
Crayon as a scribbler of `skip-along, trim-the hop, popinjay
prose; whose Sketch Book abounds with
heavy,
disagreeable
matter, betraying throughout little merit but imitation.' Those
portions which the world has decided to be the best and most
graphic, are pronounced `absolutely
silly,
fit only for the pages
of two-penny primers, to amuse children.' The utmost credit
conceded to Geoffrey, is `that his productions may
possibly
beguile
a dull hour, or please a blue stocking; but farther than this
the critic can recognise no merit in them. With true Hibernian
simplicity, he asks respecting these eminent works: `What
lesson
do they teach? What information do they convey? What
impression do they make?' and adds: `We can not see their
value.' He confesses that they are popular and successful; but
he imputes the cause to the bribery and corruption of the
Edinburgh
and London reviewers, by the booksellers, to help Irving
along!
A very general, though it would seem erroneous impression,
has prevailed, and is still cherished, both in Europe and America,
with regard to the
style
of Irving. Ripe scholars and
real
critics,
everywhere, have given their suffrages in favor of this style, as
possessing
quiet sweetness and ease; pure as the Latin in `Augustus'
golden Age,' or the English, in the Elizabethan. But these men
have been all in the wrong. Our Longinus can see, in this
farfamed
style, neither comeliness nor grace. He protests that `it
reminds him of a boy moving
awkwardly
on stilts, who is
straining
every nerve to prevent a downfall!'
Next to Washington Irving, in the condemnatory estimation of
our critic, comes
James Fenimore Cooper,
who seems a
peculiarly obnoxious culprit in the view of his judge. Fearful
that Cooper would supplant some of his own sublime novels,
then in process of manufacture, he pounced upon his rival right
greedily. He damned `The Pioneers' at once, by calling it
`unwieldly, slovenly, ungrammatical,' and insufferable; and `as a
story, entirely destitute of interest.' `The Pilot' suffered very
nearly the same fate. These works, however, yet survive, and
the reputation of the author has recovered in a measure from the
cruel and awful blow thus bestowed upon its integrity.
The popular poets of the Union did not escape the visitations
of our Reviewer. He finished
Halleck,
in a few words, by
pronouncing him an inveterate
doggerelist;
`a man capable of
throwing the most common and contemptible ideas into metre.'
Percival
suffers in the same pillory. So great is the
furor
of
the critic in relation to this gentleman, that he delivers himself in
verse. We hope the reader will excuse the profanity. It is a
way the reviewer has of his own, and we give his lines verbatim:
`As for our poets, dn them, one and all,
Except the megrim-haunted
Percival;
For his are lays that suit the Theban taste,
By sense unburthened, nor by music graced.'
In further discussing Percival's merits, this literary Daniel
takes occasion to remark, that the charm, both of prose and
poetry
,
is
simplicity;
and he illustrates this charm as follows:
`Mr. Percival would seem to think that harmony of cadence and
musical numbers were mere
incumbrances upon the wild freedom
with which the nine deities should be permitted to drag us through
all the entanglements and confusions of an ill-sorted, unconnected,
and heterogeneous mass of cogitations, conglomerated into one
indefinable
collection, by the wondrous instrumentality of that mighty
father of discordance and grotesque originality, known by the
name of haphazard
.' Here is the prose style of this lover of
simplicity!
It gives us pleasure to turn from cast-off bards, to a poet who
has won the suffrages of our critic. In a review of the `
Mountain
Muse,' (a crude, youthful production, now forgotten, and of
which its amiable author, Mr. Bryan, of Alexandria, is heartily
ashamed,) he says, `This poem, though long, manifests an
immense
genius,
equal to that of
Byron
or Percival. In the tuneful
movement of his
strains,
Mr. Bryan is much their superior.'
It may well be supposed that all these consistent specimens of
acumen did their author no credit. He was derided by the best
writers throughout the country. The ridicule he excited,
awakened
his angry muse; he buried his rowels in his Pegasus, and
`rode in mud.' We doubt whether the most phrensied effusions
of Nat. Lee are wilder than the doggerels composed by our
author
,
in reply to his critics. But as some of his own brain-born
progeny were just then extant,
policy
whispered him that he
should conciliate these high authorities in his favor. His novel
of the Wilderness had appeared. He had transported copies of
it to the North American Review, and was looking with painful
anxiety to see them duly lauded. His eulogies upon that work,
therefore, were cordial in the extreme. His Review teemed
with its praise. We can only find room for the following
sentences
:
`The
North American
is one of the fairest
Reviews
of the day. It has
always
advanced something of its own, to prove that it could be boldly original
when it pleased. On the whole, we have found a spirit of
candor
and a
vein of
good sense,
generally to pervade the work, which induces us to
esteem
it one of the most useful publications of the age.'
Whether the North American Review appeared sooner than
its eulogist expected, we know not; but it reached Philadelphia
before his monthly went to press. It contained a notice of the
Wilderness; but alas! it was such a one as the author was not
prepared to see. The Reviewer, after a few judicious remarks
as to what
ought
to constitute an American novel, thus analyzes
the Wilderness:
`
By
casting an eye over these pages, it will be seen at a glance, that the
art of writing an American novel is neither more nor less than the art of
describing, under American names, such scenes as are in no respect
American
,
peopling them with adventurers from all quarters of the globe, except
America, with a native or two here and there, acting as no American ever
acts, and talking a language which on the other side of the water may pass
for American simply because it is not English. Thus the chief
dramatis
person
of the Wilderness are a Scotch Irishman, (by which we mean an
Irishman who talks Scotch,) an American Irishman, (by which we mean an
Irishman born in America,) with an Irish Irishman, (by which we mean
Paddy himself,) for his servant; a sort of mad Indian, who turns out to be
a Frenchified Scotchman; together with General Washington, and a few
other mere nondescripts. The plot is carried on by means of the wars of
the last century, between the French and English settlers of our western
wilderness, and the loves of Gen. Washington, who plays the double part of
Romeo among the ladies, and Alexander the Great among the Indians,
with signal success.'
After describing some of those
lusus natur
characters with
which the Wilderness abounds, and giving a slight insight into
its undefinable plot, the Reviewer proceeds:
`
But
it is time to introduce another hero, who acts a most conspicuous
part in the progress of the Tale. Upon the return of Mr. Adderly (one of
the heroes) to Philadelphia, for the purpose of giving an account of himself
to the Ohio company, the governor of Virginia despatches Mr. George
Washington, who is spoken of as `a very respectable looking young man,'
on an embassy to the French government at Fort de Buf, to demand an
explanation of the recent outrages committed by his people on the Indians,
at their instigation, against the British settlers. Not long after, as the
heroine
and Miss Nancy Frazier were sitting under a tree together, as
romantically
as possible, Miss Nancy listening, and Miss Maria reading, `with a
tenderness and pathos of manner which showed that her whole soul was
enwrapt
with the delightful
strains
in which the poet of the seasons has told
his sweetest tale:'
`Maria had just pronounced the following exquisite lines:
`He saw her charming, but he saw not half
The charms her down-cast modesty concealed,'
when Nancy happening to direct her attention to one side, perceived a white
man (the reader should bear in mind that Washington was a
white
man!)
leaning against a tree, scarce three yards distant. She immediately started
to her feet in surprise, crying out:
`Oh! Maria! here is a white stranger!'
This `white stranger' was Washington. The ladies shortly
after escorted him to their house. Here they placed feed before
the Father of his Country, in the shape of cakes and metheglin.
The author makes Washington eat merely to gratify the ladies,
one of whom asks him, with great tenderness of manner, why he
does not `use' more of her victuals? After this, Washington
becomes very intimate with Miss Frazier; delivers long
speeches
to her whenever a chance offers; fights Indians and makes
love, `off and on,' and finally ascertains that Miss Frazier is
engaged
.
The North American Reviewer gracefully sums up these
and ten thousand other improbable adventures, such as
Washington's
dancing jigs at parties; dressing in the character of an
Indian
chief, with leggins, porcupine quills, etc., and keeping
nocturnal
appointments, while, to use the words of the author, `the
earth was wrapt in a
tolerably thick mantle of darkness
.' The
Review is perfectly fair; none of the incidents are distorted, and
the ridicule is natural. Its humor and justice were universally
acknowledged.
This article changed the opinions of the author of the
Wilderness
,
respecting the North American Review, at once. Stung
by the ridicule which the paper on his work excited, and panting
for satisfaction, he came out, in the self-same number containing
the plaudits that we have quoted, with the subjoined appendix.
It is the most notable specimen of word-eating on record:
`DEGENERACY OF THE NORTH AMERICAN REVIEW!
`In the leading article of our present number, we complimented this
Review
for the honesty which it had hitherto displayed in its auimadversions
on authors. When we committed that
compliment
to paper, we were far
from
expecting
that we should so soon have to change our opinion. The
sheet containing it, however, was hardly printed off, when the Review for
the present quarter fell into our hands, and afforded decisive and
melancholy
proof that it no longer continued the honest and able journal of
criticism
we have so long esteemed it!'
Pursuing this topic in the same number, this author asks, with
a feeling of injured self-complacency: `To what principle in
human
nature are we to ascribe this ill-natured feeling of the critics?
It is to
envy;
it is to a dread of being
surpassed
in literary
reputation
!'
The `degenerate' article of the North American Review
finished
our critic as an author. The feebleness of his inventions,
the emptiness of his pretensions, and his utter ignorance of every
attribute calculated to make a real American novel, were fully
established. His self-esteem, however, was insatiable; and so
novel after novel oozed from his cerebellum, and fell dead-born
from the press! Finally he began to fancy that romance was
not his
forte,
and renewed his suit with the Nine.
On this point of evidence in his literary history, we feel
completely
posed. We are surrounded with gems of various waters;
we are in a wilderness of flowers; and how shall we cull them?
We feel like Franklin's little Philosopher, with the superfluous
apples. Our author has written on all subjects; on Ireland, and
the far West; on the Sun, and also the Moon; on land and sea,
arvorum et sidera cli
. Our only method is to plunge at once
into this vast collection of themes, and select the best. As the
present month is particularly patriotic in its associations, we
commence
with the following quatrains. They came out of the
author's
mind, on account of seeing some ladies `fetching a walk,'
one fourth of July. We have only room for fragments. The
reader is desired to note the numerous
possessives
in the first
verse, and the blending of past and present in the other stanza.
Well was it written on the glorious
Fourth
. It celebrates the
Union of the Tenses:
`Columbia's fair, a lovely train,
All ardent in your country's cause;
With glowing hearts ye join the
strain,
That sings the birth of freedom's laws.
* * * *
`Dependent on a stranger's will,
Your sires long owned a tyrant lord,
Their wrongs on wrongs increasing still,
While tyrants no relief afford.'
There are two qualities strikingly manifest in the critic's metre;
namely, his rhyming words, and a peculiar system of joining a
whole line together with matrimonial hyphens. In an effusion on
Early Scenes, he gives us the subjoined lines. It is not for us
to instruct so able a poet in the art of verse; but we make bold
to suggest, that if the
o
were out of `joy,' in the annexed stanza,
its
rhythmus
would be considerably eased:
`For then, if ills or fears invade,
The lightsome spirit bids them fly;
And then th' impressions strong are made,
Of ne'er to-be-forgotten-joy.'
The quality exhibited in this last line, to wit, that of compound
compression, by means of the conjunctive hyphen, is beyond all
praise. We know nothing to exceed it, save the remark of the
Morning Post, in Horace Smith's Rejected Addresses, where
the people are informed that `they may expect soon to be
supplied
with vegetables, in the
in-general-stewed-with-cabbage-stalks-but-on-Saturday-night-lighted-up-with-lamps
market
of Covent Garden.'
It is perhaps in the elegiac stanza that our critic's poetry runs
the smoothest. Witness the following, from a long and a strong
strain,
near the grave of a rural poet in Ireland. The rhyme is
ineffably grand. The only improvement that could be proposed,
would be to spell the last word in the first line, desarts, instead
of the present mode. We think it might give the metre a
benefit
,
but we make the suggestion with profound diffidence:
`Turn to your hut, the falling roof deserts
There genius long her darling will deplore;
His country owned him as
a man of parts
She owned him suchbutah! she did no more!'
No man is fonder than our author of a
strain
. It is a constant
operation with him. Thus:
`to the Indian shines the gem in vain,
The richest product of his native fields,
The tiger crushes with regardless
strain,
The loveliest flower the sylvan desert yields.'
Now we are not intimate with wild animals, having but a slight
menagerie
acquaintance with them: but we believe the tiger must
be a weaker beast than naturalists are aware of, if he is obliged
to
strain
much in crushing a flower.
Here comes a strain in another verse; or rather a verse in
another
strain:
`Now to the lonely wood or desert vale,
With lengthened stride, he hurries o'er the plain;
And mutters to the wind his wayward tale,
Or chants abrupt, a discontented
strain
.'
This, be it remembered, is the gait of a musing, melancholy
hard. Now, the walk of a thoughtful man is solemn and slow.
He gives his pensive fancies to the air beneath a beech at
noontide
,
or he saunters in listless idleness along. Who but our
author
would represent him, `locomoting' on a long, dog-trot over
the bogs of his neighborhood, or going ahead like the famous
steam-boat of Davy Crockett's, that jumped all the sawyers in
the Mississippi?
An amatory effusion, addressed by this writer to a virgin of
his acquaintance, commences thus:
`Maid of the
lovely-rolling
eye!'
In truth, he appears always to have preferred Venus to
Minerva
,
and a defective education was the result, which is
everywhere
exhibited in his writings. He tells us that he used to
throw his books to the dogs,
`and mingling in the sprightly train,
In many a
gambol, scoured
the plain.'
Indeed he is candid enough to say, expressly:
`I boldly
shunned the school,
And scorning all distracting rule,
The dreaded master's
voice behind
I thought
I heard in every wind
.'
A person conversant with the writings of
Gray,
might fancy
a kind of plagiarism here, from the following lines in the Ode to
Eton College, where, speaking of school-boys, he sings:
`still as they run,
they look behind
They
hear a voice in every wind,
' etc.
But we will be merciful. The similitude is merely one of the
thousand and nine strange coincidences with common English
authors, in which all the verses of this very
original
writer
abound. In this particular instance he was excusable for
imagining
that he heard a voice in the wind, and for saying so in
his rhymes, since his stolen relaxation was very suspicious. He
went, he says, to meet a young woman,
`with charms divine that first could move,
And fire my youthful soul to love,
And
show
the hawthorn
in
the
mead
To whose well-known, concealing
shade
In evenings cool we oft would stray.'
He remarks, also, that being thus cosily situated, under the
hawthorn aforesaid, they concluded `to
bring
the vale to witness
their tale,' and that `she was
kind,
and he was
blest
.'
Particulars
are omitted. It is possible that this is the same maid whom
he immortalizes in another production, and to whom comfort is
administered, just as the twain are leaving Ireland for
Philadelphia
,
in the following affectionate and hopeful lines:
`We need not grieve now, our friends to leave now,
For Erin's fields we again shall see;
But first a lady, in Pennsylvania,
My dear, remember thou art to be!'
Here, capricious in luxury, we must pause, and turn to
another
department in which our critic has excelled; namely, in the
Drama.
His first tragedy was called `The Usurper,' and although it was
a most deplorable failure, yet the author strenuously contended
that it was no fault of his. Everything that benevolence could
suggest was done to make it live, and to resuscitate it after death;
but in vain. Prometheus himself could not have revived it, with
all the authentic fire of Jove. To herald its advent, every
possible
exertion was made in the newspapers, under the immediate
direction of the author. How many were the free admissions,
how numberless the antecedent puffs which he caused to be
caused to be manufactured, or else produced himself; all setting
forth, in sugared phraseology, that `our gifted fellow-townsman,
Dr.
McH***y,
' would appear as a dramatist on such a night!
It was even publicly hinted, by a friendly journalist, at our
author's special solicitation, that `it was understood that the
seats were nearly all taken, and that all who desired to witness
its first representation, must make immediate application at the
box office!' But alas! the tragedy was inflicted but twice upon
an exceedingly sparse audience, and then expired. The cause
of its untimely demise was explained at length to the public at
the time, by the author, and proved to be, that the actors were
jealous of the writer's reputation! `Sir,' said he to an unfortunate
gentleman whom he held by the button in Chestnut-street, `the
decline of this production was principally owing to one of the
supernumeraries. He was despatched to secure a distinguished
prisoner, one of the heroes of the play. When he returned
without him, he should have replied thus to the question,
`Where's your prisoner?'
`My lord, we caught him, and we held him long;
But as dd fate decreed, he 'scaped our grasp,
And fled.'
Now, sir, this is poetry; it stirs the blood, and makes an
audience
feel very uneasy. And how do you think that elegant
passage was spoken? Why, it was done in this wise:
Quest.
`Well, have you catch'd the prisoner?
Ans.
`Yes, Sir, we catch'd him, but we could not
Hold himand he's off.'
`That very passage, my friend, together with the pre-disposed
stupidity of the audience,
ruined
my tragedy; and it is lost to
the stage.'
But these reverses did not damp the vanity of our author.
Though the public condemned and laughed, yet his familiar
friends looked upon all the works that he had made, and
pronounced
them good. Thus, the Usurper, though dead and
buried
,
was duly glorified in the American Quarterly Review. A
labored analysis of its incomprehensible plot was given, and `its
sweetness, tenderness, and
simplicity,
' set forth by extracts!
Animated by these partial plaudits, our dramatist turned his
attention to comedy. Feeling indignant at the unbending
Mordecais
of the critical world, he determined to crucify them all,
emblematically. So he wrote a piece called `Love and Poetry.'
This lived two nights. One passage only is preserved in the
memory of the hearers. The hero, a poet, was made to commit
a highway robbery; and his poor old father, lamenting the
infatuated
criminality of his boy, exclaims in a burst of parental
anguish
:
`Alas! my brain is wildmy heart is sad;
And, as 't is troublesome to tarry here,
Where every thing reminds me of my son,
I think, upon reflection, I will go
And live in the Western Country!
'
On the second representation, at the theatre in Walnut-street,
the quondam Circus, there were about a dozen persons in the
boxes, perhaps twenty in the pit, and one enterprising Cyprian in
the third tier. The piece was listened to with great solemnity.
It was written for amusement, but the author had the fun all to
himself. So irresistibly comic was it, that there was scarcely a
smile during the whole performance. The friends of the writer,
unwilling to be `in at the death' of his comedy, had staid away.
They knew it would be dismal to look upon the bantling of a
fellow-townsman,
in articulo mortis,
and they spared themselves
the trial. The curtain descended; and sundry peanut-eating
pitlings
,
(who lay along on several benches, each occupying two or
three,) made an unanimous call for the author. He arose from
his solitude in the second box, second tier, where he had
ensconced
himself, and said:
`Ladies and Gentlemen: I thank you for this triumphant mark of esteem
and honor. It is not on account of pecuniary considerations that I thank
you, for I perceive by a glance at the house, that the avails will not be
extensive
;
but ladies and gentlemen, I am thankful for the
glory,
' (and here
he smote his breast with sonorous emphasis,) `the undying
glory
which I
feel at this moment. Ladies and Gentlemen, I thank you
all
.'
This was the last of our critic's dramatic productions. He
has since attended to the linen trade, and occupied the stool of
poetical criticism in the American Quarterly Review. All the
long, dull articles in that periodical, from first to last, on the
subject
of American poetry, have been from his pen. The drift of
them generally is, to show that there is not and can not be such
a thing as American verse, and that in this particular the only
way to succeed, is to abandon the idea of any independent
literature
of our own, and trust for that commodity to trans-atlantic
producers.
We can not enumerate the various critiques in which this same
sweet bard has destroyed all the chief minstrels of the land; but
the ideas of the American Quarterly with respect to the merits of
Bryant,
are too peculiar to be lost. It is true, that they differ
in the matter from the recorded opinions of every eminent Review
in Europe; but then taste is taste, and there is no accounting for
it. The productions of Bryant are esteemed by this
Philadelphia
quarterly as utterly devoid of any qualities to excite the
reader's curiosity or interest his heart. `Page after page,' it
says, `may be perused, if the reader has sufficient
patience,
with
dull placidity, or rather perfect unconcern, so that the book
shall
be laid aside without a single passage having been impressed
upon the mind as
worthy of recollection
.'
Now, when opinions like these are advanced, in utter
opposition
to the whole world of letters, in defiance of taste and sense,
the question naturally arises,
Who
judges thus foolishly? This,
as far as the American Quarterly Review is concerned, we have
endeavored to show in the foregoing pages, and in so doing, have
set down naught in malice. The choice morsels of biography
that we have presented, are inseparable from the works of our
author; they are, moreover, notorious. The moral of all is, that
our literature has been long enough degraded by alien intruders,
who have neither learning nor genius, and by those enemies of the
most dignified interests of the country, who have aided and
abetted
their shallow pretensions. Were it likely that a
discontinuance
of the evil is at hand, we might be content to let such
literary
empirics make themselves as ridiculous as they please. But
when,
because anonymous,
their bad taste infects even a limited
number of readers, their influence becomes offensive. The
divine
Plato, in his immortal dialogue of Protagoras, tells us, that
in the arts it is only the opinions of those who are themselves
gifted and skilful, that ought to be respected. And what kind
of skill, by our present unbiassed showing, has been evinced by
this Critic? He is a walking synonym for a failure, in
everything
.
We are told on good authority, though the work has not
yet reached us, that in the last number of the American
Quarterly
,
our Aristarchus is at his work again. He confesses the
general popularity of several American poets, but lays the blame
on the press and the public. He thinks that both should be
slow to commend, and be careful not to be gulled. Such advice
comes with miserable grace from the author. His insatiate
hunger
for praise, and his continual supplications for it, of the
editorial
fraternity of Philadelphia, are proverbial. And, as to
deceiving
the public, we place him at our bar, and ask him to
establish
his own innocence. Did he not once determine to take
the general applause by storm, and on the publication of one of
his unhappy novels, repeatedly stop the press, and cause
second,
third,
and
fourth
editions to be inserted in the title-page of the
same
impression? Was not the
third
edition for sale at the
book-stores before the
first
was bound? Was not the same
19
system adopted with several of his other works, the plagiarized
`Pleasures of Friendship,' especially? Any Philadelphia
bookseller
can answer these queries, much more readily than our
critic would like to admit them. It is only by such modes of
grasping at ephemeral praise, through trickery, coupled with
advance
eulogies and surmises in newspapers:
`el' augurio, a la bugia,
E chiromanti, ed ogni fallace arte,
Sorte, indovini, e falsa profezia,'
that this critic has ever been honored, even with ridicule. All
his articles have proceeded from the ignoblest private motives,
either of hope or of retaliation. Thus, the argument spoken of as
contained in his last Review; namely, that we have yet no great,
long poem; no big book of American metre, and that there is
now a want of it; is only to herald a manuscript volume of his,
in some nineteen `books,' which he has just been obliged to send
to London, because the publishers on this side of the water can
not see its merits. It has been shown about very generally, and
we learn, is similar to Emmons' Fredoniad; only of greater
length. It is y'clept `The Antediluvians;' and we venture to
say, if any hapless London bookseller is seduced into its
publication
,
that the first copy which reaches America will be lauded
in a certain quarter, under the author's immediate supervision.
as a work `unparalled, unpaired,' equal to Klopstock or Milton
in sublimity, superior to Pope in harmony, and a touch beyond
anything ever produced in the United States, for `sweetness,
tenderness, and simplicity!' We wait patiently for its coming.
Note
.
The
effect of this article was a decided one. It put an end, from that
time forth, to the literary career of the writer whose productions it exposed. The
work here referred to was subsequently published in London by the author, but it
dropped still-born from the press.
Christopher North,
indeed, revived a copy
of it for a sort of galvanic experiment in criticism, which established an
electrical
`communication' with the risible nerves of his fifty thousand readers. The
critique commenced, if we rightly remember, with these flattering words: `To
compare these two volumes with a couple of bottles of small beer, would be greatly
to belie that fluid!'
Editor
.
AN OLD MAN'S RECORDS.
When
the sober and mellow days of Autumn are passing by
me with a melancholy smile, I love to go back upon the pinions
of memory, to the scenes and enjoyments of other years. I
joy to retrace my footsteps along the journey of life; to call up
in long review the sunny scenes that flitted from my vision, like
the gay but withered leaves of the departed Summer, which I
now behold from my window, floating with a low and mournful
whisper on the breeze. I love to call old friends and old events
to mind; to linger in thought by the low mansions of dust, in
which are dwelling in silent repose the forms I have loved,
waiting
to awake at the resurrection, in the light of immortality and
the likeness of
God
. I gaze again, as from some lofty eminence,
upon those glorious realms of my early imagination, once
peopled
with forms and scenes of surpassing beauty, and redolent
of the sweet odors of delight. Such are my thoughts at this
calm and solemn season. The chilling influences which are
usually allotted by men to the octogenarian, are not with me.
This Sabbath of the Year descends upon me like some holy and
heavenly spirit, with gentle voices, and on dove-like wings;
until
,
as I repaint the faded pictures of the past, with the magic
dyes of fancy and of memory, I gaze again upon them with a
feeling of honest and refreshing rapture, or a not unpleasing
sadness
.
Age, unlike the Idleness of the great moralist, has not
yet wreathed for me its garland of poppies, or poured into my
cup the waters of oblivion. I renew, in thought and feeling, the
joys and the sorrows of by-gone times. A holy tenderness
creeps warmly into my heart; and as I approach the great gate
which opens from time into eternity, I turn to survey the vistas
through which my wayfaring has lain, as the traveller pauses at
sun-set to look back in the waning light upon the dim and distant
landscape that he has traversed.
This comparison of life to a journey, reminds me how pleasant
it is to overlook the records of modern pilgrims, in
Pays d' Outre
Mer.
I compare what they see, with what I have seen on the
same extended theatre, in times long past; ere yet the
schoolmaster
was abroad, as now; when Johnson thundered his
pompous
anathemas against American independence; when Pitt and
Burke wielded their tremendous eloquence in the popular
assembly
,
and `France got drunk with blood to vomit crime.' Those
were days of interest; of deep, stern, and awful import; and
I witnessed them as they passed, on the very arena from which
they borrowed their glory and their gloom. I have seen the fatal
axe descend upon the heads of a Marie Antoinette and a Louis
Capet; I have witnessed the tumults of a revolution, the
thousand
excitements of political life in a departed age; and as at `a
theatre or scene,' have beheld those great actors play their parts
in the vast drama of existence, who are now quietly reposing,
some in tombs of honor, and others in vaults of infamy. My
youth was spent abroad, at a period when every object was to me
new and impressive; when the contrasts between the new world
and the old were large and various; and when my country, then
glimmering like a faint star in the West, had scarcely began to
clothe herself in that meridian brightness wherewith she is now
invested.
I passed the best portions of my early manhood in France
and England. This foreign sojourn was in days lang, lang syne;
and no one can tell the enthusiasm which filled to overflowing
my truly American bosom, as I heard, by slow and uncertain
arrivals
,
how the current of free principles was rolling onward in
my native land. I used daily to read, with stormy indignation,
those journals which teemed with obloquy upon the `Rebels' of
the New World, even after the war-cloud had ceased to `muffle
up the sun' of liberty. In all things I was, from principle,
profession
,
education, and habit, an uncompromising republican. In
the best sense of the word, thank Heaven! I am so still.
As I cast my eye backward over that period in my humble
history, and the scenes it embraced, I bethink me of the great
truth in the words of the wise man of Jerusalem: `The thing
that hath been, is that which shall be; and that which is done,
is that which shall be done; there is nothing new under the sun.'
The principal causes of common events in our country at
present
,
are much like those of Europe then; there were mobs and
murders, and desperate adventures among the debased and the
passion-led; but among the majority of the people there was
paramount a sincere respect or reverence for the laws.
But the affections and frailties of mortals alike impress all
ages. `Nature isnature,' says some profound `saw'-yer, and
its attributes, at one period or another, are always the same. I
have seen offenders against the laws lay down their lives at home
and abroad; I have heard the shouts of infuriated multitudes on
both sides of the Atlantic; and I have drawn from all a
meaning
and a moral, of which the principal is this: that while in our
own country there exist no external excuses for crime, it is often
in Europe the dire result of positive, unescapeable compulsion.
When I say this, I speak of course of those crimes which are
begotten of Indigence and Ignorance; crimes which may as it
were be naturally looked for in a population like that of the
great capital of England, where it is asserted that sixty thousand
unfortunate persons arise every morning, from hap-hazard
lodgings
in by-places, without a morsel of bread for their lips, or a
place to lay their hapless forms when the evening draws nigh.
The first execution that I ever witnessed, was in London. I
was also, by accident, a spectator of the dreadful deed which
brought the wretched criminal to the gallows. I proceed to give
a description of both the culprit and his act; of the causes which
made him the former, and brought about the latter. All the
scenes of this extraordinary and romantic catastrophe arise to my
mind as vividly as if they had happened but yesterday.
On the evening of the seventh of April, 1779, I left my
lodgings
in the Strand, at an early hour, for Covent Garden Theatre.
The house was filling as I sought my box. The play was Love
in a Village, and the cast for the night embraced some of the
then most popular performers of the day. There was a
continual
influx of beauty and fashion, until the dress circles assumed
an appearance of absolute splendor. Plumes waved; jewelled
hands lifted the golden-bound glass to the voluptuous eye; and
all the pomp and circumstance of a brilliant auditory garnished
the scene. One `taken' box still remained without its
occupants
;
but at the close of the first act, they entered. A
middle-aged
,
but fine-featured and cheerful-looking gentleman, with an
Irish physiognomy, handed into her place a lady of such
surpassing
loveliness, that, the first glance being taken, I could
scarcely withdraw from her the patronage of my eye. She was
dressed in the magnificent fashion of the time; her hair parting
off from her temples and forehead like a wave, and falling in two
large masses on either side of her polished neck. Her brow
was high and clear; her eyes of heaven's own azure; her nose
had the fair lines and nostril curve of Greece; her cheeks and
chin softly dimpled, and her ruby lips wearing `a smile, the
sweetest that ever was seen.' The dazzling creature took her
place, and adjusted her scarf with inimitable gracefulness. Her
dress, I well remember, was in the height of taste; the white
lace ruffles of her short sleeves terminating at the elbows, and
showing the perfect symmetry of her hand and arm, as she plied
her pretty fan, or peered through her glass at the Pride of the
Village. I was quite overcome with admiration.
`Pray who
can
that be?' said I to a friend.
`What a question!' was the reply. `How ignorant you are!
`Not to know her, argues yourself unknown.' That is the
splendid
Miss
Reay,
the fair
friend
of Lord Sandwich, who is her
protector
. He has given her the protection that vultures give to
lambs. She has borne him two or three lovely, cherub-like
children
.
He is twice her senior in years, has robbed her of her
best treasure, and it is strongly whispered that she loves him not.
When in public, as at present, she usually appears without him.'
I did not prolong my inquiries, for the lady herself attracted
my sole attention, to the utter disregard of the play. As I was
gazing in that direction, I saw a person standing at the door of a
box near by, whom at the first glance I took for a maniac. His
eyes glared with unsettled wildness; his face was pale as death,
and the damp hair hung in heavy threads over his forehead. He
was looking at Miss Reay with an expression in which love and
hate seemed struggling for empire. He was well-sized,
handsome
,
and of goodly presence. He was dressed in black. I
never beheld a countenance in which so much mental excitement
was depicted. His livid lips moved as if in a kind of prayer:
he would sometimes press his hand against his forehead or his
heart; and finally, after a long and lingering look at the lady I
have mentioned, raised his handkerchief hurriedly to his eyes,
and disappeared.
I never remember to have passed an evening in such perfect
abstraction as this. The intoxication of beauty overpowered
me; and so rapt had been my attention, that I scarcely knew
when the play was over. I hurried out, as soon as the curtain
fell, and stepping to the Piazzas, waited to see the fair creature
enter her carriage. She passed by me, with her attendant, his
epaulettes glittering in the lamp-light. A kind of enchantment
possessed me, and a foreboding that some doleful disaster was
about to happen. I was moving onward, and stood within a few
feet of the lady, when I heard the loud and stunning report of a
heavily-charged pistol. Another followed, and shrieks and
groans resounded along the arches. I rushed toward the spot
whence the deadly sounds proceeded, and found the brilliant
being whom I have described, weltering in her blood. The ball
had entered her fair forehead, and her vestments were deluged
with gore. The sight was horrid beyond description. She was
perfectly dead. I penetrated the crowd that had surrounded the
murderer. It was the same person whom I had noticed in the
theatre, and whose looks were so desperate. His face was white
as snow; his eyes dilated, and his lips compressed; but his
demeanor
evinced a kind of peaceful tranquillity, or dead stupor;
the awful calm that follows a tempest of passion. The blood,
and even portions of the brain of his victim were on his sleeve.
Never shall I forget the terror of that scene! He had attempted
immediately after killing Miss Reay to destroy his own life; but
his murderous weapon failed in its effect, and he stood mute
before the multitude, a personification of immoveable Horror.
I returned to my lodgings, but sleep fied from my eye-lids.
The excitement of fixed attention during the evening, and the
awful catastrophe I had witnessed, left me in a state of dread,
and nervous feeling. If I slumbered, my slumbers were not
sleep, but a continuance of melancholy scenes and impressions.
Sometimes I fancied myself the murderer, flying from the sword
of justice to my own place of abode, and seeking relief upon
my pillow. It seemed in vain; for methought,
That Guilt was the grim chamberlain
Who lighted me to bed,
And drew my midnight curtains round,
With fingers bloody red!
The next day, all the events which led to the deplorable
deed I had witnessed, were brought to light, The murderer
was a young
clergyman
named
James Hackman
. He was
formerly
an officer in one of the British regiments; and being
invited
on one occasion to dine with Lord Sandwich at
Hichinbrook
House, he met Miss Reay, and soon became so
desperately
enamoured of her as to weaken his health. He finally,
more probably for the purpose of being near the object of his
love, than for any other cause, left the army, took holy orders,
and obtained the living of Wiverton in Norfolk.
Perhaps a more affecting and melancholy termination of
unlawful
love never occurred than this. Miss Reay had little or no
affection for the nobleman who had so foully wronged her; and
the first object of her passion was undoubtedly the young military
clergyman. In the course of time he completely won her heart,
and alienated her regard, if any she had, entirely from her first
lord. A series of letters passed between them for several years,
printed copies of which are now before me, and some of which,
or extracts from them, it may not be improper to give. He
ultimately
removed to Ireland; and on his return found the heart
of his versatile mistress changed forever, and in favor of a third
admirer. While, however, in the mutual `tempest, torrent, and
I may say, whirlwind of their passion,' while he was in the
constant
course of dishonoring the man whose hospitality he had so
often enjoyed, (if dishonor it may be called under the
circumstances
,)
the epistles which the parties addressed to each other
breathe the very soul of feeling. Never, perhaps, was there a
more awful exemplification, than in the case of these short-lived
lovers, of the truth of Shakspeare's lines:
`These violent delights have violent ends,
And in their sweetness die.'
`Huntingdon,
8th Dec.,
1775.
`To Miss
.
Then I release my dear soul from her promise about
today
.
If you do not see that all which he can claim by gratitude, I doubly
claim by love, I have done, forever. I would purchase my happiness at any
price but at the expense of yours. Look over my letters, think over my
conduct, consult your own heart, read these two long letters of your own
writing, which I return you. Then tell me whether we love or not. And
if we love (as witness both our hearts), shall gratitude,
cold
gratitude, bear
away the prize that's due to love like ours? Shall my right be
acknowledged
,
and he possess the casket? Shall I have your soul, and he your
hand, your lips, your eyes?
`Gracious God of Love! I can neither write nor think. Send one line,
half a line, to
`Your own, own
H.'
This impassioned letter, with others previously sent, induced
the following reply:
`H. 10th Dec.,
'75.
`To
Mr.
H
Your two letters of the day before yesterday, and
what you said to me yesterday, have drove me mad. You know how such
tenderness distracts me. As to marrying me, that you should not do upon
any account. Shall the man I value, be pointed at and hooted for selling
himself to a lord for a commission? * * * My soul is above my
situation
.
Beside, I will not take advantage of what may be only, perhaps,
(excuse me), a youthful passion. After a more intimate acquaintance of
a week or ten days, your opinion of me might very much change. And
yet you
may
love me as sincerely as I
`But I will transcribe you a verse which I don't believe you ever heard
me sing, though it's my favorite. It is said to be a part of an old Scottish
balladnor is it generally believed that Lady L. wrote it. It is so
descriptive
of our situation, I wept over it like a child, yesterday:
`I gang like a ghost, and I do not care to spin,
I fain would think on Jamie, but that would be a sin;
I must e'en do my best a good wife to be,
For auld Robin Gray has been kind to me.'
`For God's sake let me see my
Jamie
to-morrow. Your name also is
Jamie.'
It would of course be useless for me to follow up these
epistolary
details of passion and crime. At my present age, when
`the hey-day of the blood is cool and humble, and waits upon
the judgment,' I look upon them as the confessions of two minds
alienated from reason by temporary madness. Three days after
the date of the foregoing, the reverend lover wrote thus:
`Huntingdon,
13th Dec.,
'75.
`To
Miss
My Life and Soul! But I will never more use any
more preface of this sort, and I beg you will not. A correspondence begins
with dear, then my dear, dearest, my dearest, and so on, till, at last, panting
language toils after us in vain.
`No language can explain my feelings. Oh, yesterday, yesterday!
Language
thou liest! Oh, thou beyond my warmest dreams bewitching! Are
you not now convinced that Heaven made us for each other? * * *
Have I written sense? I know not what I write.
`Misfortune, I defy thee now! M. loves me, and my soul has its content
most absolute. No other joy like this succeeds in unknown fate.'
To say that the whole correspondence is marked on both sides
with good taste, often with learning, and always with enthusiastic
but guilty tenderness, is but justice to the memory of the parties.
In one of his letters, Hackman quotes the following among other
stanzas, entitled, `The moans of the forest after the battle of
Flodden Field:'
`I have heard a lilting at the ewes' milking,
A' the lasses lilting before break of day;
But now there's a moaning in ilka green loning,
Since the flowers of the forest are weeded away.
`At bughts in the morning, nae blythe lads are scorning,
Our lasses are lonely, and dowie, and wae;
Nae daffing, nae gabbin, but sighing and sobbing,
Ilka lass lifts her leglin, and hies her away.'
During the lover's sojourn in Ireland, he wrote to his mistress,
and in doing so, spoke unwittingly of pleasant female
acquaintances
that he had formed in that kingdom. This, I have reason
to believe, was the first impulse to her estrangement. Her
previous
letters to him had been overflowing with affectionate
sentiments
.
In one of them, speaking of her devotion, she says, `I
could die, cheerfully, by your hand, I know I could.' The
letter
to which I have just alluded, however, provoked the following
reply:
`
England,
25th June, 1776
.
`To
Mr.
.
Let me give you joy of having found such kind and
agreeable friends in a strange land. The account you gave me of the lady
quite charmed me. Neither am
I
without
my
friends. A lady from whom
I have received particular favors, is uncommonly kind to me. For the
credit of your side of the water, she is an Irish woman.
Her agreeable
husband,
by his beauty and accomplishments, does credit to this country.
He is remarkable also for his
feelings
.
`Adieu! This will affect
you,
I dare say, in the same manner that your
account affected
me
.'
This letter, with others that followed it, soon brought Mr.
Hackman to London. He lodged, on his return, in Cannon's
Court, and addressed an immediate letter to his mistress. The
answer returned, purported to come from a female servant,
writing
by the sick bed of her lady, and at her dictation. The
epistle was humbly written, and filled with prevarications and
cold compliments. By degrees, the melancholy truth of the
lady's estrangement was established. Proof of the most positive
description was furnished. It drove the lover to despair, and he
resolved upon self-destruction. Information having been
communicated
to him at his parsonage in Norfolk, (whither before
the full proof of his suspicions he had retired,) calculated to
awaken every dark surmise, he hastened to London, where
everything was confirmed. In his first tumultuous resolve for
self murder, he expressed his fears in a letter to a friend, as
follows: `My passions are blood-hounds, and will inevitably tear
me to pieces. The hand of nature has heaped up every species
of combustible in my bosom. The torch of love has set the
heap on fire, and I must perish in the flames. And who is he
will answer for passions such as mine?
At present,
I am
innocent
.'
His last letter before committing the deed for which he
suffered an ignominious death, was addressed to a friend, and
couched in the following terms:
`
7th April, 1779
.
`To Mr. B.
My Dear F.
When this reaches you I shall be no
more, but do not let my unhappy fate distress you too much. I strove
against it as long as possible, but now it overpowers me. You know where
my affections were placed; my having by some means or other lost hers,
(an idea which I could not support,) has driven me to madness. God bless-you
, my dear F. Would I had a sum of money to leave you to
convince
you of my great regard! May Heaven protect my beloved woman,
and forgive the act which alone could relieve me from a world of misery I
have long endured! Oh! should it be in your power to do her any act of
friendship,
remember your faithful friend,
J. H.'
In the afternoon of the day on which the preceding letter was
written, Mr. Hackman took a walk to the Admiralty, from his
lodgings in St. Martin's Lane, probably to take a last view of
worldly objects, ere he plunged into the great gulf of Eternity.
Near the Admiralty, he saw Miss Reay pass in a coach, with
Signora Galli, an attendant. He rushed into the theatre, in the
desperate condition I have before described; and unable to
control
his thick-coming and bitter thoughts, returned to his lodgings,
where he procured and loaded the pistols, with one of which he
committed his dreadful crime. In his attempt to kill himself
after
Miss Reay, he was severely wounded. Mr. M'Namara, a
gentleman who was assisting the lady into the coach, was so
covered with blood, and filled with horror, that he was seized
with violent sickness. The mangled remains of the `Beauty
once admired,' were conveyed to the Shakspeare tavern, near
the theatre, to await the coroner's inquest.
The unhappy clergyman was conveyed to Newgate, whence
he addressed the ensuing note to a friend:
`8th April, 1779
.
`To
Charles
,
Esq
.
I am alive, and she is dead. I shot her and
not myself. Some of her blood is still upon my clothes. I dont ask you
to speak to me. I don't ask you to look at me. Only come hither, and
bring me a little poison; such as is strong enough. Upon my knees I beg,
if your friendship for me ever was sincere,
do,
do
bring me
some poison!
'
This was not furnished him, and his trial soon came on. I
was present. The prisoner sat with his white handkerchief at his
cheek, his head resting languidly on his hand. His face wore
the gloomy pallor of the grave. The plea of insanity, put in by
his counsel, did not avail. When he rose to offer his defence,
many an eye glistened with the tears of pity. His words, hollow
and sepulchral in their sound, seemed to come forth without
breath from his livid lips; while a large dark spot on his
forehead seemed like a supernatural seal of ruin. His defence
was brief, clear, and pointed. In the course of it he said: `I
stand here this day the most wretched of human beings; but I
protest, with that regard to truth which becomes my situation,
that the will to destroy her who was ever dearer to me than life,
was never mine, until a momentary phrensy overcame me, and led
me to the deed I now deplore. Before this dreadful act, I
trust nothing will be found in the tenor of my life, which the
common charity of mankind will not excuse.
I have no wish
to avoid my punishment.' This state of mind prevailed to the
last. He hungered and thirsted for death. Lord Sandwich
addressed
him anonymously, the note subjoined, to which I annex
the reply:
`17th April, '79
.
`To Mr.
Hackman,
in Newgate:
If the murderer of Misswishes
to live, the man he has most injured will use all his interest to procure his
life.'
`
The Condemned Cell in Newgate,
Saturday Night, 17th April, 1779
.
`
The
murderer of her whom he preferred, far preferred, to life, suspects
the hand from which he has just received such an offer as he
neither desires
nor deserves
. His wishes are for death, not for life. One wish he has:
Could he be pardoned in this world by the man he has most injured! Oh
my lord, when I meet
her
in another world, enable me to tell her, (if
departed
spirits are not ignorant of earthly things,) that you forgive us both,
and that you will be a father to her dear infants!
J. H.'
The rest of his time was passed in a state of mind almost too
horrible to relate. Among his writings, were such records as
these: `Since I wrote my last, I caught myself marching up and
down my cell, with the step of haughtiness; hugging myself in
my two arms; and muttering between my grating teeth,
What a
complete wretch I am!
' `The clock has just struck eleven.
The gloominess of my favorite Young's Night Thoughts, which
was always so congenial to my soul, would have been still
heightened, had he ever been wretched enough to hear St. Paul's
clock
thunder through the still ear of night, in the condemned
cells of Newgate
. The sound is truly solemnit seems the
sound of death. Oh that it were Death's sound! How
greedily
,
would my impatient ears devour it! And yet, but one day
more. Perturbed spirit!rest till then!'
His dreams were tumultuous and dismal. In one vision, he
saw himself in perdition, and having a distant view of Heaven,
beheld his adored mistress walking with angels, and looking down
with a look of peace and joy upon his miseries. She did not
seem to know of them. `I could not go to her, nor could she
come to me: nor did she wish itthere was the curse! Oh,
how I rejoiced, how I wept and sobbed with joy, when I awoke
and found myself in the condemned cell of Newgate!
'
He
met his fate at the scaffold with the firmness of despair.
Only two or three years before, the criminal had attended the
execution of the celebrated Dr. Dodd. I employ his very
description
of that scene, as a complete simile of that which
attended
his own death, as witnessed by me; and with it, close the
melancholy tale. `At last arrived the fatal moment. The
driving
away of the cart was accompanied by a noise which best
explained the feelings of the spectators for the sufferer. Did
you never observe, at the sight or the relation of anything
shocking
,
that you closed your teeth hard, and drew in your breath
hard through them, to make a sort of hissing sound? This was
done so universally at the fatal moment, that I am persuaded the
noise must have been heard at a considerable distance. For my
own part, I detected myself, in a certain manner, accompanying
his body with my own.'
`His agony was soon over, and his cold form conveyed to its
last couch of silence and oblivion.'
We
have been much alarmed of late, by the mobs and
disturbances
which have prevailed in some quarters of our
Republic
but
we have never yet experienced anything half so terrific
as the mobs of Europe. The Bristol Riots, and the
Evennem
ns
de Lyons,
must be fresh in all minds; while some of the
more remote riots in the British capital stand out like pyramids
from the general level of ordinary madness and crime. It was
my hap to see the Great London Riot of 1780, for the
instigation
of which Lord George Gordon was tried for high treason,
and left, though acquitted, with a stain upon his name. He was
the champion of a numerous class of the lower order of
Protestants
,
who held large meetings in various parts of the metropolis,
and sent heavy petitions to Parliament, praying for enactments
against Catholicity. One of these documents, signed by many
thousands, which was presented by Lord Gordon, was so large
that it required the united strength of all the officers of the
House to lift it into the presence of that noble Legislature.
Though every signature was genuine, they were declared to be
fictitious, and the petition was treated with contempt. Incensed
at this imputation, Lord Gordon vowed that he would convince
Parliament of its error, by bringing up the petitioners
in propria
persona,
before their representatives and servants.
He kept his vow; and at ten o'clock on the next Friday
morning
,
several thousands of his petition-signers assembled in St.
George's Fields, where the noble Lord met them, as a Roman
general would have done his legions. He directed them to
proceed
to the Parliament House, over the Westminster,
Blackfriar's
,
and London Bridges. Before this great multitude had
reached their place of destination, it had doubled its numbers and
become a mob. Lords, bishops, and archbishops, were made
objects of popular fury; cries of `No Popery!' rang through
the dusky streets; carriages were upset, and their occupants
obliged to escape from the
mele,
and glide in disguise from roof
to roof, to which they ascended from dwellings where they sought
refuge.
This day was but the beginning of tumult. Like an
half-cured
ulcer on the human form, the riots, when suppressed in
one quarter of the town, would break forth in others. Saturday
and Sunday witnessed the most dreadful excesses. Indeed, the
mob was quite uncontrollable, and yet the horrid Saturnalia had
but just begun. The rioters convened in immense force on
Monday
,
the anniversary of the king's birth-day. Efforts had been
made, but ineffectually, to suppress them; large rewards were
offered for the apprehension of the ring-leaders among the
lawless
bands, who had burned several Catholic chapels, in different
sections of the capital. A few offenders were secured, but the
flame was spreading, and the great body of miscreants rioted on.
The events of Tuesday were dreadful. The mob made a
desperate attack upon the Newgate prison, mounting in swarms
over the walls, and besieging the cells, (where a few riotous
principals
were confined,) with pick-axes and hammers. The chapel,
and the house of the keeper, were soon destroyed. This
occurred
between six and nine o'clock in the evening. The loud
alarms and rising flames drew me to the spot. The fire had
then communicated to the wards and cells, from which the
affrighted
prisoners rushed into the yard, where many of them
were supplied with liquor by the mobocracy, and went yelling
and shouting around their enlarged boundary of exercise, with
the fury of uncaged tigers. Many who were under sentence of
death were among the liberated prisoners. The new prison at
Clerkenwell was also stormed and broken open, and all the
inmates
set free. Many of them, grateful for their sudden and
unexpected
discharge, entered heartily into the cause of those who
had played for them the part of liberators. They next destroyed
the mansions and furniture of Sir John Fielding, and Lord
Mansfield; pictures, libraries, wines, and splendid furniture,
might have been seen, strewed in all directions, and clutched by
the crowd.
Thus waged the horrid war. The next day witnessed only
the increase of a lawless power, which seemed destined to know
no future abatement. The establishment of a private citizen, a
distiller in Holborn, a papist, Langdale by name, was attacked
and fired. Then ensued a scene, such as pen can not describe.
Five hundred thousand dollars' worth of property was destroyed
in a space of time so short, that it seemed as if the whole had
perished in a tornado of fire.
The spectacle at twilight was awful and sublime. At one and
the same moment the billowy clouds of flame were seen surging
upward from the King's Bench and the Fleet Prisons: from the
ponderous toll-gates on Blackfriar's Bridge; from the new
Bridewell, and from dwellings in different sections all over the
metropolis. With a few friends who had purchased admission,
I surveyed the terrific scene from the cupola of St. Paul's. The
crowds that ran howling through the streets; the occasional
thunder of artillery; the spires of blazing light darting up on all
sides, occasionally revealing the red waters of the Thames, and
the sails like sheeted ghosts wavering along its bosom; the
towers
and steeples innumerable, clothed in lurid light; the maniac
vociferations of numerous straggling parties of the mob, who
had come intoxicated from Langdale's distillery, where they
drank to excess, and where hundreds of hogsheads, emptied in
the gutters, were ignited by torches, and ran from street to street,
a tempestuous torrent of fire;these were sights, that, once seen,
could not fail to be forever remembered. Words are powerless
to describe them. On Thursday they ceased.
We have had some violent mobs in America, but none like
this, wherein nearly five hundred persons, beside the numerous
victims of the law, perished together. Long may such
sanguinary
tempests be averted from
our
land!
DESPERATION.
A TALE OF WO AND WEAL.
A gentleman,
whose word, like his penmanship, is straight up and down, and
deserving
of credit, has sent us the following Tale, which has about it a touch of the
Germanic pencil. The discoverer of the narrative says he picked it up in Philadelphia,
as he turned from Chestnut-street into Ninth, near the University. It is evidently the
work of some young student, who is merely auto-biographical. His adventures, which
seem to be described in a letter, are not without parallel, and certainly not without
warning.
Thank Heaven,
my dear George, I have arrived at home,
after a fortnight's mad siege at the Great Metropolis. How
curiously
inscrutable are the freaks of fortune! Three weeks ago,
I could scarcely have met my tailor with a smile, or heard a
friend propose an extra bottle of Sillery at dinner, without feeling
in my bosom a void similar to that which reigned in my purse.
But I am bravely over all these unpleasant sensations.
Impudence
and stratagem have set me superbly upon my legs. I
have made the maxims of Jeremy Diddler my vade mecum:
and now, methinks, I could lend a clever chum any given amount
of shekels, within the circumscription of an X on the Monster.
I am
flushed
by success, and `my countenance gives out lambent
glories.' Every thing needs a preface, and my good fellow, for
what is to come, these remarks serve only as a head. I will
address
myself to my tale.
`Eugene Dallas,' said Tom Edwards to me, as we sat at
Parkinson's
,
on a mild afternoon in December, discussing a delicious
punch,
la Romain,
`I have just been reading an article at the
Athenum, in a Washington paper, describing the society there;
the beauty, the brilliancy, the life. It has made me sick of
college
and books, and the parties we meet here; where the music
is but so-so, the ladies clannish, sometimes dull; and where the
young men line the long halls of their entertainers from parlor to
kitchen, in order to besiege the first invoice of champaigne,
unmindful
of the fair, who, fatigued with moving in the dance,
await with Christian patience their allotment of ice-cream,
oysters
,
and chicken-salad. I say, I begin to tire of these things.
I should like to cut the town, `clandecently,' for a fortnight or
so, and go to Washington. Wouldn't you?'
The
next day, we were warming our feet by the stove in the
gentlemen's cabin of the steam-boat, and watching through the
windows the receding shores of Chesapeake bay. With trunks
hastily packed, a confused wardrobe, and only thirty dollars
between
us, we had entered upon this hair-brained frolic. A
hurried
letter to one of the Faculty announced that we should be
absent a week or two, and the inference instantly transpired over
town, that we had `gone gunning at each other,' or in other
words, to fight a duel.
Baltimore is an agreeable place. The approach to the city is
picturesque; the Cathedral and the Washington Monument rise
magnificently to the view; the principal streets are elegant; the
ladies petite and pretty. We staid there two days; attended
one splendid soiree; smelt the gas foot lights at Holliday-street
Theatre, and thenon for Washington.
The monumental city fades beautifully on the traveller's eye.
The noble statue of the Savior of his Country, towers, a white
and shining column in the sky; a pharos of liberty, sending the
warm beams of patriotism into every American heart. Its tall
form dwindled, over the brown landscape, to a slender shaft
against a gay host of clouds, as we rolled toward the capitol.
How shall I describe the feelings which animate a young
citizen
of this great republic, as he approaches the place where the
destinies of a confederacy of
nations
are controlled and guided!
Throned on a lofty hill, he sees the domes of the capitol, colored
by the sunbeam, and shining amid the striped and starry banners
that roll out and rustle above them. A flood of historic
associations
pours upon his mind. He bethinks him of the
surmounted
perils of the past, and the unrecorded glory of the future,
until his heart and his eyes are filled with emotion, and he rises
with enthusiasm from his carriage-seat, and waving his hat on
high,
hurrahs
for the land of the brave and the free!
Beyond the capitol lies the city, covering ground enough for
half a dozen times its houses and inhabitants, yet no inapt
emblem
of the country itself; large in plan, and rapidly fulfilling its
scope, even beyond all original conjecture.
Drove to Gadsby's. Fine house. Good
table d'htc,
excellent
wines, and a talkative barber, who kills the English language,
speaking daggers to it, at every breath. Went to the capitol.
How proudly it rises at the end of the Pennsylvania Avenue!
what views from its dome! The gay and winding Potomac,
the outspread city; Georgetown, Alexandria; the gorge near
Mount Vernon, in the distance; the solemn burial ground of
Congress nearer at hand; the vast doings below and within! It
is a great place, Washington.
Tom Edwards
had a senatorial uncle at Washington; but I
knew nobody, except a country member of the House from our
District. The chances of admission into society, therefore, were
good for him, but faint for me. The result of his relationship
was an almost immediate invitation for him, the next evening, to
a party at Sir * *'s, the Foreign Minister. There was
none for me; but my wild chum vowed that I should go, on his
introduction, and I assented.
My first movement was to cast about for a
blanchisseuse
. This
was easily arranged. But my dismay can better be conceived
than described, when I found that I had left my best coat at
home, and brought away a cloth one, of summer-green,
somewhat
marked by the careless positions of study. It had an
unc-tuous
collar, and buttons of disreputable antiquity, singularly
rubbed by the finger of Time. What was to be done? I
observed
from my window a tailor's sign; and thither, after
nightfall
,
I hied. On the `board,' like a Turk with his pipe and
slippers, was seated an old Frenchman, the master of the
premises
.
I produced my garment, and desired to know what the
swindle would be for a new set of buttons, a professional
renovation
of the sleeves, and a banishment of the oil from the
collar
.
I told him the habit was an indifferent one, but that if he
would make its amendment cost me only a trifle, he should
receive
all my future patronage, which I hinted would be pretty
extensive. The enterprise of the Gallic snip was awakened;
and, `promise-crammed,' he said:
`You shall ax me tree dollar.'
`Cheap enough,' said I, feeling conscious of my ability for
the outlay, with a present sufficiency beside, if Edwards made a
fair division: `But mind, my friend, let the thing be nicely done;
renew the youth of the garment, and let the buttons be yellow,
flashy, and fashionable.'
`
Certainment, Monsieur,
' replied the complaisant artisan; and
I took my leave.
The
brilliant apartments of Sir * * never looked
more
brilliant, I am sure, than they did on the next evening after this
economical colloquy. Tom bowed me in, but by what species
of social smuggling, I am unable to tell. At any rate,
in I was,
elbowing
my trembling way through a glittering maze of beauty
and fashion, humming with small-talk, and shining in gorgeous
apparel. Supposing Edwards at my side, I turned my head to
address him. The fellow had gone. It was indispensable to seek
him; and, `all unknowing and unknown,' I attempted an awkward
20
retrogression for the purpose. At that instant, I saw him bowing
to a splendid young creature of about sixteen: at the next, they
were standing together in a cotillon. I edged my way thither,
and gave him a supplicating look, which said, `
Do,
my good
fellow
,
introduce me to somebody.' The mischievous wretch
glanced at me, with an eye whose oblique winter I shall never
forget. He
cut
me dead! He had a malicious smirk on his
phiz, which expressed the meditated deviltry that was working in
his mind. My pride was roused, and I was determined to show
him my independence of his protection. Fortunately, I saw
close at hand, a young gentleman, with whom I had formed a
slight dinner-table acquaintance at Gadsby's. I am not ungenteel;
the blood of wounded pride was in my cheek, its fire was in my
eyes; and as to dress, thanks to the felicitous metamorphosis of
the old tailor, my coat was handsomer than ever. My other
appointments
were unexceptionable. I tied a good neckcloth; my
buttons shone lustrously, and my linen was fair as the broidered
sails of Tyre. Never did I look more like a gallant,
comme il
faut
. My mere
presence
at the party established a claim to my
new friend's attention; so, stepping up to him, I bowed
obsequiously
,
and said: `Do you know that beautiful young lady
yonder, whom you are regarding with such devoted attention?'
`No,' said he politely; `by Jove, I wish I did!' I touched his
arm, and insinuated a white lie into his ear. `You
shall
know
her. I can effect that for you. But first, let me beg you to
acquaint
me with the lady to whom I saw you just now so
courteous
and cordial.'
`Certainly,' was the answer; and it was done.
I flourished like a prince for the remainder of the evening;
and through the diplomacy of my first fair partner in the dance,
was enabled to perform my promise to my friend, being first
introduced
myself. The strategie of that night could not be
surpassed
.
I flirted with bevies of beauty; and while walking in a
general march through the rooms, with the gay daughters of two
certain Secretaries in the Department, Tom Edwards passed me:
`
Huge,
' said he, (this was his abbreviation for Eugene,) `you are
well supported, eh? Army and Navy!'
`
Sir!
' I replied, staring at him, `who are you? You are
mistaken.' Tom quailed away, looking daggers at me, which I
forgot in a moment. The excitement of wine, the glitter of
lights, the sweet gushes of music, thrilled through my nerves;
while, amid the rich odors of scented kid gloves and 'kerchiefs,
`the rustling of silks and the creaking of shoes betrayed my fond
heart to woman.' It was an evening, to my apprehension, that
might have been stolen, with all its dramatis person of the
opposite sex, fresh from Paradise.
As the visitors began to lessen, I saw afar the country member
from our District. He was obviously out of his element. He
moved like a bear among young chickens. His white cravat,
which was tied behind his neck, where the ends projected among
his lank and tallowy locks, awakened a doubt whether it was in
use for ornament or strangulation. Had it been a thought
tighter
,
that necessary vessel called the jugular would have been a
useless conduit. His face was like to the setting sun, in an
Indian
summer. He was making toward me, with his broad hands
spread on his black tabby-velvet vest, his thumbs inserted in the
arm-holes; whereupon I decamped, for fear of an interview.
I took my
breakfast
the next day at five o'clock,
p. m.
In
my room, I found a note to my address, in Tom's chirography.
It discoursed to me thus:
Gadsby's,
9
o'clock, A. M.
Dear Huge:
I am
gone to spend a fortnight, in a Christmas festival, with
some friends in Virginia. I enclose a regular division of our
joint funds. I have spoken to my uncle about our hotel bills
here, and he will fix them. It is all understood. You can stay
a fortnight if you like; though how you'll get back to
Philadelphia
,
after that, the Lord only knows. Perhaps you may
accomplish
the transit without trouble: if so, I shall be, (as I was
last night, when I
thought
I knew you,)
mistaken
.
Yours,
Tom
.
Here was a pretty business! He had enclosed me
five
dollars
!
In my perplexity, I was on the point of descending to
book myself to Baltimore, when I remembered that I had
received
two verbal invitations to parties, early in the ensuing
week, and one from my fair first acquaintance of the preceding
evening, to accompany her to church on the morrow, which was
Sunday, and hear her favorite parson `bray canticles.'
There was no alternative. I must stay a week; and stay I
did. My five dwindled to three. I had glorious times in society,
but when I thought of my breeches pocket my suspense was
actually
horrid. Could some stout pugilist have knocked me into
the middle of the next month, I should have blessed the
transportation
.
The future seemed a blank, and Philadelphia as
inaccesible
as Jerusalem.
`
All
settled, Sir,' said the bar-keeper, as I asked him the
amount of my bill. I forgave Tom on the instant. I had feared,
for a week, that it would all be a trick, though I dared not ask.
`What is the fare to Baltimore, in a private carriage?'
`
Five
dollars, Sir; but here is a barouche, about to leave
with some passengers, in which you may have a seat for three.'
I paid out the last cash of which I stood possessed, and seeing
my trunk properly lashed, embarked. After taking a final look
at the city and the Capitol, as we rolled away from the
metropolis
,
I was in an unbroken reverie, till the domes and pillars of
Baltimore rose again to view. We wheeled on, until by the
increased
rattling, I found we were on the city pavements.
`At what hotel shall I set you down, Sir?' said the driver,
touching his hat.
I was in a quandary; and so I answered his question by
asking
another. `Do you know any quiet and fashionable, but
retired
hotel, near the centre of the town?'
`Oh, yes, Sir;' and he deposited me accordingly.
I did not put my name on any book, but was shown directly
to my room. It was a pleasant one, commanding a distant view
of the Great Square and Battle Monument. Here I staid three
days; eating my meals stealthily, and being out nearly all the
time. On the afternoon of the third day, I resolved to disclose
my condition; and to nerve myself for the effort, I ordered
dinner
and wine in my room. I determined if a splendid repast
and sundry bottles of good wine would screw my courage up,
that it should arrive before bed-time at a proper tension. I
regret
to say, when I had finished my dinner, and punished an
unusual quantity of champaigne, all alone, that I was, as Southey
says of the sky, in Madoc,
`Most darkly, deeply, beautifully
blue!
'
At eight o'clock in the evening, I retired to bed, after a lusty
pull at the bell. The servant came.
`Ask the landlord to step up to my room, and bring his bill.'
He clattered down stairs, giggling, and shortly thereafter his
master appeared. He entered with a generous smile, that
made me hope for `the best his house afforded,' and that, just
then, was
credit
.
`How much do I owe you?' said I. He handed me the bill
with all the grace of polite expectancy.
`Let me seeseventeen dollars. How
very
reasonable!
But my dear Sir, the most disagreeable part of this matter is
now to be disclosed. I grieve to inform you that, at present, I
am out of money: but I know, by your philanthropic looks, that
you will be satisfied when I tell you that
if I had it,
I would
give it to you with unqualified pleasure. But you see my not
having the change by me is the reason I can't do it; and I am
sure you will let the matter stand, and say no more about it. I
am a stranger to you, that's a fact; but in the place where I
came from, all my acquaintances know me, as easy as can be.'
The landlord turned all colors. `Where
do
you live, any
how?'
`In Washing I should say in Philadelphia.'
His eye flashed with angry disappointment. `I see how it is,
Mister: my opinion is, that you are a black-leg. You don't
know
where
your home is. You begin with Washington, and
then drop it for Philadelphia. You
must
pay your bill.'
`But I can't.'
`Then I'll take your clothes; if I don't, blow me tight!'
`Scoundrel!' said I, rising bolt upright: `Do it, if you dare!
do it!
and leave the rest to me!'
There were no more words. He arose, deliberately seized
my hat, and my
only
inexpressibles, and walked down stairs.
Physicians say that no two excitements can exist at the same
time in one system. External circumstances drove away, almost
immediately, the confusion of my brain.
I arose and looked out of the window. The snow was
descending
,
as I drummed on the pane. What was I to do? An
unhappy wight,
sans culottes,
in a strange city; no money, and
slightly inebriated. A thought struck me. I had a large, full
cloak, which, with all my other appointments, save those he took,
the landlord had spared. I dressed immediately; drew on my
boots over my fair white drawers, not unlike small clothes; put
on my cravat, vest, and coat; laid a travelling cap from my
trunk, jauntily over my forehead, and flinging my fine long
mantle
gracefully about me, made my way through the hall into the
street.
Attracted by shining lamps in the portico of a new hotel, a
few squares from my first lodgings, I entered, recorded
some
name on the books, and bespoke a bed. Everything was fresh
and neat; every servant attentive; all augured well. I kept
myself closely cloaked; puffed a cigar, and retired to bed, to
mature my plot.
`
Waiter,
just brush my clothes, well, my fine fellow,' said I,
in the morning, as he entered my room. `Mind the pantaloons;
don't spill anything from the pockets; there is money in both.'
`I don't see
no
pantaloons.'
`The devil you don't! Where are they?'
`Can't tell, I'm sure: I don't know, s'elp me
God
.'
`Go down, Sirrah, and tell your master to come up here
immediately
.'
The publican was with me in a moment.
I had arisen and worked my face before the glass into a
fiendish
look of passion. `Landlord!' exclaimed I, with a fierce
gesture, `I have been robbed in your house; robbed, Sir, robbed!
My pantaloons, and a purse containing three fifty dollar-notes,
are gone. This is a pretty hotel! Is
this
the way that you
fulfil
the injunctions of Scripture? I am a stranger, and I find
myself
taken in,
with a vengeance. I will expose you at once, if I
am not recompensed.'
`Pray keep your temper,' said the agitated publican. `I have
just opened this house, and it is getting a good run: would you
ruin its reputation,
for an accident? I will find out the villain
who has robbed you, and I will send for a tailor to measure you
for your missing garment. Your money shall be refunded. Do
you not see that your anger is useless?'
`My dear Sir,' I replied, `I thank you for your kindness. I
did not mean to reproach you. If those trowsers can be done
to-day, I shall be satisfied; for time is more precious to me than
money. You may keep the others if you find them, and in
exchange
for the one hundred and fifty dollars which you give me,
their contents are yours.
The next evening, with new inexpressibles, and one hundred
and forty dollars in my purse, I called on my guardian in
Philadelphia
for sixty dollars. He gave it, with a lecture on
collegiate
desertion, that I shall not soon forget. I enclosed the money
back to my honorable landlord, by the first post, settled my other
bill at old Crusty's, the first publican, and got my trunk by mail.
I have now a superflux of thirty dollars; and when Tom
Edwards
returns, if I can find no other use for it, I will give it to
him, for the lesson he has taught me.
If this story has bored you, George, you must forgive it. It
is pleasanter to remember, being past, than it is to tell.
Cordially Thine,
Eugene Dallas
.
CONTEMPORARIES.
'
T is
a queer word. Where or how it first came into use, the
memory of man scarce can tell. Political editors use it when
they wish to deal sly cuts at each other, without calling hard
names; and it is, in truth, one of the commonest little fragments
of parlance extant. How journalists would get on without it,
passes conjecture. This, with the phrase `some people,' and
`certain persons,' gives them ample room for oblique thrusts and
anonymous allusions. Verily, they have reason to bless the
word.
But it is not alone in the word itself that interest lodges. It
is an honor to be contemporary with the greatI mean the
fortunate
great, who happen to receive during their natural term of
life that reward and renown which are often left to fling a halo
about the tomb, and ring triumphant music in the dull ear of
death. Who among the young does not look with a kind of envy
upon the aged acquaintance that has seen General
Washington
,
and was a contemporary with him? I have a friend, now
just in the best part of manhood, who loves to tell how he met
the Father of his Country, when Congress sat in Philadelphia.
The lad was playing in the State House Square, with some young
companions, while Washington passed along. `There's the
Commander
in Chief,' said a dozen voices. All the little company
ran to meet him. A storm was approaching; and my friend,
drawing near to Washington, offered him an umbrella. Several
others did the same. `No, my dear lads,' said the Pater Patri,
`keep your umbrellas for yourselves; I have been in many
storms, and can endure them.' There is not a lad, present at
that time, who does not recall the circumstance with pleasure,
and feel a delight in saying, `Washington was my
contemporary
!'
There is something in the grave, which hallows the goodness,
as it buries the foibles, of its tenant. The form which wastes
away within its precincts, has ceased to move and to be.
Perhaps
it had numerous enemies; perhaps some imperious spirit
agitated that mouldering heart, and fired that busy brain. But
death smote them, and that form was no more the object of
disesteem
,
or the nucleus of envious fancies.
Post mortem cessat
invidia
. No longer contemporary, the vices and the goodness of
the common departed, become, the one softened, the other
enlarged
,
to the imagination. Above, the sun rolls round upon his
circuit, in his chariot of gold; the winds dispense abroad the
music
of streams and the breath of flowers; contemporaries hear and
inhale them; but One has gone. He enjoys them no more. He
has travelled along the twilight vale of his decline, and is lost from
among the living.
I have often thought, when looking at some patriotic spectacle
at the theatres, on a Fourth of July evening; when the
apothesis
of our Great Departed has been pictured forth, accompanied
with solemn and mournful music, ending at last in triumphant
harmony; I have thought, I say, what a sensation would be
produced
,
were the men thus honored to enter the theatre in the
flesh, clothed, and with bones and sinews! Awe and wonder
would possess the multitude. Women would faint; and men,
iron-hearted men, would weep for very enthusiasm. But let the
wonder cease; let the re-appearance of these great men be
accounted
for on some rational principle, supposing that possible,
and those restored patriots,
being contemporary,
would soon be
talked of with the same freedom that has ever distinguished and
yet distinguishes the political contests of this nation; a freedom,
from which even the character of Washington, spotless as it was,
could not always be sacred.
The farther we go into the past, the greater is our wonder at
any thing which brings those olden ages near. Thus a
mummy,
preserved for dozens of centuries, is truly a marvellous object.
We look upon the antiquated face, once fanned by the airs of
Egypt; on the closed lids that perhaps opened to greet the
sunlight
as it poured its matin influence on the harmonious Memnon;
on the hands that may have woven the broidered sails of Tyrus,
or waved some signal of applause to Ptolemy or Cleopatra. A
British Poet has indulged in some beautiful reflections on this
subject
,
suggested by seeing one of these Ancient of Days in the
exhibition
of Belzoni, at London. They are in the form of an
address
to the mummy:
I need
not ask thee if that hand, when arm'd,
Has any Roman soldier mauled and knuckled,
For thou wert dead, and buried, and embalmed,
Ere Romulus and Remus had been suckled:
Antiquity appears to have begun
Long after thy primeval race was run.
Since first thy form was in this box extended,
We above ground have seen some strange mutations;
The Roman empire has begun and ended,
New worlds have risen, we have lost old nations;
And countless kings have into dust been humbled,
While not a fragment of thy flesh has crumbled.
Didst thou not hear the pother o'er thy head,
When the great Persian conqueror, Cambyses,
March'd armies o'er thy tomb, with thundering tread,
O'erthrew Osiris, Opus, Apis, Isis,
And shook the Pyramids with fear and wonder,
When the gigantic Memnon fell asunder?
If the tomb's secrets may not be confessed,
The nature of thy private life unfold;
A heart has throbbed beneath that leathern vest,
And tears adown that dusky cheek have rolled;
Have children climb'd those knees, and kissed that face?
What was thy name and station, age, and race?
Statue of fleshimmortal of the dead!
Imperishable type of evanescence!
Posthumous man, who quit'st thy narrow bed,
And standest undecayed within our presence,
Thou wilt hear nothing till the judgment morning,
When the great trump shall thrill thee with its warning!
Distance, which in space belittles objects, in time enlarges
them. That which time spares, it hallows or curses. It bears
to after ages the brightness of a mighty reputation, or it adds
fresh grimness to `a wounded name.' Its plaudits and its
anathemas
are alike enduring; and that which, when contemporary,
was not deemed especially worthy of either, has its claims
strengthened in the lapse of years.
Contemporaries! Could any one go back into bodily presence,
as we may in mind, among the great beings of the pastgreat
for good or evilhow common-place would seem to him the
thousand objects which history, and those deeds that ages
sanctify
,
and fate, preserve immortal! That traveller into antiquity
might sport with Anthony in his voyages, with the dark eyes of
`his Egypt' darting their liquid lustre, and witness the mighty
littleness of the loving Roman; he could stray with the
philosophers
through the groves of Athens; find Aristotle writing hymns
to please his sense, and gratify the master of a concubine,
notwithstanding
his ethics that sense was non-essential to happiness;
he might see Tiberius fight with an oysterman, or hear Nero fiddle.
Coming slowly down the vista of years, he might hear
Shakspeare
play at the Globe Theatre, in London, or enjoy his early
and ample fortune at Avon; he might play with Goldsmith, dine
with Milton, at Mr. Russell's the tailor's; or laugh at Thomson
as he sat on the fence of his rural retreat, with his hands in his
pockets, eating out the blushing and sunny sides of peaches in
his garden, that he was too lazy to pick! This traveller, too,
might see what were the
real
knights of chivalry, about whom so
much is prated in these degenerate days. He would find them
hoisterous, revengeful, bilious and dishonest fellows; vulgar in
attire, awkward in harness, covered with salve-patches on their
arms and legs, where they were galled with their iron mail, and
leaving their scores at the blacksmith's shops unpaid, all the way
from France and Britain, even to the Holy Land. Alas! how
much of romance fades away in that one word, contemporary!
It is ratsbane to the imagination; it is a green shade over the
eagle eye of Genius!
For heroes whose lives are passed at the head of armies, amid
`the stir of camps and the revelries of garrisons;' who are from
year to year the observed of all observers; for them, there is the
reward of their own era. Such men enjoy during their own
mortal
span a kind of antepast of that renown which settles after
death upon their name. But they pay heavily for their glory, by
the responsibility and peril in which they exist. Failure even in
judgment would be ignominy; multitudes of restless spirits are to
be guided and kept subordinate by their power, kindness, and
skill; and what with one object and another to harass and
distress
them, their lives are passed upon the rack, and they pay
dearly enough for that two-penny whistle,
posthumous fame
. It
is only by the bustle and turmoil in which they live, that they
receive
more passing applause than the quiet civilian, whose works
and merits, after his departure, add radiance to his name.
I have said that, to be a contemporary, is to be
belittled
. The
remark is true, indubitably. I might prove it by a thousand
instances
,
but I will content myself with a very few. Homer was
called by Aristarchus, a vain, foolish fellow, who fancied he
could make poetry, and under that delusion had produced his
stupid
Iliad,
whose speedy transit to oblivion was confidently
predicted. Now his fame fills the world. When Milton's
Paradise
Lost appeared, a contemporary critic condemned it as trash;
and it sold for fifteen pounds. Now it is immortal. Every body
will acknowledge that Shakspeare was a poet whose works are
imperishable; whose observation was unfailing; who looked
through
Nature; whose pathos and humor are irresistible; who
was, in short, at once sublime, yet simple and delicate; touching
and witty, deep and playful. He was such a man as centuries
do not match or approach. And how would these eulogistic
words have been received in his time? As downright hyperbole.
He was probably looked upon in pretty much the same light as
Sheridan Knowles, that fine poet of humanity, is now viewed in
London; namely, as a man who wrote plays, and acted parts in
them. The majority of the common people undoubtedly
esteemed
him `no great
shakes
.' I find in the chronicle of a quaint
historian of Shakspeare and Queen Elizabeth's time, the
following
venerable sketch, which shows that the Swan of Avon stood
but indifferent well: `Our modern and present excellent poets
which worthily in their owne workes, and alle of them in my owne
knowledge lived in this Queene's
*
*
Elizabeth.
reigne,
according to their
priorities
,
as neere as I could, I have orderly sette downe, (viz.)
George Gascoigne, Esquire, Thomas
Church-yard,
Esquire,
Edward
Dyer, Knight, Edmond Spenser, Esquire, Sir Philip
Sidney
,
Knight, Sir Thomas Chaloner, Knight; Sir Francis Bacon,
Knight, and Sir John Davie, Knight; Master John Lillie,
gentleman
,
Master George Chapman, gentleman, Master William
Warner, gentleman,
Mast. Wil. Shaks-peare, gent.;
Samuel
Davie of the Bath, Master Christopher Marlo, gent.; Master
Benjamin Jonson,
gent.; John Marston, esquire; Master Abm.
Francis, gent.; Francis Meers, gent.; Master Joshua Sylvester,
gent.; Master Thomas Decker, gent.; John Mecher, gent.; John
Webster, gent.; Thomas Haywood, gent.; Thomas Middleton,
gent.; and George Withers.'
Now of all the poets, here `orderly sette downe,
according to
their priorities,
' how few survive! We have a host of knights
and esquires, of whom, with a few exceptions, nothing is known:
and
after
Masters Chapman and Billy Warner, we have `Mast.
Wil. Shaks-peare!' Of his fellow-bards, with some omissions,
what have we heard? What of Chaloner, Davie, Lillie,
Webster
,
Meers, Sylvester, and Thomas
Church-yard,
eke? We can
only fancy the latter a melancholy writer, but darkness covers
nearly all the rest. Doubtless Shakspeare conceived himself
inferior
to all those whose names here precede his; and therein,
(with the exclusion of his king and queen, and a few choice,
learned spirits, who knew his surpassing power,) he probably
coincided
with the general impression of his merits. Such is the
judgment of `contemporaries!'
LEAVES FROM AN ARONAUT.
`
But
in Man's dwellings, he became a thing,
Restless, and worn, and stern, and wearisome;
Droop'd as a wild-born falcon, with clipt wing,
To whom
the boundless air
alone were home.'
Byron
.
I have
realized one of the dreams of my youth, and gratified
the strongest aspirations that ever agitated my manhood. I look
back with a kind of intoxicating bewilderment upon the perils I
have encountered, and the fears I have subdued; for, to me, the
memory of excitement is excitement still.
My early days were passed in a village in the country. I first
opened my eyes to the light, near the banks of the Hudson; and
my juvenile hours were full of the most flighty visions. I always
had a very arial imagination. Anything in
motion
always had
for me a peculiar charm. I shall never forget the delight I
experienced
in seeing the doves fly from their shelter in the end of
my father's carriage-house. They would alight, and poise
themselves
for a moment on the eaves, turn their bright necks in the
sunlight, pour forth a few reedy murmurs, and then launch out
upon the bosom of the air. Often, in the fulness of youthful
desire
,
have I felt ready to say:
`Oh, for thy wings! thou dove,
Now sailing by, with sunshine on thy breast,
Thou thing of joy and love,
That I might soar away, and be at rest!'
My school-bench commanded a view of a long and distant
range of the Kaatskills, lifting their tall summits aloft, `and
printing
their bold outlines against the sky.' How did I love to watch
the evening clouds as they drave before the summer gale, along
those gigantic tumuli of blue, in throngs of gold and purple,
magnificent
waftage, of rack undislimned! My ardent fancy
peopled
them with fairy inhabitants. Sometimes, castles and cities
seemed rising from them, groves nodded in beauty, and
sometimes
there would seem to spring up from their midst a mighty
rock `o'erhanging as it rose, impossible to climb.' I used to
think how those misty peaks of cloud could be surmounted, and
was wont to muse and dream over my shut arithmetic, until I
thought myself among them.
With my years, this soaring passion increased within me. I
constructed large paper-kites, and sent them out of sight, at the
end of some thousand yards of twine, procured by the outlay of
every cent of my pocket-money for holidays. My heart bounded
with every move of those bird-like objects. Finally, I
constructed
one of linen, nearly six feet long; and, considering the shape
of a kite, proportionably wide. I had conceived the idea of
sending
up a
cat
at the end of it, suspended a few feet from the paper
tail. One gusty afternoon in autumn, I attempted the enterprise.
Taking the kite on the terrace of my father's house, with the cat
tied to a chair, I arranged my large spindle of almost
interminable
twine, and perfected my arrangements. I secured the
affectionate
old grimalkin to the cord, and attached it to the kite, which
I had much ado to hold steadily in my hand, for the violence of
the gale. Swinging the affair over the balustrade, I let the
small windlass slowly unroll with my left hand, while with my
right I held the cat by the soft velvet strap which I had tied
around her body, just behind her fore-legs.
The kite was now moving slowly upward, and puss was
purring most cordially, `her custom always of an afternoon.'
As soon as the kite rose above the garden trees, it felt the full
press of the wind, and rushed upward like an arrow. At this
juncture, my venerable tabby was lifted from the chair where she
stood in unsuspecting quietude, and went dangling off,
zenith-ward
.
As I heard her hysterical
yowlings
grow fainter and fainter,
and saw her feline corporation fading into indistinctness on the
edge of a cloud, I came to the conclusion that I had performed
one of the greatest achievements ever consummated by man. That
curious, Yankee-like Ancient, who stumped about, crying
Eureka
!
on making his great discovery, could not have enjoyed
himself
more, in that paroxysm of rapture, than I did when I heard
and saw that old puss squalling her way into ether. When the
twine had completely unrolled, she was entirely out of sight,
among the clouds. I tied my string to the balustrade, and let
the poor old quadruped remain
in nubibus,
by the space of three
hours, when I wound her down, wet and shivering. Her large
green eyes were dilated with fear, and their sockets looked as if
they would soon have had, to use a boarding-school phrase, `a
vacancy for pupils.'
But this adventure did not satisfy my ambition, I wished to
be,
personally,
in the air. The blue fields above me looked ever
to my eye, like the abodes of beauty and peace. One afternoon,
about this period, I gave notice to my school-mates, that I would
treat them to a specimen of `the art of sinking,' from the roof of
the village academy, a stone edifice, five stories high. Choosing
a breezy day, and having each hand occupied with a large
umbrella
,
made for the occasion, I stalked gingerly out of the
dormer
window of the cupola, and walking to the end of the roof,
looked down upon a whole green-full of spectators. I had
experimented
,
previously, as an
amatcur,
from divers heights, without
injury. Getting a little dizzy, I opened my umbrellas, and made
the spring. I descended with a decent slowness at first, but the
operation of gravity upon me, after I passed the second story,
was too strong for breath, or comfort. I struck the ground with
force enough to cut my tongue desperately between my teeth, (for
I suppose I was about to say something in the ejaculative way,)
and to be jarred into a state of feeling like that of a glass of jelly,
allowing that article to have the capacity of sensation. I rose to
my feet, laughing as if the exploit were a fine one, and I
delighted
;
but at the same time, with my mouth full of blood.
The memory of this feat was only a stimulant to the
prosecution
of others. But science now began to lend her influence and
aid to my longings. One part of my academical studies was
chemistry. I listened to the lectures of the Principal with a
pleasurable wonder, which I can not describe. The best
portions
of the course were the evenings set apart for
experiments
.
One circumstance tended to render them peculiarly attractive.
My heart, about this time, became touched with the living
fervors
of the tender passion. The object of my regard was a lovely
creature, only seventeen years of age. Sweet Sophia Howard!
She is one whom I remember as a perfect beauty, if one ever lived.
How richly the golden hair disparted on her calm forehead, and
lay in silken waves upon her rosy cheek! There was a light in
her clear, hazel eye, that used to fill me with a kind of dreamy
transport, which no time can annul.
In some of the lectures, the lights were extinguished, for the
purpose of showing the effects of phosphorus. On such
occasions
,
how great was the change of places among the
students
!
Every young lover hied to his mistress' side, for all the
refined young ladies of the village attended, and many were the
kisses exchanged in the darkness, then! With my Sophia near
me, I was supremely comfortable. We watched the marks and
letters of flame as they played on the wall, and heard the lecturer
talking in his obscurity, `but our hearts were otherwhere!' Ah,
good gracious! those were happy days! But I rhapsodise.
The study of chemistry interested me beyond any other. It
seems so
supernatural,
in many respects, to the half-initiated, that
it is very difficult to believe that an unearthly agency is not
exerted
,
in its results and combinations. It always reminded me
of the tales of wonder and enchantment, and the
diablerie
of
Faust, Monk Lewis, and other Satannic intellects. By degrees,
the study became to me a passion. What with that, and love, I
was well nigh distraught. Finally, after a good deal of thought
upon the subject, and a careful estimate of my chances of
prosperity
in any other pursuit, I resolved to become a chemist by
profession.
As soon as I had made up my mind, I came to the city to
continue
the study. I pressed forward in my career with unabated
ardor. In the course of my researches on the subject of gases,
I encountered some histories of
Aronauts
. They acted upon
my imagination as a spark of fire would on a nitrous train; they
kindled it into a blaze. With what enthusiasm did I pore over
the recorded experiments and doubts of Cavallo and the
Montgolfiers'
,
of Charles, and d'Arlandes! I resolved at some
future
time, and that not remote, to try
my
silken sphere in the sky,
and to live, in fame, with those bold adventurers of Paris and
Avignon.
This era of my life was one of unmingled enjoyment. My
charming Sophia passed her winters with her relations in town;
and our evenings were, of course, mutually shared. In her
society
,
music and beauty warmed me into rapture; and when the
summer called her and her gentle cousins of the city to her rural
home, I used to feel like a hermit. Then my thoughts would
revert to chemistry with increased earnestness. The goodness
of my father enabled me to surprise my friends with a superb
store, and I conducted it with brilliant and unexpected success.
Practical chemistry is a severe calling, and I was only a
superintendent
of my establishment. I had faithful and competent
subordinates for all the details, which left me nearly one half of
my time to spend at leisure, with men of science and letters.
The inspiration thus acquired, all tended to one point, my
ultimate
ascension. There was not a day in the year, in which the
thought of it was absent from my mind. Occasional notices of
ascensions abroad, which met my eye among the foreign
quotations
,
served only to fan the flame.
One bright morning in June, as I was passing along Maiden
Lane, I saw a piece of light-colored silk, at the door of a
fashionable
shop. I stepped up to examine it. The quality was of
uncommon excellence. It was light, but very firm. Here,
thought I, is the
materiel
for my balloon. I entered, asked the
price, and found that the shop-keeper had several pieces of
precisely
the same quality. I purchased them at once, and leaving
my address, walked home as if on air. I had made the primary
movement in my enterprise, and I felt that it would not be long,
ere I should cease to be one of the `undistinguished many.' I
was determined to make some sensation in the world; to rise
superior to that large number, each of whom is only famous for
counting one in a general census; but to preserve a strict
incognito
until the time arrived, when I should blaze upon the public
like a stray comet.
My intimacy with scientific gentlemen was of much service to
me; although I do not imagine that a close knowledge of men
and things will add much to one's self-confidence. My
acquaintance
with the science by which I expected to rise, was by no
means complete, and perhaps my limited attainments inspired me
with vigor to trample with a firm and resolute step upon every
obstacle that might interpose to prevent my flight. The mystery
of the aronaut was of no very remote introduction in the
country
;
and though I had witnessed one or two ascensions, and
conversed
with the aronauts, as to the details of their efforts, yet I
found myself unable properly to comprehend them. They were
of transatlantic origin, and after one or two voyages aloft,
generally
returned whence they came, each bearing with him the
marvellous
arostat,
that he had brought from foreign lands. Books,
therefore, and my own judgment, supplied my deficiency in
practical
knowledge, and my soaring resolution daily grew stronger
and stronger.
At this period, I surveyed the heavens by night and day, with
an intensity of interest.
There
swelled that broad blue theatre,
among whose cloudy curtains I was yet to rise; there, were the
empires of the imagination; from thence came light, enveloped
in heat; and there, was
the source of life
. There the sun `
looked
from his sole dominion like a God,' sowing the earth with his
vital smile; from that endless vault came the subtle, invisible, and
mystic fluid, which pervades the globe, ubiquitous in its
principle
,
resistless in its power. There, the tremulous stars sang
together
;
there, the Thunderer lifted his voice; there, the meteor
streamed its horrid hair; and from thence, the moon poured her
religious lustre on the earth, blending her rays with the sweet
influences
of Orion and the Pleiades, of Arcturus and his sons.
I never prided myself much on my weather-wisdom; and the
atmospherical phenomena or changes of the seasons seldom
occupied much of my attention. But now, as I meditated an
early voyage, I began to compare a few old almanacs together,
to ascertain the mildest part of the season. Whether the
comparison
was accidental or not, I am unable to tell; but I found
that the early days of September had been for many years
previous
,
remarkably clear and calm. Presuming on the
continuance
of such weather, I fixed upon the first part of that
approaching
month for my arial dbut. The sequel proved that my
ratiocination
was at fault. I looked for a day such as we
sometimes
experience after the fervors of the solstice, when the sky
appears palpable, and you can see the downy beard of the thistle,
gradually moving through its depths, as if empowered to make
its way, fast or slow, by inherent volition. But there is such a
thing as a premature equinox, and in dry weather all signs fail.
Not a week now passed, without finding me in the possession
of some new materials, all tending to the ultimate object. My
nights, instead of sleep, gave me visionary slumbers, fitful
passages
of repose, which made my waking hours seem like the
fragments of a dream. I felt like one rapt, inspired. I shunned
all company, I neglected my affectionate Sophia's correspondence
from the country. In fine, I was half demented, perhaps a
monolithiac
,
a fool on one point. But there was method in my mood.
I had a determinate purpose in my mind, where every energy
centered.
About a month before the time, I sent a confidential notice to
an editor of one of the journals, requesting him to observe in his
original department, that, early in September, a young American
would make his first ascension in a balloon from Castle Garden,
and that due information would be given of the day on which the
event would take place. The article appeared, and went the
rounds. I immediately sent a paper, and wrote to Sophia Howard
and her brother, giving her the intelligence that the aronaut was
a friend of hers, whom we both knew, and requesting the brother
to accompany the family to the city in the steamboat, on the
Saturday evening previous to the ascension, the time of which I
promised to communicate as soon as definitely known. I had
the satisfaction of receiving a compliance with my request, and a
thousand questions from Sophia, concerning `the intrepid young
gentleman, who was about to leave the world in so singular a
manner.'
I kept my secret, and perfected my arrangements. Long
before
the day selected for my enterprise, my balloon was made,
and folded, according to the forms I had seen; the netting, iron,
oil of vitriol, barometer, vessels, all the apparatus, prepared;
even the ice was engaged, with which the conductors were to be
cooled. I had proceeded with the utmost caution; and the
proximity of the wished-for yet dreaded time occupied almost
every thought. Gas and love divided my intellect between them.
My scientific confederates were all sworn to be
mum
about my
name; the newspapers announced the day, and `keen the
wonder
grew.'
21
At the time specified, my friends came. The expected
voyage
was then a town's talk, and I had much ado to keep my
counsel from Sophia. An evening or two after her arrival, on
visiting her with my accustomed punctuality, I found her
beautiful
eyes filled with tears. I asked the cause. She handed me
one of the evening journals. It announced
my name
as that of
the aronaut who was about to make his perilous venture.
Sophia
implored
me to say that it was erroneous, and thus remove
her misery.
For a moment I was utterly unmanned. The tears of a lovely
being, who had never before met me but with a smile, and whom
I adored so tenderly, were too much for me. I hesitated a little:
but
Truth
was my counseller: I knew that some of my
confidants
must have
`blabbed,'
and I owned that the statement was
veritable.
I will not describe the scene that ensued. Had not my
unusual
eloquence succeeded in explaining to her the comparative
safety of the attempt, and in soothing her fears, I would have
flung a thousand balloons to the wind, rather than wound that
gentle heart. But Sophia Howard had a yielding spirit. When
she found that my whole soul was bent on the effort, when I
showed her the reputation and advantages it might give me, she
grew calm with a `sweet reluctant delay,' that endeared her to
me more than ever.
At last came on the evening previous to
the
day. As I
walked
among the busy throngs of Broadway, heard my name uttered
by hundreds, and caught occasional views of the rich scenery
across the Hudson, where twilight was then faintly blushing, I
could not help asking myself,
`Where shall I be at this time
to-morrow
?'
Perhaps, a lifeless corse in the ocean, or perchance
dashed upon some rocky crag, or blasted by some dreadful
explosion
!'
But my mind was made up, and I drave the
forebodings
from my brain. I spent a
holy,
melancholy evening with my
beloved, and our adieu was like that of friends who part to meet
no more.
That night I could not sleep. Perturbed by a multitude of
thoughts, I tossed upon my couch in restless longings. At last,
I slumbered, and dreamed.
Methought I embarked in my balloon to cross the ocean. I
cut the ideal cord, and set forth in my imaginary car. Day after
day, to my fancy, I rode on the posting winds, far above the
long green swells of the Atlantic. At last, I made the coast of
England, and sailed among the clouds to London. Here,
methought
,
news had been received of my approach, and an escort
of several pilot-balloons came out to meet me. I found a
committee
of both Houses of Parliament, with the Lord Mayor, on
the broad, flat-roof of St. Paul's, ready for my reception. They
offered me the hospitalities of the city. How fantastic is a
dream! I declined the honor, and pushed on to Windsor.
There I stopped for a moment, fastened my balloon to the
terrace
,
and took a glass of wine with the king, who I thought was
walking on the terrace, in his
robe de chambre,
and eke his
night-cap
.
He gave me a passport to France. I shook his royal
hand, borrowed some pigtail tobacco of him, and sailed away. I
reached France soon after. Passing over the heights of
Montmartre
,
I looked down upon the capital. I seemed to
know
the
city; and when I arrived over the Place Vendome, I was made
to look up, by some irresistible monition, and lo! my balloon
had changed to the semblance of a horn! a long, bright trumpet
of silk, the little end towards the earth, and from it, by a mere
thread, was my car suspended! All at once, the thread parted.
I went down, down, in a way that one can only sink in dreams.
I
saw
my head strike against the statue of Napoleon, and fall
separate from my body to the earth. I
observed
the jabbering
crowd picking up my limbs, (these are
sights
for dreams only!)
and then I awoke.
The
morning sun was shining in my window. I dressed
instantly
.
My dream seemed to indicate that I should at any rate
have an extensive sail, though the close omened that I should
come out at last from the little end of the horn. `Never mind,'
said I, `that last part was dreamed in the morning; and there is
an adage, that `morning dreams always go by contraries.' This
satisfied my superstition, and I took my slender breakfast in
cheerfulness and hope.
I had scarcely finished this hasty meal, when my apartment
was entered by a meagre-looking gentleman, who seemed
nervous
and agitated. I inquired his pleasure. He answered me
with a marked French accent. `My dear Sir,' said he, `you are
not acquainted with me, but I have taken the liberty to come and
try to dissuade you from your voyage this day. I have never
seen but one balloon ascension, and God forbid that I should
ever see another. It was that of M. Romain, and Pilatre de
Rozier, in '85. I saw them rise from the shore of France, to
cross to the English side; as their double balloons ascended
among the clouds over the waves, I saw the flames burst forth in
the lower globe; I saw the fierce blaze flashing aloft, and the
daring aronauts precipitated from on high, mangled by the fiery
gas, and swept to death by that arial power which they had
fondly hoped would give them fame! Horrid remembrance!
My dear friend, can I persuade you not to go?'
I was touched with this abrupt evidence of friendship; but I
argued with the adviser, that important discoveries had since
been made in the science; that my gas would be cool, and no
embers be placed near the arostat, as there was with that of
Rozier
and Romain. My determination, I added, was inflexible.
The gentleman smiled reluctantly, and bowed himself out as
suddenly
as he entered, leaving me surprised at the quickness and
singularity of the interview.
I now consulted my barometer. It had risen during the night,
but there were flying clouds in the sky, and they drifted along
with a rapidity which betokened a strong wind. I found,
however
,
on opening my window, that it was light but summer-like.
The barometer could not be doubted, and my hopes were
assured
.
I was now delayed for hours with men from the amphitheatre
at the garden, wishing my directions. I gave them like a general
commanding his legions. One I ordered to the sail-maker's, for
canvass to spread the balloon on; one to the cooper's, for extra
casks: one to one place, one to another. I issued my ukase
that no particle of iron, or any sharp, hard substance be left on
the ground about the canvass; that the policemen should be on
the ground, tickets sent to editors, and arranged every thing with
a promptitude that has since astonished me. I then retired to
my room, and dressed in a plain suit of
American
cloth, for the
occasion, had my chin new reaped by a dainty barber, and sallied
into the street.
It was now about twelve o'clock. I called for a moment on
the Howards, to inform them that one of the best seats had been
reserved for their use, and that an attendant would be at the gate,
to conduct them to it. This, to me,
first
duty arranged, I
walked
slowly down Broadway to the Garden. As general a turning
of heads occurred among the most of those I met, as if I had
been the sea-serpent. There was excitement in this. I felt like
a monarch.
I found the garden by no means empty, even at that early hour;
and around about the scene, were premature groups of curious
sailors, country urchins, and Fly-market loafers, looking up at
the flags, and other popular furniture, that fluttered above. I
examined every thing connected with the apparatus most strictly.
Minutes seemed hours. At length, the cannon, booming over
the bay, and startling the distant shores and heights, announced
the opening of the gates, and the commencement of the process
of inflation. Throngs of well-dressed citizens, ladies and
gentlemen
,
began to arrive. The empty benches became fewer and
fewer; and there was a bustle around me, which filled me with
impatience. My natural timidity was lost in the consciousness
that my preparations were perfect, and an assurance that I should
perform what I had promised. The wind had lulled, the clouds
dispersed from overhead, though a few bright-edged ones still lay
along the west.
The attendants now opened the carboys of oil of vitriol, some
of which they poured into large jars: these were emptied into
capacious hogsheads, where three thousand pounds of iron, and
some thousand gallons of water had already been placed. The
chemical compound was complete; the noise proceeding from
the casks, proved the powerful action of the agitated acid on the
iron. The water was fast decomposing, the gas rushed through
the tubes to the condenser, and thence poured in volumes into
the balloon, which now arose from the canvass, gradually
distending
into a globular form, and quivering like a thing of life, in
impatient
bondage. Finally, it was permitted to rise a few feet, for
the proper arrangement of the delicate cord-work, by which it
was encompassed. I now experienced a strong feeling of
pleasure
,
when I heard the loud cheering which attended the letting
off of the little pilot balloon. It passed to the east of the city,
and describing a vast semicircle over the north part of the town,
floated, at last, away to the west, beyond the wind-mills of
Jersey
city, toward the town of Newark. There was a kind of
pleasing bewilderment in being thus the focus of ten thousand
eyes, in the bursts of national music, and the encouragement of
so many hearts. I felt it all. It surpassed every previous
experience
of
condensed
excitement.
Only twenty minutes now remained before the hour of
ascension
.
`The time of my departure was at hand,' and I was
`ready to be offered.' Every thing requisite had been placed in
my fairy gondola; my pigeon, the poetry, in hand-bills, for the
occasion; the tissue-paper, flags, ballast, all. Every moment
seemed an hour. I did not trust myself to look often at the seat
where Sophia, and all my nearest relations, were seated; for I
feared that they might disconcert me. Observing a broken
carboy
of oil of vitriol lying carelessly by the passage through which
the balloon with its netting had been brought, I ordered it instantly
removed. The amphitheatre was now filled; the Battery trees
`bore men;' the bay was crowded with craft of all sorts, and
every eminence in the neighborhood was clothed with clusters of
human beings.
My gay wicker-car was now attached, with the minutest care,
to the long cords that depended from the buoyant globe above.
I was looking at my watch, observing that the time of twenty had
dwindled to eight minutes, when I heard the cry of `Fire!' I
sprang toward the arostat, as if a bullet had perforated my heart.
`Where?' said I. `There, in the balloon!' was the answer.
Looking upward, I perceived that the netting had become
entangled
with the valve, which ever and anon flew open, as the
wind surged against the balloon, and the gas, mixed with vapor,
issued from the aperture, resembling smoke. The netting was
soon disengaged; and the valve, closed and held by its stout
springs, remained firm in its place.
My hour had now come, and I entered the car. With a
singular taste, the band struck up at this moment the melting
air of `Sweet Home.' It almost overcame me. A thousand
associations
of youth, friends, of all that I must leave, rushed upon
my mind. But like Dashall in the play, I had no leisure for
sentiment. A buzz ran through the assemblage; unnumbered
hands were clapping, unnumbered hearts beating high; and
I
was the cause. Every eye was upon me. There was pride in
the thought.
`Let go!' was the word. The cheers redoubled,
handkerchiefs
waved from many a fair hand, bright faces beamed from
every window, and on every side. My last look was toward
Sophia. She was pale, and her lips parted `like monument of
Grecian art.' Her white fingers touched them, as I cut the
cord. One dash with my knife, and I rose aloft, a habitant of air.
How magnificent was the sight which now burst upon me!
How sublime were my sensations! I waved the flag of my
country; the cheers of the multitude from a thousand house-tops
reached me on the breeze; and a taste of the rarer atmosphere
elevated my spirits into ecstacy. The city, with a brilliant
sunshine
striking the spires and domes, now unfolded to view, a
sight incomparably beautiful. My gondola went easily upward,
clearing the depths of heaven, like a vital thing. A diagram
placed before you, on the table, could not permit you to trace
more definitely than I now could, the streets, the highways,
basins
,
wharves, and squares of the town. The theatres and public
buildings, I recognised from their location near parks or open
grounds, and from the peculiarity of their being covered with
various
metals, as well as slate, or tiles. The hum of the city
arose to my ear, as from a vast bee-hive; and I seemed the
monarch-bee, directing the swarm. I heard the rattling of
carriages
,
the hearty yo-heave-o! of sailors from the docks that,
begirt
with spars, hemmed the city round: I was a spectator of all,
yet aloof, and alone. Increasing stillness attended my way;
and at last the murmurs of earth came to my ear like the last
vibrations
of a bell.
My car tilted and trembled, as I rose. A swift wind
sometimes
gave the ballon a rotary motion, which made me deathly
sick for a moment; but strong emotion conquered all my
physical
ailings. My brain ached with the intensity of my rapture.
Human sounds had fainted from my ear. I was in the abyss of
heaven, and
alone
with my
God
. I could tell my direction by
the sun on my left; and as his rays played on the arostat, it
seemed only a bright bubble, wavering in the sky, and I a
suspended
mote, hung by chance to its train. Looking below me,
the distant Sound and Long-Island appeared to the east; the bay
lay to the south, sprinkled with shipping; under me the city,
girded with bright rivers and sparry forests; the free wind was
on my cheek and in my locks; afar, the ocean rolled its long blue
waves, chequered with masses of shadow, and gushes of ruby
sunlight; to the north and west the interminable land, variegated
like a map, dotted with purple, and green, and silver, faded to
to the eye.
The atmosphere which I now breathed seemed to dilate my
heart at every breath. I uttered some audible expression. My
voice was weaker than the faintest sound of a reed. There was
no object near to make it reverb or echo. Though rising with
incredible swiftness, I had nothing to convince my eye that I was
not nearly still. The weak flap-flap flap, of the cords against the
balloon, in regular motion, as the trembling arostat, moved by
its subtle contents, continued to rise, was all that indicated my
tendency. My barometer now denoted an immense height; and
as I looked upward and around, the concave above seemed like
a mighty waste of purple air, verging to blackness. Below, it
was lighter; but a long, lurid bar of cloud stretched along the
west, temporarily excluding the sun. The shadows rushed afar
into the void, and a solemn, Sabbath-twilight, reigned around. I
was now startled at a fluttering in my gondola. It was my
compagnon
du voyage,
the carrier pigeon. I had forgotten him
entirely
.
I attached a string to his neck, with a label, announcing
my height, then nearly four miles, and the state of the barometer.
As he sat on the side of the car, and turned his tender eyes upon
me in mute supplication, every feather shivering with
apprehension
,
I felt that it was a guilty act to push him into the waste
beneath
.
But it was done; he attempted to rise, but I out-sped
him; he then fell obliquely, fluttering and moaning, till I lost him
in the haze.
My greatest altitude had not yet been reached. I was now
five miles from terra-firma. I began to breathe with difficulty.
The atmosphere was too rare for safe perspiration. I pulled my
valve-cord to descend. It refused to obey my hand. For a
moment I was horror-struck. What was to be done? If I
ascended
much higher, the balloon would explode. I threw over
some tissue paper to test my progress. It is well known that
this will
rise
very swiftly. It
fell,
as if blown downward, by a
wind from the zenith. I was going upward like an arrow. I
attempted
to pray, but my parched lips could not move. I seized
the cord again, with desperate energy. Blessed heaven! it
moved. I threw out more tissue. It rose to me like a wing of
joy. I was descending. Though far from sunset, it was now
dark about me, except a track of blood-red haze, in the direction
of the sun. I encountered a strong current of wind; mist was
about me; it lay like dew upon my coat. At last, a thick bar
of vapor being past, what a scene was disclosed! A storm was
sweeping through the sky, nearly a mile beneath, and I looked
down upon
an ocean of rainbows,
rolling in indescribable
grandeur
,
to the music of the thunder-peal, as it moaned afar and
near, on the coming and dying wind. A frightened eagle had
ascended through the tempest, and sailed for minutes by my side,
looking at me with panting weariness, and quivering mandibles,
but with a dilated eye, whose keen iris flashed unsubdued.
Proud emblem of my Country! As he fanned me with his
heavy wings, and looked with a human intelligence at the car,
my pulse bounded with exulting rapture. Like the genius
of my native land, he had risen above every storm, unfettered and
free!
But my transports were soon at an end. He attempted
to light on the balloon, and my heart sunk; I feared his huge
claws would tear the silk. I pulled my cord; he rose, as I sank,
and the blast swept him from my view in a moment. A flock of
wild fowl, beat by the storm, were coursing below, on bewildered
pinions, and as I was nearing them, I knew I was descending. A
singular effect was now produced by my position. It was a
double
horizon,
one formed by the outer edge of the upper cloud, and
the other by the angle of the eye to the extreme strata of the
storm over the earth. A breaking rift now admitted the sun.
The rainbows tossed and gleamed; chains of fleecy rack, shining
in prismatic rays of gold, and purple, and emerald, `beautiful
exceedingly,' spread on every hand. Vast curtains of cloud
pavilioned the immensity, brighter than celestial roses, or `jasper,
bdellium, or the ruby stone,' glittered around; masses of mist
were lifted on high, like steps of living fire, more radiant than
the sun himself, when his glorious noontide culminates from the
equator. A kind of arial Euroclydon now smote my ear; and
three of the cords parted, which tilted my gondola to the side,
filling me with terror. I caught the broken cords in my hand,
but could not tie them. They had been dragged over the broken
carboy of oil of vitriol, of which I have spoken, and had rotted
asunder.
The storm below was now rapidly passing away, and beneath
its waving outline, to the southeast, I saw the ocean. Ships
were speeding on their course, and their bright sails melting into
distance: a rainbow hung afar, and the rolling anthems of the
Atlantic came like celestial hymnings to my ear.
Presently, all was clear below me. The fresh air played
around. I had taken a noble circuit, and my last view was better
than the first. I was far over the bay, `afloating sweetly to the
west.' The city, colored by the last blaze of day, brightened
remotely to the view. Below, ships were hastening to and fro
through the narrows; and the far country lay smiling like an
Eden. Bright rivers ran like ribands of gold and silver, till they
were lost in the vast inland, stretching beyond the view; the
gilded mountains were flinging their purple shadows over many a
vale; bays were blushing to the farewell day-beams; and now I
was passing over a green island. I sailed to the main land;
saw the tall old trees waving to the evening breeze; heard the
rural lowing of herds; heard the welcome sound of human
voices; and finally, sweeping over forest tops and embowered
villages, at last descended with the sun, among a kind-hearted,
surprised, and hospitable community, in as pretty a town as one
could desire to see, `safe and well.'
If
I have told too long a yarn for so short a voyage, I crave
the reader's mercy. My feat has not diminished the number of
my friends, and nothing could increase Sophia Howard's love.
She is now mine; and when she wishes to amuse
our
little
Sophia
,
as some childish casualty bids her weep, she takes her on
her knee, and tells her `about Pa's voyage in the sky,' until,
`Throned on her mother's lap, she dries each tear,
As the sweet legend falls upon her ear.'
THE STONE-FLINGER OF CAMPEACHY.
(EL PEDRERO CAMPECHANO.)
Whoever
has been at Campeachy within the last twenty-five
years, has probably seen, and must remember, a fellow of curious
look and gait, wandering to and fro through the streets of the
city. His nether garments have never been considered
remarkable
for their cleanliness or beauty; his tattered
sombrero de
paja
hangs ever slouchingly over his cunning and restless eyes;
and he is evermore to be seen poking his intrusive nose into
other people's business; not
unblushingly,
it is true, for the
member of which I speak has always glowed and beamed as did
the `maintained salamander' of Bardolph, which Falstaff used as
a sort of lantern, to light him about from tavern to tavern; from
the Boar's Head, and its dependencies, to all the adjacent
taprooms
,
near and far, in London. I say most if not all people
who have seen Campeachy, will remember the nondescript of
whom I speak
El Pedrero Campechano,
or the
Stone-flinger,
of that ilk. He is a well-educated and accomplished loafer, the
very head of his tribe, having been brought up at the feet of
loafers from childhood. No adventure was ever too arduous for
his undertaking. He would pick a pocket, or thresh a friend's
enemy, for the same
quid pro quo,
and with equal good will.
He was eternally busy in the day time, about nothing; for the
moonlight evenings and the twilight hours were his only seasons
of pecuniary harvest. His eye was an unerring, unerratic orb,
in its wildest and most maudlin rollings; and for hire or from
caprice, he would take a stone in his right hand and send it to
the distance of a quarter-mile with arithmetical precision. He
could single out a man from a crowd, among thousands, and
consign
him to oblivion, without mistake or fear. In daylight, to
see him, you would think him the busiest man alive. He was
always to be observed running about the long wharf of the town,
with a memorandum-book and pencil in his hand, taking notes
of bales and boxes, as if he were the most anxious merchant in
the place, and had immense consiguments in his charge. Yet
he had not a copper, of any kind, unless it were some gratuity
for his scoundrel contests. No one ever understood better the
science of projectiles, or loved better the bottle and the glass.
Hence he inherited, by positive merit and common consent, the
soubriquet
of
Pepe Naranjo,
or
Pepe Botella,
in which he
rejoiced
.
In one of the drunken scrapes of Pepe Botella, he had the
misfortune to have his left side kicked into a palsy by an athletic
fellow with whom he was contending. He never but partially
recovered from the effects of this accident; and while he passed
along the street, the contrast between his sinister and dextral
members was particularly striking; one side being tottering and
rickety, the other strong and lusty. The strength of the palsied
portion of his body seemed only to have united itself with the
hearty department, greatly adding to the force thereof. The
offender, however, who produced this disaster, had reason to rue
the day when he used his foot so discourteously. He stood in
daily fear of his life; and was at last found one moonlight evening,
prostrate and dead in the street. A large stone lay near him,
covered with hair and clotted blood; his head was indented
with a hideous wound, and the place where he lay, stained with
the vital current. No one was seen in the neighborhood during
the evening; no words of strife were heard; and the whole
event was concealed in mystery.
El Pedrero
was observed to
look very knowingly and satisfied, when told of the occurrence,
and was even suspected of the act; but it was impossible to
produce
any satisfactory proof against him.
The reputation of Pepe as a stone-flinger at last became fully
established. He was even employed sometimes to avenge the
wrongs of others, which he would do for a very small `
consideration
.'
A glass of spiritous fluid would generally be deemed
by him a sufficient guerdon for almost any enterprise.
There
lived in Campeachy a licentious priest, named Juan
de Raduan, who had become exceedingly hateful to many of the
young men of the city, for his libertine propensities. Nothing
certain, however, could be adduced against him. Vague
suspicions
and rumors alone were afloat respecting his conduct, and
these at last gradually died away. The station of the
Padre;
the holy office he professed and filled, joined to the great
reverence
of the people for the priesthood; all served to keep him
secure, even if guilty, and to appear as it were in apothesis, if
innocent. The murmurs of suspicion being quelled, the holy
villain sought occasion, at an evening confessional, to pour into
the ear of a lovely damsel, one Isabella de Leon, the daughter
of a princely house, the enticing accents and proposals of the
basest passion. The affrighted girl fled from his presence in
disgust
,
communicated the secret to her brother, and besought him,
nay required of him, under the most solemn injunctions, that the
circumstance should be communicated to no one living. The
brother bit his pale lip, and swore obedience.
The
Semana Santa,
or holy week, was near. At last it
arrived
.
During this season, great solemnity prevails through the
town; plaintive tones roll from the aisles and belfries of the
cathedrals; the penitent wail in the streets, and count their beads
at every turn. Preaching is `done' in the public places; and
the clergy are as busy in their vocation, as the faculty of a
college
previous to commencement.
One evening, in early twilight, the Padre Raduan took his
station in an out-door pulpit, at the termination of the Barrio de
Guadaloupe, and La Punta de Diamanta, streets of the city
which form the two long angles of a triangle. The area in front
of the pulpit was occupied by a tumultuous sea of people,
bowing
and kneeling in penitence and prayer. The preliminary
services
were over: the vesper incense had ascended, the ave Maria
had ceased, and the Padre began his discourse.
While this scene was passing, the traveller might have noted,
in a green lane near the outskirts of the town, a tall youth,
holding
low and anxious converse in the fading light with El Pedrero,
the Stone-flinger. It was young de Leon.
`He is a precious villain,' said the latter, `that wretched Padre,
and he must not live.
He
a Priest! By the Holy Virgin,
were it not for an oath, I would pierce his surplice with my own
stiletto! Now, Pepe, can I engage you to make his forehead
and a stone acquainted?'
`
Si Seor,
' replied Botella; `but for what pay? I am no
hireling murderer, Seor; and I can not perform this heavy job
for a common reward. I must have my flask filled daily with
the best liquor in your wine vault, for six months to come; and
I want also some money for my present necessities. What will
you give?'
`Now, a
doblon de a una,
and when your deed is done, ten
more.'
El Pedrero knew the potential value of gold, that slave of the
dark and dirty mine. In this he but imitated mankind in the
mass, from Indus to the Pole. Where, and over whom does it
not hold sway? `Gold, of all other,' saith the quaint Democritus
his pen, `is a most delitious objecte; a sweet light, a goodly
lustre
it hath;
gratius auram quam solem intuemur,
saith Austin,
and we rather see it than the sun. Sweet and pleasant in
getting
,
in keeping, it seasons all our labors; intolerable pains we
take for it; base employment, endure bitter flouts and taunts,
long journeys, heavy burdens; all are made light and easy by
this hope of gain. The sight of gold refresheth our spirits, and
ravisheth our hearts, as the Babylonian garment and golden
wedge did Achan in the camp; the very sight and hearing sets
on fire his soul with desire of it. It will make a man run to the
Antipodes, or tarry at home and turn parasite, lye, flatter,
prostitute
himself, swear and bear false witness; he will venture his
body, kill a king, murther his father, and damn his soul to come
at it.' To the latter extreme, or near it, had El Pedrero been
roused by the single
doblon de a una
of de Leon.
Slowly and stealthily the Stone-flinger and his employer made
their way toward the Barrio de Guadaloupe. As they neared
the great area by the Punta de Diamanta, they perceived that the
evening torches and flambeaux had been lighted, and were
shedding
their fitful rays over the vast multitude. Tall wax candles
by the pulpit enabled the many thousands around to see with
perfect distinctness the splendid robes of the Padre Raduan.
He was preaching with a drawling coldness; and evidently took
more pains to gesture gracefully, and to see who of his female
friends were among the assemblage, than to deliver the testimony
of a man of
God
.
On the very outskirts of the multitude, at the distance of six
or seven hundred yards from the pulpit and priest, stood El
Pedrero and his master for the time.
`Can you see his eye, Seor?' said the Stone-flinger, in a low
voice.
`No,' replied de Leon: `the rays of the candles dazzle me.'
`It is no matter,' added Pepe: `I can see his face.
That
will do. Stand back, Seor, and tell me where to strike him.'
`In the middle of his forehead, between the temples; dash
out his brains, if you can; the unrighteous wretch!' responded
de Leon.
`Stop a moment,' muttered Pedrero.
This moment was spent in preparation. He poised the stone
in his right hand, thrust forward his right leg, with a tragedian
attitude, and lifting his hand, like a dying gladiator in his last
clutch toward his victim, prepared to fling the stone, now raised
uprightly in his dexter hand.
The priest had warmed a little in his discourse, and in some
ejaculation to Heaven had lifted his hand.
`
Now's
the time!' said de Leon.
No sooner said than done. El Pedrero lifted his hand yet
higher; a slight
whiz!
hummed over the heads of the multitude;
and the Padre dropped down in his place, the blood streaming
from his forehead, and the air resounding with the lamentations
and groans of the assemblage.
Hundreds rushed to the pulpit. The Padre Raduan had fallen
by the hand of some vile assassin. The uproar was dreadful.
Men shouted, women shrieked and fainted; emissaries were
despatched
with the news of the Padre's death, (for he had expired
in his pulpit,) to the different churches of the city. All was
confusion. Ten minutes had not elapsed, when the bells of San
Jose, San Francisquito, San Juan de Dios, and the old
Cathedral
of San Francisco, poured out upon the evening air their
full-volumed
descommunion-dirge
against the dire offender, the
Priest-slayer, the Unknown Man of Blood.
All was of no avail. The shouting multitudes, as they bore
away the dead body of the Padre, knew not of his murderer,
nor was he ever identified. El Pedrero escaped, scot free.
Isabella
de Leon was satisfied, and her brother avenged.
Time would fail, should the writer of this hurried sketch
attempt
to relate
all
the adventures of El Pedrero. He has
wrought `twenty mortal murders' on as many crowns. Two
priests are among the victims of his personal avarice, or hired
enmity. In all his adventures, no one has ever been able to
identify him. Testimony has been found useless against him.
With an omnipresent
alibi,
he has ever eluded the law; and still
lives, to kill and to escape.
His last act was perpetrated at the corner of the Castle San
Pedro, (outside the walls of the city of Campeachy,) which
divides
the district of Santa Anna and Guadaloupe. He drew a
stone from his doublet, and at the length of seven hundred yards
smote a priest on the breast, who is, in consequence, afflicted with
the asthma to this day. The secret of his power is known to
few, but his person is familiar with every Campechean. He
`bears a charmed life,' beyond the limits of the laws; for such
is the incredible distance to which he can project a missile, that
it is a matter of impossibility to procure evidence against him.
His hand, or his employer's eye, can be only his witness. The
suspected terror of all, yet the
accused
of none, he sustains
himself
upon the fears of others. His
interested
friends are
numerous
;
his employers the same; and between them all, the
Stone-flinger
lives, of late years, more like a prince, than the loafer
that he is. Wo to the head of that citizen who refuses him a
glass, call for it when he will! His laws are Draconian, written
in blood; and like that of the Medes and Persians, their code is
unalterable.
THE IDEAL.
`
Oh,
Spirit-Land!thou land of Dreams!
A world thou art, of mysterious gleams;
Like a wizard's magic-glass thou art,
Where the wavy shadows float by, and part.
Visions of aspects, now loved, now strange,
Glimmering and mingling in ceaseless change.
Thou art like the depths where the seas have birth,
Rich with the wealth that is lost from earth:
All the bright flowers of our days gone by,
And buried gems, in thy bosom lie.'
I am
a lover of the ideal. I bow to those enchantments of
the imagination, which come we know not whence or wherefore,
to awaken a few evanescent throbs of pleasure in the heart, and
to shed a few gushes of sunshine around the common walks of
this working-day world. I love to give myself up to the
guidance
of my dreaming moods, and to say, `Halloo, my fancy,
whither wilt thou go?' I deem that the great charm of existence
lies, not in wailing because of the stern realities that we may not
shun, but in seeking those bright lapses in the stream of time,
illusive though they be, which sparkle into the soul with their
radiance
,
and cause every nerve to thrill with momentary
enthusiasm
.
As sorrow sometimes rolls its unbidden blight over the
spirit, so does pleasure there pour its lustre; and of neither the
one nor the other can we rightly discern the cause,
commencement
,
or end. How often will a cluster of hopes, gathering
thickly in the mind, clothed in hues of heaven, warm the bosom
into transports which have no definite origin, and can be traced
to none; which fade by far too soon, and yet grow lovelier
while they fade?
The shocks which our imaginary world sustains; the
earthquakes
which devastate its glorious demensnes, and shake to
nothingness its thousand brilliant creations, are too frequent in
manhood to render the influence of the Ideal abiding. Its
magnificent
pictures melt beneath the noontide of experience. We
know what we have been; we see what we are; and, contrasting
the raptures of the past with the faint visions of the present, are
led to feel, and deeply too, that the `golden exhalations of our
dawn' were too beautiful for perpetuity. Some rude lesson from
men diminishes our rich amount of romance. Coldness, deceit,
the changes and forgetfulness of friendships that we deemed
almost
indestructible, admonish us with a voice stern and
unrelenting
,
that the radiance of ideality is limited to a narrow compass
in our being, and that we soon recede from that shore,
`Where every scene is pleasant to the view,
And every rapture of the heart is new;
Where on the land and wave a light is thrown,
Which to the morn of life alone is known;'
and that, whether we will or no, those enchantments are eluding
our search, and those iris hues of delight rapidly `evanishing
amid the storm.'
It is with the mind as with the sky; continued brightness
would soon be wearisome. Like Macbeth, I have often been
`a-weary of the sun.' I like those little passages of life which
break the self-deception of the soul, and lead me to contemplate
things as they are. This liking, too, is by no means
incompatible
with a passion for the ideal, but rather identical with it. One
may give the reins to fancy, and journeying in thought from
heaven to earth and from earth to heaven, may enjoy the transit
without supposing it reality. This is, in my view, the acm of
day-dreaming. We are prepared to wake with new vigor from
the illusive reverie, fortified for the conflicts of the world; for
we know that we can sometimes shake off the latter, and in the
twilights of spring or summer, or during the golden reign of
autumn, command the former at our will. It is by the
cultivation
of this spirit that the poet, the novelist, and the painter, have
depicted their best conceptions. Shutting out the world for the
nonce, yet retaining a sense of its continuance; amid the urbane
resumptions of cigarillos, or pipe, or over-generous cordial, they
luxuriate and dream; the air, the light, the view from an open
window of some pleasant landscape, minister to their quietude:
and thus, abstracted in meditation, they roll up the shadowy
curtains
of Reality, and spread before their mental gaze an El
Dorado
and an Eden.
SomebodyI believe it is Dr. Johnsonpronounces books
to be dull
friends
. They may be so; but they are glorious
companions
. They can not lend one money, but they can
enrich
his mind with incorruptible and unalienable affluence.
They can confer in gorgeous profusion the vast estates of
ideality
the
dominions and principalities of thought. And while
they impart an enjoyment in all respects equal to worldly riches,
they inculcate no sordid selfishness; they never contract the
heart; and they leave its genial avenues unclogged by envy;
unpolluted by pride; for knowledge ever humbles its votaries,
even while it exalts them.
But there are some grievous disappointments to which
imagination
is subject; namely, the changes that happen inevitably to
the romantic fancies derived from human annals, and which form
the
ideal of history
. We read of mighty conquerors and
statesmen
,
who have made rivers run with blood, or thrilled senates
with resistless eloquence: we pore over the records of their lives
by some partial contemporary, until we deem them demi-gods.
We wish that we had lived in their day, and heard the rolling of
their chariot wheels, or the musical thunder of their periods.
Anon, we meet with authentic accounts of their private foibles,
their inglorious passions, their petty iniquities, until they diminish
in our eyes to the mere playthings of small impulses, the ignoble
puppets of Whim. We forget Cicero the orator, and find him
the puff-seeker of a friend, soliciting the hyperbole of praise in
an extravagant biography, and hinting at its reward. We see
monarchs bribing historians to give fair colors to their fame, or
posthumously shining in the doubtful authorship of an Ikon
Basilike
.
I have been marvellously shocked at the variations which have
passed over my imagination in reference to the great characters
of history. The trusty annalists who have dwelt more on their
private than their public course, have almost destroyed my
original portraits; and although I began them fancifully `in large,'
they have left them `in little.' From the heroes and heroines of
Greece and Rome, down to the queens, ladies, kings, princes,
and knights of European dominions, there has passed away the
coleur de rose
with which my fancy first invested them. They
have come to appear like common people to me, and the
greatness
they once wore to my spiritual eye, has gone like the
pageant
of a vision. I can not cite many instances here, but they
are as numerous as the leaves of history.
Among those great personages of historic fame, who have
swayed monarchies by their nod, or been closely allied to regnant
majesty, I look with the greatest interest upon those whose tastes
and judgment have connected them with the success of genius
and literature. I should like to have had a peep at that old
Tuscanian Macnas, and witnessed the pleasures and the affluence
that he imparted to the gifted spirits by whom he was
surrounded
;
making the sweet Mantuan to `possess himself in much
quietness,' and brightening the Sabine estate before the quick eye
of Horace, until that satirist felt almost ready to forswear his
haughty
nil admirari
. I should delight to have met them all
together over a glass of that ancient and mellow Falernian, which
Horace kept so long in his cellar, and felt upon my lips those
gouts
of an inspiration that used to find its way so often into
22
deathless verse. But alas! had I known them, I should
doubtless
have witnessed many a vulgar scene; many
tableaux vivants
of maudlin revellers, reposing under tables, quite overdone; and
been haunted to my grave with an oft-recurring vision of broken
goblets, among lost streams of wine, rolling over the flooded
board, and wasting upon unmindful nostrils the odor of delicate
spices.
To those monarchical friends of talent, who have shone as
the patronizing beautifiers of our vernacular tongue, I have
always
looked in a kind of misty admiration. How have I filled
my fancy with pictures of
Elizabeth,
the rewarded of merit, the
learned lady, the favorite of the gentle Sidney, the friend of
Shakspeare; and beyond all, according to some loyal chroniclers,
the possessor of that best religion `which triumpheth upon pride,
and sits on the neck of ambition, humbly pursuing that infallible
perpetuity unto which all others must diminish their diameters,
and be poorly seen in angles of contingency.' I have painted
her in my thought as a tall majestic woman, with an eye which
warmed, while it awed the heart, and whose glance, pleasing,
and commanding homage, filled her court with reflected sunshine;
her person stately as Juno, and marked by the befitting sweetness
of a gracious queen. I have almost doated on what I supposed
must have been
about
her smile. But like my fancy-sketch of
the great Russian Empress Catharine, the partial hues have
vanished
before the rays of truth, and the bright lineaments have
gone. I have fallen upon Paul Hentzner's `Journey thoroughe
Englande,' in the year of grace
m.d. xc. viii.;
and ah, what
havoc hath he made! Touching Elizabeth and her
arrangements
,
he speaketh thus: `Her presence chamber was strewn
with
hay,
and therein were present the Archbishop of Canterbury,
Bishop of London, and so; first went gentlemen, barons, earles,
knights, all richly dressed and bareheaded; next wended the
chauncellour, with seals in a silk purse between two, one of
which carried the royal sceptre, the other ye sworde of State, in
a red scabbard, covered with fleurs de lis, and pointed upward.
Next came the Queen; * * her face long and wrinkled, her eyen
small, but black and pleasaunt; her nose a little
hooked;
her
lips narrow, and her teeth
black,
a defect whereunto the English
do seem subject, from their too great use of sugar. From her
ears did depend two pearls, with exceeding rich drops; she did
wear false hair,
and that red;
over which she had a small crown
of Lunenberg table gold: her bosom was uncovered; thence
she was dressed in white silk, burdened with pearls, the size of
beans, over which was a
black
mantle.'
When I read this, good heaven! what a pattern of female
grace and nobleness faded from my mind.
This,
then, was
Elizabeth
!
The two portraits shown by Hamlet to his mother were
not more dissimilar than this and mine. Mine was a free
drawing
;
Hentzner's an unquestioned original. And was
this
the
Queen for whom the bards of her day thought it an honor to
weave their lays; and who considered it the
summum bonum vit
to bask in her royal favor? Was this the peerless personage in
whose service the high-born Sidney fluttered and did the amiable;
in whose cause he fought and died? The very same. Oh flesh!
by partial pens how art thou glorified!
Talking of Sidney, leads me to say, that his case is another
instance in my experience of the false Ideal. He has stood in
the mirage of my conception, a knight unparagon'd; a poet as
full of personal grace as his verses are of beauty. He was the
favorite of the most intellectual court in Europe; the mark and
model of his sex; the cynosure of the ladies. He has appeared
to me, clothed in the
purpureum lumen
of nobility; the valiant
oracle and pet of his fair sovereign; walking and talking with
her, in English, French, Italian, Scotch, Dutch,
*
*
Elizabeth
understood all these
languages.
`and so;' in
fine, the very concrete of gentlemen. I have supposed him
winningly
tall and majestic; easy as Adonis; with his lace points all
adjusted, and his bow superb. But Hentzner has dissolved the
vision, by furnishing an engraved portrait, undoubtedly authentic,
in which he is represented sitting clumsily on a bank, like a
shepherd of Arcady, with a form fat, oily, and burly, a bulbous
nose, a double chin, and eyes of a deplorably lack-lustre leer!
I shall never think of Sidney as a perfect courtier and
preux
chevalier
again.
It were a grievous list indeed that should contain all those
alterations
which the stern pencil of truth has painted upon the
first pictures of great people in my mind. It has substituted the
coarse for the comely, and flung harsh shades over beauties of
sky-tinctured grain.' Warriors have dwindled into Lilliputians:
diplomatists into hair-brained invalids; empresses into dowdies.
Taking a fancy view of the Duke of Wellington, across the
Atlantic
,
I have supposed him a lofty personage, six feet nine in his
boots, with an eye like Mars, and a curl of disdainful dignity in
his monstrous nose. But he is a little pocket edition of a man,
with a bended back, a countenance in no wise prepossessing, and
legs approximating to that parenthesis state called the
bandy
.
Julius Csar! how the late describers of that man have
undeceived
me!
Just so with Talleyrand. I thought him a diplomatic weazel;
ever wide awake, with ears erect, and ready to slip out of any
negotiation that the finesse of court forecaste or private
instructions
might suggest. But he is just the contrary. Instead of
being filled with deceitful animation, his visage is soporific; his
manner languid, nay stupid; and the last portraitthe latest and
best, I supposehas sketched him
asleep!
But because history darkens my ideal, shall I refuse to chase
it? No, by my halidome! I love the journeyings of thought.
I will travel often over those exclusive railways of the mind;
passing by castles, towers, lakes, wide-watered shores and
splendid
towns; through fields made
Champs Elyses
by the poets,
and over hills renowned in song. I
have
seen those who
surpassed
my brightest beau-idealliving, moving, breathing,
beings
.
If I should see them again, something will have vanished
to break the charmto dissolve the spell. I choose to hug
these camera obscura pictures to my heart; though with reference
to
their
characters, histories should be caught fibbing, and
chroniclers
be falsified.
JOHN SMITH.
`men of pith,
Sixteen called Thompson, and nineteen named Smith.'
Byron
.
My
name is
John Smith
. The first important event of my
life was my birth; but of that my reminiscences are faint, of
course. John Jenkins Smith was my father's name; and, until
my twelfth year, I was called John Jenkins Smith, Junior; the
middle appellation being in compliment to the sir-names of my
uncle and aunt, Increase and Abundance Jenkins. In the fitness
of time, my father deceased. He was an estimable individual,
and did a good business in the line of bar-soap; the avails
arising
from the sale of which article created a decent competency
for the necessities of his surviving family. He was an industrious
man, with habits uncommonly domestic. My mother, nine
brothers
,
and seven sisters, lived to mourn his loss.
After the demise of my father, it was my mother's wish and
advice, that I should drop the Jenkins and the Junior from my
title, and adopt the simple cognomen of John Smith.
Persuasion
at last induced me to comply with her desires; and dearly
have I paid for my acquiescence. The simplicity of the name
has been fruitful of mystery. Innumerable are the vexations and
difficulties into which it has led me. Were I to relate them, in
the swelling style of modern writers, I do verily believe that the
world would not contain my books. But the task is too
formidable
,
even if I were fond of authorship, which, I thank heaven, I
am not. My name forbids the thought. The wise may
cogitate
from the tripod, and the dunce twaddle on his stool. I
shall not arise to push them from their places. Save in the
Directory
and the census, I shall be
nominis umbra
.
When one arrives in a large city, it is a common simile to
liken him to a drop of water falling into the ocean; it mingles,
and is lost, in the vasty deep. So I found it, when I left my
native village `up the river' for the metropolis, in more ways than
one. I ascertained by a glance at the Directory, that I was one
among hundreds who bore my personal appellation. Having
passed my time from youth to early manhood in the country, the
bustle and buzz of a vast city like this almost drave me crazy.
Like John Jones, in the play of that name, `I was excited.'
Forthwith I made my way to the Adelphi. I had a fair share of
money, and the picture of that hotel, hung in the steamboat cabin,
had captivated my eye. Glancing at the travellers' book in the
bar-room, I perceived my name three times repeated. I began
to think myself of consequence. `Doubtless,' said I, `the
several
coachmen who stood on the wharf with uplifted, beckoning
whips, awaited my commands, and who ascertained my
destination
,
have come hither in advance, to record my arrival.' I was
unsophisticated in those days. Those things which we chew the
cud of wisdom withal, namely, eye-teeth, had not then been cut.
I thought, with a pleasing sensation, of the truth of the old poet's
remark, that one always finds `the warmest welcome at an inn.'
Purposes of business brought me to town. It was my
intention
,
after passing a year or two at mercantile apprenticeship in
the city, to become a country trader; and I had resolved from
the first to make all the acquaintances I could. I was rejoiced
to hear, the morning after my arrival, that several persons whom
I did not see, had inquired after my health at the Adelphi. I
knew I had many friends who had come to the Great Babel
before
me; but I had not the most distant suspicion that they would
remember the `gawkey,' as they used to call me, whom they
knew at home. However, I solaced my mind with reflections
on my growing importance, and indulged myself in pleasing
anticipations
of the success which these acquaintances would yet
induce for me.
I was fond of strolling through the streets in the morning,
when the glitter and stir of fashion were abroad, and I never
failed to walk myself hungry before twelve o'clock. An
advertisement
which I had inserted in the newspapers, of, `Wants a
place, a young man from the country, with an extensive
knowledge
of figures, who writes a good hand,' had been successful.
I had procured a situation, and was to enter upon its duties in a
fortnight. Of course, I was delighted; and remembering my
boyish scrape-maxim, `
Dum vivimus vivamus,
' I resolved to enjoy
my time. So, on each day at twelve o'clock, I was wont to
resort
to one of those famous ordinaries in Broadway, where all
that the human appetite can crave is spread before the eye in
rich profusion. `A fig for the expense,' said I, `the things are
good, and I wish to make acquaintances for my employers.'
At the resort of which I am speaking, it seemed to me that all
the town convened. There, from eleven until five, were to be seen
vast numbers of voracious aldermen, and opulent good-livers,
devouring
their respective lunches. Many a one of these, as he
came out, went along the streets with a pleased and satisfied
countenance,
`Smiting his thigh, with blythe Apician glee,
And licking eke his lips, right beautiful to see.'
Of course, there were many faces that I came at last to know
`passing well.' One individual, especially, in a suit of rusty
brown, a bell-crowned hat, and a bombazine stock of blue, used
every day to enter the apartment just at the time I did, and seat
himself at the marble table next me. By degrees, we became
slightly acquainted. Being a regular visitor, my name and
lodgings
were soon known to the bar-keeper. One morning, the
man in brown picked up a letter from the floor under his table,
and asked me if I had dropped it. I told him I had neither
written nor lost any.
`Very singular,' said he, without putting the epistle into my
hands; `I will make inquiries about it.' He showed it to the
keeper, who opened it, and after casting his eye down the page,
bowed politely to me, and said, `Certainly, certainly, with
pleasure
.'
The whole affair was an enigma; but I was as green at
that time as a new-hatched gosling. Supposing the person had
mistaken his man, but not wishing to be outdone in courtesy, I
bowed and smiled in return.
Shortly after, when I had taken my usual meal, and was about
to render the trifling equivalent, the keeper said to me:
`
This
is Mr. John Smith, I believe.'
`Yes, that is my name.'
`Got a certain note about you; the bill is all right; put up
your money.'
I did n't understand him.
`You are Mr. John Smith, at the Adelphi?'
`Yes. I am at that hotel.'
`Very well, my dear Sir, the note is accepted. Your bills are
paid until farther notice.'
`Well, thought I, my friends
are
polite, that is truth. I have
almost the freedom of the city. How curiously agreeable! I
continued to go for days and weeks together, and eat at this
ordinary
,
`without money and without price.' He in the brown
coat was ever present.
At the end of the month, I received at my hotel a bill of forty
dollars, for edibles used at the ordinary aforesaid. I hurried to
the place, and demanded an explanation. I was informed that
the man in brown had given a letter to the keeper, under my very
nose, requesting lunches for two every morning, the bill to be
sent monthly to John Smith, at the Adelphi. References were
given, and had been answered, all by the same hand!
It was a broad
hoax;
and after paying the money, as I was
obliged to do, (it was left `to my honor' that potent opener of
purse-strings,) I found that
one
of the three John Smiths whose
names were written at the Adelphi, was a
chevalier d'industrie,
who passed as my friend at the lunch, and my cousin John at
the hotel. He came down with me in the steam-boat. I never
saw him after he was `
blowed
.' This was the first practical attack
on my name; but by how many dozens was it
not
the last! Let
me go on.
There is scarcely any body who has not been in love, as often
as once, at least. I have had my flame, but my name quenched
it. About the third month of my mercantile apprenticeship, I
was induced on a certain evening to attend one of those
convocations
,
a sacred concert; and at first sight, I became attached
to a lady who was attached to the choir. She looked like a
divinity
,
she sang like an angel.
I followed her to her house, when the concert broke up, to
ascertain
her residence; and from that time, my life was one wild
dream of suspense and passion. I used to see her every day or
two at the window, and sometimes at church. A good-looking
young man, who lodged at the Adelphi, and for whom I had
often been taken, seemed to be pursuing the same object. When
I went in that direction, he generally walked a few yards behind
me, as constant to my trip, as the shadow to the substance; but
as he went beyond, I supposed he had friends farther on, in the
same street; for he
passed
the house, whereas I saw nothing
worth a step beyond, and used to `wheel about' like a
militiaman
,
directly in front of the domicil, when my eye had drunk in
its dizzy poison from the window. One evening, just at twilight,
I saw my Adelphi friend standing on the steps of my lady's
dwelling. Good heavens! Perhaps he knew her. I sought my
hotel with a spirit of envy, that I find it hard to describe. Was
that man my rival?
The next day I received a scented note, in a fine crow-quill
hand, which ran as ensueth:
`
No.,Street
.
`My Dear John:
We do not know each other well, for we have been
thwarted by the presence of untoward circumstances; but surely, my dear,
my
only
John, the language of my eyes must have convinced you that
since we first met, my heart has been wholly yours. Come to-morrow
evening at eight, and in a walk of a few moments, I will convince you, if
words can do it, of the unalterable affection of your devoted
`
Catharine Wallace
.
`
John Smith, Esq.,
Adelphi
.'
I have a notion that my punctuality the next evening was a
model of mercantile precision. As the town-clocks were
clanging
eight, my hand was on the knocker of the Wallace door. A
very attentive `color' person' answered my call, and in a moment
after my inquiry, the arm of Miss Wallace was in mine, trembling
with hurry and agitation. We walked for the space of nearly `a
block,' without the utterance of any thing but low interjections
of pleasure, and an occasional remark upon that inexhaustible
subject, the weather.
We turned into Broadway. Here, in the blaze of gas lights,
we met abruptly, two gentlemen, who turned after passing us,
and striding hastily a few paces before, like Othello's lady, they
`turned again,' and as I was on the point of pouring out some
tender sayings, one of the fellows, staring at the face of my fair
companion, exclaimed:
`Good gracious! Miss Wallace, is that you?'
It was my
tracking
friend, of the Adelphi. I knew his voice
instantly. The lady dropped my arm, as if she had received a
death-shot.
`Why are you walking with this man, and how did you come to
know him?' Miss Wallace answered with a faltering voice, that
she did not know me, but had mistaken me for himself. `Dear
John,' said she, did you not get my note this morning? I
expected
you to walk with me, and not a person with whom I have
no acquaintance whatever.'
Guess my surprise. I was, as the Kentuckians phrase it, `an
entire
stranger.' The gallant began to bluster.
`Willyoujustpermitmetoaskyou,' said he
to me, cocking his hat fiercely o' one side, and drawling his
words,
sotto voce,
through his set teeth, `who the devil you are?
what you are here for? what's your name? and what you are
a'ter?
(syncopating the last word with a broad inflection of the
first syllable.) I have seen you at the Adelphi, and I begin to
think you are a puppy.'
`Puppy, I am none,' said I coolly, for I hate fighting, `and
my being with this lady at present, is the result of
concert
. I
received
a note from her this morning, requesting an interview.'
`Liar!' said the gentleman.
`That phrase,' I responded meekly, `would not be borne, if I
considered you a good judge of the truth in the present case. I
happen to have the note in my pocket, Sir; and as you are very
inquisitive, let me return the compliment, and ask
your
name?'
`My name, s; I am not ashamed of my name, s, as you
appear
to be of yours; my name, s, is
John Smith
!'
`And so is mine. Here's the heart of the mystery. I see at
once that the similarity of our names has been the cause of this
error. Your note fell into my hands. I never spoke to this
lady, before to-night, in all my life, though I have for some time
occasionally seen and admired her, at a distance.'
We were friends in a moment. The young damsel had
accidentally
made
his
acquaintance, a week or two previously, after
an extensive interchange of oglings, at churches, and other public
resorts, and they were, it was plain to see, quite desperate with
each other. I could not help comparing myself to the man in
the play, whose servant says to him; `Maister, ar' n't your name
Gregory?' `Yes, Sir R. Gregory.' `So is mine.' `Ah, then
your name is similar.' `No, master, my name ar' n't Similar,
my name's Gregory!'
These amusing reflections were but a momentary gleam of
sunshine on the cloud which darkened my spirit. My dream of
love was broken. Another John Smith had stepped into my
bower of hope, and plucked the brightest rose it ever grew. I
became `melancholy and gentleman-like;' went to conventicles
with great regularity, and read a multitude of books. By
degrees
I began to have quite a passion for literature, and tried my
hand in the light department, as a producer. With the assistance
of Ossian, and a rhyming dictionary, I made some poetry, and
sent it to a popular weekly journal. It was entitled `A River
Scene,' and bore for its motto the following couplet from some
grand inconnu:
`'T is sweet, upon the impassioned wave,
To watch the little fishes swim.'
Ambitious of distinction, I wrote my name in full at the top of
the piece. What kind of reception, think you, did it encounter?
Reader, read:
`
John Smith's
poetry is received, and has gone to that vast receptacle
of things lost for the present upon earth, on the cover of which it is thus
written: `Rejected Balaam:
Clauduntur in aternam noctem
.' We would
advise John Smith to give up his visions of fame. Let them dissolve into
airy nothing, for they produce nothing, and out of nothing, nothing comes.
No man, with exactly his two names, need expect glory below the sun.
The last one is not the objection: for the Jones's, the Browns, Thompsons,
and Jacksons, with many other names, might compete with it in point of
numbers; but the baptismal prefix of
John,
makes the title no name at all;
and thus, if we mistake not, has the matter been ruled in courts of justice.
We beg our correspondent to drop either the lyre or his name; for he will
labor in vain for renown, unless he prays the legislature for a divorce from
his present cognomen.
`John Smith, John Smith, oh Phbus! what a name
To fill the speaking trump of future fame!'
This unequivocal compliment almost extinguished my lyrical
propensities. I was convinced that John Smith would never
make any respectable sensation in literature. Cruel thought! A
rose would smell as sweet, according to Shakspeare, even if it
were called ipecacuanha, as by any other name. Why then,
from such a cause, should a barrier be placed against the
aspirations
of an ambitious mortal? The idea was not endurable. I
determined to be even with the editor who had so crucified my
lines. A rival publication had offered prizes for an Essay, a
Tale, and some poetry. It wanted a month before the meeting
of the committee. I spent a fortnight on one poem. The paper
in question was great in a small way, and bore on its cover a
learned motto, `from the Greek of Alcus.' The time arrived;
the committee convened; the award was made; and what was my
delight on reading in the public journals the following
announcement
:
`NOTICE.
`
The
committee appointed to examine the pieces of prose and poetry,
designed for the prizes in the `Oriental Olympiad and Weekly Sunburst,'
beg leave to report, that after a close examination of the matters confided to
their discrimination, they have come to a decision. Private notice has
already
been made to the modest and successful authors of the Essay and
Tale. Before giving the name of the victorious writer of the poem to the
world, the committee desire to state, that with reference to the two baskets
of accepted and rejected productions, now in the office of the Sunburst,
they cannot make a more fitting comparison, than by likening them to the
figs of Jeremiah; (Jer. xxiv. 2.) `One basket had very good figs, even like
the figs that are first ripe; and the other basket had very naughty figs,
which could not be eaten, they were so bad.' The committee now
proceed
,
with a feeling of serene and solemn exultation, to commit to the
public
eye at this era, and to that which shall lift its lid in future ages, the
name of the distinguished person who has won the guerdon of twenty-five
dollars, and a year's gratuitous subscription to the Olympiad and Sunburst,
It is
John Smith,
Esq., of New-York. He will readily comprehend his
putative
identity, when the committee remark, that his effusion commences
with a spirited invocation to the Nine. The committee will be prepared to
meet him, and to administer into his hands the twenty-five dollars, and a
year's receipt for the popular journal aforesaid, on Tuesday evening next,
at six o'clock, in the saloon of the City Hotel. That the author may be
received without the embarrassment of self-introduction, he is requested to
wear a white favor in the lappel button-hole of his coat; whereupon, on his
entrance, he will be introduced to the company, and receive the pecuniary
tribute due to his extraordinary genius. Many ladies, amateurs, and
literary
gentlemen, will be present.
`Nov. 25. eod. ass. dtf.'
I read this notice over at least forty times, before the appointed
evening. On that day, after dinner, I dressed with studied
neatness
,
and turning down my collar,
la Byron,
brushed my
reddish
locks, Apollo-like, around my forehead, in a style of
sublime
confusion, and awaited with a palpitating bosom the proud
moment when I should enter the saloon. I paused some thirty
minutes after the appointed time, so that expectation should be
on tiptoe. At last I sallied forth, and with a queer feeling of
transport opened the door of the saloon and entered. There
was a collection of people; and at one side of the room, like
stinted wall-flowers, stood a line of wo-begone-looking individuals,
to the number of fifteen, each with a white favor in his bosom,
but with
such
diversified garments! `Motley was their only
wear.' I was surprised, bewildered. At the request of the
committee
,
tendered through their chairman, I took my station `in
line.' A subdued snicker ran through the room, as two
more
persons, bearing white favors, entered, and stepped by direction
into the ranks below me. I stole a glance at my comrades.
They were silent, grim, and sad to see. We all of us looked
like a small company, detailed for private exercise, from `the
great army of martyrs.'
At last the chairman rose, and waving his hand loftily, said:
`An unexpected duty, ladies and gentlemen, devolves upon the
humble person who now addresses you. Called to my office at
a moment of peculiar excitement, I wish to discharge its duties
with approval. I expected to-night, in the presence of you all,
to pay a delegated honor to the genius of one bright son of song.
But I am obliged to select him from yon troop of tuneful worthies
now arranged before the assembly, every one of whom, by a
singular concatenation of parental tastes, bears the name of
John
Smith!
'
I could have evaporated through the key-hole. My first
impulse
was to cut and run. A second thought told me,
I
might be
the
John Smith, and I determined to see the farce out.
`In this state of uncertainty,' continued the chairman, `the
only method of arriving at the successful author is to read the
accepted lines.'
He began to read them with the lungs of a Stentor, and the
gestic grace of an elephant.
They were not mine,
that was
certain
;
poor, drawling, spiritless stanzas, mere verbiage to mine.
My contempt for the committee was unbounded.
But a person now jumped out from our row, with the
quickness
of a Narraganset pacer; bowed, was identified as the
author
,
and took his perquisites. When he wheeled again, and
made a derisive inclination of the head to the rest of us
unsuccessful
essayists, I did instantly, by the sinister smirk of his face,
recognise the ecstatic entity. It was the rascal in brown, whose
bill I had paid at the lunch!
I remember little of the occasion after this. I only recollect
that some of the `great rejected' swore with emphasis, that they
had been sadly misused. Each man contended for the peculiar
merit of his own composition, every one of which, even to the
entire
eighteen, opened with an appeal to the muse for assistance.
One man, who seemed a little excited with wine, declared that
`he came there for the prize, and the prize he would have; he
had already engaged a supper below, for himself and a few friends,
on the strength of the prize; `and I would like to know,' he
added, with a sardonic grin of defiance, `who in the name of
Parnassus is a-going to pay the bill? My heart is heaving and
bursting with emotion. What is to requite us all for our
disappointment
?
`
Of
our soul-stirring hopes we are in at the death,
And we stand, as in battle array,
To find our renown but a bodiless breath,
That vanisheth away!
`Messieurs Smith,' said the chairman, entirely disregarding the
loquacious member, `you are dismissed. Your badges, beside
being emblems of peace, which will prevent any wranglings
among yourselves, are also signs that you feel independent, and
ask no
favors
.' Here the company laughed, in the manner of a
certain popular actress, `like hyenas.'
How the company broke up, I know not. I was the first at
the door, and walked up Broadway with my hat in my hand,
although
the weather was drizzling. I have never entirely
recovered
from the acidity of spirit which that sore discomfiture
entailed
upon me. I had been crossed in love and literature; and my
coming days seemed only to me, a helpless wanderer on the
ocean of time, like `breakers ahead.' And so they have proved.
I have been advertised in the newspapers; persecuted by
females
whom I knew not; had callow bantlings laid on my
door-steps
.
In short, I have suffered every thing but death; and all
for my name. In vain do I attempt to console myself, by
thinking
of
one
great name like mine, the captain, who was saved by
the Indian girl, Pocahontas, and
two
that are `similar,' the
renowned
Horace and James, the wittiest men living. I am still
plodding along the vale of existence, looking at the bright steep
of fame in the distance, knowing it `impossible to climb.' My
name hangs to my tail as heavy as the stone of Sysiphus. I
almost
wish I was entirely defunct.
Having long ago removed from the Adelphi, in consequence
of a `collapse' in its prosperity, I have got a home of my own,
and am well to do in the world. But I am not happy. I disburse
the postage for a weekly mass of letters, of which three in five
are intended for others. I read notices concerning me,
hymeneal
and obituary, several times in a month. I have been waited
upon simultaneously, by persons who had come to wish me joy,
in the expectancy of a punch-drinking, and by rival tomb-stone
cutters, desirous of a job `to my memory,' from the surviving
members of my bachelor household. I pay twice my own
amount of bills. A John Smith lives next door, to whom half
my choice rounds and sirloins, selected personally in the market,
for I love good provant, are sent without distinction. My name is
a bore, and my life a burden. Touching the debts I have paid,
which were not my own, they have harassed me beyond measure.
Such is the perplexity arising from their constant and
unavoidable
occurrence, that I begin to think myself a member of that
class of reprobates, mentioned by St. Paul, in his Epistle to the
Romans, who have been given up by Divine Providence, `to do
those things which
are not convenient
.' Heartily do I wish I
could do as the Druids of old did, who contracted earthly debts
for themselves and others, and gave promissory notes, payable in
the other world.
But I forbear to recite my infelicities. I skip over some
hundreds
,
and come to the
latest
. Yesterday morning the following
police report met my eye:
`
John Smith,
a new offender, was on Monday last committed to
Bridewell
,
charged with having stolen several descriptions of clothes from various
hotels in Broadway. He formerly made his home at the Adelphi, where
he practised his light fingered arts for a considerable time. He was at one
period `well-off,' and lived in Broadway, but his thieving propensities have
brought him up, at last, to a full stop. Bail having been procured, he is
now at large, but so well known, that his career is now comparatively
harmless.'
This is the latest, but not the
last
. I have met scores of
acquaintances
since yesterday, and they all shun me as if they
scented in my garments the air of a jail; all but one puppy, and
he asked me `when I got out!' There is ample botheration in
store for me. Its
kind
I know not, but the
quantity
must be
enormous. I will bear it no longer. I have booked myself for
Albany to-morrow; and if I am not released from my name by
the House, I will go, for refuge, to that narrow house appointed
for all living; and on my tomb-stone shall be recorded, in good
`slap-up' Latin, `
Sic transit tristitia Johannes Smithi!
'
THE SNAKE EATER.
`Some strange commotion
Is in his brain: he bites his lip, and starts;
Stops on a sudden, looks upon the ground,
Then lays his finger on his temple; straight
Springs out into fast gait; then stops again,
Strikes his breast hard; and then anon he casts
His eye against the moon; in most strange posture
We have seen him set himself.'
Shaks:
Henry Viii
.
A few
years ago, near the sunset of an autumnal day, I
reached a populous town on the banks of the Mississippi. An
accident to the steam-boat, wherein I had embarked, and by which
many lives were lost through the carelessness of an ignorant and
drunken engineer, had compelled the directors of the boat to stop
with the remaining company, and repair the damages that had
occurred.
Alas! there were damages and evils on board that
unpretending
craft, which were beyond the reach of mechanist or
chirurgeon
.
The dead were strewing the deck; fragments of the
boiler, and broken wheels, were lying around; and masses of
soot and cinders from the unclean pipes blackened the deck.
On every side were corpses, and wailing friends, and tearful eyes.
A few settees had been brought up from the cabin, and on the
mattresses with which they were covered, the dead were laid. It
was an awful scene. Two hours before, all was well; and every
heart seemed bounding with the rapid impulse of life and hope.
I myself escaped by a miracle. I was seated at the stern of the
boat, near the end window of the cabin, over the rudder,
watching
,
as is my wont, to see the turbulent waters boil around the
keel, and mark the landscape flit by and recede. A noise like
an earthquake, which made the shuddering boat recoil many
yards; a rush of hot steam through the broken windows; the
hissing
of the pieces from the boiler, as they dropped into the river;
and after one sad pause of an instant, the shrieks and groans of
the dead and dying, and the surviving mourners; these were the
signs which betokened the appalling disaster, and convinced me
visibly, for the first time, what a vast amount of pain and misery
can be crowded into a passing moment.
It is a sight of horror to behold the strong man smitten down
in his might; to see the pride of womanhood defaced and blighted
by sudden death; to hear the lamentations of grief and despair,
where but a little time before were heard the light laugh of
pleasure, and the tones of delight. How distant was the thought
of harm, from each and all! Truly it is said by the great bard
of nature, `We know what we are, but not what we shall be.'
We weave the garlands of joy, even by the precipice of death;
we disport in the sunbeam, unmindful of the storm that is
booming
afar, and will soon be at hand!
The sun descended as we entered the town, which was situated
on ascending grounds near the river. A swell of upland,
over-looking
near at hand a few patches of green, which I took to be
cotton fields, and which apparently commanded an extended
view of the shores and course of the great Father of Rivers,
stretched rearward from the place. Overcome with excitement
and gratitude for my deliverance, and seeing also that there
had throunged to the wharf a large number of citizens, sufficient
for every purpose of charitable assistance toward the sufferers,
and the dead on board of the steam-boat, I selected that portion of
my luggage which had not been destroyed, and after seeking an
hotel, made the best of my way to the upland of which I have
spoken. I felt like one snatched from the grave; and deeply
impressed with the sense of the danger from which I had escaped,
through the watchfulness of a benignant Providence, I determined
to seek some haunt of retirement, and quiet my agitated spirits
with thankful meditation.
When I gained the eminence, I found that the view was
calculated
to heighten and expand all the feelings with which my
heart was surcharged, to the overflow. A few gorgeous clouds,
bedight in crimson and purple, were sailing in glory along the
melancholy west; dark cypresses, hung to their tops with trailing
clusters of wild vine, colored with mingled violet, amber, and
emerald, stood in relief before the horizon; while afar, on either
hand, the great Mississippi was seen rolling along with a kind of
quivering radiance, and exhibiting, even at that distance, the
turbulent
might, which makes it seem like a prostrate Niagara. At
a distance, in each extremity of the view, it was lost in dark
woods and misty head-lands; an emblem, most striking at the
moment, of that obscurity which, like the shadow-curtain in the
vision of Mirza, overhung the stream of life and time, making of
the Past a dream, and of the Future a vast unknown.
It is impossible to describe the sensations which animate the
bosom of an American, as he looks at this running ocean, and the
long, long vale through which it rolls. He gazes onward with
the eye of anticipation to the not distant period, when that
almost
interminable stretch of landscape shall become bright with
towns, and vocal with the sounds of human industry; when the
busy hum of scholars at their tasks, of artists at their labors, of
the husbandman folding his flocks, or garnering the rich treasures
of the harvest, shall succeed the moanings of the cypress, and the
mingled howlings of roaming beasts of prey, and yet wilder
Indians
;
when the light of civilization and religion shall extend
over forests and savannahs, until the progress of our people
through the dominions of the receding Aborigines, shall be, in
the expressive words of Scripture, `as the morning spread upon
the mountains: a great people, and a strong; of whom there
hath not been ever the like, neither shall be any more after it, to
the years of many generations.'
As I turned to survey the prospect, I saw at no great distance
from the spot where I stood, a white tent, or
pavillion,
surmounted
with a parti-colored flag, which was waving in the evening
breeze, and on which I read the words, `
The Snake Eater
.'
The tent was open on one side like a door, before which there
was a curtain. Benches were placed in an amphitheatrical form
before the tent, which were then filling with people. The faint
glimmer of an early lamp was perceivable behind the dark
curtain
;
and, moved with curiosity, I bent my steps toward the
assemblage
.
I paid the requisite sum to the person who kept the
gate of a picket-fence which surrounded the amphitheatre, and
took my seat among the crowd, in the open air.
Twilight had now set in, and the twinkling of the stars could
be seen on the broad bosom of the Mississippi, as it moved in
noiseless solemnity toward the ocean. The cypresses assumed
the semblance of weird and ghastly forms against the sky; and
the occasional sweep of a belated hawk from the far-off prairies,
with his dismal scream, gave token that the day had died, and
that its dirge was sounding.
Presently, at the tinkle of a little bell, the curtain of the tent
was lifted. A young man was seated at a table, with a box
before
him, covered with glass, and apparently subdivided into two
or more drawers. He seemed about eight-and-twenty years of
age; his face was thin, and a leaden wanness overspread his
features
;
but his sunken eye had that supernatural brightness so
often seen in the eyes of the consumptive. His voice, though
faint, was musical, but interrupted by an occasional cough; and
as he removed his cravat, and turned his wristbands over the cuffs
of his coat, he said:
`The company has assembled to see the Snake Eater. If any
one wishes to satisfy himself with regard to the reptile which I
23
am now about to devour, in the presence of you all, and to
restore
again from my throat, alive, he will please draw nigh.'
He turned the closed cover of the box over toward the
audience
,
as he made this observation, and disclosed to the sight a
hideous rattlesnake. It was coiled; and when disturbed,
elevated
it spiry head from its circle, and while its forked tongue
played
with a rapid motion, it darted against the glass in vain attempts
to escape, while its rattles continued to quiver, with a violent and
whizzing sound, accompanied by that apparent flattening of the
head, which denotes the highest pitch of resentment. Its dilated
eye shot fire; and the coarse scales on its contorted form grew
rugged in its anger.
After this
expos,
the Snake Eater placed the box in its original
position. A chilly shudder ran through the assembly, when,
after
turning his back to the beholder, he bent his face for a
moment
at the edge of one of the drawers, with a kind of chuckling
sound, and drew forth the horrid reptile with his hand. The
snake now seemed languid and passive, though the rattles
continued
to sound. He placed the head of the venomous serpent
to his lips; he opened his mouth, and the long spire began to
descend
.
It was an appalling sight to see that huge
monstrum
horrendum
making his way into the throat of a human being. The
cheeks of the young man began to dilate, and his complexion
became
a livid purple. His eyes seemed bursting from their
sockets
;
masses of foam gathered about his lips, and he looked as
if in the severest struggles of the last mortal agonyas if `
tasting
of death.' Several of the audience shrieked with affright.
After apparently mumbling and crunching his fearful meal, the
Snake Eater again partially opened his lips, and the forked tongue
of the reptile was seen playing, like threads of bright red fire,
between
them. Presently it began to emerge. It moved very
slowly, as if held back by other serpents that had preceded it, in
the awful deglutition of its master. As the long, loathsome folds
hung from his lips, and continued to extend, the features of the
Snake Eater assumed their wonted aspect; and in a moment, the
reptile had emerged, was re-placed in the box, and the feat was
accomplished.
After seating himself for a few seconds, to recover from the
perilous execution of his task, the Snake Eater arose and
addressed
the audience. He desired them to believe that he had
wished not to appal, but to surprise them. There was, he
acknowledged
,
an
art
in what he had done, but it was a mysterious
and undiscoverable one. `They call me mad,' he added,
bitterly
,
`and a conjurer; but a conjurer I am none, and though I
have been mad, I am not now; yet often do I wish I were. You
will denominate my calling one of foolish hazard, and perhaps of
disgust; but did you know all, you would judge of me better. I
thank you for your attendance; and if I have succeeded in
surprising
you, my aim has been won.'
The audience, in the enthusiasm of western feeling, gave the
performer three hearty cheers, and retired with wonder-stricken
faces. I lingered behind until the last had departed, and
stepped
into the tent, where the Snake Eater had drawn a few eatables
from his knapsack, which he was discussing with considerable
relish. I found him sociable, but sad. By degrees, my
observations
excited a sympathy in his mind; and, as we sat, toward
midnight, in his solitary house of canvass, the dark Mississippi
rolling below, the pale stars fretting the vault above, and the far
West stretching in dimness around, he thus began:
THE SNAKE EATER'S STORY.
`
I am
not, my friend, what you see me. Though regarded
hereabout
as one who has dealings with `familiar spirits and
wizards
,'
I am only a heart-broken man, the child of sorrow, and
almost
without hope. I do not speak thus for your sympathy; for
human sympathy can at best but awaken afresh the wells of
mournful tenderness in my breast, without pouring one ray of
sunshine upon the troubled fountains; they must flow on in
darkness, without a prospect of day. Listen to me.
`Eight short years ago, with the spirit of adventure stirring
within me, I came as it were directly from the walls of a
university
,
in one of the Atlantic states, to this `far country.' I came
with prodigal endowments from my father; and seeking the
then
frontiers of civilization, embarked in trade with settlers and
Indians
.
I bought furs and sold all kinds of mercantile riches. I
prospered; my capital re-doubled itself, and in all respects was
prosperous. You may perhaps desire to know my motive for
thus leaving the charms of society, and seeking the seclusion of
the wilderness. It was the strongest of motives,
human affection
.
An uncle had preceded me. He had a ward, to whom I had
been deeply and devotedly attached from my childhood. She
was the paragon of her sex. I speak not as a rhapsodist, or with
enthusiasm; for the loveliest being that ever came from the
hands of God into this lower world could not excel her for
beauty. She made that beauty perfect, by the graces of a mind,
pure and clear as the forming diamond. Her voice was melody;
her smile a burst of living and pearly light; and her clam blue
eyes were the sweet expositors of a sinless affection. The young
peach, when the airs and beams of summer have awakened its
ripening blushes, or the pomegranate, as it glows among leaves
that tremble to the rich chant of the nightingale, surpassed not
her cheeks, for bloom or loveliness, when her fair hair was
divided
on her brow, and fell in masses of waving and silken gold
around them. Truly, I loved her with my whole soul. She was
my idol; my cynosure; the centre of every desire, and the
object
of every aspiration.
`We were married. Time went on, and brought me a bud
from the rose that I had established in my green bower of home.
We were blest indeed. Aloof from society, though we missed a
few of its luxuries, we suffered none of its vexatious and
demoralizing
corruptions. On Sabbath days, we rode many miles
through the wilderness, to worship our Maker in his sanctuary,
and hear the word of life from the lips of those who journeyed
through the forest on missionary enterprises, and for the
edification
of the believing; ambassadors from a court, of which the
most noble court on earth affords not the faintest emblem.
`On the day that our dear little Sarali attained her second
year, she was seated by my counter, and her mother was
standing
by, when three fierce-looking Indians entered the store.
They had evidently travelled a long way, for their leggins were
torn and dirty, and their feet were almost bare. I recognised
one of them instantly, as
The Crouching Wolf,
a desperate being,
who hung alternately around the skirts of the settlements, begging
for rum, or getting it in barter for small peltry, which he obtained
in the chase. Just one year before, he had visited me for the
purpose of procuring the fire-water, or ardent spirit. I refused
him, and he left me with a vow of future vengeance.
` `Hoogh!' said he, as he reeled up, with his gruff-looking
companions, toward the counter, where my child was playing,
and my wife stood: `The Crouching Wolf said he would come
back. He wants the talking water; he wants that orrevenge.
He will have
one!
'
`I tried to reason with him, but he was deaf to reason. He
had already tasted from the flagon of one of his red comrades,
and the fumes were in his brain.
` `Come, medicine-man, the Wolf wants the fire-milk. Where
is it? He can not wait. His spirit is up, and his forehead is
warm.'
`I saw he grew desperate, but my resolution was fixed: I
sternly denied him. It was a fatal denial.
`He stepped back a few paces, growled some gututral
sentences
to his companions, and the three then advanced toward my
child. I was motionless, and paralyzed with terror. As the
Wolf approached my daughter, he drew a tomahawk from his
belt, and flourished it on high. I sprang toward him, but was
pushed back by his companions. The dear innocent,
unaffrighted
,
smiled in the face of the Crouching Wolf, and it seemed as
if the cheerful purity of her look stayed his vengeful arm. He
paused, until a scream from the mother aroused the terror of her
first-born. She shrunk back from the relentless savage, while
her mother was kept, like myself, at bay, and while her sweet red
lip, chiselled like her mother's, was quivering with dismay, she
said in childish simplicity:
` `Naughty Indian; if he hurts Sarah, ma will be angry, and
punish him.' As she said this, she burst into tearsher last for
ever!
`In an instant, the trenchant weapon of the infuriated Indian
clove in sunder the head of my babe; in the next, his excited
comrades had murdered the wife of my bosom. I have an
indistinct
and horrid remembrance of my burning store; the red
fiends yelling over the consuming roof and walls; my escape to
the forest; the rest was but silence and oblivion. I was a
madman
!
`Ten months after, I found myself in New-Orleans. I had
reached the city, no one knew how; had been conveyed to a
hospital, kindly treated, and discharged as cured; but an
outcast
and a beggar. Misfortunes seldom come singly. My father
had died; and as I had already received my share of his estate,
the residue melted away among a host of brothers. My
inheritance
had been destroyed by the Indians. I was without a home
or a friend.
`How I subsisted, I scarcely know. At last, as I was one
day walking on the levee, I saw a group collected around an
Indian
,
who was performing certain tricks from a box, with a
rattlesnake
.
It was the Crouching Wolf.
` `The murderer of my wife and child!' I exclaimed, as I
penetrated
through the ring, and with one huge blow felled the vile
monster to the earth. I seized him by the throat; I placed my
knee upon his breast. In a few moments, he was a distorted and
ghastly corpse beneath my feet.
`My award of retribution was considered just, and no effort
was made to arrest me. Availing myself of the box belonging to
the Crouching Wolf, which I contended was mine as a debt, I
soon learnt the mystery of his art, as it were by intuition. The
upper drawer of the box contained the real rattlesnake; the other,
merely the skin of one, which could be inflated by the breath, at
will. The motion of the tongue, which was dried, and had
wires within, was produced by loadstone; the movement of the
rattles by the same cause.
*
*
The
writer has now in his possession a curiosity from the far West, in the
shape of a large prairie-beetle, which is composed, among other ingredients, of paper
and wood. At the end of every claw and feeler, where they are attached to the
body, are small bits of lead, impregnated with loadstone. This lifeless imitation
performs all the movements of the actual beetle; moves, and extends its limbs,
precisely
like nature. It would puzzle the profoundest entomologist, on a common
examination, `to wotte whether that it livedde or was dede.'
`Filled from the lungs, it could readily be taken into the
mouth, and compressed into a very small compass, and while
repassing
outward, inflated again. I bought a new snake from a
museum, which I killed, and prepared according to the model
before me. I could not endure the thought of even using the
same instruments formerly employed by the destroyer of all
that I most loved on earth, and I turned from his trickery with a
feeling of almost positive loathing. A little practice made me
an adept in the mystery of snake-eating, and I have since
wandered
in loneliness from town to town, attempting this curious
enterprise. My pecuniary success has been sufficient for my
comfort and convenience, and the danger of the feat is only in
appearance. With a slight exertion, I can resolve my face into
the colors and contortions you witnessed this evening, and which
heighten the interest of the spectacle.
This
`power of face' is not unusual among the dramatic fraternity. The
celebrated
tragedian,
Booth,
can easily flush his face with the deepest suffusion of
guilt or anger, and at the next moment cause it to bear the livid hue of death.
This power often adds a tremendous effect to his
personations.
But these things can
only temporarily divert my thoughts, for I carry within my heart
an aching fever, which no prosperity can allay or remove. The
objects that
have
cheered me, can cheer me no more. I stand
alone in this wilderness world; a mourner and a pilgrim. My
visions are of my wife and child; my day dreams are of them;
but I must suffer as you see, until I meet them in that better
country, where the sun descends not, and darkness is unknown;
where the wicked cease from troubling, and the weary are at rest.
I can forget my childfor her existence seems to me like a
misty trancein the fond assurance that the sparkling dew-drop
has exhaled to heaven; but for the cherished rose that sustained
it, I cease not to grieve. Alas, for the wife of my bosom! Well
can I say, with one who, perhaps, has loved and mourned like
me:
`
Alas,
for the clod that is resting now,
On those slumbering eyeson that faded brow!
Wo for the cheek that has ceased to bloom,
For the lips that are dumb in the noisome tomb:
Their melody broken, their fragrance gone
Their aspect cold as the Parian stone:
Alas! for the hopes that with thee have died
Oh, loved one! would I were by thy side!
`Yet the `joy of grief' it is mine to bear:
I hear thy voice in the twilight air;
Thy smile of sweetness untold I see,
When the visions of evening are borne to me;
Thy kiss on my dreaming lip is warm,
My arm embraceth thy yielding form:
Then I wake in a world that is sad and drear,
To feel in my bosomthou art not here!' '
The
morning had already began to fire the eastern horizon,
beyond the distant wilderness, and to sparkle on the river, when
I parted with the Snake Eater, and pursued my journey. On
my return from the great metropolis of the Mississippi, I found
that he had died, and gone to rejoin the lost treasures of his
affection
,
in a clime where Sorrow has no residence, and where
neither reptile nor poison can enter.
DRAMATIC ALTERATIONS.
`
Tempora mutantur, et nos mutamur in illis,
'
is a saw of all
earthly saws the tritest, yet it strikes
pat
upon the Drama. How
has that `department of the fine arts' varied and turned, like an
anxious politician, until you can discern neither the ancient
coherence
of its comely parts, nor its present estate! Divine
Shakspeare
!
couldst thou now revisit the glimpses of the moon, how
would thy fine taste be outraged, and thy noble spirit grieved,
by the perceiving flashes of inspiration, which centuries agone
issued from thy luminous mind, now dimmed by modern
playwrights
,
and diluted into weak flickerings of sentiment! How
would it vex thy poor ghost! Verily, the dramatic abominations
of the day might create a soul of anger under the ribs of Death.
Take, for example, the play of Richard III. When the bard
of Avon made that `pityful tragedie,' he adhered religiously to
historical facts. The language of all the interlocutors was
characteristic
and consistent. Look at that tragedy now-a-days.
Speeches `like vermin on the lion's crest,' have been introduced
as clap-traps, which show a foolish ambition in the fool that made
and the zanies who use them; history is distortedthe poet is
mangled.
The task would be quite too tedious to point out all the errors
which the march of histrionic improvement has engrafted like
cankerous buds upon one of the noblest intellectual trees of
Shakspeare's rearing. In many instances the subordinates of the
bloody play are omitted altogether; and, as in the case of
Tyrrell
and the young princes, the mere instigators of the murder
are made actors in it. Most people, listening to the present
performance
of Richard III., would be led to
infer,
at least, from
the modernized text, that Tyrrell himself was the person who in
the night-time flung the princely corpses down the Thames. We
miss the passage where the sanguinary and ambitious baronet
soliloquizes
respecting `Dighton and Forest whom he did suborn,'
to do the deed, and who it is conclusively known, were its
diabolical
perpetrators. That the young nephews were thrown into
the river, is a very general though erroneous impression.
History
,
as we shall see, buries them in the tower.
With perhaps the majority of play-goers, the Drama usurps
the province, and supplies the teachings of history. It embalms,
for posterity, the floating facts of the olden time; and those
heroes have a small chance for posthumous fame who do not
execute
some act in their lives that is peculiarly
stage-effectual,
and
may be in some way perpetuated by plays. Thus the great
Winkelreid of Switzerland, in contrast with William Tell, is
comparatively unknown. How important is it then in all
dramatic
efforts, such as those of the immortal Shakspeare, that the
truths of history should never be stretched nor polluted!
There is an eloquent passage in Richard III.; the soliloquy
of the monarch, on the evening before the battle of Bosworth
Field. Its intrinsic beauty makes it acceptable any where, but
its utterance by Richard, under the circumstances, is rather out
of place. It was originally a part of a chorus, with which many
of the prominent acts of Shakspeare's plays were at first
introduced
,
in imitation of the Greek tragedies. The speech of King
Henry, also, on receiving news of his son's death, does not
belong
at all to Richard. It is from one of the Henrys.
How many play-goers have shouted and clapped their hands,
pitlings, boxites, and all, when the crook-backed tyrant, on
hearing
of the capture of his enemy, exclaims:
`Off with his head! So much for Buckingham!'
and what hearer of taste has not deemed the expression
incongruous
and abrupt? It is enough to say that it is none of
Shakspeare's
.
The self-approving Mr. Tate, who introduced it, is the
putative father of the barbarism. So also the dying speech of
Gloster, `Perdition catch thy soul,' etc., is an addition by some
other mind, and though smooth and forcible, is
not
like
Shakspeare
.
Perhaps many of the readers of the
Knickerbocker
are
unacquainted
with the contemporaneous history of the bloody
Gloster
,
and therefore they cannot object to hearing him spoken of
by an ancient and most veritable chronicler, who lived not long
after the tyrant's time. Rare and curious indeed is that
black-letter
tome, `Ye Cronikels of Iohn Stovve,' wherefrom the
following
quaint but right credible historie hath been taken.
`
On ye
4
th of Iuly,
Richard iij. hee came to the Tower by
water with his wiffe, and made 14 knightes of ye bath.' During
that moneth he had numerous victims arrested as rebels, among
whom was one
John Smith
(the name was extant even then);
and all of whom he charged with a design to fire the city of
London
,
so that while it was burning they might rescue Prince
Edward
and his brother the Duke of York, out of the tower:
`Now,' says the honest Stowe, `there fel myscheeves thick; and as the
thing euil gotten, is neuer wel kepit, thorough all Richard's tyme neuer
ceased there cruell deths and slawters till his own destruction ended them.
But as he finished his time with the best deth and the most righteous, that
is to wit with his owne, so he began with the most pityous and wickedI
meene the lamentible murther of his innocent nevues, the young king and
his tender brother, whose death and finall infortune hath natheless comen
so far in question that some did remain in dovt whether they were destroyed
in his daies or no. But I shall rehearse you the dolorous death of these
babes, not after every way that I have heard, but by such men and by such
means as methinketh it were hard but it should be true.'
Richard knew that while his nephews lived, he could have no
right to the realm, and that therefore their death must ensue.
Shakspeare has nobly expressed this in Gloster's famous
soliloquy
.
The manner in which he effected this, is succinctly
recorded
by Stowe. He tried at first, through his special and
trustworthy servant, John Greene, to prevail on Sir Robert
Brakenbry
,
constable of the Tower, to attempt the murder, which that
functionary flatly declined. Greene returned with his answer to
Richard, who was then at Warwick:
`Secretly displeased, Richard said, on the same night to his secret
page, `Ah, whom shall a man trust? Those that I have broughten up
myself
,
those that I had weened would most surely serve me, even these fail
me, and at my commandment would doe nothing for me.' `Sir, (quoth the
page,) there lieth one on your pallet without, that I dare well say to do
your grace's pleasure the thing were right hard that he would refuse,'
meaning
by this Sir James Tyrrell, which was a man of right goodly personage;
(modern playwrights make him a ruffian) and for nature's gifts worthie to
haue serued a much better prince, if he had served God, and by grace
obtained
so much truth and good will, as he had strength and wit. This man
had an high heart, and sore longed upward, not rising yet so fast as he had
hoped, being hindered and kept under by ye meanes of Sir Richard
Ratcliffe
and Sir William Catesby, which longed for ne moe partners of the
prince's favor. Richard tooke this time to put him foreward, and by such
wise to doo him good, that all the enemies he had except the diuel, could
never had done him so much.
`Upon hearing his page's wordes, Kynge Richard arose, (for in this
communication
he had been sitting at the draughtconvenient carpet for such
a council,) and came out into a pallet chamber, in which he found Sir
Iames and Sir Thomas Tirels, of persons like and brethren of bloud, but
nothing of kin in conditions. Then said ye Kynge merrily vnto them:
`What, Sirs, are ye in bedde so soone?' and calling Sir James, brake
secretly
to him his minde in this mischievous matter, in which he found him
nothing straunge. Wherefore on the morrow he sent him to Brakenbry,
with a letter by which he was commanded to deliver to Sir James all the
keyes of the tower for one night, to the end he might there accomplish the
king's pleasure in such things as he had given him commandment. After
the which letter deliuered and keyes receiued, Sir Iames appointed the next
night ensuing for to destroie them, deuising before and preparing ye meanes.
When the eldest of the young princes was told that his Vncle would be
kynge, he was sore abashed, and sighed and said, `Alas, I would my Vncle
would let me haue my liffe yet, though I should leve my Kyngedomme.'
Thenne he that tolde him ye tale, used him with good words, and put him
in ye best comfort he could. But forthwith was the prince and his brother
both shut vp and all other remoued from them, onely one called Black
Wille, or William Slaughter except, sette to serue them, and see all sure.
After which time ye prince neuer tyde his pointes nor aught roughte of
himself, but with ye babe his brother, lingred in thought and great
beauinesse
,
till his traitrous death deliuered him of that wretchedness, for Sir
Iames Tirell deuised that they should be murdered in their beds. To ye
execution whereof he appointed Miles Forest, one of the four that kept
them; a fellow fleshed in murther aforetime. To him he ioyned one Ioh.
Dighton, his owne horse-keeper; a bigge, broade, square, stronge knaue.
`Then all other being remoued from them, this Miles Forrest and Iohn
Dighton about midnighte (ye sweete children lyeing in their beddes) came
into ye chamber and sodainely lapped them up among ye clothes, and so
bewrapped
them and enstrangled them, keeping down ye feather bed and
pillowes
harde unto their mouthes, that within a while, smothered and
stifled, their sweete breaths failing, they gaue to God their innocent souls
into the ioyes of Heauen, leauing to the tormentors their bodies dead in ye
bedde. Which after that the wretches perceiued, the first by the struggling
with ye paines of death and after long lying still to be throughly dead, they
laid their bodies naked out upon the bed and fetched Sir Iames to see them,
which vpon the sight of them
caused these murtherers to bury them at the
staires foot, meetely deepe in ye grounde under a great hepe of stones
.'
When Tyrrell conveyed the news to Richard at Warwick, he
was overjoyed at the success of his dreadful and cruel plot.
Several chroniclers, Master Moore, Stowe, Howes, etc., assert the
tradition that Tyrrell was knighted on the spot. But the
consummate
hypocrite, Richard, affected to be both chagrined and
indignant that the bodies were buried in so vile a corner, because
`they were kynge's sonnes,' and ought to have been interred in
a better tomb. It was said that the bodies were afterward
removed
by Brakenbry, but where, he never condescended to tell.
It is not impossible that the skeletons of those unfortunate princes
passed by discovery and reversion, into the hands of some
ancient
doctor or surgeon! Who can tell? Hamlet speculated
at a wilder rate than this, and yet with perfect plausibility. He
proved by respectable ratiocination, that
`Imperious Csar, dead, and turned to clay,
Might stop a hole to keep the wind away.'
Tyrrell was afterward imprisoned in the Tower for treason against
King Henry the VII. There, both himself and Dighton were
examined, and confessed the murder of the princes as above
written; but as touching the places whither the `fair corpses'
were removed, they could impart no information.
A more diabolical event, if we except the sad story of the
Cenci, can scarcely be found in history. It seems to have moved
the tender heart and aroused the warmest sympathies of the
worthy Stowe, who thus `entreateth' the subject:
`In this wise, as I haue learned of them that much knew and little cause
had to lye, were these two princes, these innocent, tender children, borne
of most royal bloude, brought up in grete wealth, likely long to liue, rule
and rayne in ye relme, by traitrous tyranny depriued of their estate, shortly
shut vp in prisonn, priuily slaine and murtheredtheir dainty bodies caste
God he wots where, by the cruell ambition of their Vnnatural Vncle and
his dispiteous tormentors. Which things on euery part well pondred, God
neuer gaue this world a notabler example neyther in what mischief
worketh
the enterprise of an hie heart, or finally what end ensueth such
dispiteous
cruelty. For to begin with the ministres, Miles Forest at Saint
Martins
rotted peacemeal away, Dighton
indeed yet walketh ye earth
(he was a
contemporary of Stowe) in good possibility to be hanged ere he die. But
Sir Iames Tyrel dyed at ye Towre hill, beheaded for treason;
and kynge
Richard himself was slaine in ye the fielde,
*
*
`
After
ye battel of Bosworth Field,' says our worthy historian, `ye dead corps
of Richard was as shamefully carried to ye towne of Leister, as hee gorgeously the
the day before with pomp departed out of ye same towne; for his body was naked
to ye skinne, not so much as one clout about him, and he was trussed up on
horseback
behind a pursuivant at armes like a dogge or caffe, ye head and armes
hanging
on one side of ye horse, and ye leggis vpon the other; and all sprinkeled with
myre and bloud, was brought to ye Gray-Friers Churche, within ye towne, and
there homely buried, when he had rained three yeeres, two moneths, and
one day.'
hacked and hewed of his
enemies
hands; carried on horse-back, dead; his hair in despight torne and
tugged like to a Curre Dogg: and the mischefe that he tooke was within less
than
three
yeares of ye mischeves that he did;
and yet all the mean time
spent in much paine and trouble outwarde, much feare, anguish, and
sorrow
within. For I haue heard by credible report of such as were secrett
with his chamberlaines, that after his abominable deed done, he neuer had
quiet in his mynde; he neuer bedeemed himself sure: wheneuer he went
abroad his eien whirled about, his body privily fenced, his hand euer vpon
his daggerhis countenance and manner like one alwaies ready to strike
again; he took ill rest a-nights; lay long waking and musing, sore wearied
with care and watch; rather slumbered than slept, troubled with fearful
dreams: sometimes sodainely started up and leapt out of his bedde, to runne
about ye chamber, so was his restless heart continually tossed and tumbled
with the hideous impression and awful remembrance of his abominable
deede.'
We marvel whether a better description of what might not
inaptly
be termed an earthly hell, can be found in all history, than
the foregoing portrait of Richard, during those three memorable
years in which his plans of insatiate ambition were working to
their fulfilment. In his immortal play, Shakspeare has caught
the very aspect of Gloster's form, and exhibited the concrete
essence
of his foul spirit. Tyranny must always be miserable to
its dispenser; and a crown got and maintained by blood, sits like
corroding iron, not on the brow alone, but on the heavy heart of
the usurper. Such were the feelings of Richard at Warwick,
and of Tiberius at Capre; and such will ever be the fate of
those who rest wrongfully in their regal seats, and abuse their
ill-gotten prerogatives. Happily, in modern times, little
despotism
exists in kingly dominions. The people hold in their hands
the balance of power, and monarchs themselves are accountable
to their subjects.
MUSICAL INFELICITIES.
I was
much pleased by the perusal of the lament of one
Old-school
,
in a recent number of the
Knickerbocker
wherein he
discoursed with true feeling and discretion upon the theme of
Music `under the Reformation.' True it is, that we receive no
longer that auricular gratification from sweet and simple sounds,
once commended so delectably to our senses. The reason is
obvious. There is a mania among our modern singers for mere
execution,
which drives harmony and melody at once into the
shade. I shall treat of this, in connexion with others, as among
the chiefest of my infelicities.
Naturally, I have tender ears. As recipients of the different
modulations of sound, they are peculiarly subtile. My nervous
organization is delicate; and those airs that melted into my soul,
and kindled up my heart in my better days, still charm those
recesses
of thought and feeling with an influence truly magical.
The enchantment of association twines itself among the notes,
and awakens all the dreams of the past, until the tear is on my
eyelid, and the throb of remembered delight trembling in my
bosom like a reed shaken by the wind. I return with the elastic
and visionary tread of memory, into that Happy Valley of Youth,
where I spent the sunny morning of my days. I see the streams
sparkling blue and bright along the meadows; the bird chants
in the wild wood; the flocks are white on the green hill-side;
the herds are cropping the herbage in shady places, and lashing
the summer flies, murmuring as they sting; and, above all,
swells the pomp of the unsearchable sky, and `gorgeous
companies
of clouds.' These, like the pictures of a panorama, ever
arise to my mental vision at the sound of music, such as I heard
in other times. Mornings, and sunsets, and landscapes that
were dear to me of old, throng around me. I give up the
present
,
and live in the past.
But of late these emotions are strangers to my breast, and the
pictures have faded from my mind. I hear singers announce
and execute songs called by the same names as those I used to
hear; but how different their sound! New shakes, quavers, and
variations, murder their sweetness at the very portals of my ear,
and put all their associations to flight.
Affectation,
too, that
bane of good singing, has come so much in fashion, that it is
quite impossible to hear a simple song without the modern
emendations
.
If you do, it will be from some fresh-hearted creature,
with affections as pure as the rose on her cheek, who spends a
few winter weeks among friends or relations in the city. Then,
to a guileless mind, her attractions in music are transcendent,
and she shows among the starched, affected demoiselles of
fashion
,
`like to a snowy dove trooping with crows.' I have a
good friend, Kate J, who now and then comes to the city;
and I hail her arrival as a blessing. She sings with simplicity,
but with correctness and good taste. She feels what she sings;
and does not, parrot-like, repeat the sonorous ejaculations and
half-musical intonations, expressive of spurious sorrow or delight,
taught by some mortally affected master. I sit by her piano, and
in a moment my spirit is wandering in the dominions of
recollection
,
and finds the things of the present to be but as entities of
the twilight, flitting unobservedly around.
I have said that
affectation
is now-a-days the bane of social
music. And so it is. Your city-bred Miss, following the
teachings
of her instructor, does not permit her friends to hear, or
rather to understand more than half the words in a song. Some
of them are butchered on her lips; some of them come forth
clipped of their proportions in such wise that you know them not;
others are murdered in her thorax. This is not her fault, for
she learns and sings `according to the mode;' therefore her
tenderness
is
affetuoso,
and her feeling second-hand. If she visit the
Theatre, she will hear ladies and gentlemen applauded to the
echo, who if they read a song with the pronunciation with which
they
sung
it, would be hissed out of sight in a moment. For
example, I have heard a fashionable female vocalist, whose name
I leave unmentioned, sing Black-Eyed Susan with a
pronunciation
exactly
as expressed in the stanza below:
`Yole-d' in the Dunes tha' vlit was moored
Tha' sydrimures wa-iving to tha' woind,
W'en
black-guard
Zeuzin kim on bo-awd:
Say
war
shall E me tr-r-rew lev foind?
Tell me, e-ye jovial Zoilars, tell me e-tr-r-ew
Does e'my zweet William zale am'eng e-yer cr-rew?'
Now why is it that such errors are tolerated? and that they are
imitated?
The musical old gentleman in Salmagundi, who
worked several summers in producing a change in the chimes of
Trinity church bells, so that instead of going
di do ding dong,
they might go
ding dong do di,
was far better employed than the
masters or the vocalists who inculcate affectation. Let us have
sincerity in music
. It is, of all things, the sweetest and most
acceptable
.
Let the ear have its honestly-desired fruition of
harmony
,
and not be mocked with the shadow of music and feeling,
when the substance is wanting.
THE DUELIST.
`Thou takest a
life
away
A holy, human lifethe life
God
gave!'
Milman's `Fazio
.'
A few
months ago, in company with a professional friend, I
visited a Lunatic Asylum, in the neighborhood of one of our
most populous cities. It was a mild autumn day; of that rich
and breathing kind, which wears less of earth than heaven; when
the garniture of the year displays a loveliness like the cheek of
Beauty, tinted with the hectic of coming dissolution, which seems
more a herald of life and promise, than of death or decay. The
institution I have mentioned, stood upon an eminence,
surrounded
by groves, waving like a mass of rainbows in the air. The
scene from its site was beautiful in the extreme. Blue
mountains
melted afar into the sky; fair vales and bright rivers smiled
and rolled between; the city was near at hand, with its towers
and battlements, `and banners floating in the sunny air;' all was
delightful, all serene. My spirit received into its inmost depths
the harmonizing influences of the view; and I could not help
contrasting the peaceful calmness that lay like a charm upon the
landscape around, with the murmurs of phrensy which reached my
ear, as I stood with my friend at the great door of the asylum,
waiting, for a moment, to enjoy the prospect, before we entered.
Voices were heard, in various tone and measure, singing, talking,
and howling, in mingled confusion. It was as if Limbo had
been dispeopled, and we were listening to the wailings of its
miserable
inhabitants.
As we entered, I was struck with the regularity and order
which every where prevailed in the appearance of the mansion.
It seemed a place where Reason, could it be permitted to enjoy
so sweet a retreat alone, might wrap itself in the mantle of
undisturbed
reflection; where Love might nestle and be delighted;
and from whence the baneful passions of our nature might be
utterly
banished.
As we strayed along the solemn corridors, catching ever and
anon rich views of the distant scenery from the windows and
embrasures
,
I could not but admire the generosity which had
planned such a Refuge. It had been very successful. The
exertions
of its officers and various superintendents had been so
well rewarded, as to give pleasure to every philanthropist in the
large community of liberal hearts to whom their yearly reports
were submitted. Blessed, surely, of Heaven, will those be, who
thus bind up the weary bosoms that have been pierced by the
bitter shafts of affliction; who re-unite the disjointed links of
memory and reason, and cause the streams of thought to flow
with the renewal of a fresh and healthy impulse, through the
soul!
We entered many of the apartments. Several contained
females
,
sitting in gentle abstraction, humming some half-forgotten
song, and repeating in audible cadence the disordered images
that rose to the mind, like the changeful hues of a kaleidoscope,
in a thousand beautiful but fantastic and momentary forms.
At the extremity of a wide gallery, extending the entire length
of the mansion, were two rooms, larger than any on the same
floor, and, when the doors were shut, with no communication
whatever, even in sight, between them. One was occupied by a
female, the other by a young gentleman who scarcely seemed
`Less than Archangel ruined, or the excess
Of glory obscured.'
He was tall, and of an erect, manly form. He was pacing his
apartment, and separated from the observer, as his door opened,
by a close iron palisade which extended into the room about a
foot from the door. On one ankle was a chain which clanked
incessantly, as he strode to and fro through the apartment, like a
lion in his cage. He scarcely deigned a look at us, but
wandered
on, turning at regular intervals, and sometimes pausing for a
moment, with flushed features, to place his hand on his forehead,
as if to repress a tide of swelling thoughts, which seemed ready
to burst the boundary of the brain. His forehead was wide, but
not high. Around it the dark hair hung in masses of gloomy
shadow, or drooped in the lank dampness of perspiration. There
was an expression of stern and implacable bitterness about the
lip; but it was in the eye, that the direful meanings of phrensy
were the most convincingly exhibited. The pupils dilated with
a fearful expression, while, now and then, he would lengthen and
retard his pace, as if measuring a space of ground accurately
with his tread. Then he would stand sidewise, in a soldier's
attitude
,
and with his eye fixed closely on some distant object, lift
his arm to the level of his breast, reach it strongly out from his
side, his shifting eye quickly following the curl of his fore-finger,
as if taking aim for a pistol shot. In this position he would
remain
for nearly a minute, at the end of which his eye would
close as if from horror; a shuddering ran through his limbs, and
his arm dropped nervelessly by his side. Then he would curse,
and weep
such
tears! They seemed wrung like life-blood from
the very fountain of his heart.
`Poor fellow!' said my comrade: `three years ago, he was
one of the most attractive and promising youths I ever knew.
He was the best scholar in his class at college, for learning
seemed to come to him without an effort. Energetic and
ambitious
,
but with most unbridled passions, he allowed nothing to
stand in the way of his desires. He was beloved by some for his
freedom of spirit, but condemned by the judicious for the
recklessness
of his aims. An unfortunate affair has brought him
hither; and
I,
used as I am to histories of crime and sorrow,
have never been able to retain a sufficient mastery of my
feelings
,
to relate his story as I know it, even to the most intimate
friend. When he first reached the asylum, he was a raving
maniac. Several months passed by, and his disorder grew more
temperate and mild. There were occasions when he would not
for days utter an irrational word. He desired that writing
materials
should be allowed him, and he wrote many sheets closely
full. These he tied together in the form of a book, with fanciful
strings of blue and red silk, and used almost daily to read over,
marking out, with apparent care, every inelegant or irrelevant
word. Earnest hopes were entertained of his recovery, at no
distant period, when the admission of a lunatic lady into the
opposite
apartment, and of whom he caught a glimpse through his
open door as she entered, drove him at once into a settled
delirium
.
In this state he has continued ever since. Increasing
weakness now marks his disorder; his appetite has declined;
fitful ravings disturb his repose; no drowsy potion can calm his
mind; and he sometimes, especially in summer nights, howls
away the doleful watches, in all the agony of a doomed spirit. A
few months, I fear, will seal his destiny.'
The conversation of my friend seemed to have no effect upon
the prisoner before us. He appeared wrapt up in the thick
darkness
of his own imaginations, and gave none but vague tokens
that he recognised our presence. Indeed, until then, he had
scarcely glanced in that direction. My friend wished to try the
effect of a new face upon him, (as he had seen none but himself
and a domestic attendant for several months, strict seclusion
having been advised). Accordingly, he retired into the hall, and
with his extended cane, (himself unseen,) rapped against the
threshold, the usual salute.
The maniac turned his face toward me, and started back with
wild surprise. `
Why,
sir,' said he, `have you not been to see
me before? I have been imprisoned in this cell, by order of
24
Cleostratus, because I refused to explain his epicycles before the
faculty atcollege. He wrote a note to them; Socrates
signed it, Plato stuck
his
sign-manual on it, and I was expelled!
Sir,' he continued, `they have got Cleopatra in the other room;
and she is trying to kill me! Twenty times in a night, with the
fire of a demon in her eye, and the poisonous blood coursing
over her bosom, does she open that door where you stand, and
let loose from a box which she got of Pandora, a swarm of asps
and scorpions on my floor. Yes; you know it, for at this
moment
you are scowling upon me, as if you were leagued with her!
Fiend! What have I done to her, or you? Where is my friend?
My friendha! ha! ha!
my
Friend
?'
I trembled at his manner and his words. He continued to go
on, in language similar to that I have quoted, uttered without
much connection or relevancy, in a voice hollow and sepulchral.
The play of his features was agonizing to behold. What can be
more terrible than a mind in ruins, `like sweet bells jangled out
of tune?' The stare of natural idiotcy is not so painful to
receive
,
because we know, as we look on the sufferer, that he has
never fallen from a high estate; but when we meet the glances
of a disturbed and restless eye, flashing with phrensy, and shifting
every way, as if tossed about by the boiling fervors of a `
heat-oppressd
brain;' when we remember that once, perhaps but
lately, it shone with the scintillations of wit and reason; then it is,
that we can faintly apprehend the inherent greatness, and delicate
dependencies of the immortal mind. It is fearful to see the light
of
God
extinguished in the soul; to behold it reduced to a chaos:
to note the obscuration of a spark whose divine lustre, next to
the vast spheres of heaven, affords the most convincing proof of
an ever-watchful and omnipotent intelligence; and assures us
that man is indeed `but little lower than the angels.'
I was so completely absorbed in contemplating the features and
movements of the maniac before me, that I felt as if spell-bound
in a dream. Whether an influence, akin to sympathy of thought
or feeling, is conveyed by a lunatic to his observer, I know not;
but certain it was, that every glance, shot from the penetrative eye
of the being before me, awakened a new interest in his behalf.
He ceased speaking, and walked on, turning with heavy steps,
and humming occasionally the faint notes of disremembered
music
,
that came to his mind, half cheerful, half sad; the wrecks,
perchance, of sounds that had melted and won his heart in better
years. My companion still continued to stand aloof, anxious to
know what the consequences of my interview might be.
Abstraction
seemed to be the maniac's chief characteristic. Bitter
memories, it was evident, were at work in his hand. At last he
stopped suddenly, and said in a deep, sober tone:
`Do you know that my chain reaches to that corner, and that
desk? It does, upon my honor. Yes, upon my
honor
. Men
fight for honor, they die for honor, they plunge themselves into
rivers of fire and bloodfor
honor!
Oh God! I have
I
have!'
Words cannot convey the desperation of his language, or the
horror that sate upon his countenance, as he gave it breath. It
was like the features of the thunder-scarred and dark-browed spirit,
in Milton, whose cheek, blanched by tempests of dire hail from
the treasuries of the Almighty, was the throne of care.
Suiting his action to his word, the prisoner approached the
desk, and took from it the identical manuscript which my friend
had described. `I will give this,' said he, `to you. It is a deed
of all my property. I bequeath it for your benefit. Now I look
at you again, you seem a friend.' Here, without an effort, or
apparent emotion, the large tears came again to his eye. He
attempted
to reach the manuscript to me, but could not. Instantly
he approached the window, and grasped one of the wooden bars
which crossed it. With desperate energy, he drew it from the
casement, as easily as Samson disparted the withes wherewith
he was bound. Tying the colored strings to the bar, he handed
the book to me, through the grating which separated us from each
other. I took it, and thanked him for his pains. He made me
no answer, but stood like an image of stone. He seemed to have
dispossessed himself of a burden, and disposed for sleep. He
approached his pallet in the corner, and sank so quickly into
slumber, that it seemed like the mimic sleep of an actor, in
Richard
the Third, when the tyrant sees the ghost of the Plantagenets,
`Clarence and the rest,' rising around him. His breathing was
heavy and slow; large drops of sweat stood on his temples; and
an occasional groan, as if sounding from the heart, moaned
through his lips.
`Now,' said my companion, `is the time to go. Step lightly,
for the least sound will waken him at this hour.'
As we turned from his apartment, my friend moved a little
slide before a pane of glass in the door of the opposite room, and
bade me look in. A lady was sitting at the window, gazing
outward
,
with a vacant eye, and kissing her hand at the airy nothings
of her mind. The noise of the sliding panel attracted her
notice
.
She glanced toward the door. The moment my face was
recognised, she sprang toward me. `Oh, Henry,' she said, `
are
you come? How long I have waited for you! No, no,' she
added, pushing her fair hair wildly back from her brow, `you
are
not
Henryno; if you were, you would speak to me!'
I
could not speak to her. I was overpowered, bewildered.
She was a beautiful being, seemingly not twenty years of age.
The ravages of sorrow had thinned her features, and saddened
her brow; but her lips were still feverishly full and red; her blue
eye, still bright; the hues of fading loveliness, like the
reflected
tints of a damask rose, still lingered in her cheek; and her voice!
oh, how sweet and musical, did its gentle accents fall upon my
ear! Every word bespoke the stainless purity of the spirit that
fate had steeped in ruin.
I could not bear the sight, and a world could not then have
compelled me to the utterance of a word. I closed the panel,
with a distressful feeling; and taking the arm of my friend,
replied
to his attentive offers, that I would see no more.
When I returned to my lodgings in the city, I opened the
maniac's pages. I have deemed them of interest, and I now give
them to the reader, word for worda melancholy record of
passion
and crime.
`
I am
a man, smitten of
God
. I seize my pen with a
trembling
hand, to record some of the events in a life that has not been
long, but is yet wearing swiftly to its close. A world of sable
images is arrayed before the prospect of my soul. I lift the
dismal
curtain of fate from the gloom of departed years, and
discern
,
over its scenes of horror, the sun of recollection; bloody
and wan, like that pale sphere which hung above Jerusalem,
when the veil of the temple was rent in sunder; when they who
slept in their graves arose, called from their cerements by the
moaning of thunders and earthquakes on a thousand hills. The
beams of innocence have vanished for ever from my mind; the
roses that opened once around my pathway, are changed for the
night-shade and the ivy; my feet have stumbled upon the dark
mountains of error; and for the dews of pleasure, or the blooms
of hope, I inherit the vulture of regret. Remorse and pain are
knawing at my heart; and like the fabled scorpion in his
envenomed
circle, I mingle at once the poison of the adder, with the
torpor of the worm.
`The misery of years may be compressed into one short page.
I shall be brief. What I am now, I was not always. As I sit
by my window, and look out from the bars that hedge me in,
upon earth and sky, basking in that sunlight which but faintly
shadows the smile of the
Creator,
I bethink me of all the past.
My soul swells with remembrance, my heart with emotion. It
is the hour of sunset. The great orb rolls slowly down; he dips
behind the western mountains, and in gushes of solemn pomp,
ethereal brightness flows over their blue outlines, along the
landscape
.
It is a Sabbath eveningthe month is June: the distant
bells of the city load the fragrant breeze with volumes of tender
melody. Around, are aroma, and peace, and music, and
holiness
but
not with me.
`My testimony must be given. I hold my uncertain reason as
a boon which a breath may dissolve; and as its dawning day
continues, I must inscribe my record, before the night shall come.
Against myself, I am to place upon these pages a fearful witness.
I shall write as one on whom the sleepless eye of
God
looks
with a discerning vision. I shall unveil my heart. I will bare
to the day the corruption of its motives, and the deed of horror
to which they have led; the thoughts whereof have withered my
form, and scathed my brain, like the blast of a samiel. I will
call up from their dungeons, the wierd spectres of memory. I
will lift the mirror of truth before me, and describe the hideous
monster that I behold therein, though the appalling reflection
should sere my eyeballs, and make me shudder through every
nerve.
`I have been a scholar and a student. I have gone through
the studies and trials alloted to those who delve after knowledge.
I have explored the treasures of orators, dramatists, annalists, and
poets. I have bent over the breathing pages of Cicero, and
Homer, and Virgil; of schylus and Thucydides, Tacitus, and
Livy. I have quaffed long and deep at the fountains of ancient
lore; but the only spring that ever cheered me has dried up,
and left for my seeking lip the sand alone.
`I have loved. There lies the secret of my torture and my
doom. At the junior exhibition of my class, as I was speaking
before a large and brilliant assembly in the University chapel, I
saw, for the first time, an object that riveted my gaze and secured
my admiration, my affection. She was young, and oh, how
supremely
lovely! I paused with a sense of intoxicating transport.
Her liquid blue eyes met mine; her fine Grecian features
seemed
lit with an unearthly intelligence; the blush of innocence was
on her cheek. The periods of my salutatory dropped slowly
from my lips; I forgot my duties, my honors; I was `clothed
upon with love!'
`When the exercises of the day were over, I made enquiries
after the fair being who had so moved me. She was a partial
stranger in town, remaining at the dwelling of a relation. A year
previous she had visited the city, and been addressed by a
classmate
with whom my terms of friendship were strict and intimate.
He had been accepted as her suitor, and the day of their union
had already been appointed.
`Fired with passion, I sought her acquaintance. I met her
often; and amidst the attractions of a society not deficient in
female
loveliness, I found her ever the sole ascendant star.
God!
how
I loved her! I waited upon her footsteps, and bent to her
beck, as one that obeys the bidding of a celestial spirit. Her
smile was the joy of my heart; her voice the richest music to
my ear. But I wooed in vain. With a delicacy, pure as it was
engaging, she repelled all my advances, and I could not but see
that my friend, Henry Rivers, was the choice of her affection.
`Rivers was indeed my friend. We had been all in all to
each other. But causes
must
produce effects, and coldness soon
sprang up between us. He loved May Morton with a perfect
idolatry. I was the foul iconoclast, who destroyed both the
worshipper
and the image. Wo is me!
`My passion could not be concealed. The pent-up flame
defied
restraint. One balmy afternoon in spring, I sought the
apartment
of May Morton. I poured out my soul, in kisses and
protestations
,
on the white, reluctant hand that thrilled in mine. I was
answered in tones of melody, whose fatal sweetness haunts me
still, that my suit was vain. Rivers was her betrothedher
heart and hand were his own. I heard no more. Pride spread
its burning color over my cheek. I ceased to supplicate; I
bowed, and withdrew. Weeks passed over me, without a
knowledge
of existence. A malignant fever brought me to the margin
of the grave; and the delirium of passion and sickness was
continually
upon me.
`Months elapsed before I recovered. When I came forth
again, it was only to hear of the approaching marriage of my
rival. A few days were to witness its consummation. In all
my sickness, Rivers, forgetting my offence, was my devoted
attendant
.
He was generous and noble. No office was too
arduous
for his goodness; and through the watches of many a
weary night, he kept his vigil by my side. Alas! how was he
repaid!
`As the time drew nigh for the celebration of his nuptials,
my vigor increased. I ate but little, yet I seemed to subsist
and thrive on thought. A vague idea of some desperate deed
beset my soul. What it was destined to be, I knew not; but I
felt, inly, as if nerving myself for some dire resolve.
`How little do we know of our own hearts! During all this
period, I could not recognise in myself any hatred to Rivers. I
thought him the happiest of men; I would have given worlds to
have filled his place in the affections of May Morton; and
because
she
did, I thought
I
too loved him. Fatal delusion!
`I received an invitation to be present at their nuptials. I
went, but with a feeling such as I never before experienced. It
was the elateness of a desperate mindthe elevation which
precedes
despair.
`It was a lovely evening. The guests were met, the feast was
spread. I heard the voice of the priest; I saw the hands of the
betrothed united in eternal fidelity. The room swam to my
vision; the smiles that met me were repaid by glances of vacancy
or of fire; and the wine-cup passed my lips untasted.
`A dance ensued. The music breathed through the scented
apartments, like a heavenly epithalamium. Graceful forms were
moving in fairy circles; the viol uttered its harmonies; all was
brightness; all delight.
`How it was, I know not, that I approached the happy pair as
they stood at the head of a cotillon. `Pleasant time, this, Mr.
Rivers,' said I, with a bitter smile, and in a hollow voice; `
very
pleasantdo n't you think so?'
Indeed I do; the happiest of my life. My sweet May
beside
me, and
my own!
It is like a dream.'
Very likely,' I replied. `What a pity it is that so sweet a
dream should not be enjoyed by somebody who deserved it.'
What do you mean, Sir?' said Rivers, the generous
meanings
of his eye changing to a look of stern inquiry.
I mean,' I responded, with the abruptness of instant
falsehood
,
which could not be contradicted from the grave, `that you
told young Everts, of our class, that my Oration at the Junior
Exhibition was written by you. He is dead now, and can not
say to you, as I do, that you are both a liar and a coward. I
speak it aloud; I am heard by all around me; and I leave you
to demand of me that satisfaction, current among all honorable
men, which you will not fail to receive.'
`Rivers was thunder-struck. He gazed at me with a look of
mingled pity and surprise. At last he said:
Charles,
now I know you
. This is an angry, envious trick
of yours,
and I see the motive
. But it shall not avail you. You
shall be met, as you desire; but not to-night. To night, at
least,' he added, addressing his terrified bride, with looks of
unutterable
tenderness, `shall be devoted to rapture and to love.
Sir, you will hear from me in the morning.'
`What were my feelings! Like Ithuriel in Eden, I stood,
hideous and single, in the midst of a scene of loveliness. From
bitter envy and unrequited passion, I had wantonly falsified the
truth, and poisoned the happiness of a lovely being, by
embroiling
in mortal combat the chosen companion of her bosom.
`I know not how I reached home. I slept as on a bed of fire.
In the morning I received a note from Rivers, which I accepted
without delay.
`That afternoon we met. The grey walls of the University,
where we had spent so many happy hours, shone through the
distant grove, as we measured our deadly paces. The word
was waiting to be given; the lengthened solemn tread was made.
Rivers held his pistol as if willing to use it on an enemy, but
not
on a friend. I levelled my aim at his heart. I see him still as
he stood before me then; the sunshine playing on his chestnut
locks and manly forehead; the look of blended pity and
consternation
that his features wore. He stood with the sublimity
of a good conscience beaming from his eye. As I stretched my
mortal weapon toward his bosom, he shrank not. He seemed
to feel the
moral
advantage that he possessed over me. A whirl
of giddy thoughts rushed through my mind, but I had no time
for reflection. Some fallen angel whispered
vengeance
in my
ear. What had I to avenge? What, but an innocent and
mutual
love?
`I held my elevated pistol a shade higher. The word was
spoken by the seconds; I drew back my lock, and heard the
click of Rivers' simultaneous with mine. I took deliberate aim;
the burning flash warmed over my fingers, the report rang
through the grove. Rivers stepped toward me with extended
hand; his pistol exploded as it dropped from his nerveless grasp;
he brought his open palm convulsively to his breast; he reeled;
he fell.
`I rushed to my fallen friend. The crimson blood was
gushing
from his heart, over his bosom; the leaden hue of death was
beneath his closing eyes; its pallor was on his cheek; its foam
on his lips.
Oh, May!' he uttered, with an agonizing groan; and then,
as if nerving himself to an act of dreadful energy, he raised
himself
partially up, and reaching forth his hand, exclaimed: `Charles,
I forgive you!
You have killed me without a cause; you will
break the fondest heart that ever beat for man; but
I forgive
you!'
`The blood now gathered, clotty and smoking, on his purple
lips; the gurgling sound of dissolution was in his throat; and in
one short moment, his life-current staining the green sward where
he fell, he was among the dead....
`
I tell
no more. Is it for
me
to describe the funeral; the
grief that brought the widowed and distant mother of a widowed
bride to the grave; the distress that made May Rivers a maniac?
Can I paint the burden of remorse which at last, and for a long,
dark period, dethroned my reason? Shall I revert to that hour
to-day, when, an inmate of this dreary place, I saw
her
whom I
once loved, as never did a thing on earth, before me; her fair
locks and graceful vestments torn with the struggles of phrensy;
an occupant of the same mad mansion? No; the picture is too
dreadful, even for a mind that has conceived the deeds and
suffered
the horrors of mine. At uncertain moments, my brain
seems reeling as if a weight of lead were pressed upon its cell;
ghastly forms rise up around me; hands that would incarnadine
the ocean, beckon to me from the dark walls of Evening, and
funeral murmurs, like the
wul-wullehs
of the East, come booming
from afar. Wo is me! I am smitten of
God!
'
Here
the manuscript of the maniac ended. It was with a
melancholy heart, a few months after its perusal, that I saw, on
a second visit to the Asylum, in the green cemetery of the
institution
,
the graves of the duelist and his hapless victim. The
verdant mantle of Spring decked the earth where they slept, with
rich fertility. His monument was of dark, gloomy marble; but
the white, simple stone, which shone above the tomb of fair
May Rivers, stood like an emblem of her stainless life and her
glorified soul. She had gone from earth, like the breath of the
Spring-time, or the bloom from its flowers. The memorial that
rose above her slumbers was shaped like an urn. On one side,
was sculptured `
May
'on the other, `
Hope
.' What fitter
device
could have been made? Let the shaft or the cenotaph be
lifted for the
mind
that has gone to its beatitude, not for the lost
grace that is wasting, the lip that is dumb, or the brow that is
dim! In the pale dominions of the dead, `that have fallen
asleep upon the bosom of the earth,' never again to rise on mortal
vision, to whom should we build?
`To Beauty? Ah, no! She forgets
The charms that she wielded before;
Nor knows the foul worm, that he frets
The skin that but yesterday fools could adore,
For the smoothness it held, or the tints which it wore.'
MILITANT ARIASBY AN AMATEUR.
Nobody
is cynic or green-goose enough to deny that the
present
is the age of improvement. Every thing seems to be going
onward with a rapidity, the strides whereof may be likened unto
the tread of an army with banners. All kinds of systems, social,
political, public and private, seem to be better fixed than they
used to be. To account for these great emendations on any
common
hypothesis, would be ridiculous. Hypotheses are remnants
of antiquity; and I believe the age can yet be found able to
dispense
with them altogether. The time is not distant, I fancy,
when conclusions will be jumped at without argument, and when
Truth herself (I believe I have hit the gender of that
respectable
stranger) will come out of the well where her troglodyte
limbs have so long been cooling, and lift her mirror on high
to irradiate the benighted brains of every son and daughter of
Adam.
I say it is difficult to account for these grand emendations on
any common cause; but I have one to which I refer them
uniformly
,
and it is to my mind of a very satisfactory nature.
Modern
philosophers have discovered that, in the matter of light, the
extremities of comets have scattered new substances into our
atmosphere
,
and that when these eccentric characters are in
perihelio
,
their tails are peculiarly bright and flashy. Now, my
impression
is, that the light of these comets, thus generously
disbursed
from their hinder sides, in an intermittent diarrha of
glory, is conveyed by some principal of induction to the mind
of man; that the subtile rays act specifically upon some
craniological
bump of his head, inclining him to love music, poetry,
politics, horse-stealing, or any thing of the sort, according to the
character of the organ in which these rays may settle. To some,
they convey high fiscal notions and a love of locomotion, as in
the case of Mr. Nazro, the classical teacher, who has such rapid
habits and extensive relations, and who charges $100,000 per
year, for the finishing of a scholar in his Biblical Instruction.
To my own mind, I am sensible that there has been conveyed a
strong portion of light on the subject of musical adaptation, and
my ears have been acted upon to a considerable extent by the
same principle. I never witness any public amusement of late,
that I do not begin to reflect on some way in which music might
be made to help it on; and being an ardent though blind admirer
of European customs, I join in that sublime chase in this science,
and in other matters of about the same importance, with which a
large majority of my comet-stricken fellow-citizens seem
interested
.
But to my subject.
I was lounging the other day, on one of the luxurious sofas
of the Washington Divan, and sipping a cup of delicious coffee,
and looking at the fine paintings and various periodicals hanging
and lying around, when I took up that elegant paper, Bell's Life
in London, and straightway fell into a train of deep reflection, as
I sent my eye up and down its columns, upon the great
prevalence
among the
gentlemen
of England, of those lofty and
dignified
amusements, so cheering to intelligent minds, which are yet
almost unknown in this country. I worked myself by degrees
into a paroxysm of high-bred indignation, that our imitative
gentry
had copied so sparingly from these great transatlantic
examples
,
in pastimes so pleasing to humanity and healthful to the soul.
I had touched the climax of my regret, when the following
advertisement
caught my gaze:
`
Cocking
.A main of cocks will take place on Wednesday the 6th
inst., at the
Royal
Cockpit, West Green, Tottenham, for 5 the battle and
50 the odd, between the gentlemen of Middlesex and Kent; to fight in
silver.
Feeders,
Gumm
and
Hawick
.
`Three whole days' play will be fought at Bristol on the 19th inst., and
the two following days, between the gentlemen of Gloucestershire and the
gentlemen of Somersetshire, for 10 the battle, and 100 the main.
Feeders
,
Grant,
for Somersetshire;
Bumm,
for Leicestershire.'
As I peered over this notice, a train of luminous thought,
rapid as the scintillations of a meteor, burst upon my mind.
Why, said I to myself, has not this accomplished sport of
cockfighting
been more extensively introduced into this meridian?
and why should it not be
done to music?
How few, alas! how
very few of the intelligent gentlemen of this country have ever
taken an interest in these gladiatorial rencontres between
exasperated
fowls; or reflected upon the admirable manner in which
their contests might be associated with instrumental sounds, and
their jumps, pecks, and gaff-kicks, be timed with crotchet and
quaver! To the honor of a few remote Kentuckians, or Indiana
Hoosheroons, this eminent sport has found a few advocates in
those distant quarters of our republic. Is it not time that the
practice were forbidden to waste its exclusive elegance in the
haunts of rural life, and that it were introduced into our cities?
Should not cock-pits be built by the sale of stock, and capacious
coops be laid in? Should not
feeders
be imported, to deliver
lectures on the subject; and ought there not to be competent
composers engaged, who shall produce a series of
militant arias,
by means of which the cocks could fight with precision, and the
ears of the audience be simultaneously delectated? For the
credit of the nation, and of the growing taste for operative,
active
music, I ask, can this solemn appeal be resisted? I think
not.
Some churlish, old-fashioned denizens may deem this plan
infeasible
;
but I can tell them otherwise. Let us secure the
importation
of one of those foreign fowl-supervisors. Bumm, for
instance, `Cock-feeder to the gentlemen of Leiscestershire;' let
him be installed as manager of the New-York Metropolitan
Cockpit
;
and let the musical department be entrusted to some
passionate
master of the science, who feels the spirit of his trade;
and I warrant me the concern will prosper beyond hope. Our
people need to be advanced in these lovely refinements, and I ask
leave to explain how it can be done.
Let the pit be opened as the theatres are at present. Let the
curtain rise on the feathered combatants, standing each by his
feeder, looking grim as Tophet, and his plumage quivering with
impatience. Chanticleers, and fowls of that genus, without
distinction
of sex, are peculiarly susceptible to music. Martial
melody seems to impregnate them with the very spirit of evil.
At the juncture in question, let their pugnacious propensities be
roused by horns, bass-drums, and such like soul-stirring
instruments
.
Let the audience hear the gathering storm of sound
which impels the fighters onward, every note kindling their
adventurous
intentions, and `sticking in their crops' with ominous
energy. What an interesting picture is thus presented!
`
See
to their desks A pollo's sons repair
Swift rides the rosin o'er the horse's hair;
In unison their various tones to tune,
Murmurs the hautboy, growls the hoarse bassoon;
In soft vibrations sighs the whispering lute;
Twang goes the harpsichordtoo-too, the flute;
Brays the loud trumpet, squeaks the fiddle sharp,
Winds the French horn, and rings the tingling harp;
`Till like great Jove, the leader, figuring in,
Attunes to order the chaotic din.'
After the overture, let the fighting begin, to slow music. Let
the fiddlers scrape out the gaff-time; and if the cocks do battle
`in silver,' let the music be made to imitate the jingling of that
pleasant metal. As the combat deepens, the various instruments
should express the growling discord; and when the
unsuccessful
cock begins to give in, let that peculiar burst of melody
called
a
collywabble
by the cockneys, which expresses something
between
a squeal and a wheeze, he ecstacised forth from the bowels
of some ancient fiddle, cracked for the purpose. This would be
truly interesting; and when the discomfited fowl gave his final
flutter, let his act of tumbling over be accompanied by that `strain
which has a dying fall.'
A full blast of fac-simile cock-crowing should then proceed
from the orchestra, significant of victory. After this, a gush of
soft, low airs should denote the end of the strife, and express in
descriptive measures, the falling of the feathers that have been
antagonistically educed from the combatants during the fray, and
which will just then be floating naturally around. The
finale
could be selected with propriety from the variations of Jim Crow.
Should an after-piece be required, a set-to between the feeders
might come off, before the assembly.
This sketch is very imperfect; but it embodies a conception
which I have long groaned withal, and of which I am proud;
namely, the establishment of Cock-fighting by Music. The plan
is stupendous, I know; and, like all great undertakings, will
probably meet with opposition; but the march of Taste will
cause it to succeed. Humanity, decency, dignity, and other
cabalistic words, of no particular import, may be employed against
it; but this refined amusement must make its way, and float
sweetly into favor, under the smiles of Euterpe. I am now in
active correspondence with my worthy friend
Adrian Q. Jebb,
Esq., private cock-feeder to an English nobleman whose name I
am not at liberty to disclose; and I am happy in believing that
he will yet visit America, to instruct our aristocracy in the
modus
operandi
of his profession.
I merely mention my plan at present, owing to the want of
time, and shall perhaps make further disclosures to the public
hereafter. In the meanwhile, I will merely remark, that
subscription
books for the Metropolitan Cock-pit will soon be open,
and the script ready for delivery. The opening address is being
prepared by the celebrated author of `The Antediluvians;' and
the whole establishment will be well appointed, in all respects.
I anticipate the co-operation of every fellow-citizen, whose veins
contain any gentle blood, and who can trace his pedigree back
to his grandfather without stumbling on an artisan. It is to such,
fit audience though few, that I commend my enterprise.
Brummagem
.
BIG LIARS.
There
can be no doubt of the fact, that Lemuel Gulliver has,
in modern days, enjoyed too exclusive a reputation as a fictionist.
Munchausen has laurels which, though partly deserved, are
some-what
too exuberant for his deserts. Congreve showed his
knowledge
of liars, when he made one of his dramatic characters say
to another:
`Ferdinand Mendez Pinto was but a type of thee,
Thou Liar of the first magnitude!'
Pinto was great in his way, but he was a poor romancer,
compared
with Sir John Mandeville. The elastic credulity of that
gentleman could take in a mountain of mendacity. Marvels,
that were such to others, were trifles to him; and with respect to
the stories he heard in his travels, however gross they were, his
great belief had stomach for them all. We design to rake up a
few of his wonders, and by comparing them with those of Pinto,
prove conclusively that the latter is immeasurably
distanced,
as
also are Rabelais, Munchausen, Gulliver, and indeed the whole
olden tribe of pencillers by the way-side. We will begin with
the Portuguese.
His travels were of one-and-twenty years' duration. They
were made in the kingdoms of Ethiopia, China, Tartary,
Cauchin-China
,
Calaminham, Siam, Pegu, Japan, and a great part
of the East Indies. They were `done in English by H. C.,
Gent, printed by J. Macock,' and were `to be sold by Henry
Herringman, at the sign of the Blew Anchor, in the Lower
Walk of the London New Exchange,' in the year of grace 1663.
Poor Pinto! He suffered much; and Cervantes has blackened
his memory by calling him the Prince of Liars. Among the
various sovereigns of the East with whom he sojourned, and in
whose various battles he fought, he does certainly give accounts
of violence, and misfortunes, and scenes of bloodshed that are
somewhat enlarged; but he does not
expect
them, we imagine,
to be believed. In his wanderings, he `five times suffered
ship-wrack
,
was sixteen times sold, and thirteen times made a slave.'
He went first to the Indies, then to Ethiopia, thence to Turkey.
Here he was purchased by a Greek, (he was then a captive,)
and sold to a Jew. Then he was ransomed, and passing to Goa,
was received into the service of the king of Portugal. Here he
is engaged in astonishing battles, sees the strangest sights, and
does the daily labor of Hector. Here is one of his largest lies.
`While coasting the ile of Sumatra,' he saith, `we entred a litel
River, and saw athwart a wood such a many adders and
crawling
creatures, no less prodigious for their length than for the
strangeness of their formes,
that I shall not marvel if they that
read this history will not believe my report of them
.' With this
preamble, he emboldens himself to say: `Those of this country
assured us that these creatures are so hardy as there be some of
them will set upon an Armada, when there is not above four or
five men in her, and overturn it with their tails, swallowing the
men
whole,
without dismembering them!' Gathering confidence
as he gets on, he observes:
`In this place also we saw a strange kind of creatures which they call
Caquisscitan;
they are of the bigness of a great goose, very black and scaly
on their backs, with a row of sharpe pricks on their chins, as long as a
writing
pen; moreover they have wings like unto bats, long necks, and a little
bone growing on their necks resembling a cock's spur, with a very long
tale, spotted black and green, like unto the lizards of that country; these
creatures hop and fly together like grass-hoppers; and in that manner they
hunt apes, and such other beasts, whom they pursue even to the tops of the
highest trees. Also we saw adders that were copped on the crowns of their
heads, as big as a man's thigh, and so venomous, as the negroes of that
country informed us, that if any living thing came within the reach of their
breath it died presently, there being no remedy nor antidote against it.
We likewise saw others not copped on their crowns, nor so venomous as the
former, but far greater and longer, with an head as big as a calf's.'
In the course of his wanderings, he somehow got into the
service
of the king of China, during which time the city of Nanquin
was attempted to be taken by the king of Tartaria, but his army
was sorely discomfited. Mark the result. `Now,' says Pinto,
`after they had taken an account of all the dead, there appeared
four hundred and fifty thousand, the most of whom died by
sickness
,
as also an hundred thousand horses, and three score
thousand
rhinocerots, which were eaten in the space of two months
and a half, wherein they wanted victual; so that of eighteen
hundred thousand men, wherewith the king of Tartaria came to
besiege Pequin, he carried home seven hundred and fifty
thousand
less than he brought.' From carrying on an armament
against the king of Mattaban, Pinto becomes ambassador to the
court of Calaminham, whose extraordinary magnificence he
especially describes, and thence sails down the great river Ritsey,
whose banks, if we may believe him, are stocked with marvels.
He makes particular mention of `certain tawny men, who are
great archers, having their feet like oxen, but their hands are like
unto other men, except that they are exceedingly hairy.' He
saw, beside, `men named
Magares,
who feed on wild beasts,
which they eat raw, such as serpents and adders; they hunt these
wild beasts, mounted on certain animals as big as horses, which
have three horns in the middle of their foreheads, with thick,
short legs, and on the middle of their backs a row of prickles;
all the rest of their body is like a great lizard; beside, they have
on their necks instead of hair, other prickles, far longer and
bigger
than those on their backs; and on the joints of their
shoulders
short
wings,
(the real hippogriff!) wherewith they fly, as it
wereleaping the length of five or six-and-twenty paces at a
grasp.'
Let us now see how Sir John Mandeville bears away the palm
in
his
Travels, `werein is sett down ye way to the Holie Lond,
or Lond of Behest and Hieruzaleme; as also to the londs of the
Great Caan, and of Prester Iohn; to Indy and diverse other
countries, with manie and straunge merveilles therein.' His
tour was commenced in 1322, and ended in 1356, making
thirty-four
years' absence from his native land. He went first to
Egypt, and engaged in the service of the Sultan of that country,
Melek Maderon. His religion at last induced him to leave that
court for the Holy Land. Thence he went to Tartary, where,
with four other knights, he was in the service of the Great Chan.
His object of travel is thus expressed: `And for als moche as
it is long tyme past that there was no general passage ne vyage
over the see; and many men were desiren for to here speke of
the Holy Lond, I, John Mandeville, knyght, that was born in
Englond, in the town of Seynt Albones, albeit not worthi, passed
the see in the yeere of our Lord Iesu Crist
mcccxxii.,
in the
day of Seynt Michelle, and hidre to have ben long tyme over the
see, and have seen and gone thorghe divers londs, and manie
provinces and kingdomes, and iles, and have passed thorghe
Tartarye, Lybye, Calde, and a gret partie of Ethiope; thorghe
Amazoyne, Inde the less and the more, a gret partie, and
thorgheout
manie other iles that ben abouten Inde; where dwellen
many divers folkes, and of divers manners and laws, and of
divers
schappes of men.'
Mandeville seemed to labor under a kind of mental
elephantiasis
.
Nothing was too large for his credit. In dragons and evil
spirits, that carried on their ambulatory carnival on earth, and
appeared constantly to the `stark staring eyes' of men, he had
the fullest belief; in fact, if we may trust him, he met with them
in great abundance, and saw their nests, as it were, where most
they bred and haunted. `In Ethiope,' as we learn from him,
`are such men that have but one foot, and they go so fast that it
is a grete marvel; and that is a large foot, for the shadow
thereof
covereth the body from sun or rain when they lie on their
backs.' In the island of Macameran, which is a `great ile and
fair,' he says `the men and women have heads like hounds; they
are reasonable, and worship an ox for their God; they are good
men to fight, and bear a great target wherewith they cover all
their body, and a spear in their hand.' The population in the
island of Tarkonet, which he visited, receive this mention: `In
this ile, all men are as beasts, and dwell in caves, not having
wit to make houses. They eat adders, and speke not, but make
such noises as the beasts do one to another.' He proceeds:
`There is another ile called Dodyn, and in the same ile are
many and divers sorts of men who have evil manners. The
King of this ile is a great lord and mighty, and hath in many iles
other kings under him; and in one of these iles are men that
have but
one eye,
and that is in the midst of their front; which
eat their flesh and fish all raw. And in another ile are men that
have
no heads,
and their eyes are in their
shoulders,
and their
mouth in their breasts!'
This gives Mandeville our `suffrages' as a superior of Pinto.
No doubt his work was familiar to Shakspeare, who
unquestionably
took from it the information which Othello conveyed to the
grave and reverend seniors, in his great Defence, wherein he
spoke
`Of antres vast and deserts idle,
Of cannibals, that did each other eat,
And of the Anthropophagi,
men whose heads
Do grow beneath their shoulders
.'
Mandeville continues: `And in another ile nigh-by, are men
that have ne head, ne eyen, and their mouth is in their shoulders!
Another ile is there, where be men that have flat faces without
nosen and without eyen, but they have two small holes in lew of
eyen, and they have flatted nosen, withouten lippes. And also in
that ile are men that have their faces all flat, without eyen,
without
mouth, and withouten nose, but they have their eyen and
their mouth behind, on their shoulders!'
The old knight was a perfect Yankee in inquisitiveness. These
are his reasons for going to Tartary. We give them in his own
quaint language: `And yee schalle undirstond that my fellowes
and I with our zomen, we serveden this Emperour (of Tartary)
and weren his soudyoures fifteen moneths agenst the kyng of
Mancy, that held war agenst him. And the cause was, for we
hadden grete lust for to see his noblesse, and the estat of his
corte, and all his governance, to wyt gif it were soche as we
herden
say that it was.'
25
He regretted, when at Jerusalem, in the Land of Behest, that
he could not find many of the relies of our Saviour's crucifixion.
He gives this account of some of them: `A part of the crown
wherewithal our Lord was crowned, and eke one of the nales,
and the speer's hed, and manie other relicks, are in France and
Paris, in the kyng's chapelle. This crown was made of junks
of the see; half whereof is at Paris, and the other at
Constantinople
;
and the speer's shafte the emperour of Almany hath.
Likewise the emperour of Constantinople saith that he hath the
speer's head
and I have seen his
.'
It was a subject of great regret to our traveller, that he did not
visit
Paradise!
a place which he approached `very nearly,' but
concluded somehow not to enter. We wonder not at his scruples
of unworthiness, after the large stories he had previously told.
Yet on reflection, we can hardly conceive that, after recording
those stupendous narrations, he could shrink from any enterprise.
But although he did
not
visit Paradise in
propria persona,
he leads
us to infer that he met a great plenty of persons who
had;
and
he offers us his information on the subject, with an air of earnest
confidence, as if he could not be gainsayed. He knew very
well, (if he disbelieved his own story, which is doubtful,) that
contradiction was almost impossible, since travel, in those days was
a matter of Herculean enterprise, seldom entered upon, save by
Quixottes errant, and wights of suspicious integrity of brain.
Therefore he was at liberty to speak as he did of the place
beloved
by our first parents, and where often
`Hand in hand they passed, the loveliest pair
That ever since in Love's embraces met:
Adam the goodliest man of men, since born
His son's, the fairest of her daughters, Eve.'
He does not enter, like the sublime and imaginative Milton, upon
a picture of the verdant coverts of laurel and myrtle, the bright
acanthus, the roses, jessamines, crocus, and hyacinth, that
`broidered with rich inlay' that holy ground; but he simply saith:
`Of Paradys ne can I not speken properly,
for I was not there
.
It is far beyond, and that forthinketh me: also I was not worthi.
This Paradys is enclosed all about with a wall, and men wyt not
whereof it is made, for the walls beinge covered all over with
mosse, as it seemeth: and that wall stretchethe fro the South
unto the North, and it hath not but one entree, and that is closed
with Fyre-brenning.' This idea of the burning fire at the gate
of Paradise he derived without question from the early Scriptures,
wherein is recorded the ejection of Adam and Eve from Eden,
whom God sent forth to till the earth
et collocavit ungelum qui
prferebat manu igneum gladium, ut custodiret aditum Paradisi
.
Indeed the hints of many of his gratuities are drawn from the
Sacred Writings, which are thus perverted and obscured to his
reader.
We have written enough, we think, to convince the most
skeptical that Mandeville is a preminent fabulist, worthy to stand
like a Colossus among the great Fibbers of the Past. A closer
comparison of his claims to distinction in this regard, will add
fresh leaves to his crown. We have not forgotten the Pantagruel
and Gargantua of Rabelais; the tin horn and cherry-tree of
Munchausen
;
the Lilliputians that beset Gulliver, nor the
extraordinary
means which he subdued great conflagrations withal; but
for `large discourse' in fiction, we prefer Mendez Pinto to all of
them, and Mandeville to Pinto.
LAFAYETTE AND WASHINGTON.
AN ADDRESS PRONOUNCED BEFORE THE WASHINGTON SOCIETY OF
LAFAYETTE
COLLEGE, EASTON, PA., JULY 4, 1840.
The
events which bring a Nation up, as it were, on one day
simultaneously together, to worship near the high altars
dedicated
by virtuous patriotism to the genius of liberty, and the
expansion
of the dear rights of mankind, are of all others, the most
ennobling. They constitute the landmarks by which Republics
are guided in their career; they furnish the test whereby men of
eminence in a state are tried, and distinguished, or forgotten.
On
any
day, connected with the history of a great man who has
done good to his country, there teems a consecrated interest.
Why is it, that on certain occasions in the experience of every
country but those which are purely despotic, the universal heart
of the people throbs forth in sympathetic unison; that men and
women gather together, the one with their energy and pride of
presence, the other with the graces and blandishments, which
give superior beauty and glow to existence; to celebrate,
perhaps
the release of a continent, an empire, or a section, from
bonds and confusion, into brightness, and liberty, and peace,
and to remember, with pleasure and pride, the lofty spirits who
ministered to so glorious a consummation? Why is it, that on
such occasions, even reverence wants language, and the spirit of
Eulogy has neither boundary nor curb? It is because, in a
just-minded
nation, those who mourn, must triumph together;
because
,
where we lament the upright and the lost, we can yet
reverence
and cherish their example for the living.
In addressing an Association such as that before which I have
now the honor to appear, and which combines, with its own title,
that of the institution of which it is, in one high sense, a part, it
is impossible, that on a day like this, I could perceive, with
regard
to the distinguished and immortal names of
Lafayette
and
Washington,
a divided duty of remembrance. They
were both soldiers of Liberty; both were in the van-guard of
independence and of freedom; and how few things may be said
of the one, which are not equally due to the other! Let it be
our task, then, humbly to develope the greatness and the
goodness
evinced in the course of each; briefly to show forth the
high and holy motives by which they were guidedthe
honorable
means and influence they employed in pursuing the
advantages
of which each was successfully the seeker and guide; and
the manner in which, after well-spent lives, they were enabled
to look back upon the fruits of their labors with contentment
concerning
the past, and glorious hopes for the future.
In the College and the Society bearing these two names,
there is discernible, in their very
adoption,
the spirit of consistent
and faithful freedom.
Lafayette
and
Washington,
though
born in different countries, and under different auspices, were
yet kindred spirits. They were reapers, sent forth into the
abundant harvest-field of revolutionary triumph. Each of these
immortal men seemed conscious that he had come into the world,
with lofty acts depending on his soul and arm, and which he
must fulfil. History tells how they were carried to their
completion
.
In treating of the character of
Lafayette,
it has been too
much the custom of our writers and speakers to refer, with more
particularity and emphasis, to the course of greatness and benefit
which he pursued here so brilliantly on American ground, and
in the infancy of the American republic; even when, though a
republic in spirit, it had not quite acquired to itself the name.
But fondly and gratefully as we may dwell upon those crises and
adventures in his wonderful history, there is a double beauty in
his earliest and latest efforts for liberty at Home. He was ever
on the side of just laws; but against tyranny of every name, he
waged perpetual warfare. Of high birth, and exalted, noble
connexions
,
the false chivalry and deceptions of Courts appeared to
have no charm for his frank and open mind. His aspirations
were of a higher order. Who, in England's historyI speak
with no invidious comparisons between that country and France
has appeared with the same outset, blandishments, and
inducements
to engage in the cause of royal successions, ever turned
in his mind, to make them consonant with the cause of freedom,
or else to leave them?
When, in the calm surveys of history, Time seems to yield
up his trophies, and death to restore the mouldered victims of
his voiceless band; and we read of the crimes that cursed, or
the bright deeds that blessed a century, we can draw our
comparisons
between the man who is merely great from ambition,
without being good, or he who is at once, in uniform act and
intention
,
from youth to age, both great and good together. Let
us, for example, compare the deaths of Cromwell, or Richard of
Bosworth field, and that of Lafayette at La Grange.
Cromwell
,
full of unquenchable passions, was fierce and desperate to
the last; and how died he, who, with Plantagenets, and turmoils,
and murders, held his very life a mystery, to be solved as Fate
might utter, caring not for deeds of darkness or a wounded
name? Roll back the tide of years, and see him: the fragrance
of Summer is in his nostrils, as he gazes through the midnight
upon the watch-fires of the armies, and hears the armorers
accomplishing
the knights, and the neighing war-horse waiting for
the noise of the captains and the shouting; but his spirit is ill at
ease; the merit of defeat which is due him, he knows full well;
and the light of his star has a baleful significance, as he sinks to
his troubled rest.
Then,
Mark the sceptred traitor slumbering!
There flit the slaves of Conscience round;
With boding tongue foul murders numbering
Sleep's leaden portals catch the sound.
In his dream of blood, for mercy quaking,
At his own dull scream! behold his waking!
Hark! the trumpet's warning breath,
Echoes round that vale of death.
Unhorsed, unhelmed, disdaining shield,
The panting tyrant scours the field.
Vengeance! he meets thy dooming blade!
The scourge of earth, the scorn of Heaven
He fallsunwept and unforgiven,
And all his guilty glories fade.
Like a crushed reptile in the dust he lies,
And Hate's last lightnings quiver from his eyes!
Sprague's Ode to Shakspeare
.
Thus perished one of the most famous dukes of England!
How did the Marquis of La Grange expire? As the setting
sun descends to his beautiful evening pavilion, with gorgeous
companies of clouds waiting around him, until in the bright
waters of the West, he sinks to `where his islands of
refreshment
lie!'
When
Lafayette
came to America, with a noble
apprehension
in his heart, that our great crisis could not transact itself
without him, his native land was just fermenting into a condition,
wherein, if he had been so basely-minded, he might have attained
an eminence, commanding half that kingdom. What he did
here,
we know; how he co-operated with the `Saviour of his
Country,' for her good; the wounds of his green youth, at
Brandywine
;
his coping with Cornwallis, who declared that `the boy
should not escape him;' his forced marches to Virginia; the
liberality with which he poured out, like water, his treasure and
credit for the welfare of those troops, who were but too happy to
serve under him; the siege of Yorktown; his repeated return,
after his first visit, together with his efforts in Spain to assist the
American cause, which peace happily rendered unnecessary;
these facts are but household words, on American tongues.
Thank Heaven! they are words that come from the heart, and
yet have no gloss of newness, or of momentary show. Let us
bear in mind, that on his last return, but one, to France, after
being elected to the membership of the National Assembly, he
was appointed the Commander-in-chief of the National Guards
of Paris, two days after the celebrated attack upon the Bastille.
How might the effect of this attack have worked upon the mind
of a hero,
wrongly
ambitious?
History answers this question, in the biography of so many
persons that it would demand and deserve volumes to chronicle,
either their doings or the consequences of those doings.
Recorders
or annalists,
Bailly, Dusaulx, Besanval;
not to
name innumerable others, by letter or printed page, kept up the
record of that dreadful time, as pictures for posterity. How
triumphantly could
Lafayette
have careered upon that storm;
not only with glory, but without danger? And yet, politically
speaking, it was, for a season, the
Euroclydon
of France. Even
in our far-off western America`our own green forest-land'
the scenes of the Revolution in France were familiar to youthful
minds and eyes, and reveries; and the keeper who let forth `The
Aged Prisoner, Released from the Bastille,' was ranked with
Giant Despair, of Doubting Castle, in the `Pilgrim's Progress'
of
Bunyan,
who accidentally condescended to sleep, or be
indifferent
,
or otherwise engaged, while his victims were departing.
Such were even the rudest notions here, of an event which
struck awe through France. It awakens our highest admiration
of
Lafayette,
that while he might have profited in wielding,
at this moment, the Parisian populace at will, he sought no
power, not justly and purely derived. The flag of France
received
,
at that time, as it were, from his hand, the last emblem
of the tri-color; and his prophecy has been fulfilled, that it
passes in triumph around the world. He had seen, in America,
that honest revolution was not disobedient to honest domestic
laws; and with that glorious lesson before him, he followed it in
practice to the utmost, until his death. He showed, in all things,
that he was in very deed a
republican
. In opposing, with
Bailly
,
the Jacobin club; in swearing, in the name of four millions
of National Guards, fidelity to the Constitution; in advocating
the extinction of empty titles of nobility, and renouncing his own;
in the dungeons of Austria; in his watchful, yet characteristic
course with that great captain of his age, Napoleon; in the
revolution
of eighteen hundred and thirtyand in the serene decline
of his many and useful yearswho, and how few, of the various
military and civil dignitaries, that in Europe have risen, and
shone, and fell, have been his parallel?
It has been said by a distinguished and far-reaching spirit of
the nineteenth century, that there is that within the life of the
humblest mortal, which, well considered, would furnish forth the
substance and material of an epic poem. If that be true, that
must be a daring mind, a mind of utter leisure, and with a strong
and sustaining wing, which would attempt to pour forth, in verse,
the deeds of daring and of greatness, of comprehensive
benevolence
,
and Christian virtue, which signalized
Lafayette
.
What an extended and changeful picture unfolds itself, in
connexion
with his last visit to our shores! A boundless continent,
which, when he had before come among us, was the abode of a
terrified population; of wild beasts of prey, and wilder savages,
glutting, whensoever and wheresoever they could, their thirst for
human blood, had begun to bud and bloom, and blossom as the
rose. Cities, towns, and villages, had sprung up to beautify the
waste places of the republic; and where streams which might
cross the Atlantic, were beforetime shadowed with interminable
forests, he beheld the smoking chariots of Fulton, gliding in
their majesty and might; innumerable marts, gilding and
suffusing
with life and business, the length and breadth of the land; a
united
people; a sacred constitution; and the prospects of a
nation, brilliant beyond the utmost blazon of the pencil, of the
pen. Where the Delaware slept near its springs, in calm
tranquillity
or overshadowed murmurings, he saw the marks of
glorious
improvements, linking realm with realm in our confederacy;
and her institutions, grants, and intellectual Associations,
perpetuating
his name.
Let us now briefly turn to
Washington
. We can not do the
injustice to any here present to suppose it requisite to
particularize
the great events in the career of that incomparable man.
But, if this republic ever incurs the charge of being ungrateful
to her largest benefactor, next to the
Almighty,
it will be when
it shall be considered
repetition
to venerate his character and
laud his deeds. We will not go over the red battle-fields of his
country, where he shone in conquest, or signalized his military
stratagie in retreat. The whole synthesis, so to speak, of his
character, was to deserve success, and he ever achieved it. The
character of
Washington
was such that it overawed those who
plotted against him, and discomfited his enemies. When he
rebuked an Arnold, we seem to see, in that office, the action,
and almost to hear the voice, of Cicero against the Roman
conspirator
,
while he charged him, in the senate, with having, on
the previous evening, at M. Lucca's house, divided Italy into
shares with his accomplices; some for the field, and others for
the capitol.
Washington
had the power of making a corrupt
ambition quail before him, at the same time that he caused the
effects of that ambition, through precept, not through example
of his enemies, to operate in his behalf. In this, there was
something more than the hero. He, who on the field of battle,
could call his indomitable legions, and `perpetual glories round
him,' in the wars of the republic, could, in his walks of peace,
invoke the co-operation and the counsel of the philosopher and
the Christian. In the laws of God, he saw and recognised the
laws of man. He heard the voice of the people in favor of a
course upon which he could look back at its close with
satisfaction
and with pride; and he recognised it as the voice of
Heaven, which first called him to the field of conflict, and
crowned his efforts for his country with abundant success. He
never knew what it was to
falter,
in any undertaking. With an
estimate of chances in his mind, which bespoke not only the
man of caution, but the man of nerve, he shrunk from no
enterprise
.
The result showed that he regarded
the right,
which
he was to vindicate, in the truest light. He knew that he was
not laboring for himself; the glory that pertained to the
performance
of genuine duty, he was aware would accrue to him, in an
abundant harvest; but this, with him, was a secondary
consideration
.
So thoroughly was his great mind imbued with the
truth, that one who devotes himself rightfully and sincerely to
his country, becomes, of consequence, whether successful or
unsuccessful
,
an heir of fame among all the sons of freedom, that
he acted always on that principle, in the midst of the severest
trials to which his military and civic career was subjected. He
replied to calumny with silence; against artful and hidden
opposition
,
with which he triumphantly contended, he opposed
only the shield of his own rectitude, and appealed only, as a
guaranty for the future, to the past records of his career of glory.
While state after state, combined to do him honor; after a
brilliant
military and civic life, he retires to Mount Vernon, in quest
of his much-loved repose, which the best of men have ever loved;
and like the pure Scipio, on the Cuman shore, addressed
themselves
in their privacy to the benefit of mankind. In this
position
,
as himself did, we have leisure to survey the calm
brightness
of his nature, and the inestimable value of the services he
had rendered to freedom throughout the world. There is an
analysis of his character, by his friend and faithful adviser, and
the philosopher of his age, the illustrious
Marshall,
which has
never been surpassed by any American or European pen. Nothing
can be added to it, without producing tawdry ornament, or blind
hyperbole; nothing taken away, without diminishing the
wonderful
and perfect symmetry of the whole.
`The manners of
Washington,
' he tells us, `were rather
reserved
than free, though they partook nothing of that dryness and
sternness which accompany reserve, when carried to an extreme;
and on all proper occasions, he would relax sufficiently to show
how highly he was gratified by the charms of conversation, and
the pleasures of society. His person and whole deportment
exhibited
an unaffected and indescribable dignity, unmingled with
haughtiness, of which, all who approached him were sensible,
and the attachment of those who possessed his friendship, and
enjoyed his intimacy, was ardent, but always respectful. His
temper was humane, benevolent, and conciliatory; but there
was quickness in his sensibility to anything apparently offensive,
which experience had taught him to watch and correct. In the
management of his private affairs, he exhibited an exact yet liberal
economy. His funds were not prodigally wasted on capricious
and ill-examined schemes, nor refused to beneficial, though
costly
improvements; they remained, therefore, competent to that
expensive establishment, which his reputation, added to his
hospitable
temper, had in some measure imposed upon him, and to
those donations which real distress has a right to claim from
opulence
.
He made no pretensions to that vivacity which fascinates,
or to that wit which dazzles and frequently imposes on the
understanding
.
More solid than brilliant, judgment rather than
genius constituted the most prominent feature of his character.
As a military man, he was brave, enterprising, and cautious.
That malignity which has sought to strip him of all the higher
qualities of a general, has conceded to him personal courage, and
a firmness of resolution which neither dangers nor difficulties
could shake. But candor will allow him other great and
valuable
endowments. If his military course does not abound with
splendid achievements, it exhibits a series of judicious measures,
adapted to circumstances, which probably saved his country.
Placed, without having studied the theory or been taught in the
school of experience the practice of war, at the head of an
undisciplined
,
ill-organized multitude, which was unused to the
restraints
,
and unacquainted with the ordinary duties of a camp;
without the aid of officers possessing those lights which the
commander-in-chief
was yet to acquire, it would have been a miracle
indeed had his conduct been altogether faultless. But
possessing
an energetic and distinguishing mind, on which the lessons
of experience were never lost, his errors, if he committed any,
were quickly repaired; and those measures which the state of
things rendered most advisable, were seldom if ever, neglected.
Inferior to his adversary in the numbers, in the equipment, and
in the discipline of his troops, it is evidence of real merit that no
great and decisive advantages were ever obtained over him, and
the opportunity to strike an important blow never passed away
unused. He has been termed the American Fabius; but those
who compare his actions with his means, will perceive at least as
much of Marcellus as of Fabius in his character. He could not
have been more enterprising, without endangering the cause he
defended, nor have put more to hazard, without incurring, justly,
the imputation of rashness. Not relying upon those chances
which sometimes give a favorable issue to attempts apparently
desperate, his conduct was regulated by calculations, made upon
the capacities of his army, and the real situation of his country.
When called a second time to command the armies of the United
States, a change of circumstances had taken place, and he
meditated
a corresponding change of conduct. In modeling the army
of seventeen hundred and ninety-eight, he sought for men
distinguished
for their boldness of execution, not less for their
prudence
in council, and contemplated a system of continued attack.
`The enemy,' said the General, in his private letters, `must
never be permitted to gain foothold on our shores.' In his civil
administration, as in his military career, were exhibited ample and
repeated proofs of that practical good sense, of that sound
judgment
,
which is, perhaps, the most rare, and is certainly the most
valuable quality of the human mind. Devoting himself to the
duties of his station, and pursuing no object distinct from the
public good, he was accustomed to contemplate, at a distance,
those critical situations in which the United States might
probably
be placed, and to digest, before the occasion required action,
the line of conduct which it would be proper to observe. Taught
to distrust first impressions, he sought to acquire all the
information
which was attainable, and to hear without prejudice all the
reasons which could be urged for or against a particular measure.
His own judgment was suspended until it became necessary to
determine, and his decisions, thus maturely made, were seldom,
if ever, to be shaken. His conduct, therefore, was systematic,
and the great objects of his administration were steadily pursued.
Respecting, as the first magistrate in a free government must
ever do, the real and deliberate sentiments of the people, their
gusts of passion passed over without ruffling the smooth surface
of his mind. Trusting to the reflecting good sense of the nation
for approbation and support, he had the magnanimity to pursue
its real interests in opposition to its temporary prejudices, and,
though far from being regardless of popular favor, he could
never stoop to retain, by deserving to lose it. In more instances
than one, we find him committing his whole popularity to hazard,
and pursuing steadily, in opposition to a torrent, which would
have overwhelmed a man of ordinary firmness, that course which
had been dictated by a sense of duty. In speculation he was a
real republican, devoted to the constitution of his country, and to
that system of equal political rights on which it is founded. But
between a balanced republic and a democracy, the difference is
like that between chaos and order. Real liberty, he thought was
to be preserved only by preserving the authority of the laws, and
maintaining the energy of government. Scarcely did society
present two characters, which, in his opinion, less resembled
each other than a patriot and a demagogue. No man has ever
appeared upon the theatre of public action whose integrity was
more incompatible, or whose principles were more perfectly free
from the contamination of those selfish and unworthy passions
which find their nourishment in the conflicts of party. Having
no views which required concealment, his real and avowed
motives
were the same; and his whole correspondence does not
furnish a single case, from which even an enemy would infer that
he was capable, under any circumstances, of stooping to the
employment
of duplicity. No truth can be uttered with more
confidence
,
than that his ends were always upright, and his means
always pure. He exhibits the rare example of a politician, to
whom wiles were absolutely unknown, and whose professions to
foreign governments, and to his own countrymen, were always
sincere. In him was fully exemplified the real distinction
which forever exists between wisdom and cunning, and the
importance
,
as well as truth of the maxim, that `honesty is the best
policy.' If
Washington
possessed ambition, that passion was,
in his bosom, so regulated by principles, or controlled by
circumstances
,
that it was neither vicious nor turbulent. Intrigue
was never employed as the means of its gratification, nor was
personal aggrandizement its object. The various high and
important
stations to which he was called by the public voice were
unsought by himself: and in consenting to fill them, he seems
rather to have yielded to a general conviction that the interest
would be thereby promoted, than to his particular inclination.
Neither the extraordinary partiality of the American people, the
extravagant praises which were bestowed upon him, nor the
inveterate
opposition and malignant calumnies which he
experienced
,
had any visible influence on his conduct. The cause is
to be looked for in the texture of his mind. In him, that innate
and unassuming modesty, which adulation would have offended,
which the voluntary plaudits of millions could not betray into
indiscretion
,
and which never obtruded upon others his claims to
superior consideration, was happily blended with a high and
correct
sense of personal dignity, and with a just consciousness of
that respect which is due to station. Without exertion, he could
maintain the happy medium between that arrogance which
wounds, and that facility which allows the office to be degraded
in the person who fills it. It is impossible to contemplate the
great events which have occurred in the United States, under the
auspices of
Washington,
without ascribing them, in some
measure
,
to him. If we ask the causes of the prosperous issue of a
war, against the successful termination of which there were so
many probabilities; of the good which was produced, and the
ill which was avoided during an administration fated to contend
with the strongest prejudices that a combination of circumstances,
and of passions could produce; of the constant favor of the
great mass of his fellow-citizens, and of the confidence which, to
to the last moment of his life, they reposed in himthe answer,
so far as these causes may be found in his character, will furnish
a lesson well meriting the attention of those who are candidates
for fame. Endowed by nature with a sound judgment, and an
accurate, discriminating mind, he feared not that laborious
attention
which made him perfectly master of those subjects, in all
their relations, on which he was to decide; and this essential
quality was guided by an unvarying sense of moral right, which
would tolerate the employment only of those means that would
bear the most rigid examination, by a fairness of intention,
which neither sought nor required disguise, and by a purity of
virtue which was not only untainted, but unsuspected.'
Such was
Washington:
a combination and a form where
every human grace and virtue appeared to have set an indelible
seal. If we look at the various peculiarities of the various great
men, for example, of the ancient republic, we shall find that he
embraced the good ones of them all:
His was Octavian's prosperous star,
The rush of Csar's conquering car,
At Battle's call;
His Scipio's virtue; his, the skill,
And the indomitable will
Of Hannibal.
The clemency of Antonine,
And pure Aurelius' love divine;
In tented field and bloody fray,
An Alexander's vigorous sway,
And stern command:
The faith of Constantineay, more
The fervent love Camillus bore
His native land.
*
*
Coplas de Manrique.
But the crowning glory of
Washington's
course, was its
close. Nothing could be more glorious than such a life, but
such a death. Encircled by his family; watched by eyes that
loved him, and attended with tender ministrations, his body
parted from his soul, and that immortal guest of his earthly
tabernacle ascended to Heaven. As that hour approached, his
contentment and peace were indescribable. He saw, if his
thoughts were then momentarily of earth, through the long vista
of coming years, the grandeur and beauty of a new republic,
made free by his hand; teeming with all kinds of riches, and
filling with a virtuous and well-governed people. How beautiful
a prospect! We read, of late, of the death of a king of Europe,
who, when on his dying pillow, caused a mirror to be placed
near his bed, that he might see his army defile in their glittering
uniforms before him; an insubstantial picturemere shadows
on glass, showing in a most striking emblem, how the glory of
this world passeth away. But
Washington
had retired from
his
armies; throughout the land,
`Glad Peace was tinkling in the farmer's bell,
And singing with the reapers:'
and he had no regret in his hour of departure.
Can we scarcely refrain from allowing to that hour, the
unutterable
splendor of an apothesis? He had fought his warfare;
he had left his testimony for the rights of men, and obedience to
Heaven; and is it too much to imagine him looking, at his last
moment, toward Heaven, with his dying eyes, and exclaiming
with chastened rapture:
What
means you blaze on high?
The empyrean sky,
Like the rich veil of some proud fane, is rending;
I see the star-paved land,
Where all the angels stand,
Even to the highest height, in burning rows ascending;
Some with their wings outspread,
And bowed the stately head,
As on some errand of
God's
love departing,
Like flames from evening conflagration starting;
The heralds of
Omnipotence
are they,
And nearer earth they come, to waft my soul away!'
MEPHISTOPHILES IN NEW-YORK.
`
Millions
of spiritual creatures walk the earth
Unseen, both when we wake, and when we sleep.'
The Bard of Eden
.
When
the last moon was new, at the hour of midnight, I
ascended
to the house-top of my dwelling, to pass an hour in
silence
and meditation. The solemn skies, fretted with dazzling
stars, and `thick inlaid with patines of bright gold,' rose
sublimely
above me. The winds of autumn surged and murmured in my
ear, as they swept from distant woods and waters, filling me with
profound and lofty imaginations. There are few things so
impressive
to my fancy as the moaning of autumnal winds. They
stir the painted leaves with a melancholy rustle; the faded
honors
of the summer sink upon their wings, and they float onward
like the sighs of mourners at a funeral, or the voice of some
viewless spirit, infusing into the awe-struck mind a vision of
eternity. At this time, I was peculiarly chastened and subdued.
I thought of the frailty of my being; of the friends I had lost,
and of the uncertain tenure wherewith those who remained were
folded to my bosom. I thought of the re-visitation of immortal
intelligences
on the earth; and as a mass of many-colored foliage,
whose tendrils had overrun a towering edifice near me, waved to
the breeze, meseemed I heard the accents of buried friends,
coming back to my bearing as in vanished days. A deep feeling
of mystery stole upon me; a sense of awe, which I can not
describe
.
`What,' I soliloquized, `should prevent the communion
of embodied and disembodied souls? Why should there not
come to us, in these sad and spiritual hours, the habitants of
other and brighter worlds, to tell us that beyond this dim diurnal
sphere, where change and decay are ever occurring, there are
places where the loves of the heart are not broken by death;
where the flowers are forever in blossom, and no eye becomes
dim? It is a sweet and tranquilizing thought. It lifts my soul,
and I feel that I am immortal. Why should we not mingle with
the departed, in spiritual communion? Do they not come to
us sometimes; are they not present with us, though we know it
not?
How often from the steep
Of echoing hill or thicket, can we hear
Celestial voices?
And who has not
seemed
to hear, in dreams and reveries, the
accents
of the departed?
Filled with these thoughts, I sat upon the house-top, watching
a few clouds that lay along the West, over the dim hills of
Jersey
.
They were of curious and fantastic shape, continually
changing, like the palest colors of a kaleidoscope. At last, one
of them appeared to separate in a waving fleece from the rest,
and to approach the city. Flakes of fairy light seemed playing
around it as it came, and as it passed over the river, the
reflection
,
like a golden column, trembled in the water. A light mist
soon gathered about me; an odor, like the pure breath which
we sometimes inhale on high mountains, hovered near; and in
the twinkling of an eye, the cloud took a human shape. Huge
wings expanded from its shoulders, tinct with innumerable hues;
form and features were established before me; and a Spirit, full
of beauty and intelligence, passed by my side, and paused where
I stood.
`Fear not,' said the Spirit, in tones whose awful sweetness
still lingers in my ear, `I am thy better angel. Thou thirstest
for knowledge; thou art poring evermore over ancient books,
and uncouth tomes in difficult characters, to study man. Thou
needest better helps for thy desire. Thou hast need to look,
and to see thy fellows; to compare the fate of those whom thou
mayest envy or pity, with thine own; then wilt thou feel at thy
heart the voice of contentment and the charm of tranquility.'
As I heard these words, I looked up, and lo! the Vision was
gone. All was stillness around me; but by my side there lay a
telescope of pearl. On its edge, in letters of light, it was thus
written:
`Mortal! by this gift thou art endowed with the faculty of
unobstructed
sight
. That which bounds and circumscribes the
observation
of others, shall have no power over thine own. Walls
and gates shall melt before thy glance, as thou lookest: the
human
heart shall be unveiled before thee, with all its wonders.
Gaze, then, mortal, and remember as thou gazest, that thy
supernatural
present is of short duration.'
I lifted the mysterious object with a trembling hand. I raised
it to my eye, and directed it toward the street beneath me. A
flood of light seemed to play around the direction in which I
turned, and every thing became visible. The Great
Throughfare
,
over which so many thousands had walked during the day,
was solemn and deserted. A few faint lamps, almost obscured
by the superior radiance which flowed from my instrument, could
be perceived, twinkling in feeble rows afar, stretching to the
26
glimmering waters of the bay. At intervals a belated reveler
went reeling to his home.
I gazed with eager attention. Now and then, I could
perceive
a familiar visage. At last I beheld, standing by the steps
of a proud mansion, a youth whom I recognised as an admirer
of one of its young inmates. He was holding by the railing of
the steps, and looking up with maudlin eyes toward a window
whose shutters were tightly closed. No one was considered
more exemplary in life and conduct than himself. He was a
communicant of the church, a devout reader of prayers on
Sunday
,
and one whose responses in the litany were ever solemn
and sonorous. He was betrothed to the damsel of whom I have
spoken; while she, unknowing of his declining goodness, wasted
upon him all her wealth of love.
I lifted my instrument to the window where the intoxicated
youth was gazing. The wall and casement melted away like a
scroll; and I saw, kneeling by a bed-side, a young lady in
prayer
.
Her hands were clasped in earnest supplication; she lifted
her dove-like eyes to heaven, and implored blessings for her
beloved
one, until her cheeks were wet with tears. Then rising,
she sought her pillow, and shading with rich locks her sweet face,
sunk into slumber.
I moved my glass and looked yet farther. A wall melted
again from my vision; and in a beautiful apartment, studded
with splendid furniture, a lady reclined upon an ottoman,
rocking
to sleep a cherub babe. Her tears fell fast, as she mused;
and now and then a feeble wail escaped her lips, half lullaby,
half sigh. Ever and anon, the infant would `ope its violet eyes,'
and smile with its coral mouth upon the anxious mother who
kept a vigil by his side.
`Sweet boy!' she faltered, `would that thy father were come!'
and then she kissed the babe, with fond enthusiasm. She
continued
alternately to sing and weep. Soon, I beheld a door open,
and the husband enter. Care sat upon his features. His
forehead
was shadowed as with a cloud. He sat down by his wife
and child, in sullen despondency.
`Well, my love,' he said, with firm and resolute accents, `a
change is coming upon us. Heretofore we have been affluent,
luxurious, and as the world said, happy. Gold has been ours in
benevolent profusion. With me, how prosperous has been the
world! My ships have returned to me with the treasures of
other climes; enormous profits have ensued from my adventures;
and Hope herself has never belied her promise. Now we are
changed. I have been inspecting my accounts; my losses have
quadrupled my gains for the past year; in short, Louisa, we are
almost beggars! What shall we do?'
`We will trust in
God,'
said his affectionate wife, pressing her
lips to his forehead.
`Oh, none of this!' replied the impatient husband; `there is no
balm in your lips to heal my sorrow. It cures not my distress,
it brightens not my prospect. We have too much of loving acts,
while poverty stands at our door. I like not your inappropriate
affection. As my favorite Middleton sings:
`Is there no friendship betwixt man and wife,
Unless they make a pigeon-house of wedlock,
And be still billing?'
No, Louisa, take little Charles to his couch, and do you retire
also. I would be alone. I will come to you soon. Leave me
alone.'
The wife obeyed, and retired to her apartment. Then I saw that
the countenance of the husband settled into a look of solemn and
calm resolve. He fastened close the door through which his wife
and child had retired, and carefully surveying the apartment, drew
a pistol from his bosom, and placed it on the table before him.
His face grew pale. Desperate thoughts were struggling in his
mind. `Yes,' he muttered, `I might as well die as live.
She
will be happier, if she returns a widow to the roof of her revered
parent, than she would to remain with me; a
broken merchant,
a depressed, degraded citizen, a ruined man. Were it not
better
that I sink at once into the grave, and bury my sorrows in its
bosom? Oh yes; for there the wicked cease from troubling,
and the weary are at rest. No treacherous friends can there
repay
my goodness with ingratitude, or make the name which
has been recorded for their benefit, a mockery and a by-word.
With
what
countenance could I meet my astonished friends,
after
the hour of
three
to-morrow! I should shrink from every
gaze! No! thanks to this friendly weapon, I can escape
beyond
the frowns and curses of man.
I will die!
'
My heart knocked audibly against my ribs, as I saw the
melancholy
merchant make his deadly preparations. He cocked
the pistol; he unbuttoned his waistcoat, and parting the bosom
of his shirt, placed the fatal instrument against his heart. He
paused a moment. `I must write to LouisaI must ask her
forgiveness
.'
He took up his pen, and began to write: he laid it
by as suddenly as he grasped it.
A beam of light seemed to play across his forehead as he laid
it down. `There
is
one hope,' he whispered, with a kind of
nervous chuckle in his throat, `
one
hope to cling to. I will try
its promise; I will adopt the plan it has suggested. I know it
is desperate; I know it is wicked; but
God
forgive me! The
insufferable agony which tempts methe bitter thoughts which
madden my spiritmay
they
excuse me!'
He arose, and arranging his habiliments, sought the street
with a stealthy and hurried tread. No barrier concealed him
from my view. I followed his course as he passed through
several
thoroughfares, until I traced him to a vile and obscure lane,
where he paused before a dwelling far too elgant for the
neighhood
in which it was situated, and entered. My glance was
close upon his foot-steps. He continued his way through a
dusky corridor, and knocked loudly at a glass door, before which
hung a curtain of blue silk. It opened; and what a scene
appeared
!
Stetched through a long saloon, were some twelve or
thirteen card-tables, each surrounded with victims and victors.
Groans, curses, and laughter, were confusedly mingled together;
some of the multitude were pale with rage and fear; others
almost
frantic with joy. It seemed a blending of Paradise and
Pandemonium.
The merchant approached one of the tables, and obtaining a
seat, took out his pocket-book containing a bank-note of twenty
dollars. `It is all on earth,' he murmured, with a sigh, `that I
can call my own! If I should lose, then I myself am lost,
forever
:
if I win, I live.
God
help my poor wife and child!'
The play was
rouge et noir
. The merchant changed his note
at a side table, and bet in fives.
He lost
. Fifteen dollars were
swiftly swept away. The last five was staked.
It won!
He played again and won: he went on. Note after note
rustled
in his hand: he redoubled his ventures, and the duplicate
harvests still continued to come into his garner. His eye
beamed
,
his cheek was flushed, and he laughed ever and anon with a
convulsive joy. Thousands on thousands rolled into his
possession
.
His partner was a young
blood
about town; a prodigal
of that class depicted by Thompson in his Castle of Indolence:
`A gaudy spendthirft heir,
All glossy, gay, enamelled all with gold,
The silly tenant of the summer air.
In folly lost, of nothing takes he care:
Pimps, lawyers, stewards, harlots, flatterers vile,
And thieving tradesmen him among them share:
His father's ghost from limbo lake the while,
Sees this, which more damnation doth upon him pile.'
There seemed to be no end to the success of the merchant.
Chance was
his,
and he soon received all his opponent's funds.
`How much have you lost?' he inquired of the loser.
`Oh, curse it!just a trifle. I had between eight and nine
thousand dollars when I came: I had lost only a few hundreds
when you entered. You have the rest, and my good Sir, I
wish you joy of it. Thank the Lord, I have got enough more.'
`Believe me,' said the merchant, `you shall not lose it. I
will restore it to you, and that ere long. My success has saved
my life,' he whispered: `and
now
to my Charles and Louisa!
Chance has preserved me, and I shall
not
be a bankrupt. I
shall meet my demands to-morrow! I am safe!'
He burst from the `
Hell
' where he had played, and hastened
home. That door which closed upon him did not hide him from
my gaze. I saw him hurry to the bedside of his wife and child,
and kneeling there, he whispered a fervent and humble prayer
for forgiveness of his Maker.
* * * * * *
It
was his first gamebut not his last. The lapse of two
weeks saw him crowned with independence, and his victim
clandestinely
paid. Fortune smiled upon his sudden purchase and
disposal
of estates; and when I next saw him by day, the envy of
his fellows, and apparently the happiest of his kind, I thought,
`How few can know like me, that but so lately his life depended
upon the hazard of a cast!'...
And
what
a hazard was
that! Gambling is a magical stream, in which, if you but wet
the sole of your foot, you must needs press on, until the waters
have closed over you forever. That husband and father died a
despairing, wretched gamester, leaving his family a prey to
poverty
and sorrow.
LANGUAGE.
The
capabilities of our vernacular are not duly appreciated.
Without going back to the simple strength and sublimity of the
mater languarum,
or discussing the merits of any other tongue
that has prevailed since the brick-layers and stone-masons of
Babel fell into a state of
strike
either for want of order,
or for higher wageswe venture to observe that the English
tongue is the richest in the world. Its sublimity is `
compounded
from many simples,' and sources, as any one may know by
consulting the pages of that burly and bilious philologist, Sam.
Johnson. Latin, Greek, Saxon, German, and eke the French,
may especially be found in the garner of its circumscription. It
is capable of infinite diversity. The multitude of its synonyms,
the full array of its adverbs and adjectives, render it indeed the
best of languages.
We have said thus much, in order to pave the way for a few
specimens of the graceful
expansion
which a short phrase in
English may be made to undergo. Refinement seems to be the
increasing passion of the time, and language is forced to partake
of its prevalence. Several of our contemporaries have caught
the polishing mania, and the clothing of common thoughts in
holiday suits, and of setting some dwarf of a phrase upon the
stilts of embellishment, have become universal.
We think that we were the first to give an impetus to this
innovation
on the occidental side of the Atlantic. It is not so
generally bruited as it should have been, either on the continent
of America, or throughout the boundaries of Europe, or in
Ispahan
,
Jeddo, Jerusalem, or Bagdad, that
we
first refined that
well-known adage of `proceeding the entire swine'the
indivisum
porculum
. That stupendous conception was our own;
and to whomsoever may charge us therewith, we own the soft
impeachment, looking to the public to protect our bays.
Hereunto we append some fresh doings, of a similar kind.
Two of the saws have exotic trimmings; the others are
indigenous
.
We grew them:
Original
. Go to the Devil and shake yourself.
Improved
. Proceed to the Arch-enemy of Man and agitate
your person.
Or
.
Of one who squints
. He looks two ways for Sunday.
Imp
. One who, by reason of the adverse disposition of his
opticsa natal defectis forced to scrutinize in duple
directions
for the Christian Sabbath.
Or
. Don't count your chickens before they are hatched.
Imp
. Enumerate not your adolescent pullets, ere they cease
to be oviform.
Or
. Sauce for the goose, is sauce for the gander.
Imp
. The culinary adornments which suffice for the female
of the race
Anser,
may be relished also by the masculine adult
of the same species.
Or
. Let well enough alone.
Imp
. Suffer a healthful sufficiency to remain in solitude.
Or
. None so deaf as them that won't hear.
Imp
. No persons are obtuse in their auricular apprehension,
equal to those who repudiate vocal incomes by adverse
inclination
.
Or
. Put a beggar on horseback, and he will ride to the devil.
Imp
. Establish a mendicant on the uppermost section of a
charger, and he will transport himself to Apollyon.
Or
. Accidents will happen in the best of families.
Imp
. Disasters will eventuate even in households of the
supremest
integrity.
Or
. A still sow drinks the most swill.
Imp
. `The taciturn female of the porcine genus imbibes the
richest nutriment.'
Or
. The least said, the soonest mended.
Imp
. The minimum of an offensive remark is cobbled with
the greatest promptitude.
Or
. 'T is an ill wind that blows nobody good.
Imp
. That gale is truly diseased, which puffeth benefactions
to nonentity.
Or
. A stitch in time, saves nine.
Imp
. The `first impression' of a needle on a rent obviateth a
nine-fold introduction.
Or
. A nod's as good as a wink, to a horse that is n't blind.
Imp
. `An abrupt inclination of the head, is equivalent to a
contraction of the eye, to a steed untroubled with obliquity of
vision.'
Or
. 'T is a a wise child that knows its own father.
Imp
. That juvenile individual is indeed sage, who possesses
authentic information with respect to the identity of his paternal
derivative.
Or
. There's no accounting for taste.
Imp
. The propensities of the palate defy jurisdiction.
Or
. Two and two make four.
Imp
. (As per Sam. J.) The number four is a certain
aggregate
of units: and all numbers being the repetition of an unit
which, though not a number in itself, is the parent, root, or
original
of all number
four
is the denomination assigned to a
certain
number of such repetitions.
Or
. Three removes are as bad as a fire.
Imp
. The triple transmission of a household, with chattels,
from one domicil to another, is as vicious as a conflagration.
Here we pause. For the nonce, our speculation has done its
worst.
FREE TRANSLATIONS.
`Multa absurda fingunt.'
Cambesarius
.
Who
has not amused himself in his classic hours, in making
free translations? There is a kind of intoxication in it. The
Oxford student who completed a travestie of all the books in
Homer's Iliad, must have had a glorious time of it; for
Melesigenes
was not beyond the power of ridicule, and Socrates long
remembered the quizzing of Aristophanes. Some of those old
and choice spirits in the SpectatorJohnson, Addison, and
their coteriewith all their veneration for the blind Bard of
Greece, could not refrain from showing up his occasional `
sinkings
in poetry.' They cite the passage where he compares a
warrior in the midst of a desperate contest, to a jackass
surrounded
in a corn-field, with peculiar pleasure, as a scrap of pure
bathos. It is Shakspeare's, and of course Nature's, truth, that
no earthly thing, however good, is insusceptible of some gross
admixture; and I think the mode in which college boys murder
the dead languages, (forgive the bull,) is, so far at least, a
complete verification of a saying quoted in substance from one
who, according to Ben Johnson, understood `small Latin and
less Greek.'
I am getting deplorably rusty in my memory of free
translations
.
My brain used to be stored with them; yet I bethink me
now of but one. It was made by an unhewn fellow, in his
freshman year; and I have heard it quoted by my friend Lemuel
Turquoise, (the finest observer of the burlesque in all my
clique,
)
with an orotund fulness that would have pleased the
discriminating
and subtle ear of
Rush
himself. Here it is:
`Old Grimes is mortuus, that agathos old anthropos
Nunquam videbimus eum plus;
Usus est to habere an old togam,
All ante-buttoned down!'
Verses of this kind are arbitrary in their construction, and the
pause or accent can rest anywhere the reader chooses to fix it.
At the moment I record this, many other renderings come
suddenly
to my mind; but such reminiscences, though indescribably
pleasing to me, have no charm for the public. I associate them
with the hearty, laughing faces of school companions who have
been swept from my side by the course of circumstances and
time; some of whom are pursuing their destiny in other lands;
some dead; some on the wave, in the service of their country.
How soon do our better hours and opportunities wane into things
that were!
Among the free translators of small Latin scraps in modern
times, I reckon Thomas Hood to be the very best. He is
himself
alone. In his annual he furnishes many, and they are
always
good. They generally serve as mottos for pictures. I
recollect a few of these, and will set them down. One of his
plates represents a female cook, `doing' some meat in a
frying-pan
.
The fat, or grease, has increased to the overflow, and the
whole dish is in a blaze. The brawny arms of the maid are
uplifted
,
and her countenance indicates the utmost perplexity and
consternation
.
The motto is, `
Ignis
Fat
-
uus!
' Another sets forth
a mad bull, with his tail curled in air, his nostrils expanded, and
his whole port bewildered. He is surrounded by a crowd of
gaping rustics. Motto,
`
De Lunatico Inquirendo!
'
In one of
these sketches, a specimen of French is given. An English
cockney
is depicted riding in a private coach, on a French highway.
He is passing a field of oats; and the postillion, accidentally
stretching out his whip in that direction, says to his horses,
`Vtevte!'(
quick;
equivalent in this case to `Go ahead!')
`No,' says the cockney, thinking himself addressed, and the field
the subject, `no, them ar'nt
w'eat
them's
h
oats!'
Some odd translations have been done into French, from the
English. One of the Parisian authors, in rendering the passage,
`Out, brief candle,
Life's but a walking shadow,' etc.,
from Shakspeare, gave it thus:
`Sortez, sortez, vous courte chandelle!'
Namely:
`Get out,
you short candle!
'
But I am persuaded that the French make fewer blunders
than their neighbors across the channel. A regular John Bull,
wishing to shut the mouth of a drunken hack-driver at Calais,
said to him in a pompous and menacing voice: `Tenez votre
langue: vous tes en liqueur!' The equivalent English of these
words, rendered as they stand, is ludicrous enough.
Of all the free translations, however, that I ever met with,
commend me to a work recently published in London, from the
pen of one John Bellenden Ker, Esq., A. S. S., etc., entitled,
`An Essay on the Archaiology of Popular Phrases.' Having
been favored with this work by a transatlantic friend, I take the
liberty of presenting a few specimens of the author's stupid
ingenuity
to the American public. He gives a large number of
nursery ballads and common adages; and by the most distorted
construction, traces them either to the Anglo or Low Saxon.
The absurdity of these translations constitutes the only claim to
attention, preferred by this queer etymological. Nothing can be
more laughable than his derivations, several of which I proceed
to serve up. The first I select is the common phrase, `Oh, the
pride of a cobbler's dog.' Mr. Ker refers it to the Saxon:
`
Hoe
die prijckt op de kopplers doogh!
'
i. e. `Oh, how this person
prides himself!' `He is as poor as a church mouse.'
`
Het is
al pur als hij ghiere moes:
'
i. e. `He is reduced to be
importunate
for victuals.' `He does not care two straws for her.'
`
Het
deught niet gar toe's troren vor hr!
'
i. e. `It is not worth while
to grieve for her!'
I can not refrain from giving one specimen of the Nursery
Ballads, with Mr. Ker's original definition.
`Cock-a-doodle-doo
`Gack en duijdt het t'u,
Dame has lost her shoe:
Di'em aes lost ter s'du;
Master's broke his fiddle-stick,
Mij aes daer's brok es vied t'el stick,
And don't know what to do!'
End doedt nauw wet tet u!'
The definition is: `Dolt of a peasant!your life is a hell upon
earth; you are so foolish as to delight in hard work,' etc.
From the quizzical parodies which this work has excited
abroad, I subjoin the following. It is by the editor of the London
Examiner, who, after some study of Mr. Ker's glossaries, felt
himself
au fait
at his system of etymology. He gives this
liberal
interpretation of `God save the King.' The Saxon, if it be not
as pure, reads at at least as well as Ker's:
`
God
save great George our King,
`Goets aef gregte Gorgch oor Kynck!
Long live our noble King,
Lon glyff oor nobblekin;
God save the King!
Goets aef thee king!
Send him victorious,
Sen dym vych toe rye oose,
Long to reign over us,
Lonkturane o vyrues,
God save the King!'
Goets aef theeking!'
Definition(
free!
)`Foolish is the idea of a government
compounded
of a king, an hereditary peerage, and a popular
representative
assembly; it is foolish altogether! Under such a state
of things, the taxes become insupportable, and the people are
besotted
by the priesthood, and live miserably under bad laws; it
is foolish altogether!'
Not content with Europe as the arena of his researches, Mr.
Ker has embraced America in his derivative enterprise. Here is a
phrase that he has most learnedly illustrated; one that until quite
lately was never heard of out of the United States. If Mr. Ker's
humbug
were not absurd, it would be criminal. Strange to say,
it has many implicit believers:
`He went the whole hog'in the sense of he went the whole length, took
a deep interest in, made it his own business: `
Hij wendt de hold hoogh:
'
i. e. `He turned the feelings of a friend to the subject in question.'
The author quotes from Mr. Clayton's speech in the United
States Senate in support of his etymology.
Encouraged by our writer's example, I offer one or two
translations
,
la mode Ker
. I take a revolutionary saying, and one
verse of Yankee Doodle. I am not at liberty to mention the
derivative
language, only so far as to say, that it is a mixture of
Mormon and Choctaw. I will merely remark, for the benefit of
philologists, that the parlance is not extant in the schools:
`The times that tried men's souls:' `
Thett ymms then' dried mens 'ocls;
'
i. e. `The time when we thrashed our invaders and gained a republic.'
`Corn-stalks twist your hair,
`Koern stoelks twijsdt y'er aer,
Cart-wheels go round ye;
Kar t'oeils goer un ghe;
Fiery dragons carry ye off,
Phy ried rag undts kar e oopgh,
And mortar-pestle pound ye!'
An dmor t'arp oestil poenndjie!'
On the whole, from the evidences that I meet with daily, I am
persuaded that free translations are on the increase. Their utility
may be judged of from the foregoing specimens. That they are
amusing, admits of no doubt: but there are many who will reject
them altogether, as things that have no moral, and as possessing
nothing that one can go about to prove.
AMERICAN PTYALISM.
`
I must
humbly crave leave hereinne, to be delivered of a bouldenesse,
wherewith
my pen is in travaile.'
Sir Hy. Wotton's `Reliqui.'
Big
words, now-a-days, are all the rage, and I flatter myself
that I have selected a pretty tall one for this article. It stands as
the expositor of an alarming epidemic which has long prevailed
in our well-beloved country; and for which the land is cursed
by travelling cockneys, and cosmopolitan old women.
Ptyalism,
gentle reader, is `the effusion of spittle,' as is worthily illustrated
by that venerable lexicographer, Sam. Johnson; the prince of
his tribe, and the sometime lion to that jackal, Boswell. This is
my theme; it is the evil whereupon I design to expatiate; and
I can say with my motto-maker, that it is one which I have not
undertaken out of any wanton pleasure in mine own pen; nor
truly without pondering with myself beforehand, what censures I
might incur; for I know that the object against which the lance
of my reprobation is to be tilted, is grievously circumvested with
the affection of habit and the sanctity of time. I mean not to be
a sweeping opponent, but a commentator merely. To advocate
the ptyalism of this nation would be `a sin to man,' for an
amendment in the custom is most imperiously demanded.
Whether the corporeal juices are more abundant in the citizens
of the United States than in the people of other countries, it is
not pertinent just now to inquire. At all events, they are less
regarded; for we are said to be the most notoriously salivating
nation on the face of the globe. But the custom is as old as
time. We hear of it in the first origin of our religion. It was
by spittle that the blind man was healed with the clay which our
Saviour
applied to his eyes; and in many countries it has been
invested
with peculiar sanctity. In Scotland, as may be learned from
works relating to its popular superstitions, the virtue of spittle has
long been held in high estimation by that proverbially neat and
thrifty people. Authors have thrown much light upon this
subject
.
They prove that the properties of the human saliva have
enjoyed singular notice in both sacred and profane history.
Pliny devotes an entire chapter in describing its efficacy among
the ancient pagans, with whom it was esteemed an antidote to
fascination, a preservative against contagion, a counteracting
influence upon poisons, and a source of strength in fisticuffs.
Some of these uses, the moderns retain. When they fight, they
spit in their hands; and they indulge in the same process under
the humiliation of defeat. Your Irish or English servant will
spit on an eleemosynary shilling; for he thinks that it blesses the
coin. In the country of the former, it is said to be an invariable
habit among the peasant girls, whenever they fling away the
combings of their hair. There is sometimes a dignity, or grandeur,
and sometimes a solemnity, in the custom. I always think well of
those ladies one meets in romances, when they
express
themselves
in that way. Who has not joined in the feeling of Rebecca and
Ivanhoe, when the lustful templar, Brain de Bois-Guilbert,
invades
her in her tower, to compass her dishonor, and when she,
standing on the parapet, ready to spring from that lofty height
into the court-yard below, says to the craven knight, with a look
of withering contempt: `I
spit
at thee; I defy thee! Thanks
to him who reared this dizzy tower so high, I fear thee not!
Advance one step nearer to my person, and I will leap, to be
crushed out of the very form of humanity, in the depth beneath!'
The reader almost sees the scornful foam escaping from the
curled and beautiful lip of the Jewess, and is himself inclined to
suit his action to the thought. Our ideas of propriety are
derived
,
to a greater extent than we are aware of, from novels;
and if their pages may be relied on, their heroines (being always
encompassed by scoundrels whom they have much ado to keep
at a proper distance) must have been spitting at their detested
supernumerary lovers about half the time. Contempt is well
expressed by that action, and by the word. There is innate
disdain in the saliva itself. It leaves the haughty lip of the
offended
one, and lies before the contemned personperhaps
upon his beardlike a gage of war, as potent as the glove in
the days of the Crusades. In his work of `England and the
English,' the author of Pelham alludes to one Westmacott, (who
seems a common libeller in London,) under the name of
Sneak,
in the following expressive phrase: `His soul rots in his
profession
,
and you spit when you hear his name!' Among the
various
and opposing inferences derivable from the custom and the
use of the word, one is, that saliva is inherently contemptible;
and if so, is it not a noble proceeding to dispossess one's self as
much as possible of that which is unworthy? Is this a
non
sequitur?
In one of the remote islets of Scotland, spitting into the grave
forms a part of the funeral ceremony. Relations and friends
gather round the narrow mansion of the departed, and each one
ejects the salivary tribute of sorrowful remembrance. `Happy,'
says the old adage, `is the new grave that the rain rains on;'
and in the island of which I speak, perhaps the saying may be,
`Beloved is the dust that we spit upon.' Anciently, the subject
of
Optics
was illustrated only by those who possessed ample
knowledge in relation to the qualities of saliva. The popular
oculist was one who saw,
`or fancied, in his dreaming mood,
All the diseases that the spittles know.'
Even modern opticians, in their discussions upon the eye, have
recommended a research of the old schoolmen's tomes, that it
may be decided whether any `solvent, sanative, or medicament,'
connected with saliva, and lost to the oculists of the present day,
was not in vogue of yore. But I do not wish to discuss the
virtue
of that which I esteem the parent of a
vice
.
I look upon TOBACCO, in all its shapes and varieties, as the
prime cause of the very extensive ptyalism which prevails in
this nation. It is passing strange that this article ever came to
be beloved. It is wonderful, that a weed which is in itself, in
its original state, acrid and disagreeable, and which contains
poison as deadly as the sting of a scorpion, should have pushed
its way into use, until it has become a matter of traffic in all
quarters of the world. I can hardly imagine how it ever spread
its magic beyond the wigwam of the Indian, or came to mingle
its fumes with anything but the council-smokes of the aborigines,
in the pathless forests of the west. It has encountered and
conquered every obstacle; the book which James I. fulminated
against it; the opposition of Papal bulls, of Transylvanian edicts,
of Persian anathemas; and by the aid of Nicot, with Catharine
de Medicis, (who may perhaps have `
chawed,
') and the great
crowd of amateurs who continue to patronize it, the whole eastern
continent glories in its use, and is loud in its praise. Since the
Haytien began to draw its blue wreaths through his derivative
pipe, as he watched the distant sea, dancing to the balmy winds
from the palm-groves of his native land, the world has bowed to
the Nicotian weed. From Iceland to the tropics, and from
Jerusalem to the Pacific, it is in request. Protean in its forms,
it intoxicates in pigtail, twist, or plug; in cigar or snuff. In the
latter substance, how many a lofty nostril has it pleased, how
many old women and great men has it delighted! It was the last
comfort of Napoleon, when he cried `
Sauve qui peut!
' at
Waterloo
,
and rode through bloody battalions of the wounded and
dying, away from the victorious legions of Wellington. When
an old Irish vixen in a London police-office was charged by her
husband, to whom she had been rebellious, in a row, with taking
two ounces of snuff per diem, what was her answer? `Lawful
powers, yer Warship! What is two ounces of blissid snuff, to a
poor onfortinit woman, as gives suck to two childer?' It was an
appeal that went home at once to the proboscis of the magistrate,
and the woman was discharged.
Much as tobacco has been lauded, snuff has perhaps received
a greater share of eulogy. Even the organ to whose pleasure
it ministers has been addressed, among many others, by the
facetious author of `Absurdities,' as the source of his supremest
rapture. Hear him:
`
Knows
he that never took a pinch,
Nosey, the pleasure thence which flows?
Knows he the titillating joy
Which
my
nose knows?
Oh, Nose! I am as proud of thee,
As any mountain of
its
snows:
I gaze on thee, and feel the joy
A Roman knows!'
But this is an episode, since snuff is not directly consociated
with `the effusion of spittle.' Tobacco is. Who chews, and
smokes, and salivates not? Who ever attended a church, a
theatre, a political meeting, or any assembly, legislatures even,
and did not see the effects of tobacco! Who has not witnessed
them at parties, at ballsanywhere, and everywhere? How
many divines and statesmen have I known, the misanthropic
corners of whose lips exhibited the stained and pursed-up
wrinkles of tobacco! Your student and your `blood,' (ruminating
bipeds, who smoke or chew,) expectorate themselves away, and
look like old men long before they are forty.
Yet it is the abuse, rather than the use, of tobacco, of which I
complain. Under the rose, I have some respect myself for a
cigar; and I do not object to some kinds of scented snuff. It
is pleasant to smell the airy whiffs, circling around one's
contemplative
nose, and to enjoy the excitement of a sneeze. But
moderation
should guide us in these matters; for ptyalism is so
much of a habit, that in my opinion it might be abated two thirds,
in every one of our countrymen; and I think that many valuable
lives would thus be lengthened:
With regard to expectoration, I would say, that when 'tis
done, it would be well if it were done secretly. I am no
advocate
of the English custom of salivating into the handkerchief,
and carrying in a pocket the harvest of one's palatic department.
Neither do I think that we should care a tobacco-stopper what
foreign zantippes or scribblers think of the custom, only so far
as their strictures may seem to be just. In truth, after the
falsehoods
with which the European public has been deluged
respecting
our manners, the mere sight of an English tourist, male
or female, in this country, is enough to make an American citizen
spit from sheer disgust. We mean those tourists who grumble
when they land; grumble their six weeks' transit through the
republic, and then grumble themselves into a packet-cabin, and
go home to make a grumbling book. It is not surprising that
folk like these have seen a good deal of ptyalism. Every such
raven of passage is a walking ptysmagogue, and excites the very
discharges that are so vehemently condemned.
There is a
juste milieu
in this habit, which, as a nation, we
have not hit as yet; though we are much nearer to it than the
spittle-pocketing kingdom which has furnished us with so many
peripatetic philosophers on the subject. Let a general effort be
made to touch this happy medium. To use a pun of some
longevity
,
we must expectorate less, before we can
expect to rate
as
a polished nation. I appeal to all frequenters of public places,
whether my advice be not good. Let it be followed. Let it be
henceforth declared no more, as it has been, that `an American
spits from his cradle to his grave; at the board of his friend, at
the feet of his mistress, at the drawing-room of his president, at
the altar of his God: he salivates for three score years and ten;
and when the glands of his palate can secrete no longer, he spits
forth his spirit, and is gathered to his fathers, to spit no more.'
John W. Sangrado,
M. D.
Communipaw
,
November
22, 1834.
END OF PROSE MISCELLANIES.`Huntingdon,
8th Dec.,
1775.
`To Miss
.
Then I release my dear soul from her promise about
today
.
If you do not see that all which he can claim by gratitude, I doubly
claim by love, I have done, forever. I would purchase my happiness at any
price but at the expense of yours. Look over my letters, think over my
conduct, consult your own heart, read these two long letters of your own
writing, which I return you. Then tell me whether we love or not. And
if we love (as witness both our hearts), shall gratitude,
cold
gratitude, bear
away the prize that's due to love like ours? Shall my right be
acknowledged
,
and he possess the casket? Shall I have your soul, and he your
hand, your lips, your eyes?
`Gracious God of Love! I can neither write nor think. Send one line,
half a line, to
`Your own, own
H.'`H. 10th Dec.,
'75.
`To
Mr.
H
Your two letters of the day before yesterday, and
what you said to me yesterday, have drove me mad. You know how such
tenderness distracts me. As to marrying me, that you should not do upon
any account. Shall the man I value, be pointed at and hooted for selling
himself to a lord for a commission? * * * My soul is above my
situation
.
Beside, I will not take advantage of what may be only, perhaps,
(excuse me), a youthful passion. After a more intimate acquaintance of
a week or ten days, your opinion of me might very much change. And
yet you
may
love me as sincerely as I
`But I will transcribe you a verse which I don't believe you ever heard
me sing, though it's my favorite. It is said to be a part of an old Scottish
balladnor is it generally believed that Lady L. wrote it. It is so
descriptive
of our situation, I wept over it like a child, yesterday:
`I gang like a ghost, and I do not care to spin,
I fain would think on Jamie, but that would be a sin;
I must e'en do my best a good wife to be,
For auld Robin Gray has been kind to me.'
`For God's sake let me see my
Jamie
to-morrow. Your name also is
Jamie.'`Huntingdon,
13th Dec.,
'75.
`To
Miss
My Life and Soul! But I will never more use any
more preface of this sort, and I beg you will not. A correspondence begins
with dear, then my dear, dearest, my dearest, and so on, till, at last, panting
language toils after us in vain.
`No language can explain my feelings. Oh, yesterday, yesterday!
Language
thou liest! Oh, thou beyond my warmest dreams bewitching! Are
you not now convinced that Heaven made us for each other? * * *
Have I written sense? I know not what I write.
`Misfortune, I defy thee now! M. loves me, and my soul has its content
most absolute. No other joy like this succeeds in unknown fate.'`
England,
25th June, 1776
.
`To
Mr.
.
Let me give you joy of having found such kind and
agreeable friends in a strange land. The account you gave me of the lady
quite charmed me. Neither am
I
without
my
friends. A lady from whom
I have received particular favors, is uncommonly kind to me. For the
credit of your side of the water, she is an Irish woman.
Her agreeable
husband,
by his beauty and accomplishments, does credit to this country.
He is remarkable also for his
feelings
.
`Adieu! This will affect
you,
I dare say, in the same manner that your
account affected
me
.'`
7th April, 1779
.
`To Mr. B.
My Dear F.
When this reaches you I shall be no
more, but do not let my unhappy fate distress you too much. I strove
against it as long as possible, but now it overpowers me. You know where
my affections were placed; my having by some means or other lost hers,
(an idea which I could not support,) has driven me to madness. God bless-you
, my dear F. Would I had a sum of money to leave you to
convince
you of my great regard! May Heaven protect my beloved woman,
and forgive the act which alone could relieve me from a world of misery I
have long endured! Oh! should it be in your power to do her any act of
friendship,
remember your faithful friend,
J. H.'`8th April, 1779
.
`To
Charles
,
Esq
.
I am alive, and she is dead. I shot her and
not myself. Some of her blood is still upon my clothes. I dont ask you
to speak to me. I don't ask you to look at me. Only come hither, and
bring me a little poison; such as is strong enough. Upon my knees I beg,
if your friendship for me ever was sincere,
do,
do
bring me
some poison!
'`17th April, '79
.
`To Mr.
Hackman,
in Newgate:
If the murderer of Misswishes
to live, the man he has most injured will use all his interest to procure his
life.'`
The Condemned Cell in Newgate,
Saturday Night, 17th April, 1779
.
`
The
murderer of her whom he preferred, far preferred, to life, suspects
the hand from which he has just received such an offer as he
neither desires
nor deserves
. His wishes are for death, not for life. One wish he has:
Could he be pardoned in this world by the man he has most injured! Oh
my lord, when I meet
her
in another world, enable me to tell her, (if
departed
spirits are not ignorant of earthly things,) that you forgive us both,
and that you will be a father to her dear infants!
J. H.'Gadsby's,
9
o'clock, A. M.
Dear Huge:
I am
gone to spend a fortnight, in a Christmas festival, with
some friends in Virginia. I enclose a regular division of our
joint funds. I have spoken to my uncle about our hotel bills
here, and he will fix them. It is all understood. You can stay
a fortnight if you like; though how you'll get back to
Philadelphia
,
after that, the Lord only knows. Perhaps you may
accomplish
the transit without trouble: if so, I shall be, (as I was
last night, when I
thought
I knew you,)
mistaken
.
Yours,
Tom
.`
No.,Street
.
`My Dear John:
We do not know each other well, for we have been
thwarted by the presence of untoward circumstances; but surely, my dear,
my
only
John, the language of my eyes must have convinced you that
since we first met, my heart has been wholly yours. Come to-morrow
evening at eight, and in a walk of a few moments, I will convince you, if
words can do it, of the unalterable affection of your devoted
`
Catharine Wallace
.
`
John Smith, Esq.,
Adelphi
.'THE SPIRIT OF LIFE.
There
is a Spirit, whose reviving power
Dwells through the changes of each earthly hour:
Where the sere blooms of man's decline are shed,
And sterile snows the brow of age o'erspread;
Or while each impulse of the heart is young,
And the light laugh falls sweet from childhood's tongue:
There lurks that moving spirit, bound to all
O'er which nor chance nor time can fling a thrall;
Through lengthened years its force unbroken moves,
Guiding the hopes of earth, the eares, the loves;
Where'er the land outspreads, or sunshine lies,
Pour'd on old ocean from the boundless skies;
In calm or storm, in light or shade it springs,
And broods o'er nature with perpetual wings.
Its name is Lifeand glorious is its sway,
Which seas, and worlds on worlds, and stars obey;
Born from the exhaustless might of
God
alone,
The extended universe is but his throne;
In liberal measure, through the waste of years,
Its quenchless power, or principle, appears;
Fadeless and unrepress'd its lustres move,
Won from the fountains of Eternal Love!
Mysterious Life! how wide is thy domain!
In nature's scope how absolute thy reign!
In moving force thy kindling gleams appear,
When dewy blooms bedeck the opening year;
When, robed in laughing guise, the Spring comes on,
And waves her odorous garlands in the sun:
When the soft air comes balmy from the West,
And tenderest verdure cheers the meadow's breast:
How teem the gifts of life at such an hour
How sighs the zephyrhow expands the flow'r!
High from the forest's nodding tops arise
Rich clouds of hidden fragrance through the skies
Their viewless wings the abyss of ether fan,
While dreams, exaiting, fire the breast of man.
Awakening life in every thought prevails;
He draws rapt inspiration from the gales:
To the charm'd eye above, the golden sun
Doth his perpetual journeys brightly run;
Around his course, in solemn pomp, repose
Gay clonds that drink his glory as he goes;
He bathes the desert waste, the city's fanes;
He pours clear radiance on the hills and plains;
Till restless life, still travelling with his rays,
O'er earth and heaven, in trembling lustre plays.
Who, when the summer laughs in light around,
But feels that spirit's glowing power abound?
Warmed from the south, the gladsome hours are shed,
Lending new verdure to each mountain-head;
Luxuriant blessings crown the pleasant scene,
And the broad landscape glows in sunny green;
While leaves and birds and streams their songs attune,
And, steep'd in music, smiles the rose of June;
Making the freighted bliss it scatters there,
Seem like the breathings of ambrosial air;
While, o'er the tall old hills and vales between,
In peerless glory, swells the blue serene:
Unbounded skies!where life triumphant dwells,
And light resistless from its fountain wells;
Where beauty unapproach'dalonesublime,
Mocks at the restless change of earth and time;
And clothed in radiance from the Eternal's throne,
Bends its unpillared arch from zone to zone!
Who that hath stood, where summer brightly lay
On some broad city, by a spreading bay,
And from a rural height the scene survey'd,
While on the distant strand the billows play'd,
But felt the vital spirit of the scene,
What time the south wind stray'd through foliage green,
And freshened from the dancing waves, went on,
By the gay groves, and fields, and gardens won?
Oh, who that listens to the inspiring sound
Which the wide Ocean wakes against his bound,
While, like some fading hope, the distant sail
Flits o'er the dim blue waters, in the gale;
When the tired sea-bird dips his wings in foam,
And hies him to his beetling eyry home;
When sun-gilt ships are parting from the strand,
And glittering steamers by the breeze are fanned;
When the wide city's domes and piles aspire,
And rivers broad seemed touch'd with golden fire
Save where some gliding boat their lustre breaks,
And volumed smoke its murky tower forsakes,
And surging in dark masses, soars to lie,
And stain the glory of the uplifted sky;
Oh, who at such a scene unmoved hath stood,
And gazed on town, and plain, and field, and flood,
Nor felt that life's keen spirit lingered there,
Through earth, and ocean, and the genial air?
`Change is the life of Nature;' and the hour
When storm and blight reveal lone autumn's pow'r;
When damask leaves to swollen streams are cast,
Borne on the funeral anthems of the blast;
When smit with pestilence the woodlands seem,
Yet gorgeous as a Persian poet's dream;
That hour the seeds of life within it bears,
Though fraught with perished blooms and sobbing airs;
Though solemn companies of clouds may rest
Along the uncheer'd and melancholy west;
Though there no more the enthusiast may behold
Effulgent troops, arrayed in purple and gold;
Or mark the quivering lines of light aspire,
Where crimson shapes are bathed in living fire
Though Nature's withered breast no more be fair,
Nor happy voices fluctuate in the air;
Yet is there life in Autumn's sad domains
Life, strong and quenchless, through his kingdom reigns.
To kindred dust the leaves and flowers return,
Yet briefly sleep in winter's icy urn;
Though o'er their graves, in blended wreaths, repose
Dim wastes of dreary and untrodden snows,
Though the aspiring hills, rise cold and pale
To breast the murmurs of the northern gale,
Yet, when the jocund spring again comes on,
Their trance is broken, and their slumber done;
Awakening Nature re-asserts her reign,
And her kind bosom throbs with life again!
`'T is thus with man. He cometh, like the flow'r,
To feel the changes of each earthly hour;
To enjoy the sunshine, or endure the shade,
By hopes deluded, or by reason sway'd;
Yet haply, if to Virtue's path he turn,
And feel her hallowed fires within him burn,
He passeth calmly from that sunny morn,
Where all the buds of youth are `newly born,'
Through varying intervals of onward years,
Until the eve of his decline appears:
And while the shadows round his path descend,
As down the vale of age his footsteps tend,
Peace o'er his bosom sheds her soft control,
And throngs of gentlest memories charm the soul;
Then, weaned from earth, he turns his steadfast eye
Beyond the grave, whose verge he falters nigh,
Surveys the brightening regions of the blest,
And, like a wearied pilgrim, sinks to rest.
The just man dies not, though within the tomb
His wasting form be laid, mid tears and gloom:
Though many a heart beats sadly when repose
His silvery locks in earth, like buried snows;
Yet love, and hope, and faith, with heavenward trust,
Tell that his spirit sinks not in the dust:
Above, entranced and glorious, it hath soared,
Where all its primal freshness is restored;
And from all sin released, and doubt, and pain,
Renews the morning of its youth again.
Yes! while the mourner stands beside the bier,
O'er a lost friend to shed the frequent tear
To pour the tender and regretful sigh,
And feel the heart-pulse fill the languid eye
Even at that hour the thoughtful wo is vain,
Since change, not death, invokes affection's pain.
Naught but a tranquil slumberer resteth there,
Whose spirit's plumes have swept the upper air,
And caught the radiance borne from heaven along,
Fraught with rich incense and immortal song;
And passed the glittering gates which angels keep:
Oh, wherefore for the just should mourners weep?
And why should grief be moved for those who die,
When life is opening to the youthful eye;
When freshening love springs buoyant in the breast,
And hope's gay wings are fluttering undepress'd:
While like the morning dews that gem the rose,
In the pure soul, the dreams of joy repose;
When on the land and wave a light is thrown,
Which to the morn of life alone is known;
When every scene brings gladness to the view,
And every rapture of the heart is new;
Oh, who shall mourn that
then
the silver cord
Is loosed, and to its home the soul restored?
Oh who should weep that thus, at such an hour,
Celestial light should burst upon the flower
The human flower, that but began to glow
And brighten in this changeful world below;
Then, still unstained, was borne, to bloom on high,
And drink the lustre of a fadeless sky?
No! let the mother, when her infant's breath
Faints on her bosom, in the trance of death;
Then let her yearning heart obey the call
Of that high
God
who loves and cares for all;
Resign the untainted blossom to that shore
Where sicknesses and blight have power no more;
Where poisonous mildew comes not from the air,
To check the undying blooms and verdure there;
But where the gifts of life profuse are shed,
And funeral wailings rise not o'er the dead:
Where cherub-throngs in joy triumphant move,
And Faith lies slumbering on the breast of Love.
Change wears the name of death, the heart to bow,
And bid its rising shadows cloud the brow;
To teach the wandering soul, with truth severe,
That man hath no continual city here;
That all his hopes, unfixed on God and heaven,
Like pure aroma to the whirlwinds given,
Are raptures, wasted from a precious store,
They leave the bosom to return no more.
Could man's impressive reason bear the sway,
And guide his footsteps through life's little day;
Could every pulse that riots but to stain
His soul, move calmly in reflection's reign;
Could gentle Conscience whisper peace within,
And from his spirit sweep the darling sin;
Between his birth-hour and his final rest,
What high philosophy would fire his breast?
Time's glittering charms would then no more delude,
Its phantom train would all be unpursued;
No scars of sorrow's war the cheek would wear,
Ploughed by corroding thoughts too deeply there;
No gusts of passion would the brow deform,
Or lash the kindling bosom into storm;
But each pure wish, inspired, to heaven would soar,
And earth's dull fevers burn the heart no more.
And since the changes which in time are rife,
No real death contain, but teem with life;
Since blooming nature from decay can spring
With buds, and happy birds upon the wing;
Since year to year succeeds, and all renew
The scenes that glow'd to childhood's wondering view,
Since lavish beauty riseth from the dust,
Shall man's cold heart withdraw from heaven its trust?
No! while the unblemished sun careers on high,
And gilds, with glorious smile, the earth and sky;
While tides, mysteriously-obedient, roll
From orient Indus to the frozen pole;
While chaste and free above, serenely bright,
The moon sails onward through a sea of light;
While verdant leaves in summer's air can play,
Or torrents thunder midst their rainbow spray:
Long as the unnumbered stars can flash and burn,
Or journeying winds upon their circuits turn;
There shall the exhaustless life of
God
be found,
And His kind love diffuse its gifts around.
Man to his rest may fallbut who should mourn,
Or plant the cypress by the marble urn?
In dust his wan, cold ashes may remain,
But no dark shade of death the soul can stain;
Beyond destruction's power 'tis formed to rise,
And bide the judgment-audit in the skies.
Then who the dirge would breathe, or pour the tear,
Since life is strong, and death is feeble here?
Gorged by the past, in dreamless slumber laid,
Rest the fond lover and the rosy maid;
Friends, parents, brothers, sisters, linger there,
Shut from the sunshine and the blessed air;
But change alone hath touched each earthly form,
Each faded banquet of the noisome worm:
Death o'er the ransomed spirit hath no pow'r
It waits the final and triumphant hour,
When sundering cerements shall their prey release,
Renewed and radiant, to the Realms of Peace.
All-quenchless Life! bright effluence from
God
!
Whose impulse fills the universe abroad!
From thee the restless heart its movement draws
In thee, revolving seasons find their laws;
Thine is the pulse that heaves the ocean wave,
Or bids the evening sunlight gild the grave;
That paints the gorgeous skies at night or morn,
When dawn is blushing, or when stars are born;
Which drives the unquiet storm along its way,
When broken ships are whelm'd in surge and spray;
While inland hills are echoing wildly-loud,
As the mad thunders roll from cloud to cloud;
When giant trees, with arms uplifted high,
Creak, as the sheeted lightnings hurtle by;
While lengthened swells chastise the groaning strand,
And bid their deep-toned murmurs thrill the land!
Life, unsubdued, through all the world prevails;
Howls on the midnight waters, or in vales
Where gentlest Summer spreads her waving grain,
Smiles o'er the golden harvest, on the plain;
Bathes, through the tranquil eve, the lake and stream,
In silvery lustre, an unbroken gleam;
Bids the rich sunset all its splendors form,
And braids the rainbow on the passing storm:
These are the gifts of
Life
sublime and high
They teach the soul its immortality!
Then let obedient man the lesson heed
Let his observant eye its precepts read;
On earth, and ocean, and in heaven above,
Writ with the principle of life and love;
So, when the mockeries of this world shall cease,
His spotless soul may don the robes of peace:
Its tireless pinions shall in rapture wave,
Far through the bended skies, above the grave;
Where no sad care the soaring thought can bind,
Or vex the holy and eternal mind.
There, through unclouded leagues of fragrant air,
The walls of Heaven dispense their glories rare;
Prismatic shafts of sparkling light arise,
Pure as the thoughts that beam from angels' eyes;
There, glittering gates of massy pearl unfold,
And restless lustre streams from streets of gold;
There Life's immortal river flows abroad,
To cheer the city of the living
God
;
And where its liquid lapse extends serene,
By dewy pastures of undying green;
There, rich with healing leaves and fruits that glow,
The trees of life their generous wealth bestow;
There, gentle harpers cheer the shadeless day,
And balm and song are pour'd from every spray.
There, too, when nature's requiem-trump shall sound,
Will all the pure of earth again be found;
Long-sundered friends, on that unblighted shore,
Will meet, to sorrow and to part no more;
But, calm'd and blessed, in reverential love,
Through joyous bowers, and fields undimmed, will move,
A deathless King to praisedivine and just,
Beneath whose feet the burning stars are dust.28
MISCELLANEOUS POEMS.
LAST PRAYER OF MARY, QUEEN OF SCOTS.
O Domine
Deus
! speravl in te;
O care mi
Jesu
, nunc libera me;
In dura catena, in misera pna,
Desidero te;
Languendo, gemendo, et genuflectendo,
Adoro, imploro, ut liberes me.!
*
*
These
lines, so melodious in the original, and susceptible of equally melodious
translation
,
were written by the unfortunate
Mary
a short time before her melancholy
execution.
It
was the holy twilight hour, and clouds in crimson pride
Sailed through the golden firmament, in the calm evening-tide;
The peasant's cheerful song was hushed by every hill and glen,
The city's voice stole faintly out, and died the hum of men:
And as night's sombre shades came down o'er day's resplendent eye,
A faded face, from a prison cell, gazed out upon the sky;
For to that face the glad bright sun of earth for aye had set,
And the last time had come to mark eve's starry coronet!
Oh, who can paint the bitter thoughts that o'er her spirit stole,
As her pale lips gave utterance to feeling's deep control;
While, shadowed from life's vista back, thronged mid her falling tears
The fantasies of early hope, dreams of departed years:
When pleasure's light was sprinkled, and silver voices flung
Their rich and echoing cadences her virgin hours among;
When there came no shadow on her brow, no tear to dim her eye,
When there frown'd no cloud of sorrow in her being's festal sky.
Perchance at that lone hour the thought of early visions came,
Of the trance that touched her lip with song, at love's mysterious flame;
When she listened to the low-breathed tones of him the idol One,
Who shone in her imagining, first ray of pleasure's sun:
Perchance the walk in evening hoursthe impassioned kiss or vow,
The warm tear on the kindling cheek, the smile upon the brow:
But they came like flowers that wither, and the light of all had fled,
As a hue from April's pinion, o'er earth's budding bosom shed.
And thus, as star came after star, into the boundless heaven,
Were her deep thoughts, and eloquent, in pensive numbers given:
They were the offerings of a heart, where grief had long held sway;
And now the night, the hour had come, to give her feelings way:
It was the last dim night of life; the sun had sunk to rest,
And the blue twilight haze had crept on the far mountain's breast;
And thus, as in her saddened heart the tide of love grew strong,
Pour'd her meek, quiet spirit forth, this flood of mournful song:
`The shades of evening gather now, o'er the mysterious earth,
The viewless winds are whispering, in wild, capricious mirth;
The gentle moon hath come to shed a flood of glory round,
That, through this soft and still repose, sleeps richly on the ground:
And in the free, sweet gales that sweep along my prison bar,
Seem borne the pure, deep harmonies of every kindling star:
I see the blue streams glancing in the mild and chastened light,
And the gem-lit, fleecy clouds, that steal along the brow of night.
`Oh must I leave existence now, while life should be like spring
While Joy should cheer my pilgrimage, with sunbeams from his wing?
Are the songs of hope for ever flownthe syren voice which flung
The chant of youth's warm happiness from the beguiler's tongue?
Shall I drink no more the melody of babbling stream or bird,
Or the scented gales of summer, as the leaves of June are stirr'd?
Shall the pulse of love wax fainter, and the spirit shrink from death,
As the bud-like thoughts that lit my heart fade in its chilling breath?
`I have passed the dreams of childhood, and my loves and hopes are gone,
And I turn to Thee,
Redeemer
! oh, thou blest and Holy One!
Though the rose of health has vanishedthough the mandate hath
been spoken,
And one by one the golden links of life's fond chain are broken,
Yet can my spirit turn to
Thee
, thou chastener! and can bend
In humble suppliance at thy throne, my father and my friend!
Thou, who hast crowned my youth with hope, my early days in glee,
Give me the eagle's fearless wingthe dove's, to mount to
Thee
!
`I lose my foolish hold on life, its passions and its tears:
How brief the yearning extacies of its young, careless years!
I give my heart to earth no more, the grave may clasp me now;
The winds whose tone I loved, may play in the dark cypress bough:
The birds, the streams are eloquent; yet I shall pass away,
And in the light of heaven shake off this cumbrous load of clay;
I shall join the lost, the loved of earth, and meet each kindred breast,
Where the wicked cease from troubling, and the weary are at rest.'
A CONTRASTED PICTURE.
It
was the morning of a day in spring
The sun looked gladness from the eastern sky;
Birds were upon the trees and on the wing,
And all the air was rich with melody;
The heaven, the calm, pure heaven, was bright on high;
Earth laugh'd beneath in all its fresh'ning green,
The free blue streams sang as they wandered by,
And many a sunny glade and flowery scene
Gleam'd out, like thoughts of youth, life's troubled years between.
The rose's breath upon the south wind came,
Oft as its whisperings the young branches stirr'd,
And flowers for which the poet hath no name;
While, midst the blossoms of the grove, were heard
The restless murmurs of the humming-bird:
Waters were dancing in the mellow light;
And joyous notes and many a cheerful word
Stole on the charmed ear with such delight
As waits on soft sweet tones of music heard at night.
The night-dews lay in the half open'd flower,
Like hopes that nestle in the youthful breast;
And ruffled by the light airs of the hour,
Awoke the pure lake from its glassy rest:
Slow blending with the blue and distant west,
Lay the dim woodlands, and the quiet gleam
Of amber clouds, like islands of the blest;
Glorious and bright, and changing like a dream,
And lessening fast away beneath the intenser beam.
Songs were amid the mountains far and wide,
Songs were upon the green slopes blooming nigh:
While, from the springing flowers on every side,
Upon his painted wings the butterfly
Roamed a sweet blossom of the sunny sky;
The visible smile of joy was on the scene;
'Twas a bright vision, but too soon to die!
Spring may not linger in her robes of green
Autumn, in storm and shade, shall quench the summer sheen.
I came again. 'Twas Autumn's stormy hour:
The wild winds murmured in the faded wood;
The sere leaves, rustling in the yellow bower,
Were hurled in eddies to the moaning flood:
Dark clouds enthrall'd the west; an orb of blood,
The red sun pierced the hazy atmosphere;
While torrent voices broke the solitude,
Where, straying lonely, as with steps of fear,
I mark'd the deepening gloom which shrouds the dying year.
The ruffled lake heav'd wildly; near the shore
It bore the red leaves of the shaken tree
Shed in the violent north wind's restless roar,
Emblems of man upon life's stormy sea!
Pale autumn leaves! once to the breezes free
They waved in Spring and Summer's golden prime,
Now, even as clouds or dew, how fast they flee!
Weak, changing like the flowers in Autumn's clime,
As man sinks down in death, chill'd by the touch of time!
I marked the picture: 'twas the changeful scene
Which life holds up to the observant eye:
Youth's spring, and summer, and its bowers of green,
The streaming sunlight of its morning sky,
And the dark clouds of death which linger by:
For oft, when life is fresh and hope is strong,
Shall early sorrow breathe the unbidden sigh,
While age to death moves peacefully along,
As on the singer's lip expires the finished song.
AN INVITATION.
They that seek me early shall find me.
Come
while the blossoms of thy years are brightest,
Thou youthful wanderer in a flowery maze;
Come, while the restless heart is bounding lightest,
And joy's pure sunbeams tremble in thy ways:
Come, while sweet thoughts, like summer buds unfolding,
Waken rich feelings in the careless breast;
While yet thy hand the ephemeral wreath is holding
Come, and secure interminable rest.
Soon will the freshness of thy days be over,
And thy free buoyancy of soul be flown;
Pleasure will fold her wing, and friend and lover
Will to the embraces of the worm have gone:
Those who now love thee will have pass'd forever
Their looks of kindness will be lost to thee:
Thou wilt need balm to heal thy spirit's fever,
As thy sick heart broods over years to be.
Come while the morning of thy life is glowing,
Ere the dim phautoms thou art chasing die;
Ere the gay spell which earth is round thee throwing,
Fade like the sunset of a summer sky;
Life hath but shadows, save a promise given,
Which lights the future with a fadeless ray:
Oh, touch the sceptrewin a hope in heaven
Cometurn thy spirit from the world away.
Then will the crosses of this brief existence,
Seem airy nothings to thine ardent soul:
And shining brightly in the forward distance,
Will of thy patient race appear the goal:
Home of the weary! where is peace reposing,
The spirit lingers in unclouded bliss,
Though o'er its dust the curtained grave is closing
Who would not
early
choose a lot like this?
A LAMENT.
They
sin, who tell us love can die;
With life all other passions fly,
All others are but vanity:
But love is indestructible:
Its holy flame for ever burneth;
From heaven it cameto heaven returneth;
Too oft on earth a troubled guest,
At times deceived, at times oppress'd
It here is tried, and purified,
And hath in heaven its perfect rest.
Southey
There
is a voice I shall hear no more:
There are tones whose music for me is o'er;
Sweet as the odors of spring were they
Precious and richbut they died away:
They came like peace to my heart and ear
Never again will they murmur here:
They have gone, like the blush of a summer morn
Like a crimson cloud, through the sunset borne.
There were eyes, that late were lit up for me,
Whose kindly glance was a joy to see:
They revealed the thoughts of a trusting heart,
Untouched by sorrowuntaught by art:
Whose affections were fresh as a stream of spring,
When birds in the vernal branches sing;
They were fill'd with love that hath passed with them,
And my lyre is breathing their requiem.
I remember a brow, whose serene repose
Seemed to lend a beauty to cheeks of rose;
And lips I remember, whose dewy smile,
As I mused on their eloquent power the while,
Sent a thrill to my bosom, and blest my brain
With raptures that never may dawn again:
Amidst musical accents those smiles were shed
Alas, for the doom of the early dead!
Alas, for the clod that is resting now,
On those slumbering eyeson that faded brow!
Wo for the cheek that hath ceased to bloom
For the lips that are dumb in the noisome tomb;
Their melody broken, their fragrance gone
Their aspect cold as the Parian stone:
Alas, for the hopes that with thee have died
Oh, loved-one! would I were by thy side!
Yet the joy of grief it is mine to bear:
I hear thy voice in the twilight air;
Thy smile of sweetness untold I see,
When the visions of evening are borne to me;
Thy kiss on my dreaming lip is warm,
My arm embraceth thy yielding form:
Then I wake in a world that is sad and drear,
To feel in my bosomthou art not here!
Oh,
once
the summer to me was bright
The day, like thine eyes, wore a holy light;
There was bliss in existence, when thou wert nigh
There was balm in the evening's rosy sigh:
Then earth was an Eden, and thou its guest;
A sabbath of blessings was in my breast:
My heart was full of a sense of love,
Likest, of all things, to heaven above.
Now thou art laid in that voiceless hall,
Where my budding raptures have perished all;
In that tranquil and holy place of rest,
Where the earth lies damp on the sinless breast:
Thy bright locks all in the vault are hid
Thy brow is concealed by the coffin-lid:
All that was lovely to me is there
Mournful is life, and a load to bear!
WARNINGS.
There
are voices of
God
for the careless ear
A low-breathed whisper when none is near
In the silent watch of the night's calm hours.
When the dews are at rest in the deep sealed flowers;
When the wings of the zephyr are folded up,
When the violet bendeth its azure cup;
'Tis a breath of reprovala murmuring tone,
Like music remembered, or extacies gone.
'Tis a voice that sweeps through the evening sky,
When clouds o'er the pale moon are hurrying by;
While the fickle gusts, as they come and go,
Wake the forest boughs on the mountain's brow:
It speaks in the shadows that swiftly pass,
In the waves, that are roused from the lake's clear glass,
Where summer shores, in their verdant pride,
Were pictured but late in the stainless tide.
And that voice breaks out in the tempest's flight,
When the wild winds sweep in their fearful might;
When the lightnings go forth on the hills to play
As they pass on their pinions of fire away;
While they fiercely smile through the dusky sky,
As the thunder-peals to their glance reply;
As the bolts leap out from the sombre cloud,
While the midnight whirlwinds sing wild and loud!
'Tis a voice which comes in the early morn,
When the matin hymns of the birds are born;
It steals from the fold of the painted cloud
From the forest's draperies, sublime and proud;
Its tones are blent with the running stream,
As it sweeps along, like a changeful dream,
In its light and shade, through the chequered vale,
While the uplands are fanned by the viewless gale.
In the twilight hour, when the weary bird
On her nest is sleeping, that voice is heard;
While mist-robes are drawn o'er the green earth's breast,
And the sun hath gone down from the faded west;
In the hush of that silencewhen winds are still,
And the light wakes no smile in the quivering rill;
Through the wonderful depths of the purple air,
O'er the landscape tremblingthat voice is there!
There are whispers of
God
in the cataract's roar
In the Sea's rude wail, on his sounding shore;
In the waves that melt on his azure isles,
Where the sunny south on their verdure smiles;
In the oceanward wind from the orange trees
In the Sabean odors that load the breeze;
'Midst the incense that floats from Arabia's strand
That tone is there with its whispers bland.
And it saith to the cold and the careless heart,
How long wilt thou turn from `
the better part?
'
I have called from the infinite depths of heaven,
I have called, but no answer to me was given;
From many a hallowed and glorious spot,
I have called by my Spirit
and ye would not!
Thou art far from the haven, and tempest toss'd
Hear the cry of thy Pilot, or thou art lost!
EUTHANASIA.
`
What
is man's history! Bornlivingdying,
Leaving the still shore for the troubled wave:
Mid clouds and storms, o'er broken shipwrecks flying,
And casting anchor in the silent grave,'
I.
Methinks,
when on the languid eye
Life's varying scenes grow dim;
When evening-shadows veil the sky,
And Pleasure's syren hymn
Grows fainter on the tuneless ear,
Like echoes from another sphere,
Or dreams of seraphim
It were not sad to cast away
This dull and cumbrous load of clay
II.
It were not sad to feel the heart
Grow passionless and cold;
To feel those longings to depart,
That cheer'd the saints of old;
To clasp the faith which looks on high
Which fires the Christian's dying eye,
And makes the curtain-fold
That falls upon his wasting breast,
The door that leads to endless rest.
III.
It were not lonely thus to lie
On that triumphant bed,
Till the pure spirit mounts on high,
By white-winged seraphs led:
Where glories earth may never know,
O'er `many mansions' lingering, glow,
In peerless lustre shed;
It were not lonely thus to soar,
Where sin and grief can sting no more.
IV.
And, though the way to such a goal
Lies through the cloudy tomb,
If on the free, unfetter'd soul
There rest no stains of gloom;
How should its aspirations rise,
Far through the blue and fretted skies,
Upto its final home;
Beyond the journeyings of the sun,
Where streams of living waters run!
A SONG OF MAY.
The
Spring's scented buds all around me are swelling,
There are songs in the stream, there is health in the gale;
A sense of delight in each bosom is dwelling,
As float the pure day-beams o'er mountain and vale;
The desolate reign of Old Winter is broken,
The verdure is fresh upon every tree;
Of Nature's revival the charmand a token
Of love, oh thou Spirit of Beauty! to thee.
The sun looketh forth from the halls of the morning,
And flushes the clouds that begirt his career;
He welcomes the gladness and glory, returning
To rest on the promise and hope of the year.
He fills with rich light all the balm-breathing flowers,
He mounts to the zenith, and laughs on the wave;
He wakes into music the green forest-bowers,
And gilds the gay plains which the broad rivers lave.
The young bird is out on his delicate pinion
He timidly sails in the infinite sky;
A greeting to May, and her fairy dominion,
He pours, on the west-wind's fragrant sigh:
Around, above, there are peace and pleasure,
The woodlands are singing, the heaven is bright;
The fields are unfolding their emerald treasure,
And man's genial spirit is soaring in light.
Alas! for my weary and care-haunted bosom!
The spells of the spring-time arouse it no more;
The song in the wild-wood, the sheen of the blossom,
The fresh-welling fountain, their magic is o'er!
When I list to the streams, when I look on the flowers,
They tell of the Past with so mournful a tone,
That I call up the throngs of my long-vanished hours,
And sigh that their transports are over and gone.
From the wide-spreading earth, from the limitless heaven,
There have vanished an eloquent glory and gleam;
To my veil'd mind no more is the influence given,
Which coloreth life with the hues of a dream:
The bloom-purpled landscape its loveliness keepeth
I deem that a light as of old gilds the wave;
But the eye of my spirit in heaviness sleepeth,
Or sees but my youth, and the visions it gave.
Yet it is not that age on my years hath descended,
'Tis not that its snow-wreaths encircle my brow;
But the
newness
and sweetness of Being are ended,
I feel not their love-kindling witchery now:
The shadows of death o'er my path have been sweeping;
There are those who have loved me, debarred from the day;
The green turf is bright where in peace they are sleeping,
And on wings of remembrance, my soul is away.
It is shut to the glow of this present existence,
It hears, from the Past, a funeral strain;
And it eagerly turns to the high-seeming distance,
Where the last blooms of earth will be garnered again;
Where no mildew the soft damask-rose cheek shall nourish,
Where Grief bears no longer the poisonous sting;
Where pitiless Death no dark sceptre can flourish,
Or stain with his blight the luxuriant spring.
It is thus that the hopes which to others are given,
Fall cold on my heart in this rich month of May;
I hear the clear anthems that ring through the heaven,
I drink the bland airs that enliven the day;
And if gentle Nature, her festival keeping,
Delights not my bosom, ah! do not condemn;
O'er the lost and the lovely my spirit is weeping,
For my heart's fondest raptures are buried with them.
A PLACE OF REST.
`
Alli
los impios cesron del tumulto; y alli reposron los de fuerzas cansadas.'
Weep
not, thou heavenward pilgrim here, around whose toilsome way
The gloom of many a care is thrown, where'er thy feet may stray;
Within whose heart some tender pulse must echo unto pain,
When tried by this relentless world, where every dream is vain;
Weep not, though o'er the living glow of Pleasure's brightest wreath,
Fate's swift and frequent tempests leave the cloudy stain of death:
For endless raptures shall be thine, in mansions of the blest.
Where the wicked cease from troubling, and the weary are at rest.
Thou must bend unto the Chastener here, and see the deeply lov'd,
The pure and beautiful of earth by early death removed;
Thou must mark on many a blighted cheek, the hectic mildew cling,
Thou must bend beneath Time's shadowy frown, when snows are on
his wing,
Till the peace which passeth knowledge is garnered in thy soul,
Till the silver cord is broken, and crush'd the golden bowl
Till the bright and glorious streets of heaven are by thy feet imprest,
Where the wicked cease from troubling, and the weary are at rest.
How many flowers will rise and bloom, a flood of sweets to pour
Across the mazes of thy way, that earth cannot restore!
How many fond eyes, full of love, will in the grave be hid
How will the dark and heavy pall press on each folded lid!
Thou must pile the grave's remorseless clod on many a pallid brow,
And lift the serenade of death, beneath the cypress bough:
Till with a pale and deluged cheek, and with a yearning breast,
Thou wilt long for pinions of a dove, to soar and be at rest.
Yet it is but for a seasonand thy trials all are past,
And
then!
upon the empyreal air thy spirit-wings are cast;
Then the bonds of earth will sunder, and thine ear will drink the song
That floats the vernal pastures and crystal waves along:
Thou wilt join the lost and lovely that have gone before to
God,
In a glad `continual city,' by the earth's redeemed ones trod;
Where each angel-plume is folded o'er a peaceful brow and breast,
Where the wicked cease from troubling, and the weary are at rest.
THE SIGNS OF GOD.
I mark'd
the Spring as she pass'd along,
With her eye of light, and her lip of song;
While she stole in peace o'er the green earth's breast,
While the streams sprang out from their icy rest:
The buds bent low to the breeze's sigh,
And their breath went forth in the scented sky;
When the fields look'd fresh in their sweet repose,
And the young dews slept on the new-born rose.
The scene was changed. It was Autumn's hour:
A frost had discolor'd the summer bower;
The blast wailed sad mid the wither'd leaves,
The reaper stood musing by gather'd sheaves;
The mellow pomp of the rainbow woods
Was stirr'd by the sound of the rising floods;
And I knew by the cloud, by the wild wind's strain,
That Winter drew near with his storms again!
I stood by the ocean; its waters rolled
In their changeful beauty of sapphire and gold;
And day looked down with its radiant smiles,
Where the blue waves danced round a thousand isles:
The ships went forth on the trackless seas,
Their white wings play'd in the joyous breeze;
Their prows rushed on mid the parted foam,
While the wanderer was wrapp'd in a dream of home!
The mountain arose with its lofty brow,
While its shadow was sleeping in vales below;
The mist like a garland of glory lay,
Where its proud heights soar'd in the air away;
The eagle was there on his tireless wing,
And his shriek went up like an offering:
And he seem'd, in his sunward flight, to raise
A chant of thanksgivinga hymn of praise!
29
I look'd on the arch of the midnight skies'
With its blue and unsearchable mysteries:
The moon, mid an eloquent multitude
Of unnumber'd stars, her career pursued:
A charm of sleep on the city fell,
All sounds lay hush'd in that brooding spell;
By babbling brooks were the buds at rest,
And the wild-bird dream'd on his downy nest.
I stood where the deepening tempest pass'd,
The strong trees groan'd in the sounding blast;
The murmuring deep with its wrecks roll'd on,
The clouds o'ershadow'd the mighty sun;
The low reeds bent by the streamlet's side,
And hills to the thunder-peal replied;
The lightning burst forth on its fearful way,
While the heavens were lit in its red array!
And hath
man
the power, with his pride and his skill,
To arouse all nature with storms at will?
Hath he power to color the summer-cloud
To allay the tempest when hills are bow'd?
Can he waken the Spring with her festal wreath?
Can the sun grow dim by his lightest breath?
Will he come again when death's vale is trod?
Who then shall dare murmur `
There is no God!
'
MEMORY.
'
Tis
sweet to remember! I would not forego
The charm which the past o'er the present can throw,
For all the gay visions that Fancy may weave
In her web of illusion, that shines to deceive.
We know not the futurethe past we have
felt
Its cherish'd enjoyments the bosom can melt;
Its raptures anew o'er our pulses may roll,
When thoughts of the morrow fall cold on the soul.
'Tis sweet to remember! When storms are abroad,
To see in the rainbow the promise of
God:
The day may be darken'd, but far in the west,
In vermilion and gold, sinks the sun to his rest;
With smiles like the morning he passeth away:
Thus the beams of delight on the spirit can play,
When in calm reminiscence we gather the flowers
Which love scatter'd round us in happier hours.
'Tis sweet to remember! When friends are unkind,
When their coldness and carelessness shadow the mind;
Then,
to draw back the veil which envelopes a land
Where delectable prospects in beauty expand;
To smell the green fields, the fresh waters to hear
Whose once fairy music enchanted the ear;
To drink in the smiles that delighted us then,
To list the fond voices of childhood again;
O, this the sad heart, like a reed that is bruised,
Binds up, when the banquet of hope is refused.
'Tis sweet to remember! And naught can destroy
The balm-breathing comfort, the glory, the joy,
Which spring from that fountain to gladden our way.
When the changeful and faithless desert or betray.
I would not forget! though my thoughts should be dark,
O'er the ocean of life I look back from my bark,
And I see the lost Eden, where once I was blest,
A type and a promise of heavenly rest.
ON THE DEATH OF DR. BEDELL.
He
has gone to a mansion of rest,
From a region of sorrow and pain;
To the glorious Land of the Blest,
Where he never can suffer again:
The pangs of affliction and sickness are o'er
The cloud on his spirit will darken no more!
He has gone, like the life-waking sun,
Descending the radiant sky;
Ere the stars have their shining begun,
And are hid by the day-beams on high;
The night could not rest on the wings of his soul,
Nor the shadows of earth their uprising control.
The watchman is missed from the wall,
Where his warnings so often have rung;
No more the affectionate call,
Or remonstrance, will melt from his tongue;
There is dust on his lip, and the shroud on his breast,
And the deep seal of peace on his eyelid is prest.
How oft, when the sanctified air
Round the altar with music was filled,
Have the words of his eloquent prayer
Gone forth, like rich incense distilled;
Like the breath of Spring roses ascending the skies,
To
God
, an acceptable sacrifice.
His heart was a fountain of love
It stirred in the light of his mind,
Whose glory was caught from above,
Where the pearl of great price was enshrined;
He taught the dark spirit to look to its ray,
And to feel its warm glow in life's gloomiest day.
He knew that our pilgrimage here
Was a dream: he remembered as dust
The throngs that assembled to hear,
And bade them in heaven to trust.
And armed with persuasion, and pity, and prayer,
He shunned not the counsel of
God
to declare.
How oft like the heart-moving Paul,
Did he beckon with wavering hand,
Till silence around him would fall,
Then, echo his
Saviour's
command;
Till his magical accents the hearer received,
Their soberness treasured, and hearing, believed.
Who mourns that his garland is won,
That the crown on his forehead is bright?
That his trials and labors are done,
That his spirit rejoices in light?
Who weeps that our loss is his infinite gain,
Where Death may not enter, and Sin cannot stain?
He walks in the smile of his
God,
And looks o'er those realms of the sky,
Where Mortality's foot never trod,
Unseen by Mortality's eye:
Where calm by green pastures, and dwellings of gold,
The waters of life all their splendor unfold.
And he sees in the shadowless air,
That lofty and beautiful tree,
Whose blossoms and fruits blooming fair,
Are spread for the ransomed to see;
He hears the glad harpers that linger beneath,
And feels not the fear of corruption or death.
Oh, leave him to rest with his
God,
To join in that music benign
Which swells o'er his blessed abode,
Where every sight is divine,
Where flowers immortal with lustre are fed,
From the source of all glory unceasingly shed!
BOOTS:
A SLIPSHODICAL LYRIC.
The
watch has brawl'd `elevin,' and the moon
Walks through the evening heaven like a queen,
Raining soft influences on lovers' minds,
While I, with fragrant and serene oigar
Prest satisfactorily betwixt my lips,
Am lounging in that Traveller's Paradise,
Hight bar-room in the vulgate, looking round,
With honest speculation in mine eye
In quest of food for thought. By Jove, 'tis here!
I have't: in yonder huge and gloomy pile
Of travellers' boots, is inspiration hid.
Come, bustle, honest Muse, and help me sing,
In fanciful disportings on the theme,
Till from this scented tube departs the fire,
And all its ashes slumber on my lyre.
Time was, when boots were not; when graceful feet
Of men and women, unrestricted, prest
Their mother earth denuded. Then, suddenly,
The Greek and Roman sandal came in vogue:
August Athena's streets, to soles of cork,
Trod by philosophers and stoicsJews,
Cretes and Arabiansechoed as they trode;
And e'en the solemn groves of Academe
Beheld the feet that bore a master mind
`Neath Plato's lofty and impressive brow,
Press the gay sandal on the olive leaves,
Which autumn winds had shaken to the ground.
In Rome, the tribune, lictor, senator,
Proconsul, headsman, and centurion,
The graceful sandal wore. Apostles, too,
Did patronize the article. The light
Which burst on Peter's dungeon, as he lay
Hedged in by soldiers at the midnight hour,
Was scattered from an angel's odorous wing,
And on the prisoner's chains and sandals streamed;
The first fell offthe latter he did don,
And walked abroad in freedom. And in sooth,
Where'er the Greek or Roman power had away,
The sandal, with its dainty tie, became
The fashionable thing.
At last boots came;
But how, or when, it boots not now to tell,
Save that they
did
advene; and through all time
Since their first origin, have kept their state,
Circling the calves of youth, and the slim shanks
Of weak and trembling age. Of various name,
Their titles I invoke notfor I know
Their number numberless; nor eke of style,
Of Wellington, Suwarrow, tasselled, laced,
Civil, or military; seven-leagued,
Or Chinese kinds, diminished, have I time
To dwell on at this present, nor need tell
How since their date, their fabricators swarm.
St. Crispin's followers are every where:
In France, the
cordonnier;
in England, named
Knights of the enwaxed end. The race is large,
And keep their azure Mondaysfestivals
Of old renownwith wassail and with song.
My present business doth not lie with these,
But rather to discourse, as in me lies,
About this pile of boots before mine eyes.
It seems to rise, as if its apex strove
To reach that constellation, Botes y'clept,
To which Arcturus clings. But I demand
My fancy from the stars, to help me here.
There stands a scurvy pair, with tops of red,
Sore wasted at the heel, and slim at toe.
The straps are broken; and the owner's mind
And disposition, thus to me exposed,
Are clear, as if I knew him. He's a young
And hair-brained biped, has a sprawling foot,
But fain would be `genteel,' and so has cased
His pedal adjuncts in a narrow space,
By much too small for comfort. When he draws
Those boots upon his legs at morn, he chafes,
And stamps the floor, and vents the spiteful `dn!'
Because they will not
on
. When in the street,
He hath a rapid gait, and stalks abroad,
On politics or business, with an air,
As if a nation's cares were on his mind,
Heavy as Atlas' load. Be sure, that man
Loves, eats, and drinks, and all his acts performs,
In the Cambyses' vein.
Adjacent riseth, with the look of eld,
A pair of
fair-tops;
and to Fancy's eye,
Their owner stands beside them. He is one
Now near the turn of sixty, and his hair
Is powdered, white as snow-wreaths; and his cane
Is headed o'er with gold. Whene'er he treads,
The spotless dust on broadcloth collar falls;
And as he walks the street, full many a hat
Is touched to do him reverence. At his board
The choicest wines are found, that, quick and warm,
Ascend them to the brain. He readeth loud
The liturgy o' Sundayswhile the priest
Whenas he glanceth tow'rd his cushioned pew,
Bethinks him of that layman's sumptuous fare.
I like not that next paira clumsy mass
Of ill-conditioned leather. To a boor,
A walking porker, do I quickly trace
Their certain ownership. What sprawling heels!
And holes are cut anigh the spreading toes,
As if the ponderous feet in that wide space
Had still been `cabined, cribbed,' and wanted room;
Or else, that doleful crops of pedal maize,
Called by the vulgar corns, had flourished there.
I see the wearer plainly. Large of form,
He moves abroad like stern Rhinoceros
Or Behemoth in the ocean; or, to rise
In metaphor, like old Sam. Johnson's form
Wending along Cheapside. In public haunts
He of his self-deportment takes no heed,
And spitteth evermore. His lips are scaled
And juicy, like wind-beparched mouth
Of ichthyophagous Kamschatkadale; and oft
With three sheets in the wind, in upper tier
Midst mirthful Cyprians, he puts his feet
Over the box's front, and leaning back,
Guffaws and swears, like privateer at see,
Until the pitlings from beneath, exclaim,
`Boots!' `Trollope!' and he straightway draws them in.
My
fragrant tube is outand objects swim
Like coming dreams before my drowsy eyes;
Yet one more pair of boots, ere I retire,
I fain, in thoughtful mood, would scrutinize,
A dapper pair, yet gaudy not, but neat,
As if they needed neither brush nor shine,
For marks of both they bear. He who inserts
His
understanding
in them, comes to town
A merchant, trafficking and getting gain:
He hath a wife and pleasant babes at home,
To whom the squeak of those familiar soles
Is like to heavenly music. That wife delights,
What time she sweetly `plies her evening care,'
To hear that squeak, and see the infant smile,
Tilted on parent knee. He lives and trades
In a fair village, `throned by the West,'
Embowered in trees, and reached by rural roads,
All variously diverging, where in throngs,
The wealthy farmers come. He leads the choir
At church, and sets the quaint, old-fashioned tune
The pitch-pipe blows, and is, in all respects,
The magnate of the village.
My
subjects multiplybut to my gaze,
Half dimmed with sleep, fantastic boots arise,
And turn to shapes, and menace me with fear
Of kicks and damage, if I publish them.
I shrink from such a penalty. Now dreams,
And shades, and forms, and fluttering entities,
Surround my brain so fast, that I opine
My wakefulness is doubtful. Yea it is
And all my pictures do themselves resolve
To mere oblivion.
PRAYER.
When
on the sad and yearning heart
The clouds of early sorrow fall,
Oh! what shall bid their gloom depart,
And lift the spirit from their thrall?
When 'neath the foldings of the pall
The lost and beautiful are laid,
Oh, who shall answer to the call
By watchful love in anguish made?
When from our daily paths, like flowers,
Our kindred wither one by one,
Ah! what shall gild the weary hours,
Or bring again the unshadow'd sun
His bright and golden course to run?
To chase the clouds that round him rise
Recal again each lustre gone,
And bathe in light the uplifted skies?
When, with a shadow o'er them flung,
Appear the sere autumnal trees;
And every blast their boughs among
Awakens mournful images;
What, on the lapse of hours like these,
Can earth, with all its phantoms, fling,
When Hope hath ceased her melodies,
And folded up her rainbow-wing?
Is it not sweet, when song and dream
Have pass'd, like sunset's sky of fire,
When Love's false pinion sheds no gleam
O'er Pleasure's crushed and tuneless lyre,
To raise with purified desire
The prayer, in earnest suppliance given,
Which lifts the immortal spirit higher,
And antedates the joy of Heaven?
THE HEXEN ZEE.
*
*
The
Hexen Zee, or Witches' Lake, is described by modern travellers in Germany as one of
the neighboring wonders of the Brocken mountain. It is not wide, but, according to
tradition
,
unfathomably deap.
`How glumly sownes you dirgy songe!
Night-ravens flappe the wing;
What bell doth slowly toll ding dong?
The psalms of death who sing?
Look up, look up! an airy crew
In roundel daunces reele:
The moon is bright, and blue the night
Mays't see them dimly wheele.'
Burger
I.
'
Twas
a sunset hour, and the waters play'd
Like living light on the golden sand:
The dark green trees by the gale were sway'd
As their wings swept over the quiet land:
And as those wavelets kissed the shore
With a gush of delicate melody,
They seemed in a traveller's ear to pour
This marvellous tale of the Hexen Zee:
II.
`'Tis a haunted place where thou art now,
And when the west hath lost the sun,
And silvery moon-beams waver slow,
Where here the chasing billows run;
When fairy mists like spirits throng
About this undulating tide,
Then sweep the witches' trains along,
And charm the air whereon they ride.
III.
`And, as between the waning moon
And Brocken's height their forms are seen,
While midnight's melancholy noon
Extends its thoughtful reign serene,
Their rustling folds are heard above,
The branches groan in every tree;
Till on the lake these spectres move,
And sing this song of the Hexen Zee:'
IV.
`Our boat is strong, its oars are good,
Of charnel bones its ribs are made;
From coffins old we carved the wood,
Beneath the gloomy cypress shade;
An
ignis-fatuus
lights the prow,
It is a felon's blood-shot e'e,
And it shineth forth from his skeleton brow,
To light our way o'er the Hexen Zee.
V.
`There's a scream of dreaming birds afar,
And a hollow blast in the old Hartz wood:
Our course was marked by the evening star,
By the wakeful eagle's glance pursued:
The tree-toad moaned on the mossy limb,
And plunged in the pool 'neath the dark yew-tree,
But what care we for `the likes of him,'
While we sing and sail on the Hexen Zee?
VI.
`We have come over forest, and glen, and moor,
We have ivy leaves from the castle wall;
We roved by the huts of the sleeping poor,
And we heard their faithful watch-dogs call;
Over cities and hamlets in haste we swept
Over gardens and turretso'er hill and lea;
Our race now pauseth, our pledge we have kept,
And together we sail on the Hexen Zee.
VII.
`There's a vapor of gray, and a crimson hue,
In the wake of our bark as we haste along;
The sails are clothed in a flame of blue,
And our voices are hoarse with this elfin song:
The finny tribes as they cross our wake,
A-floating in lifeless throngs we see;
To Hecate an offering thus we make,
Who is fond of fish from the Hexen Zee.
VIII.
`Look to the east! there the dawn is red,
Through the cedar branches it 'gins to glow;
Our song must be endedour spell is dead,
Away to our cloudy homes we go:
The charm is finished; the distant chime
Of bells are echoing onetwothree;
We will mount the blastand depart in time,
Afar from the haunted Hexen Zee.'
ELEGIAC STANZAS.
Thou
art laid to rest in the spring-time hours,
In the freshness of early feeling;
While the dew yet lies on the new-born flowers,
And winds through the wood-paths are stealing;
While yet life was gay to thine ardent eye,
While its rich hopes filled thy bosom;
While each dream was pure as the upper sky,
And sweet as the opening blossom:
But thy promise of being, which shone so fair,
Hath passed like a summer cloud in air;
Thy bosom is cold, which with love was warm,
And the grave embraces thy gentle form.
Thou art slumbering now in a voiceless cell,
While Nature her garland is wreathing;
While the earth seems touched with a radiant spell,
And the air of delight is breathing;
While the day looks down with a mellow beam,
Where the roses in light are blushing:
While the young leaves dance with a fitful gleam,
And the stream into song is gushing;
While bright wings play in the golden sun,
The tomb hath caressed thee, thou faded one!
The clod lies cold on that settled brow,
Which was beaming with pleasure and youth but now.
Should we mourn that Death's Angel, on dusky wing,
O'er thy flowery path has driven?
That he crushed the buds of thy sunny spring
That thy spirit is borne to heaven?
How soon will the visions of earth grow dim
How soon will its hopes be faded;
And the heart that hath leaped to the syren's hymn,
With sadness and gloom be o'ershaded!
The feelings are fresh but a little while;
We can bask but an hour in affection's smile,
Ere the friend and the lover have passed away
Ere the anthem is sung o'er their wasting clay?
Then take thy rest in that shadowy hall,
In thy mournful shroud reposing;
There is no cloud on
the soul
to fall,
No dust o'er its light is closing:
It will shine in glory when time is o'er,
When each phantom of earth shall wither;
When the friends who deplore thee shall sigh no more,
And lie down in the dust together:
Though sad winds wail in the cypress bough,
Thou art resting untroubled and calmly now:
With a seal of sleep on thy folded eye,
While thy spirit is glad in the courts on high.
LOVE'S RIVAL.
`
Trevylyan
drew back, and without another word, hurried away; he returned to the town;
he sought, with methodical calmness, the owner of a piece of ground on which
Gertrude
had
wished to be buried. He purchased it, and that very night he sought the priest of a
neighboring
church, and directed it should be consecrated according to the due rite and ceremonial.
`The priest, an aged and pious man, was struck by the request, and the air of him who
made it.
``Shall it be done forthwith, Sir? said he, hesitating. `Forthwith,' answered
Trevylyan
with a calm smile; `a bridegroom, you know, is naturally impatient.''
Pilgrims of the Rhine
.
Oh,
thou that lovest! do not deem thou hast no rival nigh,
To interrupt thy visions, or cloud thy golden sky;
And though Hope's syren voice beguile, believe not all her song,
Nor deem the joys enduring that to the lay belong.
Thou hast a rival, lover, however blest thou art,
How dear soe'er the object be, that kindles up thy heart;
There may be bloom upon her cheek, light on her forehead fair,
And balm upon her rich red lip, as sweet as roses are;
And kindness in her lustrous eyes on thee alone bestowed,
The stars that guide thy pilgrimage on life's uncertain road;
It may appear that all in all, thou art alone to her,
And yet, thou hast a rival, deluded worshipper!
Yes, though the kisses from her lips, when they to thine are prest,
Are like the fragrant winds of Spring that wander from the West:
Though that voice is kindest to thine ear, and though that tender eye
Is brighter when thy step is heard, and when thy form is nigh;
Though every glance be full of love, yet fate will bid thee own
Thou hast a busy rival, thou idolizing one!
A rival, horrible and grim, yet wooing unconfined,
Whom tears nor prayers can overcome, nor exorcism bind.
He walks a spectre by her side, impalpable as Night
He wafts to her the fever-dream, and checks her young delight;
And though unseen by mortal eye, and clothed in vapors dim,
He yet will win her to his arms, to sleep in peace with him:
He will fold her, unresisting, to his lone and gloomy breast,
And curtains, dark as Midian's land, draw round her place of rest;
And torn from thy caressing arms, fond lover! she will be
Within a narrow mansion, enclosed away from thee.
30
Death
is that rival, lover! and soon or late will rend
From thy embrace his victim, thy fond one, and thy friend!
And when he knocketh at thy door, thou canst not say him nay
He will rob thee of thy treasure, and bear it hence away.
Then love with fear and trembling, the idol of thy soul
For life's bright cord is feeble, and frail its golden bowl:
And let the cloudless eye of faith the hour of rapture see,
When `raised in incorruption' ye both at last may be!
OCTOBER.
Solemn,
yet beautiful to view,
Month of my heart! thou dawnest here,
With sad and faded leaves to strew
The Summer's melancholy bier.
The moaning of thy winds I hear,
As the red sunset dies afar,
And bars of purple clouds appear,
Obscuring every western star.
Thou solemn month! I hear thy voice,
It tells my soul of other days,
When but to live was to rejoice,
When earth was lovely to my gaze!
Oh, visions brightoh, blessed hours,
Where are their living raptures now?
I ask my spirit's wearied powers
I ask my pale and fevered brow!
I look to Nature, and behold
My life's dim emblems, rustling round,
In hues of crimson and of gold
The year's dead honors on the ground:
And sighing with the winds, I feel,
While their low pinions murmur by,
How much their sweeping tones reveal
Of life and human destiny.
When Spring's delightsome moments shone,
They came in zephyrs from the West;
They bore the wood-lark's melting tone,
They stirred the blue lake's glassy breast:
Though Summer, fainting in the beat,
They lingered in the forest shade;
But changed and strengthened now, they beat
In storm, o'er mountain, glen and glade.
How
like those transports of the breast
When life is fresh and joy is new;
Soft as the halcyon's downy nest,
And transient all as they are true!
They stir the leave in that bright wreaths,
Which Hope about her forehead twines,
Till Grief's hot sighs around it breathe,
Then Pleasure's lip its smile resigns.
Alas, for Time, and Death, and care,
What gloom about our way they fling!
Like clouds in Autumn's gusty air,
The burial-pageant of the Spring.
The dreams that each successive year
Seemed bathed in hues of brighter pride,
At last like withered leaves appear,
And sleep in darkness, side by side.
HYMN
FOR THE EIGHTH ANNIVERSARY OF THE AMERICAN SUNDAY SCHOOL UNION.
We
have met in peace together,
In this house of
God
again:
Constant friends have led us hither,
Here to chaunt the solemn strain:
Here to breathe our adoration,
While the balmy breeze of spring,
Like the Spirit of Salvation,
Comes with gladness on its wing!
And, while nature glows with beauty,
While the fields are rich in flowers,
Shall our hearts neglect their duty,
Shall our souls abuse their powers?
Shall not all our hopes ascending,
Point us to a home above,
Where, in glory never ending,
He
who made us smiles in love?
There no autumn-tempests gather:
There no friends lament the dead
And on fields that never wither,
Fadeless rays of light are shed:
There with bright immortal roses,
Angels wreath their harps of gold,
And each ransom'd soul reposes
'Midst a scene of bliss untold.
We have met, and time is flying,
We shall partand still his wing,
Sweeping o'er the dead and dying,
Will the changeful seasons bring;
Let us, while our hearts are lightest,
In our fresh and early years,
Turn to
Him
whose smile is brightest,
And whose grace will calm our fears.
He
will aid us, though existence
With its sorrows sting the breast;
Gleaming in the onward distance,
Faith will make the Land of Rest;
There, 'mid day beams round him playing,
We our
Father's
face shall see,
And shall hear
Him
gently saying,
`Little children, come to me.'
YESTERDAY.
And
where are
now
thy sunny hours,
Fond man, which shone but
yesterday?
Perchance thy path was rich with flowers,
That glittered in thy joyous way!
Perchance the Day's pure eye of light
Was one interminable smile;
And visions, eloquent and bright,
Stirred thy rapt soul with bliss the while.
And where are they?the swelling tide
Of onward and resistless time
Is strewn with wrecks of baffled pride,
Conceptions high, and hopes sublime;
Dreams, that have shed upon the earth
The gladdening hues of Paradise;
Their charm is flown; hushed is their mirth,
And all their kindling ecstacies!
It may be that thy heart was sad
And wrapt in sorrows yesterday;
Perchance the scenes that once could glad
Thy spirit, passed like spring away;
That on the waste of years, was seen
Naught that might cheer thy gloomy breast,
No sunny spot, of vernal green,
On which the thoughtful eye could rest.
What recks it now, that then a cloud
Was dimly brooding o'er thy head;
That to the tempest thou hast bow'd,
When Joy's ephemeral beams had fled?
That day hath goneits care is o'er;
Its shadows all have passed away;
Time's wave hath murmured by that shore;
And round thee now is but
to-day
.
Then what is
Yesterday?
a breath,
A whisper of the summer breeze;
A thing of silent birth and death,
Colored by man's fond sympathies!
It had its budsthey all are gone;
Its fearsbut they are now no more;
Its hopesbut they were quickly flown:
Its pure delightsand they are o'er!
Look ye not backsave but to glean
From the deep memories of the past,
From the illusions of each scene,
The thought, that time is flying fast;
That
vanity
on things of Earth
Is by a pointed diamond writ;
Its hours of wild and transient mirth
Are midnight skies by meteors lit!
Oh, what is
Yesterday?
a ray
Which burst on Being's troubled wave;
Which passed like a swift thought away
Unto Eternity's wide grave;
A star whose light hath left the sky
But for a little moment given;
Scarce flickering on the gladdened eye;
Ere it hath left the vault of Heaven!
To-day!
How in its little span,
The interests of an endless state,
Beyond the feverish life of man,
Are crowded with their awful weight!
Prayers may ascend; the soul may pour
Its trembling supplications here,
That when Time's fitful hour is o'er
Its hopes of Heaven may blossom there!
THE NAMELESS GRAVE.
'
Tis
a ealm spot in Summer's hour and in the dawn of Spring,
While buds come up, like freshening thoughts when Youth is on the
wing:
Here, while the unfolding gates of Day, are opening free and wide,
And glory robes the landscape round, in an unsullied pride;
While the amber clouds that gem the West are melting in the sun;
And, lessening in his radiant smile, through the far ether run:
Here, where beneath the sanctity of the bright azure sky,
The new-born birds are dancing on the south wind's fragrant sigh;
Where the sun-lit brook sends on the ear the prattle of its wave,
And melts upon the vernal shore, is placed a
nameless Grave!
A haunt for monitory thought on life's dull scene is this,
A lesson on its fleeting hour, its little day of bliss:
No sculptured marble marks the spot where this dull clay is laid;
No sigh is breathed, save of the gale, in the dim cypress shade!
And who this wasting breast hath lov'd, the still grave answers not;
'Tis only known its throbs are hush'd, its weariness forgot:
The clod hath sent its hollow sound up from the coffin-lid:
The farewell hath been spokenthe familiar face been hid!
And where are they, who once did stand beside this nameless mound,
And felt the unhealed pang of Griefthe bosom's secret wound?
The love they bore, the tears they shed? oh, who the tale may tell!
The fitful winds no record keep, what sorrows then befell;
The sunny brook goes babbling on; the Spring-leaves come and go,
Yet they waken not the heart that here lies mouldering and low;
These ashes will not live again till the dim skies abroad
Are as a scroll, and Earth and Sea heave in the breath of
God!
THE ALPS.
Proud
monuments of
God!
sublime ye stand,
Among the wonders of His mighty hand:
With summits soaring in the upper sky,
Where the broad day looks down with burning eye.
Where gorgeous clouds in solemn pomp repose,
Flinging rich shadows on eternal snows:
Piles of triumphant dust, ye stand alone,
And hold in kingly state a peerless throne.
Like olden conquerors, on high ye rear
The regal ensign and the shining spear;
Round icy peaks the mists, in wreaths unroll'd,
Float ever near, in purple or in gold:
And voiceful torrents, sternly rolling there,
Fill with wild music the unpillared air:
What garden, or what hall on earth beneath,
Thrills to such tones as o'er the mountains breathe?
There, through long ages past, those summits shone,
When morning radiance on their state was thrown:
There, when the summer day's career was done,
Played the last glory of the sinking sun:
There, sprinkling beauty o'er the torrent's shade,
The chastened moon her glittering rainbow made:
And, blent with pictured stars her lustre lay,
Where to still vales the free streams leap'd away.
Where are the thronging hosts of other days,
Whose banners floated o'er the Alpine ways?
Who through their high defiles to battle wound,
While deadly ordnance stirr'd the heights around?
Gone like a dream which melts at early morn,
When the lark's anthem through the sky is borne;
Gone like the hues that melt in ocean's spray,
And chill Oblivion murmurs
where are they?
Yet `Alps on Alps' still risethe lofty home
Of storms and eagles, where their pinions roam:
Still round their peaks the magic colors lie
Of morn or eve, imprinted on the sky;
And still, when kings and thrones shall fade and fall,
And empty crowns lie dim upon the pall;
Still shall their glaciers flashtheir waters roar,
Till nations fail, and kingdoms rise no more.
THE YOUTHFUL DEAD.
`
Weep
not for the Youthful Dead,
Sleeping in their lowly bed;
They are happier than we,
Howsoever blest we be!'
I.
Can
the sigh be poured for the Early Dead,
On their pillows of dust reposing?
Should the tear of Pain, in that hour be shed,
When the earth o'er their slumber is closing?
Should the winds of heaven in Evening's hour
Bear the sighs of the laden bosom;
When the Young are borne from Affliction's power,
Like the Spring's unsullied blossom?
Ere the blight of crime on the spirit came
Ere passion awakened its inward flame:
While the heart was pure, while the brow was fair,
Ere the records of Evil had gathered there?
II.
They have passed from the shadows that haunt us round,
From the clouds that enthral existence,
When we look at Youth in the backward ground,
And at Death in the forward distance!
No more will the sombre pall of Fate,
Like a mantle around them gather;
They have gone, ere Affection grew desolate,
Or Hope's garland began to wither:
And they sleep like stars in the upper air,
When the skies of evening are deep and fair;
There's a halo of peace where their ashes lie,
As the ambient night-winds are hurrying by.
III.
They are blest in death!for no bitter care
Will the fevered brow be flushing:
They departed while Being was bright and fair,
While the fountains of Feeling were gushing;
Then let them sleep `in their lowly bed;'
Let Hope be amidst our sorrow;
There is peace in the Night of the Early Dead
It will yield to a glorious morrow!
They will rise like buds from the glebe of spring,
When the young birds play on the changeful wing;
They faded ere sin could beguile the breast;
They will wake in the regions of Endless Rest!
OLD SONGS.
Give
me the songs I loved to hear,
In sweet and sunny days of yore;
Which came in gushes to my ear
From lips that breathe them now no more;
From lips, alas! on which the worm,
In coiled and dusty silence lies,
Where many a loved, lamented form
Is hid from Sorrow's filling eyes!
Yes! when those unforgotten lays,
Come trembling with a spirit-voice,
I mind me of those early days,
When to respire was to rejoice:
When gladsome flowers and fruitage shone
Where'er my willing footstep fell;
When Hope's bright realm was all mine own,
And Fancy whispered, `All is well.'
Give me old songs! They stir my heart
As with some glorious trumpet-tone:
Beyond the reach of modern art,
They rule its thrilling cords alone,
Till, on the wings of thought, I fly,
Back to that boundary of bliss,
Which once beneath my childhood's sky
Embraced a scene of loveliness!
Thus, when the portals of mine ear
Those long-remembered lays receive,
They seem like guests, whose voices cheer
My breast, and bid it not to grieve:
They ring in cadences of love,
They tell of dreams now vanished all;
Dreams, that descended from above
Visions,'t is rapture to recall!
Give me old songs! I know not why,
But every tone they breathe to me
Is fraught with pleasures pure and high,
With honest love or honest glee:
They move me, when by chance I hear,
They rouse each slumbering pulse anew;
Till every scene to memory dear
Is pictured brightly to my view.
I do not ask those sickly lays
O'er which affected maidens bend;
Which scented fops are bound to praise,
To which dull crowds their homage lend:
Give me some simple Scottish song,
Or lays, from Erin's distant isle;
Lays that to love and truth belong,
And cause the saddest lip to smile!
DEATH OF THE FIRST-BORN.
`
Ah
! weladay! most angelike of face,
A childe, young in his pure innocence,
Tender of limbes,
God
wote full guiltilesse,
The goodly faire that heth here speechelesse.
A mouth he has, but wordis hath he none;
Cannot complain, alas! for none outrage,
Ne grutcheth not, but lies here all alone,
Still as a lambe, most meke of his visage:
What heart of steele could do to him damage,
Or suffer him die, beholding the maners,
And look benign of his twin eyen clere?'
Lyduate
.
Young
mother, he is gone!
His dimpled cheek no more will touch thy breast;
No more the music-tone
Float from his lips, to thine all fondly press'd;
His smile and happy laugh are lost to thee:
Earth must his mother and his pillow be.
His was the morning hour,
And he had pass'd in beauty from the day,
A bud, not yet a flower,
Torn, in its sweetness, from the parent spray;
The death-wind swept him to his soft repose,
As frost, in spring-time, blights the early rose.
Never on earth again
Will his rich accents charm thy listening ear,
Like some olian strain,
Breathing at eventide serene and clear;
His voice is choked in dust, and on his eyes
The unbroken seal of peace and silence lies.
And from thy yearning heart,
Whose inmost core was warm with love for him,
A gladness must depart,
And those kind eyes with many tears be dim;
While lonely memories, an unceasing train,
Will turn the raptures of the past to pain.
Yet, mourner, while the day
Rolls like the darkness of a funeral by,
And hope forbids one ray
To stream athwart the grief-discolor'd sky;
There breaks upon thy sorrow's evening gloom
A trembling lustre from beyond the tomb.
'Tis from the better land!
There, bathed in radiance that around them springs,
Thy loved one's wings expand;
As with the choiring cherubim he sings,
And all the glory of that
God
can see,
Who said, on earth, to children, `Come to me.'
Mother, thy child is bless'd:
And though his presence may be lost to thee,
And vacant leave thy breast,
And miss'd, a sweet load from thy parent knee;
Though tones familiar from thine ear have pass'd,
Thou'lt meet thy first-born with his
Lord
at last.
THE END.